<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11052</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (8): Men who bucked the system - Anthony
Robinson criss-crosses small-town Poland and finds the spirit of enterprise
still very much alive and well
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OVER the past two years much of Poland has become what Harold Wilson, the
Labour prime minister during Britain's 'swinging sixties', contemptuously
dismissed as a 'candy floss economy'.
In place of the old heavy industry and bureaucratic distribution channels,
Polish entrepreneurs have revolutionised the wholesale and retail system,
formed thousands of private construction, transport, travel and other
service companies and stepped up industrial production by more than 25 per
cent a year.
Some, like Andrzej Czernecki, a senator for the Beer Lovers' Party who runs
a medical equipment plant in Warsaw, make internationally competitive
high-tech equipment. But most produce the 'thousand-and-one little things'
from chocolate biscuits to bath plugs which the central planners forgot.
A week spent criss-crossing small-town Poland as well as the big industrial
areas showed the spirit of enterprise alive and well, but frustrated by the
government's slowness in creating a framework for business.
Many are also worried in case unemployment and growing income differences
bring a return to the politics of envy, and the stifling of
entrepreneurship.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
INDICATORS OF PRIVATE SECTOR DEVELOPMENT
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                    1989     1990     1991*
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Private sector share of:
  GDP**                             28.4     34.7     40.0
Employment
  Including private agriculture     47.2     49.9     50.0
  Excluding private agriculture     31.1     33.6     33.2
External trade
  Total                                       8.6     28.4
  Exports                                     4.8     14.4
  Imports                                    14.4     42.2
Investment                          35.3     41.3
Production
  Industry                          16.2     17.4     19.4
  Construction                      25.5     31.0     43.0
  Trade                             59.5     63.7     75.0
  Transport                          6.8      9.9     12.0
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
* Projected. ** 1984 constant prices
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Central Statistical Office
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11053</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (11): A man of diverse parts - Profile of
Maciej Skarbonkiewicz Of Bydgoscz - Anthony Robinson criss-crosses
small-town Poland and finds the spirit of enterprise still very much alive
and well
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE president of the Plexis precision engineering company in Bydgoszcz,
Maciej Skarbonkiewicz, runs his diversified enterprise from an elegant
panelled office attached to his precision plastic extrusion die factory. He
started building his company in the early 1980s after studying English in
England for two years. In 10 years he has built the company up to a Dollars
4m a year turnover, adapting quickly to changed circumstances. Latterly, he
has built an atelier to produce high-quality, women's fashion clothing in
the attic of the die factory and branched out into importing liqueurs, and
consumer electronics. He has also entered a joint venture with OKT of
Germany, renting the storage hall of a nearby state-owned bakery to produce
a wide variety of plastic household products.
The imported German machines, easily serviceable by the skilled engineers
from the Plexis factory, run 24 hours a day producing the kind of bright,
cheap kitchen utensils simply unobtainable in Polish and eastern European
shops a few years ago.
This summer he will start producing high quality plastic garden furniture
under an agreement with Flair Plaisir of Holland. 'We have developed many
legs, to help us keep afloat in fast changing times. But the most difficult
thing is to build up capital when interest rates are so high and government
policies keep changing all the time.'
He worries that few in government have any idea of the real needs of
businessmen. He plans to enter parliament with the Liberal Congress Party,
whose leader Jan Krzyzstof Bielecki found himself up against a rubber wall
when he tried to close loss-making state enterprises.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11054</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (10): Lessons in Polish business - Anthony
Robinson criss-crosses small-town Poland and finds the spirit of enterprise
still very much alive and well
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PACIFIC-TORUN, a joint venture between the Baring company of San Francisco
and the Torun city council, is another food company expanding fast to
satisfy the new market for good quality foods.
But the US shareholder recently faced an uphill task to persuade the
cash-strapped town council to accept adilution of its sharein recognition of
a Dollars 4.5m investment by the US partner which would greatlyincrease
capacity and profitability.
The municipality, whose contribution to the joint venture was the land and
the factory, wanted as much profit as possible as quickly as possible. While
understanding that investment in new plant by the US partner would raise
future profits it was reluctant to see its overall share in the company drop
from 49 to around 20 per cent.
Without the investment, however, the plant would soon have been unable to
compete against imports and upgraded local producers.
For the US shareholder, this provided valuable experience of the the
non-economic, cultural and political factors which can make investment in
Poland a tricky business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11055</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (12): 'Big Bang' is a damp squib - The
privatisation programme has been bogged down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW GOWERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POLAND may insist that it wants 'big bang' privatisation, but all it has
produced thus far is a protracted whimper.
The country's much-heralded Mass Privatisation Programme (MPP), conceived as
an effort to kick-start the transfer of large state enterprises into private
hands, was supposed to be well advanced by now. Instead, it has been bogged
down for months in legalistic quibbling and political disagreement. And
while the government is trying to get the process moving by issuing
invitations to western companies it wants to involve, it could still be
knocked off course by an adverse vote in parliament.
The MPP - an ingeniously complex scheme under which up to 400 of the more
attractive state-owned companies are to be parcelled up and transferred to
investment funds managed by western banks and finance houses - admittedly
represents only part of the government's privatisation efforts. But it was
designed to be the showcase. Western economists, private Polish businessmen
and government officials all worry that with the loss of momentum in its
mass scheme, Poland is in danger of squandering a key opportunity to
transform its economy.
'Although efforts at liberalising and stabilising the Polish economy have
been largely successful, privatisation, especially of the large enterprises,
lags dangerously,' wrote Jeffrey Sachs, the Harvard professor who has
advised Poland and a number of other eastern European countries on their
reforms, in a recent article in Scientific American. 'This is the nation's
key problem: unremedied, it could lead to the return of profound economic
instability.'
Poland's present difficulties should be seen in perspective. Its original
plans to sell off half of all state-owned assets within three years always
seemed over-optimistic. But it did make remarkable progress early on -
particularly in rapidly selling off about 100,000 small- and medium-sized
retail and wholesale stores previously owned by local authorities. Around 80
per cent of Poland's shops have been privatised over the past two years, and
well over 40 per cent of Polish imports are now handled by private traders.
And the government is still disposing of a steady trickle of industrial
companies, either through public share offerings, through direct sales to
foreign 'trade' investors, or by liquidation and sale of their assets to
workforces or other buyers.
Nevertheless, the sums being raised by these means are still rather small.
Last year for example, according to the Ministry of Ownership Changes, trade
sales raised an estimated Dollars 150m; and while the hope is to treble the
total or more this year, nobody is predicting a quantum leap. Around 30 more
sales to foreign investors - including cement factories, paper and pulp
manufacturers, breweries and food processors - are under discussion. The
ministry is talking of making 50 to 60 trade sales this year, out of a total
of 209 companies on offer, as well as selling stakes in three Polish banks.
Recently, there has also been progress in bringing foreign investors into
Poland's heavier industries such as car manufacturing - with the memorandum
of understanding between the Polish government and General Motors providing
for assembly of Opel cars in Warsaw - and power generation. Still, the
privatisation process has not yet made great inroads into the state assets
that really matter. There are several reasons for this. One is that large
parts of the Polish state sector are simply not profitable. Another
explanation lies in the extraordinarily complex procedures involved.
To prepare a state enterprise for privatisation through a trade sale, public
offering or participation in the mass programme, it first has to be
transformed into a corporation with stock controlled by the Ministry of
Ownership Changes. This process, known in Poland as 'commercialisation',
requires the consent of workers' representatives, and such consent is not
always given because restructuring and job cuts are often a prelude to
privatisation.
Even when 'commercialisation' takes place, there is no guarantee that the
management of a state corporation will improve sufficiently to make it
attractive to investors. The idea is that in a state-owned joint stock
company, workers' councils should not have such a decisive influence over
management. But in practice, that form of constraint tends to be replaced by
another. As one privatisation official put it: 'The change of status doesn't
seem to mean much. In fact the management of a commercialised corporation
tends to be more constrained by a politicised board of directors and by
ministry clerks.'
In effect, the government is trying to satisfy a number of disparate
objectives with its privatisation effort, and it shows. According to
ministry documents, it wants to use privatisation to: inject market forces
into the economy; improve the performance of enterprises; prevent the sale
of state assets to foreign investors at unduly low prices; generate funds
from the sale of enterprises; ensure a wide diffusion of ownership; provide
an effective system of corporate governance; start exchanging Poland's
foreign debt into equity in privatised enterprises; and meet the needs of
social justice. Arguably, these aims cannot all be met at once.
This is where the Mass Privatisation Programme was supposed to come in. It
was dreamed up as a mechanism for squaring the circle: for drawing in
western management expertise without provoking accusations that the
government was selling its family silver to foreigners. The trouble is
twofold: it is proving complicated to implement, and the politicians are
showing signs of dragging their feet.
The scheme - prepared by the ministry with the assistance of S G Warburg,
the London merchant bank, and formally unveiled in December - is eventually
expected to involve up to 400 state factories, accounting for some 25 per
cent of the country's industrial sales and 12 per cent of total employment.
The government wants to transfer 60 per cent of the equity of these
companies to a number of closed-end investment funds known as National
Wealth Management Funds; of the remainder, 30 per cent would continue to be
held by the Polish government and up to 10 per cent given to employees.
These groups, the first of which, running up to 200 enterprises, are
supposed to be set up in the autumn - would have Polish chairmen and partly
Polish boards, but would be managed by western banks and other financial
institutions for a fee. They would subsequently be privatised, with shares
in them distributed for a nominal sum to every Polish citizen over 18. Over
time, the authorities would have initiated a Polish version of popular
capitalism, with a batch of well-managed companies traded on an active
Warsaw stock exchange and enriching the portfolios of a new breed of local
institutional investors.
'This is really very innovative, it hasn't been tested anywhere in the
world,' enthuses an adviser to the privatisation ministry. 'It's a logical
combination of local possibilities with ideas from western capital markets.'
So much for the theory. In practice, the process has yet to get off the
ground. Although the initial announcement attracted lively interest from
some 50 potential fund managers, the launch date has repeatedly slipped as
the government has hesitated to put it to parliament. At the end of March,
Warburg's contract with the government to assist with the scheme expired,
and the UK's Knowhow Fund, which was funding the project, refused to provide
another injection of cash unless it received a letter from Mr Jan Olszewski,
the prime minister, formally restating his government's commitment to the
MPP.
As a result, Mr Tomasz Gruszecki, the privatisation minister, has had to
write what amounts to a holding letter to his potential western partners,
inviting them to tender but warning them that at a later stage the
government or the parliament might change the terms. It remains to be seen
how many western banks and fund managers are bold enough to wade into such
shifting sands.
To some exasperated Polish businessmen, and to outside observers, it looks
as if the mass privatisation programme, far from eliminating red tape, could
continue to tie the government in great knots of it for some time to come.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11056</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (7): Survivor prospers - Profile of
Zbigniew Socha Of Brodnica - Anthony Robinson criss-crosses small-town
Poland and finds the spirit of enterprise still very much alive and well
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BEFORE the Balcerowicz plan came into effect in January 1990, Brodnica, a
small market town near Bydgoscz founded by the Teutonic knights in the 12th
century, boasted 700 small private enterprises and shops. Only 230 still
exist.
But those which do have demonstrated their durability under harsh, and often
unpredictable, economic and political circumstances.
Zbigniew Socha, the 41-year-old owner-manager of ZSiM engineering company,
is one of the survivors. After slowly building up production in a converted
glasshouse full of second-hand machines behind his smart front office, he
saw his order book for simple metal bending machines melt away in 1990 as
customers, mainly state-owned enterprises, revoked their contracts in the
face of sky-high interest rates and falling demand.
After months desperately seeking new clients and new products he finally
received a European Community loan to build a bakery but was unable to equip
it when interest rates, linked to domestic Polish rates, rose to new highs
in early 1991.
In the nick of time he found a German joint venture partner and began making
illuminated advertising panels, using cheap Polish labour to assemble panels
from imported aluminium and plastic.
He also found German and Danish partners to market his metal-bending
machines throughout the EC and Scandinavia and set up a joint venture in
Minsk to produce wood-cutting machinery.
Now his 35-man business is divided 50-50 between panels and simple
metal-bending and wood-planing machines with 70 per cent of production for
export. 'But my German partners know my costs down to the nearest pfennig,
and they won't let me raise my prices even though they sell at a 650 per
cent mark-up,' he complains.
In the long run, he is convinced that economic recovery in the former Soviet
republics will provide an important market for Polish companies. But right
now he concedes 'the quality of the Minsk machines is terrible. We suggested
they start with 10 machines and then build up. But they decided to order
enough parts from various local factories to make 1,000 machines'.
When the parts came, however, nothing fitted and they could only assemble 20
working machines. 'Now I have nine people there helping to sort out the
mess. I don't want to get a bad name for our products. But they kept us
alive by sending cheap basic parts for the frame of our machines and that
helped us to keep our costs low,' Mr Socha said.
In spite of sleepless nights and long hours, Mr Socha is determined to
remain an entrepreneur and be his own boss. 'I have no ambition to become a
Rockefeller. This is not the time for ambitious schemes, but I do want to
keep running my own small business.'
What he worries about is non-payment or delayed payment from customers, the
difficulty of raising credit and the unpredictable changes in government
economic policy.
'What we need is a decent banking system and modest government that sets
clear rules and enforces the law,' he says. 'But it is over four months
since the elections and we still don't even know what the government's
economic strategy is.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11057</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (9): Veteran capitalist - Profile of Henryk
Winkler Of Katowice - Anthony Robinson criss-crosses small-town Poland and
finds the spirit of enterprise still very much alive and well
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THIS country of instant entrepreneurs Henryk Winkler is a veteran. Like
his father, who was deprived of his property and sentenced to 18 years' jail
in 1957 as a capitalist parasite, he has always been a private businessman.
He started with a small fish-curing business in 1970. But the past two years
open encouragement of free enterprise have given him a free rein to do what
he does best - which is to create wealth.
First, he developed his fish-curing business and built it into a wholesale
operation which turned over Dollars 19m last year. Then, in co-operation
with his Hamburg-based brother, he paid Dollars 1.5m at an auction for a
state-owned bakery 15km outside Katowice, the capital of heavily
industrialised Upper Silesia.
Like so many of the plants built with foreign loans during the regime of Mr
Edward Gierek in the 1970s, it was used only at a fraction of its potential
capacity. Even now, after heavy investment in German and Italian machines to
produce and package chocolate biscuits, swiss rolls, potato chips and other
luxury food items, including coffee, the bakery still uses only one third of
its production potential.
Two years ago, such products were virtually unobtainable in Poland's
cheerless and empty shops. Since then the market has been flooded with
luxury imports - more than Dollars 4bn was spent on consumer goods out of
the total Dollars 14bn spent on imports last year.
Winkler is one of a growing number of consumer companies which have been
quick to spot a profitable opportunity in substituting for imports by
producing similar high quality goods from a lower cost Polish base.
But pioneering the return of private enterprise has not been easy. Four
months after raising the equivalent of Dollars 1.5m from Polish banks to
finance the purchase of his bakery a combination of high domestic inflation
and soaring interest rates doubled the zloty cost of the investment.
Mr Winkler then switched to foreign funding. But in the meantime the zloty
fell 47 per cent against the dollar. The currency factor, when added to the
12 per cent nominal interest rate on the loan, translated into a total 59
per cent annual servicing charge.
Poland's cheap labour costs are also often more apparent than real. 'I know
the unemployment problem around here and when I bought the bakery I took on
the people as well. But that means I employ 230 people where a Swedish
competitor using the same equipment would employ only 30,' he says with a
shrug.
Even so, Mr Winkler reckons that his potato chips are 50 per cent cheaper
than those of imports and costs will come down further when he manages to
triple output with only minor new investment and the same labour force.
Meanwhile, he complains: 'I have to spend more time worrying about changes
in tariffs, duties and interest rates than developing production'.
Last March, for example, when he imported a German food machine, he had to
pay an import duty of DM225,000. 'Since then the government has abolished
duties on these machines so my competitors are able to buy them more
cheaply. I wish they would make up their minds.'
Since buying the factory he has also seen his property tax payments rise
from 80m zlotys to 450m zlotys as the cash-strapped local authority zeroed
in on the prosperous-looking new venture. 'I don't mind. I can see how
desperately they need the money. But my satisfaction is in producing. Ijust
want the government to let me get on with the job and not throw obstacles in
the way.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11058</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (5): Principal anchor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BUDGET deficit has become the principal 'anchor' of financial policy,
replacing the dollar/zloty exchange rate which played this role during the
'heroic' first stage of the Balcerowicz economic stabilisation plan after
January 1990.
After informal talks with the IMF in March the government announced that the
deficit would be kept to within 65,500bn zlotys or 5 per cent of GDP,
compared to 31,000bn zlotys or 3.3 per cent of GDP in 1991. Reducing the
budget deficit to 5 per cent of GDP required substantial cuts to pensions,
unemployment pay and public sector salaries and assumes no further fall in
industrial production. Other budget assumptions include a 3 per cent rise in
hard currency exports to Dollars 13.5bn and a slightly smaller, 2.5 per cent
rise in imports to Dollars 13.4bn. It also assumes real money supply growth
will not exceed 8 per cent.
On the revenue side the budget assumes a 60.3 per cent increase, although
that includes a provision for 10,000bn zlotys from privatisation receipts
which could be over-optimistic. Spending is expected to grow by nearly 63
per cent.
The government is hoping to broaden the tax base and modernise the taxation
system by introducing VAT and shifting the burden to personal income taxes
and consumption taxes. Until now, around 80 per cent of tax revenue has come
from state-owned enterprises, many of which are now technically bankrupt.
The zloty, which is now measured against a trade-weighted basket of five
currencies, has been steadily depreciating on a crawling peg basis since May
1991.
It is expected to depreciate faster this year in order to compensate for
domestic inflation, curb imports and generate the higher export earnings
needed to service foreign debt.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11059</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (4): People are fed up with the empty
promises - There is a crying need for political leadership
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW GOWERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF THERE is one word which sums up the political mood of Poland today, it is
disenchantment. Poles of all social strata grumble about the depressed
economy and the squeeze on their living standards. Most of all, they are fed
up with the empty promises and petty manoeuvrings of their politicians, who
seem incapable of charting a coherent or candid path through the present
economic pain. There is a crying need for leadership to deal with the
manifold political, industrial and financial challenges facing the country -
but no-one capable of providing it.
The fruits of this disenchantment were plainly visible in last October's
parliamentary elections and their aftermath. Only 42.5 per cent of Poles
even bothered to vote, and the parliament that emerged, under Poland's
complex form of proportional representation, was impossibly fragmented
between a multiplicity of small parties; even the largest party, the
centre-left Democratic Union led by Mr Tadeusz Mazowiecki, the former
Solidarity prime minister, gained little more than 12 per cent of the vote,
and the former communists of the Democratic Left Alliance were uncomfortably
close behind.
Not surprisingly, it took several weeks of discussions in smoke-filled rooms
for a government to emerge: a ragbag coalition of Catholic and peasant
parties, led by the one-time Solidarity lawyer, Mr Jan Olszewski, who since
he took office in December has found himself constantly having to patch
together slender parliamentary majorities for the minutest of political
decisions.
It is scarcely a government of conviction; if it has a sense of common
purpose, it stems mainly from the almost unbearably tight constraints on its
freedom of manoeuvre imposed by the need to frame economic policies
acceptable to the international financial institutions. Even that much was
in doubt during the coalition's turbulent early weeks, when it lost its
finance minister as a result of disagreements over budgetary policy.
The message has not been lost on ordinary voters, as research by the
government's own opinion polling centre shows. Asked recently whether the
government had a chance of leading the country out of its present
predicament, 50 per cent of those polled replied 'definitely not'.
In the words of Mr Jan Krzysztof Bielecki, the leader of the Liberal
Democratic Congress who preceded Mr Olszewski as prime minister: 'The mood
in Poland is that everything is getting worse because there is no very clear
vision of the future. Also there is no feeling among the people that the
executive is determined to push ahead with decisions. You have to show
people that the decision-making process is working.'
Poland's essential problem is that it lacks a real centre of power following
the ousting of the communists and the acrimonious splintering of the
anti-communist Solidarity alliance over the past three years; it lacks
someone prepared to take responsibility for the economic transformation
whose future is now in the balance, or to explain to the populace the costs
and benefits of reform. The scale of the tasks facing legislators is
immense: they include passing the austere budget required to meet IMF
criteria, agreeing to enabling legislation that will cut back welfare
payments, framing electoral reform and a package of constitutional changes,
and ratifying Poland's precious association agreement with the European
Community.
By the same token, at a time when unemployment is rising rapidly and the
collapse or restructuring of state industry will send it higher still, there
is great scope for demagogic politicians minded to obstruct change.
And although there is a broad consensus in Poland on the need to embrace
reform as a means of gaining EC membership, politicians that have other
ideas are by no means silent: the post-communists and the right-wing
Confederation for an Independent Poland, which stands ready with its blend
of nationalism and populist economics to exploit popular discontent.
'It's hard to say who's in the government and who's in the opposition,' says
Mr Jerzy Urban, the former spokesman of the Jaruzelski communist party
regime who is now a successful and wealthy magazine publisher. 'Everyone's
in opposition, but we no longer know who they're in opposition to.'
His complaint is echoed frequently among the intellectuals and activists
whose combined efforts made Solidarity such a potent force in the demise of
communism. And many of them think they know whom to blame: the man who led
the movement and who is now ensconced in Warsaw's Belweder palace, President
Lech Walesa.
Much of what is said about Mr Walesa by the Warsaw intelligentsia may well
be unfair. According to the cynical version of events, he deliberately
presided over the fragmentation of Solidarity to bolster his own bid for the
presidency in 1990; then, when he had attained that goal, he tried to use
his position to divide and rule, undermining the government in the run-up to
last autumn's parliamentary elections.
What is certainly true is that Mr Walesa has made a particular contribution
to the sense of unreality that permeates Polish politics today. For one
thing, he has yet to clarify how his role fits in with that of other parts
of the body politic. Partly by his own design at the time of the 1989
round-table talks between the communist regime and the opposition, the
presidency's powers are not strongly defined. As a result, Mr Walesa has
found himself flailing around on the sidelines of politics, acting in effect
as a sort of unlicensed opposition to his own government.
'The president has turned out to be so competent that he has managed to pick
fights with virtually everyone,' says Mr Adam Michnik, the former Solidarity
activist who now edits one of Poland's leading dailies, Gazeta Wyborcza,
which last week published a scathing six-page attack on the president. 'He
has fallen victim to his own political strategy - the war at the top,
dividing the parties. He won that battle, but that was the moment at which
he lost the war.'
The problems Mr Walesa can create have been evident in his often unhelpful
interventions over economic policy. The president made a series of
extravagant promises of 'jam tomorrow' on the campaign stump last year as he
sought to confront the bizarre populist challenger for the presidency, Mr
Stan Tyminski.
Even now he continues to suggest unrealistic ways of producing handouts for
ordinary Poles - most recently, a scheme to provide every citizen with
interest-free credit to the tune of Dollars 10,000 for the purchase of state
property or shares in state industries.
'It's true that people have to be given some hope, to be shown some light at
the end of the tunnel,' sniffs the former prime minister, Mr Mazowiecki.
'But it can't be done on the basis of multiplying miraculous solutions that
have no substance at all.'
In recent weeks, Mr Walesa's search for a role has led him into potentially
more dangerous waters: a struggle with the civilian government over control
of the 300,000-strong armed forces, in which the defence minister, Mr Jan
Parys, accused members of the president's staff of attempting 'to overthrow
democracy with the aid of the army'. It was not clear at the time of writing
how this issue would be resolved, but it has thrown the whole power play
between Mr Walesa and the government into sharp relief.
The political system and the politicians, then, have conspired to bring
about a sort of institutional paralysis. If the necessary decisions are to
be taken, something will have to give. One way forward would be to stage
another parliamentary election. But Poles are already weary enough of
politics, and few would favour another campaign; in any case, there is no
guarantee that another poll would produce a very different result.
Some senior politicians, including the prime minister, have been working to
come up with their own response to the public mood: Mr Olszewski has been
talking to a number of other parties, including Mr Mazowiecki's Democratic
Union, for some weeks with a view to forming a 'grand coalition' that would
agree to push controversial measures, including laws implementing the
budget, changes to the welfare system and political reforms, through
parliament quickly.
Such a move would be an important step forward, but it would not be assured
of success: the danger is that it would simply transfer disagreements in
parliament to within the ruling coalition, and that the paralysis would
persist. Creation of a grand coalition could also heighten tensions between
the Catholic parties already in the government and secular-minded members of
the Democratic Union over the role of the Church, a highly sensitive issue
in post-communist Poland. Last week, the prospect of such a government
seemed to recede as inter-party talks broke down.
The alternative scenario, and one which worries more than a few Polish
politicians, is that the president might take matters into his own hands. On
numerous occasions after last October's elections Mr Walesa vowed to appoint
himself as his own prime minister; at other times he has spoken of trying to
rule by decree. Such a shift towards a more or less authoritarian course is
a possibility that has not gone away. Says Mr Mazowiecki, one of the wiser
voices on the Warsaw political scene: 'This would not be a dictatorship, but
a kind of half-democracy. I wouldn't like to see Poland being in the
vanguard of this sort of development in central and eastern Europe.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11060</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (6): Banking on a reduction agreement -
Debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WILL soon be a whole generation since communist Poland, then led by Mr
Edward Gierek, and petrodollar-flush western banks went on a more than
Dollars 20bn lending and spending spree. Much of the money was spent on
industrial modernisation which never generated the export earnings needed to
service the resulting debt.
Twenty years later, however, western observers are now looking with the
greatest interest at the plants which were built or refurbished in the
1970s. One example is the Pollena detergent plant in Bydgoszcz, bought last
year for Dollars 20m by Unilever. The plant is now in private hands but the
foreign debt will continue to burden Poles into the next century.
Partial relief has come with last year's unprecedented debt reduction
agreement which covered 50 per cent of Poland's official hard currency debt
owed to 17 governments represented by the Paris Club. Bilateral agreements
arising out of that accord are now in their final stages. Talks have been
completed with 13 governments and still in train with a further four of
which Italy, which is owed Dollars 1.64bn, is the largest creditor.
The Paris Club agreement, however, still leaves Poland owing some Dollars
30bn to the 17 and awaiting a further 20 per cent reduction in 1994. But
this will take place only if Poland retains IMF approval for its economic
programmes.
The next task is to wring a debt reduction agreement out of the 500 or so
western commercial banks who are owed a further Dollars 11.4bn. Of this,
Dollars 1.8bn arises from interest arrears which have piled up since the
autumn of 1989 when Poland ceased to service its commercial debt.
Ideally Warsaw would like a debt reduction from the banks to match their
Paris Club agreement which gave a 50 per cent reduction of net present value
of the outstanding accumulated debt. The hope is the reduction will be
accomplished on the lines of the Brady plan. This could include debt
buybacks financed by IMF and World Bank funds as well as from Poland's own
reserves, and conversion of debt into medium-term bonds as well as debt
forgiveness.
The banks are unhappy about the demand. They have not said no but suggested
that Poland should pay Dollars 500m towards interest arrears before serious
talks can start. A full meeting of the so-called London Club is expected in
June once parliament has passed this year's budget and the agreement with
the IMF, suspended last year when Poland failed to meet its targets, is back
in place.
Mr Andrzej Olechowski, the new finance minister has decided to take personal
charge of the negotiations. It will be up to him to decide what to do about
the banks' demand for the up-front payment.
Certainly if he decides to make the payment it will have to come from
Poland's foreign currency reserves. These stood at Dollars 6.5bn at the end
of 1991 and are set to grow by Dollars 666m this year. This is because this
year's budget only allows Dollars 900m to be spent on servicing debt while
another Dollars 600m will come as a loan from the foreign currency reserves.
That should cover Poland's current debt service commitments which are
written into the planned balance of payments as Dollars 1.16bn in interest
and Dollars 398m in capital payments. These compare with the Dollars 888m in
interest payments and Dollars 456m in capital which was repaid in 1991.
However, a deal this year with the banks will be a mixed blessing. It should
increase much needed credit flows into Poland but will put pressure on the
country's official financial outlays in a year when the budget is tighter
than ever before.
Politically, as Mr Ryszard Michalski who handles the finance ministry's
foreign operations notes, 'we are having to explain why we are paying money
to the banks when we lack the means for hospitals, schools and pensions'.
Ms Dorota Wysznikiewicz, an economist, has meanwhile come up with some grim
predictions if things go wrong on the debt front. Her most pessimistic
scenario, published in the Gazeta Bankowa recently, assumes that a mere 10
per cent of export earnings a year is spent on debt servicing, that no
further reductions can be had from western governments or banks and that GDP
in the 1990s would grow by a mere 1 per cent annually.
On this basis she calculates the foreign debt in 2000 would reach Dollars
91.4bn or five times that year's export earnings to give a debt service
ratio of 107.5 per cent.
At best, if Poland were to get the debt reductions it is asking for and
devote 20 per cent of export earnings to debt servicing in the 1990s against
a background of 2 or 3 per cent GDP growth, then debt would still be Dollars
30.4bn, 85 per cent of annual end-of-century exports but producing a
manageable debt service ratio of 23.9 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11061</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (2): Little room to manoeuvre - The fragile
economic situation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER months of increasingly irrelevant debate in Poland about the virtues
of more or less expansionary monetary and economic policies the World Bank
issued a report on the Polish economy earlier this year which made brutally
clear how limited the real room for manoeuvre was and is.
'The fiscal situation has worsened to the point where hyperinflation is an
immediate danger. Unemployment has reached a level that cannot be tolerated
for long. Investment in infrastructure and human resource development has
shrunk to levels that, if maintained, will undermine the prospects for
sustained growth,' the report says.
In blunt words addressed to politicians even more than economists it added:
'None of the long-term supply side reforms stands any chance of success if
Poland slides back into hyperinflation, or if its economy continues to
decline as dramatically as it has in the last two years.'
At the heart of the problem lies the nature of the state-dominated economy
inherited from 45 years of Soviet-style central planning. In spite of the
explosion of private enterprise, concentrated mainly in retailing, trade and
construction where only small amounts of capital are required, the bulk of
economic activity is still carried out by state or municipally-owned
enterprises.
Privatisation, in a country where private savings were virtually eliminated
by hyper-inflation and the 1990 economic stabilisation programme, is proving
more difficult than anticipated. Allowing bankrupt state enterprises to
close is also difficult when entire communities and their infrastructure
often depend on one or two large plants where workers' councils exert strong
influence on management unversed in the ways of the market.
But the continuing existence of large numbers of bankrupt state enterprises
exerts large negative pressures on the economy, adding to inflation and
absorbing productive resources which could be better used elsewhere.
Thousands of state-owned enterprises have survived by not paying their bills
and building up inter-enterprise credits or debts to a banking system
overburdened with non-performing and non-collectable loans and in need of
reform and re-financing.
The overall picture is not quite as bleak as suggested by the nearly 40 per
cent drop in industrial output and 20 per cent decline in official GDP over
the past two years. The official statistics fail to take fully into account
dynamic growth in the private sector and much of the output no longer
produced by the state sector was of poor quality or unsellable. Furthermore,
some state-owned enterprises have managed to increase their exports to the
west and cut costs by shedding labour and selling assets. Even so the
overall crisis of the state sector is the crucial factor behind a fiscal
crisis which underlines the narrow margin of manoeuvre for policy-makers.
This is because the 8,000 state sector enterprises traditionally provided
around 80 per cent of government revenue. The collapse in their
profitability caused government income to plummet from 44.5 per cent of GDP
to 33.6 per cent last year. At the same time, unemployment rose from
virtually zero to more than 2.1m people, or 11 per cent of the workforce.
Social security costs were further bloated by highly advantageous early
retirement and disability pension regulations. The scissors effect of
declining revenue and rising spending risked pushing the budget deficit up
to 11 per cent of GDP this year if unchecked.
It was with this prospect in mind that the international institutions issued
their warnings about the dangers of hyperinflation - as well as their
strictures on the need for a better taxation system to bring the private
sector more securely into the tax net. The government is already shifting
the balance from income to consumption taxes: it plans to introduce a Value
Added Tax at the beginning of next year.
The signal that fiscal rectitude had taken priority over selective
stimulation of state industry, as originally advocated by the prime
minister, Mr Jan Olszewski, and his economic policy chief, Mr Jerzy
Eysymontt, came in March with the appointment as finance minister of Mr
Andrzej Olechowski.
After visiting Washington, Mr Olechowski pushed through cabinet a commitment
to social security and other spending cuts designed to keep the budget
deficit to a limit of 65,500bn zlotys or 5 per cent of GDP. Subsidies to
enterprises will be cut in real terms by 46 per cent to 1.7 per cent of GDP
and farmers, another vociferous group well represented in government, will
also see their aid further cut in real terms.
It will not be easy to keep to the new policy anchor, not least because the
projected tight rein on government spending will see a continuation of the
recession and a remorseless climb in unemployment. Morgan Guaranty recently
forecast a further 6 per cent decline in GDP this year accompanied by a rise
in unemployment to 17 per cent of the workforce against the background of
high inflation and a deteriorating current account deficit.
This is hard to swallow for a fragile coalition government which gained
power largely through its criticism of the allegedly tough monetary policies
associated with Mr Leszek Balcerowicz, finance minister in the first two
post-communist governments.
Mr Eysymontt, who was a leading critic of the former finance minister for
not paying sufficient attention to the impact of his policies on the state
enterprises, still hopes that growth in the construction, trade and service
sectors will help to bring the economy out of its tailspin. Ideally he would
like to see 1992 end as a year of zero growth and poised for recovery in
1993. But with a 14 per cent decline in output over the first two months of
this year he concedes that reaching this target 'will not be easy' in spite
of the boost to exports hoped for by allowing the exchange rate to fall more
closely in line with domestic inflation this year.
Real incomes actually rose last year in spite of the drop in GDP, largely
because the zloty did not depreciate less than last year's 60 per cent
inflation. The currency's appreciation against the dollar resulted in a
flood of western consumer imports, including more than 300,000 new or used
cars. This put further pressure on domestic producers and reinforced that
contrast between the glittering shops and depressed factories which is
proving so politically unsettling.
Mr Olechowski, who appears to have established a good working relationship
with Mr Eysymontt, has no illusions about the difficult economic times ahead
and fears that further cuts in government spending may be required. 'I can't
exclude that there'll be strikes, demands for higher wages, capital flight.
It could become a real problem. Then we might have to cut back further.'
Poland is already suffering a capital flight of several tens of millions of
dollars a month, he added, and will need substantial foreign funding to
finance the projected 5 per cent budget deficit and prevent the economy
falling further. 'We expect to finance about one third of the deficit from
the central bank and about a sixth from capital markets but we'll have to
get capital from abroad or we'll crowd out the private sector,' he warns.
Until now, in spite of last year's Paris Club agreement to write down over
50 per cent of the Dollars 33bn official debt, loan commitments of more than
Dollars 2bn by the World Bank and associate membership of the European
Community, post-communist Poland has not been able to attract private equity
investment consonant with its strategic importance.
The danger, underlined by the World Bank, is that without greater efficiency
in the public sector and higher investment in the private sector the
recession will deepen to create politically destabilising unemployment and
levels of debt in the public sector which would make enterprises impossible
to privatise. The next few months will be critical.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11062</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (3): Reconstruction is a priority - The
banking system
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI and ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CLEARING the Polish banks of the bad loans andnon-performing debts inherited
from the old communist system and building up a modern banking system is
high on the list of Polish priorities.
Somewhere between 20 and 40 per cent of the assets of the commercial banking
system are believed to be non-performing and confidence will remain low
until balance sheets are reconstructed and banks re-capitalised.
The first signs of change came in 1988 when the decisionwas taken to hive
off nine 'commercial' banks from the Narodowy Bank Polski (NBP), the central
bank, and encourage them to compete for corporate and individual custom.
That decision left the NBP, now headed by Ms Hanna Gronkiewicz Waltz, to
concentrate on strengthening its central banking role. Ms Waltz, an academic
specialising in banking law, was chosen by President Lech Walesa, and
eventually approved by parliament in March after an initial rejection,
largely because he thought she was the right person to put an end to a
series of banking scandals, such as last year's ART-B affair.
This involved the raising of large loans on the basis of fraudulent credit
guarantees. The affair, which revealed grave weaknesses in the bank
supervisory system, led to the removal and subsequent arrest on charges of
negligence of the then central bank chairman, Mr Grzegorz Wojtowicz.
The NBP is now entrusted with the usual central bank functions. It licenses
new banks, supervises the system and maintains monetary and credit control
through its refinancing facility and through minimum reserve requirements
and credit ceilings.
The most difficult task is building up the commercial banking system around
the core formed by the nine commercial banks which formerly acted as the
provincial branches of the central bank. Two of them, Bank Slaski in
Katowice and the Wielkopolski Bank Kredytowy in Poznan, are to be privatised
this year. The World Bank is concentrating the bulk of the Dollars 200m set
aside for developing Poland's financial institutions on improving the
efficiency and skills of these core banks.
An important role is also played by the state-owned specialist banks,
especially Bank Handlowy which still handles the greatest share of Poland's
trade financing, and the PKO SA which has in the past been the repository of
Poles' private hard currency savings.
This sector also contains the PKO BP bank which traditionally attracted the
bulk of domestic savings but is burdened with the legacy of once heavily
subsidised housing loans which now threaten to engulf it.
The Food Economy Bank (BGZ), which traditionally channelled loans to farmers
under the simple communist banking system, is also now listing under the
burden of farm debt which continues to rise while real incomes remain at
1989 levels. The BGZ also once co-ordinated hundreds of small local
co-operative banks but some of these are now striking out on their own.
The youngest of the state-owned specialist banks - Bank Rozwoju Exportu
(BRE), set up in 1986 to finance export-related projects - is due to be
privatised this year.
The inherited problems of the state sector demand a huge investment in
training and re-equipment. Training is being provided under a 'twinning'
arrangement initiated by the International Finance Corporation and financed
by the World Bank loan. Banco San Paolo from Turin, for example, is twinned
with Powszechny Bank Kredytowy (PBK) in Warsaw and banks from the UK,
Ireland and most other EC countries are involved in similar links.
Re-equipment and bank modernisation is rapidly becoming big business for
western computer and equipment makers such as ICL and for telecommunications
specialists. The risks involved in running a banking system without speedy
telecommunications to help clearing and other transactions were dramatically
underlined by the ART-B scandal where billions of zlotys were simultaneously
deposited in different banks around the country, taking advantage of slow
communications.
To bring Poland up to international standards Telbank, a company set up by
the NBP, the Polish Banking Union and several individual banks, will link 17
cities and handle interbank transactions. It will operate alongside NBP's
own wire to expedite settlements in a new clearing system.
The organisation of the new commercial banking system around the nine core
banks inevitably links the banking system to the fate of the state-owned
industries. The divisions are geographic which means that Katowice-based
Bank Slaski, for example, has most of Poland's distressed steel and coal
industry on its books while the Krakow-based Bank Przemyslowo Handlowy is
saddled with the cash-strapped arms factories concentrated in the
south-east.
In 1990, when Poland embarked on its shock anti-inflation programme with
high real interest rates, it was those companies which had been investing in
modern equipment who were suddenly caught and hit hardest with a soaring
debt service bill and little prospect of covering it.
It was a process the banks found themselves helpless to prevent. They did
not have the expertise to advise the companies or the political clout to cut
credit to ailing enterprises and risk accelerating unemployment. On the
contrary, at times they found themselves under pressure from sections of
Poland's new Solidarity government to keep their debtors afloat.
Poland's pressing budget problems have also helped to obscure the situation.
Banks which sought to make reserves against bad debts were discouraged from
doing so by the tax authorities as this would have lowered taxable profits.
Instead unpaid interest was capitalised and presented in balance sheets as
'income accruing in future periods'. As such it was treated by the taxman as
a current profit and taxed accordingly.
The pressing need for tax income also acted as a powerful incentive to keep
loss-making enterprises alive because allowing them to go under would
eliminate them as a source of taxable 'paper' profits.
This year the situation is to change. The government, supported by the World
Bank, is working on a scheme to restructure bank and inter-company debts and
clear corporate balance sheets to allow the chronically indebted enterprises
to be identified and closed.
Enterprises will be obliged to formulate a business plan and commercial
banks, the Treasury, unpaid suppliers and other interested parties will sit
around a table and discuss it. If all agree that the enterprise has a future
the discussion will move on to discuss the modalities and details of debt
reduction, restructuring and, where appropriate, access to fresh loans.
If, on the other hand, the round table concludes that the enterprise is a
'basket case' the decision should be taken to close it. Appeals against the
decision, it is suggested, would be decided by a separate tribunal.
Loans of up to Dollars 300m from the World Bank would help finance the
scheme which looks good on paper but will require steady nerves on the part
of the government to implement. The first blow of the executioner's axe has
yet to fall on Poland's hopeless debtors. The credibility of bank reform
awaits that event.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11063</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Survey of Poland (1): Reforms hit turbulence - Poland's
ambitious drive to become a prosperous, capitalist democracy has run into
political problems. But the country remains basically stable, strategically
secure and strongly pro-European. In spite of its economic difficulties, it
boasts a dynamic entrepreneurial culture and a lively civil society which is
determined to succeed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY ROBINSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UPHILL nature of Poland's struggle to turn itself into a moderately
prosperous, tolerably democratic and stable member of the European Community
by the end of the decade has been underlined over the past six months by
economic retrenchment and political manoeuvering.
The goal remains clear. But all winter long Poles lived with a dispiriting
government crisis as inexperienced politicians, elected at last October's
first free elections since the Second World War, struggled to form a
government and draw up a budget consonant with the limited resources of the
post-communist state.
As feared, the elections, which were conducted on a complex proportional
representation system, returned a plethora of parties. In marked contrast to
the passionate interest with which Poles participated in the events which
led to the end of communist rule in summer 1989, only 42 per cent of the
electorate bothered to turn out. The outcome was a confusing and fragmented
parliament with 29 parties represented in the Sejm, the 460-seat lower house
of parliament.
Without a clear mandate from the electorate for any party or leader it was
two months before Mr Jan Olszewski, a former Solidarity lawyer representing
a right-wing Catholic party, managed to put together a coalition capable of
gathering enough support in parliament. He then spent much of his time
trying to put together a broad coalition capable of providing a stronger
political base for the painful economic sacrifices.
Such hopes were dashed last week when Mr Tadeusz Mazowiecki, the first
post-communist prime minister, and leader of the Democratic Union, the
largest single party, said the three opposition parties he represented in
the talks would not join the government. This left the government unsure of
its ability to push through parliament the cuts in social welfare spending
deemed essential to keep the budget on target and restrain inflation.
Worse, the blow to Mr Olszewski's government was accompanied by a fierce
press attack on President Lech Walesa which underlined the depth of the
political crisis facing the country. The attack in Gazeta Wyborcza, whose
editor Mr Adam Michnik is a former Solidarity stalwart, accused the
president of surrounding himself with advisers linked to the Soviet KGB and
being unable to rise to the level of his responsibilities.
The tension between President Walesa and most of his former Solidarity
allies, including the prime minister whose appointment he opposed,
underlines not only the fragility of Poland's post-communist institutions
but also the ambiguous relationship between the newly-elected parliament and
the president who was elected a year earlier.
The unresolved constitutional and political issues, partly inherited from
the communist period and partly a product of Mr Walesa's own complex
personality and leadership ambitions, have diverted attention from economic
and institutional problems and now threaten to aggravate them.
The economy is already 'at a crossroads', according to a recent World Bank
report. This underlined the deeper rooted structural weaknesses of the
public administration, banking, taxation and other structures as well as
drawing attention to more immediate budgetary pressures. It warned that
hyper-inflation could return without cuts in government spending and faster
progress towards the privatisation or closure of inefficient, loss-making
state enterprises.
Privatising the still largely state- or municipally-owned industrial sector
is proving much more difficult than expected. Cutting government spending
and closing bankrupt state companies has also been affected by the political
atmosphere and doubts over the government's ability to stick to tough
economic targets.
The result was a fast-rising budget deficit last year which faced the new
government with an unavoidable but painful need to cut spending, raise taxes
and revert to the tough monetarist policies which most of those who form the
newgovernment had critised during the election campaign.
The decision to bite the bullet came in mid-March after Mr Andrzej
Olechowski, one of Poland's most experienced trade and central bank
officials, became finance minister. After a quick visit to Washington for
informal talks with the IMF and the World Bank he came back to Warsaw to
secure government approval for a revamped budget. This established a limit
of 65,500bn zlotys, or 5 per cent of gross domestic product, to the
permissible budget deficit.
Mr Olechowski is now a key figure in the increasingly shaky government. In
effect he has made the deficit limit the principal anchor for economic and
financial policy. Domestic consumption will be cut back in favour of an
export-led recovery by allowing the zloty to devalue sufficiently to boost
export competitiveness and restrain imports.
Mr Olechowski's appointment reassured the international institutions whose
support is essential for Poland's reform programme. The World Bank, along
with other institutions such as its affiliate the International Finance
Corporation, has earmarked well over Dollars 2bn for Polish projects. But
the bank and the IMF need reassurance that government spending is under
control before the IMF agrees to resume payments from its three-year,
Dollars 1.7bn extended loan facility.
A green light from the IMF, in turn, should open the way for negotiations
later this year with the London Club of commercial bank creditors. Here,
Poland is seeking a reduction of the Dollars 11bn bank debt similar to the
50 per cent reduction in the Dollars 33bn official debt already agreed last
year with the Paris Club.
The close attention to Polish events being paid by western institutions
reflects the awareness of Poland's strategic importance as the largest of
the former Soviet satellites, and the post-communist country which embarked
most enthusiastically on market-orientated reform in 1990. Poland's success
or failure will have a profound effect on the stability of a region racked
by political uncertainty, ethnic strife and economic recession.
The omens are better than the present crisis would allow. In spite of the
current malaise this ethnically homogeneous country of 38m people remains
fundamentally stable. Most Poles are enjoying their regained liberties and
recognise that they are infinitely better off than their neighbours in the
former Soviet Union. They are also vividly aware of their good fortune in
escaping the ethnic tensions which have provoked such bloodshed in
Yugoslavia and which threaten the stability of other countries in the
region.
Ideally Poles would like to be fully-fledged members of Nato and the
European Community. But realistically they acknowledge that the collapse of
Soviet power and this year's association agreement with the EC have given
them greater security and independence than they have enjoyed for decades,
if not centuries.
Living conditions have also improved substantially for many, in spite of the
seemingly catastrophic collapse in state sector output over the past two
years. Decades of empty shops are just a bad memory while millions have
found new jobs in the most dynamic entrepreneurial culture of post-communist
Europe.
All this, of course, has been watched enviously by Russian and other
reformers. The essence of a country poised between two worlds is well summed
up in a joke doing the Warsaw rounds. It tells of two travellers, one from
Paris and one from Moscow, who alight by mistake at Warsaw. The traveller
from Paris takes one look at the Stalinesque skyscraper and the crumbling
buildings and is convinced he has arrived at his final destination. The
traveller from Moscow - noting the new western cars, the cheerful new
restaurants and fully stocked shops - is convinced he has arrived in Paris.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11064</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A WEAKER financial rand boosted shares in companies with overseas income.
The overall index added 15 to 3,386, while the gold index rose 11 to 1,017.
Industrials put on 9 to 4,225. Anglos rose R1 to R111.75.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11065</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Arbitrage unwinding
breaks Nikkei's three-day gain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NEIL WEINBERG
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARBITRAGE unwinding and declines in the US on Friday pushed the Nikkei
average down in thin trading yesterday after three consecutive gains, writes
Neil Weinberg in Tokyo.
The 225-issue index lost 91.93 to 17,450.52 after reaching a day's high of
17,615.72 and a low of 17,301.08.
The Topix index of all first section shares eased 1.06 to 1,312.85, but
rises led declines by 510 to 448, with 171 issues unchanged. Volume fell to
200m shares from Friday's 300m. In London the ISE/Nikkei 50 index was off
0.02 at 1,071.12.
With the market trading at a premium to futures, investors took to selling
shares and buying futures to unwind arbitrage positions, pushing the index
to an intraday low in the first hour.
Prices then recovered on investment trust and pension fund buying, with
activity focused on large-capital and speculative issues, such as Mineba,
the day's most active stock, which rose Y8 to Y507.
The market largely shrugged off the weekend meeting of the Group of Seven
nations. The yen was mixed in spite of official statements in support of a
strengthening against other major currencies.
Mr Ross Purdie of SG Warburg Securities said: 'The G7 meetings are being
viewed from an exchange rate point of view or news of environment-related
initiatives. An external shock such as a swing in the yen or overseas stock
markets could have a very pronounced effect on Japanese stocks in this type
of trading.'
The government has recently announced a number of initiatives to support the
market: it is allowing the establishment of investment trusts that are
pooling corporate funds for repurchase of their own stocks, and has
announced a rise in the proportion of national pension funds allotted for
stock investments over the next few months.
There was some bargain hunting of blue chips later in the day by domestic
pension funds and investment trusts. Leading electricals remained in the
spotlight, with TDK adding Y90 at Y4,450 and NEC firming Y10 to Y1,040.
Pharmaceuticals also fared well, with Daiichi gaining Y40 to Y1,480 and
Yamanouchi advancing Y20 to Y2,600. Motorcycle makers have also garnered
buying interest in recent sessions, on expected strong demand from China and
south-east Asia. Honda Motor finished Y10 up at Y1,600.
Financial shares were widely lower, with Tokio Marine &amp; Fire receding Y12 to
Y998 on a weak earnings outlook and Mitsubishi Bank declining Y40 to Y1,800.
Department stores also retreated: Mitsukoshi and Takashimaya both dropped to
lows for the year and closed off Y19 at Y820 and Y40 at Y1,100 respectively.
In Osaka, the OSE average put on 83.40 to 19,755.13 in volume of 11.7m
shares.
Roundup
IN A MIXED day for Pacific Rim markets, Hong Kong climbed for the fifth
consecutive session. Bombay remained closed as brokers continued their
boycott.
HONG KONG extended its gains in spite of some profit-taking early in the
day. The Hang Seng index rose 41.60 to 5,371.77. Turnover dipped to
HKDollars 3.16bn from HKDollars 4.02bn.
Cheung Kong was the most active stock, gaining 20 cents to HKDollars 22.50,
while Jardine Matheson was 50 cents stronger at HKDollars 51.
SINGAPORE advanced as blue chips found buyers, but profit-taking trimmed the
gains in the afternoon. The Straits Times Industrial index finished a net
4.75 ahead at 1,413.11 in turnover of SDollars 85.7m.
SEOUL gained on buying of manufacturing and financial stocks. The composite
index added 13.18 at 608.06 in turnover of Won449.36bn. Daewoo moved forward
Won600 to Won11,400.
TAIWAN was buoyed in late trading. The weighted index appreciated 44.88 to
4,486.45 in turnover of TDollars 14.48bn.
MANILA closed higher as sentiment improved ahead of next month's
presidential elections. The seven candidates have signed a manifesto
committing themselves to peaceful elections and an orderly transfer of
power.
The composite index rose 16.19 to 1,190.87 in combined turnover of 151.76m
pesos. The market was led by PLDT, up 20 pesos at 905 pesos.
KUALA LUMPUR fell following disappointing February trade figures which were
released on Saturday. The composite index declined 2.69 to 581.02 in
turnover of MDollars 59.5m.
BANGKOK was lower as opposition groups called for a protest rally against
the government. The SET index weakened 20.29 to 774.52 in turnover of
Bt3.74bn. Declines led advances by 209 to 26.
Bangkok Bank lost Bt16 to Bt684 and Thai Farmers Bank was Bt10 down at
Bt484.
AUSTRALIA lost ground on profit-taking and caution ahead of tomorrow's
release of the CPI figures for March.
The All Ordinaries index slipped 6.7 to 1,602.9 in turnover of ADollars
146.2m.
BHP was 16 cents down at ADollars 13.54, BTR shed 5 cents to ADollars 2.62
and Pacific Dunlop was 7 cents cheaper at ADollars 5.31.
Western Mining declined 6 cents to ADollars 5.02 after reporting on Friday
that production at its operation in Western Australia had been affected by
industrial action.
NEW ZEALAND was easier. The NZSE-40 index shed 1.32 to 1,453.97 in turnover
of NZDollars 18m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11066</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Stock Markets: Chinese promises lift HK to record high
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONIA SHARPE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Hong Kong featured firmly last week, as a downward correction on Wall Street
after its record-breaking run and a stabilisation in the Nikkei average
around the 17,000 level caused a 0.6 per cent drop in the FT-Actuaries World
index in local currency terms.
Strong international buying lifted Hong Kong by 4.5 per cent to an all-time
high, following a positive statement from Mr Li Peng, the Chinese prime
minister, that economic reforms should be speeded up in order to boost
economic growth. HK Telecom, the market's largest stock and accounting for
12.5 per cent of the total capitalisation, climbed 85 cents to HKDollars
9.40 on the week.
The market was also boosted by publication at the end of the previous week
of Hang Seng Bank's inner reserves, which led to a rerating of the banking
sector. Pleasing results from Wharf Holdings was a further bull point. By
contrast, politics took a back seat, and the appointment of Mr Chris Patten
as the colony's new governor was largely ignored.
Mr David Bates of Asia Equity in London says that while there is some
short-term froth on the market, it is still cheap on a longer term basis,
especially if there is further evidence of a turnround in the US economy.
The second-best performer on the week was also in the Pacific region, as a
survey showing an increase in business confidence boosted New Zealand by 3.5
per cent.
There were no serious casualties last week, though Canada fell 2.1 per cent
in local currency terms. The Toronto stock market has been depressed by
Olympia &amp; York's financing troubles and the decline in gold and oil prices.
The 1.6 per cent drop in US equities also weighed on their Canadian
counterparts.
Political uncertainty had little effect in Europe: Italy rose 0.3 per cent
in spite of having no government, while troubles in Mr Helmut Kohl's
centre-right coalition inflicted a 0.2 per cent fall on German shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11067</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (Europe): German uncertainty casts
shadow on bourses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POLITICAL and industrial uncertainty in Germany cast a shadow on continental
trading. Zurich was closed for a holiday, writes Our Markets Staff.
FRANKFURT took the start of the public service workers' strike in western
Germany and the sudden resignations in Chancellor Helmut Kohl's cabinet in
its stride. The DAX index closed down 3.48 at 1,742.22 while the FAZ index,
calculated at midsession, shed 2.35 to 708.46. Turnover fell to DM4.4bn from
DM5bn.
Some analysts said that the market's reaction to the strike had been
positive so far since the government had demonstrated that it was not
prepared to concede to union pressure over pay claims. However, a prolonged
strike would erode share prices, they said.
Chemicals stood out in a dull day for corporate news. Bayer gained DM1.90 to
DM289 ahead of its dividend payout later this week while Hoechst fell DM1.20
to DM262.30. Basf was 40 pfg lower at DM249.90.
Siemens rose 90 pfg to DM687.90. After the close it announced an 8 per cent
increase in six-month net profit.
Berliner Bank closed DM2.50 higher at DM269.50 after announcing a 23 per
cent rise in 1991 net profit. The three major banks were weaker, with
Deutsche Bank down DM2.50 to DM713. Elsewhere, Horten, which said that it
was to increase its 1991 dividend by DM1 to DM5, shed 70 pfg to DM180.
PARIS came close to breaking above the elusive 2,000 barrier on the CAC-40
index in late trading, spurred by a recovery in bond prices and a strong
franc. The CAC-40 index ended 10.81 higher at 1,995.72, just below the day's
high of 1,998.45 and well up on the day's low of 1,973.39. Turnover was thin
at FFr1.8bn.
Michelin ran into profit-taking after last week's gains, losing FFr3.70 to
FFr204.70 in heavy volume of 450,450 shares. But Peugeot continued its
advance, buoyed up by news that it planned to increase its dividend payout
in coming years. The stock added FFr12 to FFr770.
Eurotunnel remained weak, losing FFr1.35 or 3.6 per cent to FFr35.65 with a
heavy 2.3m shares traded. The tube maker Vallourec lost another FFr13 to
FFr223 after a negative analysts' meeting last Friday. Moulinex had a
volatile day, falling as low as FFr162.50 after the company turned less
positive on 1992, but ended just FFr1 lower at FFr172 with 70,800 shares
traded.
MILAN closed unchanged, as continued strength in the car sector offset
weaker prices elsewhere. News that President Francesco Cossiga had resigned
had little impact on the market. The Comit index fell 0.43 to 508.43 in
turnover estimated at less than Friday's L91.1bn.
Pirelli, actively traded last week, gave the first boost to the market,
gaining L40 to L1,405. But some analysts said it was time to take profits on
the stock. Fiat closed L8 higher at L4,985. But Stet continued last week's
decline, closing L20 down at L2,100 and Sip lost L5.5 to L1,452.5. Benetton
fell L350 to L13,600.
STOCKHOLM weakened at the start on interest rate worries but steady gains by
Astra, Ericsson and Electrolux helped reverse the trend. The Affarsvarlden
general index eased 0.2 to 987.1 in heavy turnover of SKr784m after SKr586m,
bloated by an off-market SKr365m block trade in Electrolux shares at SKr260
each, amounting to just under 2 per cent of the company's equity. The B
shares closed at SKr262, up SKr3.
Volvo B shares rose SKr6 to a new year's high of SKr446 ahead of the annual
meeting tomorrow.
BRUSSELS saw its recent favourite Delhaize fall BFr330 or 3.6 per cent to
BFr9,360 with more than 15,570 shares traded following worse-than-expected
results from its US division.
The Bel-20 index dropped 11.20 to 1,210.38 in turnover of BFr700m. Petrofina
lost BFr50 to BFr10,850 after news that its US division had recorded a first
quarter loss.
AMSTERDAM's CBS Tendency index lost 0.7 to 127.9 in turnover of Fl 437.1m.
Begemann rose Fl 8.00 or 7.5 per cent to Fl 113.50 on strong retail buying.
This followed a newspaper interview with the chairman at the weekend in
which he said that the group's market value was too low.
ING, which reports 1991 earnings today, was 50 cents down at Fl 50.30.
Nedlloyd declined 90 cents to Fl 57.40 after Mr Torstein Hagen, a major
shareholder, confirmed that he has an option on a further 5 per cent of the
stock.
MADRID fell in dull trade. The general index shed 0.1 to 249.93 in turnover
of some Pta8.4bn. Repsol gained Pta5 to Pta2,840 on expectations of good
first quarter results, due early next month.
OSLO's all-share index gained 1.38 to 427.33 in turnover of NKr280m. Norsk
Hydro, due to announce first quarter results tomorrow, advanced NKr1.5 to
NKr161.
ISTANBUL fell following a number of disappointing first quarter results. The
index was down 95.8 or 2.6 per cent at 3,717.88.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - APR 27
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Hourly changes
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
   Open    10 am    11 am    12 pm     1 pm     2 pm     3 pm    close
1164.76  1166.13  1167.31  1167.47  1168.43  1170.13  1169.98  1169.59
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 Day's High  1170.33    Day's Low  1164.72
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
 Apr 24    Apr 23    Apr 22    Apr 21    Apr 16
1167.02   1169.11   1171.34   1166.73   1169.83
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Base value 1000 (26/10/90).
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 39
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11068</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Money Markets: Little move in rates
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Sterling's latest surge on the foreign exchange markets encouraged a few
traders to believe that an interest rate cut was in the offing. But the UK
market was mostly unimpressed by sterling's performance and was guided far
more by the political situation in Germany.
Period rates in the Interbank market showed no sign of change. London's
sterling deposit rates remained firmly locked into a 10 1/2 per cent
relationship with base rates. The three-month interbank rate, an important
indicator of future base rate movements, remained at 10 1/2 - 3/8 per cent.
One year money again ended at 10 3/8 - 1/4 , repeating Friday's close.
Only movements in the short sterling futures market gave the hint that
traders are expecting the Bank of England to signal a cut in base rates
soon. The June short sterling contract ended at 89.79, just below its high
for the day, having opened at 89.65. The closing figure indicated an implied
interest rate in June of 10.21 per cent. 'That indicates that the market
believes that the next move in interest rates will be down,' said one trader
yesterday.
In the Discount market, some traders said that they were reluctant to part
with bills, even though the Bank of England forecast a shortage at the day's
opening of Pounds 1.15bn. One trader claimed that this reluctance was due to
a wish to push up the cost of short-dated money. Alternatively, traders may
not have needed to sell the bills in the first place.
The Bank of England struggled to relieve a hefty shortage by way of bill
purchases, unsupported by any 'repo' facility. It purchased Pounds 69m worth
of Band-4 bank bills at 10 1/16 per cent in the early round. Later in the
morning, the shortage was revised to around Pounds 1.05bn and the Bank
purchased Pounds 11m of Band-3 bank bills at 10 5/32 per cent and Pounds 58m
of Band-4 bank bills at 10 1/16 per cent.
In the afternoon, the Bank revised its estimate of the shortage, lifting the
figure to around Pounds 1.2m. It purchased Pounds 279m worth of Band-1 bank
bills at 10 3/8 per cent and Pounds 10m of Band-4 Bank bills at 10  1/16 per
cent.
The market eventually took Pounds 505m from the Bank by exercising late
borrowing facilitites to raise total official intervention operations to
Pounds 932m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11069</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Market Report
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Robusta COFFEE prices fell to 20 year lows in London, but dealers feel that
the market still has substantial downside potential. 'It's not looking too
good. July was supposed to have support at Dollars 780 but that gave way
right on opening,' one trader said. 'This continued selling pressure just
reveals the weakness of the market. There are no buyers around.' It was
unclear whether more origin selling of robusta coffee had taken place, but
Cameroon was rumoured. COCOA recovered some ground in the afternoon on a
technical short-covering rally after the July contract dropped earlier to
within Pounds 3 of Pounds 588 a tonne - last year's low and now a major
support level. But cocoa futures are expected to test support again over the
next few days. On the LME ZINC backtracked from earlier 16-month highs while
other metals drifted back in largely routine trading. Dealers said the
run-up to a peak of Dollars 1,315 a tonne for three-month metal in the
morning, underpinned by technical tightness, resulted in profit-taking in
the afternoon. But the close is technically constructive with the market
holding above Dollars 1,300. Traders expect a move towards Dollars 1,330.
Compiled from Reuters
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11070</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Socomex to challenge
appointment of receivers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOCOMEX, A long-established London trade house in cocoa and coffee, is to
challenge in the High Court the appointment of administrative receivers by
Banque Bruxelles Lambert. The company, which is also seeking damages, said
it would meanwhile co-operate with the administrators in order to protect
its assets.
Banque Bruxelles Lambert has confirmed that it appointed administrative
receivers on April 16, but has given no reason.
Last week the Securities and Futures Association said that it had prevented
Socomex Futures, a subsidiary of Socomex, from taking any new client
business for three months 'because we are aware that the parent had some
financial difficulties'.
The SFA added that Socomex Futures was complying with its rules and was
financially solvent. No customers were at risk, it said.
Socomex has been a major trader in robusta coffee, and to some extent cocoa,
with the Ivory Coast. Robusta coffee prices last week touched the lowest
levels for 17 years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11071</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Clove hitch for cigarette
industry - Indonesia's over-sized and over-priced crop
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM KEELING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CLOVES IN Indonesia are a national feature falling rapidly into disrepute.
Like many of the smokers who annually consume more than 130bn fragrant
kretek cigarettes, of which the clove is the essential ingredient, the spice
is distinctly out of sorts.
Indonesia's 3m-4m clove farmers produce about 80,000 tonnes of the spice but
what should have been a boom period has turned sour. Despite a 62 per cent
increase in kretek cigarette sales between 1985-89, clove production has
outstripped demand. Industry officials say traders should take the blame
when in the mid-1980s, speculating on a price increase, they bought large
stocks of cloves, creating an artificial demand.
By early 1990 traders were holding over 60,000 tonnes but bumper harvests
allowed the cigarette producers to purchase requirements. The price of
cloves actually fell by half to a low of 2,000 rupiah (Dollars 1) a kilogram
and, industry officials estimate, traders faced a loss of over USDollars
65m.
Then in January 1991 the government granted a monopoly over the buying and
selling of cloves to Badan Penyangga dan Pemasaran Cengkeh, owned 80 per
cent by a consortium of five private companies and 20 per cent by Kerta
Niaga, a state marketing board.
Chaired by Mr Hutomo Mandala Putra, the youngest son of President Suharto of
Indonesia, BPPC shareholders are reported to include many of the traders
holding clove stocks. In early 1991 BPPC's stockpile amounted to about
80,000 tonnes, including Kerta Niaga's stock of 23,000 tonnes.
BPPC set a floor price for farmers of Rp7,900 and sold cloves, including its
existing stock, to cigarette producers at between Rp12,700-15,000, more than
four times the world market price. Bank Indonesia, the central bank,
provided Rp759bn in low-interest credit to finance the venture. Economists
say state-owned banks supplied another Rp250bn in credit.
International donors, including the World Bank, criticised the move as
contrary to the spirit of economic de-regulation and predicted a worsening
over-supply of cloves. BPPC officials said the agency was necessary to
protect the farmers who, they claimed, were exploited by the cigarette
industry.
BPPC stocks have since risen to over 150,000 tonnes and the company has
announced it cannot meet conditions on its loans. Diplomats say some traders
have illegally imported a further 30,000 tonnes and that many farmers have
not been paid for last year's crop. In February Mr Putra suggested that
farmers should burn half their crop or cut down a third of their clove
trees.
Industry officials say farmers have been reluctant to follow his advice but
the Ministry of Agriculture has announced that it will enforce tree-felling,
starting with diseased specimens.
BPPC has come under increasing criticism with members of the ruling Golkar
party expressing disapproval. Earlier this month the government reduced
BPPC's role in the procurement of cloves, handing much of the task to local
co-operative groups.
The floor price has been lowered to Rp4,000, although the co-operative is to
receive up to an additional Rp3,900 in retained earnings and
compulsory-farmer savings. Diplomats say BPPC has made available Rp120bn for
co-operatives to finance purchases.
BPPC retains, however, the sole right to sell cloves and Mr Putra says the
price cigarette companies must pay will not be reduced until BPPC's existing
stock is exhausted.
A face-off between BPPC and the cigarette industry, therefore, may be in
prospect. There are 120 cigarette companies but just two command about 80
per cent market share. These are reported to be holding sufficient stock for
another six months production.
The government has technically linked the sale of cigarettes to the purchase
of cloves from BPPC, but the latter is likely to face problems running down
its stockpile. Economists say cigarette companies have halved the quantity
of cloves mixed with tobacco during production. Discord has already been
reported within the BPPC consortium as to how sales should be divided
between its members.
Bankers say the continuing high cost of cloves may force some smaller
cigarette companies to close and the larger firms are threatening to cut
back tobacco purchases. Industry officials warn, therefore, of a knock-on
effect on the tobacco sector.
In 1991, tobacco production held steady in at an estimated 135,390 tonnes
(dry weight), with about 17,450 tonnes being exported. Domestic demand,
however, was affected by a rise of 30 per cent in cigarette prices resulting
from the higher cost of cloves and increased excise duty. Consumption of
cigarettes fell 5.3 per cent in 1991, breaking the trend of uninterrupted
growth. The government is likely to be monitoring the situation closely with
the cigarette industry providing 10 per cent - about USDollars 1bn - of
total tax revenue.
Many industry officials still expect BPPC to fold. Questions remain as to
its financial position and to the ability of local co-operatives to finance,
collect and store this year's harvest. Bankers say the government may be
waiting until after June's general election before wielding the axe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11072</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Commodities Prices: Tea
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Demand continued to be strong and active reports the Tea Broker's
Association. Landed prices for bright liquoring and good medium East
Africans showed further advances of between 5 and 20p. The balance sold
readily at fully firm rates. Central Africans were also well supported and
dearer. The small selection of Ceylon teas on offer were much dearer with
quality. Offshore. Bright liquoring descriptions often gained 5 to 10p while
others generally tended dearer. The highest price realised this week was
221p for a Rwanda pf. 1. Quotations: quality 180p. nom good medium 135p.
medium 118p. low medium 92p
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11073</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Cuba plans to raise nickel
output
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HAVANA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CUBA PLANS to produce nearly 50,000 tonnes of nickel in 1992 and output is
forecast to rise to 80,000 tonnes in 1996 following the completion of a
fourth nickel plant, according to Prensa Latina, the Cuban news agency,
reports Reuter from Havana. Production would reach 100,000 tonnes 'in the
near future', it said.
The agency, giving rare details of the island's most strategically-important
industry after sugar, said Cuba possessed an estimated 37.3 per cent of all
of the world's total nickel ore reserves. They were situated in an area on
the island's north-eastern coast, around the town of Moa.
'These mineral reserves will allow significant, stable production for more
than 200 years,' Prensa Latina said.
It said the Cuban government had drawn up a major development plan for the
industry involving an overall investment of Dollars 1.2bn over the next
decade.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11074</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: US copper project defeats
ecological mussel-power
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KENNETH GOODING, Mining Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the most bitterly fought battles between environmentalists and miners
enters a new phase next month when work re-starts on the Dollars 20m
development of Flambeau Mining's copper project in Wisconsin.
The hugely-rich but relatively small deposit, now owned by RTZ, the world's
biggest mining group, was first found in 1968 but it was not until last year
that all the permits were in place for development which began in August.
Then environmental researchers successfully applied to a US judge for work
to be halted because they said purple warty back mussels and other
threatened or endangered species were found in the Flambeau River about a
mile from where the mining company plans a drain pipe outlet.
Mr Larry Mercando, vice president and general manager of Flambeau Mining,
said yesterday that Wisconsin's state Department of Natural Resources had
now issued a revised environmental impact statement that clearly stated the
mine's operations would have no effect on any threatened or endangered
species.
The episode had delayed mining by about six months, he added. First ore
should be shipped in June, 1993. However, Mr Mercando admitted: 'We are
ready and prepared for more attacks by environmentalists. They never give
up.'
Mr Mercando estimates that about 70 per cent of the Dollars 20m-Dollars 30
cost of the mine will go towards environmental protection measures - the
biggest cost is for a water treatment plant to ensure that water discarded
by the mine is more pure than any found in nature.
The recent production delay was caused by a civil action against the state
department by the Sierra Club, a group of environmental activists, and the
Lac Courte Oreilles Band of Lake Superior Chippewa natives, who say the mine
could spoil fishing by polluting the Flambeau River, a tributary of the
Chippewa, which drains into the Mississippi.
Environmentalists are also concerned because the copper deposit is in a
heavily wooded area with is no industrial activity. Flambeau's will be the
first mine to be developed in Wisconsin since the Shullsburg lead-zinc mine
closed in 1979.
Kennecott Corporation, now an RTZ subsidiary, has owned the deposit for 20
years and persevered because it is exceptionally rich. The ore contains 10.5
per cent of copper whereas most miners would be happy with 2 or 3 per cent.
Unfortunately, there is only about 1.9m tonnes of ore. As this will be dug
out at the rate of 320,000 tonnes a year, the mine will have a life of only
six years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11075</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Commodities and Agriculture: Roger Vielvoye - Obituary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR ROGER Vielvoye, international editor of the Oil and Gas Journal, died
yesterday after suffering a sudden heart attack at the age of 50. Mr
Vielvoye was a well-respected authority on the world oil industry having
built a career in energy journalism over the past 20 years.
He had been energy correspondent for The Times in London from 1972 to 1978
before joining the Oil and Gas Journal.
He travelled widely throughout Europe to research and report on energy
developments for the US-based publication, building up international
reputation for his knowledge of the oil industry. Recently he won an award
from the Norwegian-based Offshore Northern Seas foundation for his reporting
on the oil industry.
Mr Vielvoye started his career in his native Plymouth where he had attended
Plymouth College. He later joined the Birmingham Post as an industrial
reporter and briefly worked at the Reuters news agency. He was the author of
several books on energy-related subjects.
He leaves a wife, Irene, and three grown-up children.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11076</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Bonds: Two Eurobond offerings launched in
dollar sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO NEW Eurobond offerings were launched in the dollar sector, which is
faring better than most in generally lacklustre trading conditions. Demand
in most bond markets is at a low ebb; only the sterling sector, buoyed by
bullishness on the currency, is attracting any sizeable buying interest.
The Export-Import Bank of Japan launched a Dollars 500m 10-year deal, a
large transaction for a Japanese government-guaranteed borrower. The 8 per
cent bonds, launched by IBJ International, were priced to yield 29 basis
points above the 10-year Treasury, a basis point tighter than last week's
Dollars 200m deal for Japan Finance Corporation for Municipal Enterprises.
The bonds illicited few sales in Europe, but met stronger demand in the Far
East, dealers said. The large size of the deal means it will take some time
to place, but should ultimately be more liquid than most Japanese
government-guaranteed names.
The spread was unchanged at the end of trading at 29 basis points, against a
directionless US Treasury market.
However, market swaps rates are very tight, which is likely to limit further
supply of paper.
A Dollars 200m two-year deal for the Council of Europe, arranged by UBS, met
demand from specific pockets of investors. Money market funds, which are
currently extending along the yield curve a little, were active buyers, and
central banks also showed some interest. In addition, some European retail
investors bought paper, apparently viewing the bonds as a currency play
which offered higher yields than bank deposits.
The bonds, priced to yield 26 basis points above the two-year Treasury, were
attractively priced relative to the swap market, dealers said.
Meanwhile, the European Investment Bank is expected to take advantage of
attractive conditions in the sterling bond market to launch a Pounds 200m
issue of 10-year Eurobonds. Yesterday, the Bank had received proposals from
around half a dozen banks and was considering them, before awarding a
mandate to launch the offering today. The EIB will use a deferred rate
setting, which allows the borrower to fix the spread over gilts on launch,
but to lock in the gilt yield at a later date. The structure is particularly
suitable for the EIB, because it onlends funds raised in the capital
markets.
With most other markets in dismal shape, activity could well be concentrated
in the sterling sector. Last week's Pounds 500m five-year deal for Hanson
has held in well, and is currently trading at a spread of 77 basis points
above the five-year gilt yield, on the offered side, three basis points
inside its launch spread.
Elsewhere, Bear Stearns is marketing a Dollars 100m Eurobond for the
National Development Bank of Brazil (BNDES), which runs the country's
privatisation programme. The deal is expected to be officially launched
later this week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11077</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Capital Markets: Abbey National Treasury
Services wins satellite deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANNY GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ABBEY National Treasury Services has won a Pounds 197m contract to provide
lease finance for three communications satellites to Inmarsat, the satellite
communications services supplier.
Credit facilities for the lease finance have been arranged by the
Luxembourg-based European Investment Bank and a group of seven European
credit banks under the label Club of European Long Term Credit Institutions.
The deal brings the value of Abbey's leasing transactions conducted in the
last 18 months to Pounds 1.9bn. Mr Robin Garratt, the head of leasing, said
yesterday that the bank's high level of taxable profits and its strong
balance sheet made leasing viable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11078</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Capital Markets: Hammerson ratings cut by
Moody's
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON LONDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HAMMERSON, the UK property group, has had its credit ratings cut by Moody's
Investors Service, the US credit rating agency, and may yet face another
downgrading, writes Simon London.
Moody's has cut the long-term credit rating from A2 to A3, a rating which
applies to a recent Pounds 100m Eurosterling bond issue. The short-term
credit rating for commercial paper is lowered from Prime-1 to Prime-2.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11079</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Capital Markets: Nippon Life to diversify into
European currencies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR AN institution with Y30,000bn (Pounds 127bn) of assets, Nippon Life,
Japan's largest life assurance company, has a surprisingly small presence in
Europe.
Last year, it lent no more than Y25bn through its 20-person office in
London. In addition, only Y50bn of the company's investments in European
bonds and equities is managed from London - pin money, in Nippon Life's
terms.
Yet the weight of Nippon Life, along with other Japanese life firms, is
likely to be felt far more in the European capital markets in the years
ahead.
'The big trend is diversification from the US to Europe,' says Mr Haruaki
Deguchi, newly-appointed managing director of NLI International, Nippon
Life's operation in London. The desire to diversify their portfolios of
foreign currencies lies behind the move, he says.
At the end of 1990, only around 18.5 per cent of Japanese life companies'
foreign currency assets were denominated in European currencies - roughly
the same as their investments in the Canadian dollar and the Australian
dollar. But by the middle of the decade, Mr Deguchi estimates, the European
share will have risen to 25 per cent.
Even with no net new investment from the life companies, that shift implies
a Y1,500bn switch of money into Europe over the next three years.
Most will be managed from Japan, rather than Europe. Nippon Life manages a
single, Y50bn closed-end fund from London to gain experience of European
equity and bond investment, says Mr Deguchi. Tax regulations prevent it
doing more: investment orders channelled through London to the company's
Tokyo headquarters would be classified as investments made in the UK, and so
be taxed there.
Meanwhile, lending to European corporations seems unlikely to grow rapidly.
All of Nippon Life's lending, most of it for periods of 10-20 years or
longer, is denominated in yen.
The currency is an obstacle - though, with the market in longer-dated swaps
becoming more liquid, it is possible for the company to meet its objectives
of lending fixed rate yen while enabling borrowers to raise floating-rate
debt in dollars or other currencies.
However, with the Japanese long-term prime rate remaining stubbornly high,
the demand from European companies for yen loans looks likely to stay
depressed. Last year, Nippon Life's lending through London - all of it
booked in Tokyo - was down from Y40bn to Y20-Y25bn, and little growth is
expected this year.
Any substantial growth in Nippon Life's operations in Europe is unlikely
before Japan relaxes the restrictions under which most parts of the
financial sector work. For life companies, those restrictions are more
severe than for banks or securities firms, preventing them even from
entering banking or securities business through overseas subsidiaries.
The growing prominence of Japanese life companies in Europe is in marked
contrast to the trend internationally. The core of their business - lending
to Japanese companies - shrank during the 1980s as they increased their
foreign currency investments, chasing in particular the higher yields on US
dollar investments. Yen-denominated loans fell from 60 per cent of assets at
the start of the 1980s to nearly half that at the end.
That trend has reversed, in part due to the higher yields available on
domestic yen loans. Now, with a question mark over the ability of Japanese
banks to service loan demand inside Japan - and with the banks themselves
looking to tap life companies for subordinated debt - the life companies are
expected to direct less of their investment internationally.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11080</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Qantas considers stake in
carrier
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
QANTAS Airways, Australia's government-owned international carrier,
yesterday said it was considering bidding for a significant stake in
Australian Airlines, the domestic carrier which is to be privatised next
year.
Mr John Ward, chief executive, said Qantas would file an expression of
interest with the government's airline sales task force on Thursday, the
deadline for indicative offers.
However, Mr Ward said Qantas had not finally decided to bid for Australian,
and indicated the airline also planned to discuss a possible operating
agreement with Ansett Australia, the domestic carrier jointly owned by TNT
and News Corporation.
He said Qantas's preference was for a significant holding in Australian, but
it would be unable to judge whether to bid for a controlling stake until the
next stage of the sale, when the government would discuss detailed options
with bidders.
Qantas has been barred from discussions with Australian, Ansett and other
airlines since an information memorandum on Australian was circulated by the
government shortly before Christmas.
However, the government announced in February that a ban on
cross-shareholdings between Qantas and the domestic airlines would be lifted
as part of a proposed second stage of deregulation in the Australian
aviation market.
Mr Ward said the acquisition of a significant stake in Australian was not
beyond the financial capacity of Qantas, although short-term bridging
finance might be required until the international airline's own partial
privatisation was finalised.
'I wouldn't see a stake in a domestic airline as being insurmountable,' he
said. 'We have been trading profitably for several months (and) . . . we
don't see anything in our financial position incompatible with a bid for
Australian.'
Mr Ward said the government's revised aviation policies, which would allow
domestic carriers to fly on international routes and create a single
aviation market in Australia and New Zealand, had confused the prospects for
its own partial privatisation.
However, he said the airline hoped the sale of 49 per cent of its capital
would go ahead later this year, either by way of a trade sale or a flotation
on the Australian Stock Exchange.
Initial enthusiasm for the airline sales has cooled in the face of
international recession and changes in government policy. But British
Airways and Air New Zealand are believed to be interested in acquiring
stakes in Australian Airlines. Singapore Airlines is believed to be
interested in taking a stake in Qantas.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11081</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Tokyu Store gross profits fall
18% to Y10.8bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AP-DJ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOKYU Department Store yesterday reported that group pre-tax profit fell 18
per cent to Y10.8bn (Dollars 80m) in the fiscal year ended January 31, AP-DJ
reports.
Sales were up 8.2 per cent at Y558.3bn from Y515.85bn last time.
Reflecting a general trend among Japanese department stores, Tokyu's pre-tax
profit suffered because management and marketing costs rose faster than
sales while sales of luxury goods were damped by the slowdown in Japan's
economy.
The group suffered a net loss for the past fiscal year of Y806m, against a
profit of Y5.07bn the year before.
This was mainly because of a special loss suffered through Daiwa Securities
Company's 'Tobashi' trading of Tokyu stock.
Through Tobashi trading a securities company arranges repurchase agreements,
selling and buying shares for customers at artificial prices to allow
clients to avoid posting losses on their investments in their earnings
reports.
Tokyu claimed Y60.5bn in damages from Daiwa, but the broker agreed to
compensate only 80 per cent of that amount.
That left Tokyu with a loss of roughly Y11bn.
For the current fiscal year, Tokyu expected group pre-tax profit to climb
4.6 per cent to Y11.3bn, with sales rising 2.1 per cent to Y570bn.
The company said it projected last fiscal year's net loss to swing to a net
profit of Y4.4bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11082</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Neste reports sharp downturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NESTE, the Finnish state-owned oil and petrochemicals group, reported a
sharp downturn in profits for 1991, and blamed the poor performance on its
chemicals division.
Group profit (before extraordinary items, reserves and taxes) plummeted to
FM478m (Dollars 105.2m), from FM2.41bn in the previous year. Net sales rose
by 13.7 per cent to FM53.03bn, from FM46.63bn.
Neste said its chemicals division suffered from the sharp fall in
international prices which resulted from a downturn in the world economy and
the increase in capacity in the petrochemicals and plastics industries.
The group said there had been no sign of a recovery in prices. The chemicals
division is Neste's second largest business area with sales of FM8.87bn.
Oil operations, the group's largest business area with sales of FM42.74bn,
showed 'a satisfactory result, despite the drop in oil consumption in
Finland and increased competition following the deregulation of oil
imports'.
Neste does not release separate profit or loss figures for the individual
divisions, but said its gas, shipping, and exploration and production
divisions all reported increased profits compared with the 1990 figures.
The state-owned group is being prepared for privatisation, although a date
for the sale of shares has not been fixed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11083</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Gencor profits hit by weak
commodity markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINUING weakness in world commodity markets caused a 26 per cent drop in
earnings at Gencor, the South African mining house, in the six months to the
end of February.
Attributable income dropped by 26 per cent to R562m, (Dollars 195.8m) with
earnings per share down by a similar margin to 47.8 cents from 65 cents in
the same period last year.
Mr Brian Gilbertson, chairman, said: 'The results reflect the difficult part
of the commodity cycle we're in.' He noted that if transaction profits were
stripped out of the 1991 results then the earnings decline was much more
modest, from 52 cents to 48 cents per share.
Mr Gilbertson did not forecast a quick turnround, and said earnings for the
second half 'will not easily match the level just reported'.
He said, though, that all the companies in the group were well positioned
for an upturn. Malbak, Sappi and Gencor have all recently made rights
issues.
Although most commodity markets remained depressed, Mr Gilbertson discerned
some optimistic pointers. On the ferro-alloys side, ferro-silicone and
ferro-chrome prices have firmed recently.
Sappi, the paper products group, has confirmed a turnround in pulp prices,
while stainless steel order books at Middelburg Steel and Alloys have picked
up. However, Mr Gilbertson said: 'It's only one or two swallows. The summer
is not here yet.'
Gencor has two very large capital projects on hand: the Columbus stainless
steel joint venture with Anglo American, and the Alusaf aluminium project.
Mr Gilbertson said he would be surprised if both projects, with a cumulative
cost of over R6bn, did not receive the go-ahead. A decision on Alusaf is
expected during July, while Columbus should get the go-ahead this calendar
year.
Following a R2bn rights issue earlier this year, the Gencor group had
considerable cash on hand, and Mr Gilbertson said he was still hopeful
Samancor would be able to finance its share of the Columbus project without
recourse to shareholders.
Responding to ongoing speculation about links with Lonhro, Mr Gilbertson
said that they were in discussion with Lonhro with a view 'to achieving
future synergies between our different platinum operations'.
He said these talks had been going on for a long time and were nothing new.
He added that the platinum assets, over which Gencor has pre-emptive rights,
were the most attractive asset in Lonhro, but that they would also be
interested in other mining assets, such as the Ashanti gold mine in Ghana,
should they be on offer.
Other Lonhro interests such as motor-dealerships, tea and hotels were 'not
our natural scene'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11084</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Hugo Boss improves 26% to
DM35.4m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HUGO BOSS, the men's fashion company which is based in southern Germany,
last year recovered some of its poise with a 26 per cent rise in net profits
to DM35.4m (Dollars 21.5m).
This was in spite of a write-down of DM24m on its loss-making US business.
Turnover of Boss, controlled by the Marzotto concern of Italy, was 8 per
cent higher at DM997m. Business grew faster in Germany than abroad, the
company said.
The company said that Mr Rene Jaggi, who has said he would step down as head
of the Adidas sports shoe and clothing group at the end of this year, would
not become Boss's new chief executive. It said talks with the Swiss-born Mr
Jaggi had ended, but gave no reason.
Boss is headed by the brothers Uwe and Jochen Holy, who have contracts until
1994, but have said they would leave earlier if necessary. Yesterday they
stated that the company's business had improved further in the first quarter
of 1992. Steps had been taken to cut the US losses and Boss should be able
to achieve profits this year similar to those of 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11085</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: US oil group posts Dollars 114m
loss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BLOOMBERG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PHILLIPS Petroleum, the US oil and gas group, yesterday reported a
first-quarter loss of Dollars 114m, or 44 cents a share, after Dollars 88m
in after-tax charges for job cuts and debt redemption, Bloomberg reports.
The loss compared with net income of Dollars 107m, or 41 cents, in the same
quarter last year, when special items reduced earnings by Dollars 42m.
Revenue fell to Dollars 2.76bn from Dollars 3.52bn.
Mr CJ Silas, chairman, said the company's average worldwide crude oil price
was down 18 per cent from a year ago while natural gas prices dropped 16 per
cent. Excluding special items, the net loss would have been Dollars 26m
against earnings of Dollars 149m last time.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11086</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: P&amp;G lifted by foreign markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROCTER &amp; Gamble, the US consumer products group, yesterday reported a 12
per cent increase in third-quarter net earnings, helped by sales growth in
foreign markets.
The company made Dollars 474m, or Dollars 1.33 a share, compared with
Dollars 424m, or Dollars 1.16, in the same period of last year. Sales rose
from Dollars 6.79bn to Dollars 7.48bn.
Mr Edwin Artzt, the chairman, said that business was 'getting better. This
was a solid quarter for us. Unit volume, sales and pre-tax operating
earnings were all up 10 per cent or better, despite continued significant
investment in new products.'
The company said the increases in sales and earnings were due to 'improved
operations of the business, reflecting broadly based unit volume growth,
particularly outside the US'.
Although other income increased primarily from one-time sales of assets,
this was more than offset by higher interest expense and a higher effective
tax rate.
For the nine months net earnings were Dollars 1.53bn, compared with Dollars
1.47bn in the same period of 1991. This worked through at Dollars 4.32 a
share, against Dollars 4.09. Sales rose from Dollars 20.3bn to Dollars
22.19bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11087</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Xerox shows 10% gain in net
profit to Dollars 128m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
XEROX, the US document-processing group, yesterday unveiled a 10 per cent
improvement in first-quarter net profits on a 3 per cent increase in
revenues.
Net income for the three months ended March 31 totalled Dollars 128m, or
Dollars 1.10 a fully diluted share, against Dollars 116m, or Dollars 1, in
last year's first quarter. Revenues were Dollars 3.31bn, compared with
Dollars 3.2bn.
Income from the group's document-processing business was Dollars 113m, up 3
per cent from the previous year. Revenues also rose 3 per cent to Dollars
3.3bn.
Mr Paul Allaire, chairman, said sales of less expensive copiers and
decentralised electronic printers continued to show strong growth worldwide.
However, the company's overall performance was hurt by the weak economic
climate in Japan and some parts of Europe.
During the latest quarter, Xerox cut about 1,000 jobs as part of the
company's previously announced plans to reduce its workforce by about 2,500.
Mr Allaire said the effect of the total reduction would be reflected in
Xerox's financial results later in the year.
Earnings from Xerox's insurance and financial services operations rose to
Dollars 66m in the quarter from Dollars 47m, though revenues dipped to
Dollars 944m from Dollars 1bn a year ago.
The company, which has been moving away from real estate and third-party
transactions, attributed the decline in revenues to strategic changes in
property and casualty insurance operations. Interest and headquarters
expenses rose to Dollars 51m from Dollars 41m, limiting earnings from
insurance and financial services to Dollars 15m against Dollars 6m last
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11088</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Hershey Foods ahead to Dollars
58m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BLOOMBERG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HERSHEY Foods, the US confectionery group, reported higher first-quarter
earnings, driven by improved results from US chocolate operations, Bloomberg
reports.
Net income rose to Dollars 58.92m, or 65 cents a share, from Dollars 48.64m,
or 54 cents, in the 1991 first quarter. Sales advanced to Dollars 800.97m
from Dollars 684.57m.
Hershey Chocolate USA was the principal contributor to earnings. The
consolidation of Nacional de Dulces and Gubor Schokoladen, acquired in 1991,
also boosted results.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11089</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: American Express to cut card
division costs by Dollars 1bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AMERICAN EXPRESS, the financial services group, yesterday announced plans to
cut annual operating costs at its card division by up to Dollars 1bn.
The plan to cut almost 11 per cent of the annual Dollars 9.4bn costs at the
travel related services (TRS) division, was unveiled by Mr Jim Robinson, the
American Express chairman.
The TRS division, which suffered a 23 per cent drop in earnings in the first
quarter of 1992, has been hit by losses in the Optima credit card division.
Last year the division's credit loss provisions jumped by Dollars 697m at
the pre-tax level, half of the increase caused by Optima.
TRS has also been faced by protests from numerous retail merchants in the US
and Britain over fees that are much higher than those of competitors such as
Visa or MasterCard.
The embattled Mr Robinson, who has been forced to reorganise the Optima
business, yesterday told shareholders at the American Express annual meeting
that costs at TRS would be cut by Dollars 500m to Dollars 1bn over the next
three years as a result of 're-engineering efforts.'
Mr Mike O'Neill, a spokesman for American Express, said the effect of the
cuts on the staffing levels at TRS would be 'minimal.' TRS employs 55,000 of
the group's 110,728 workforce.
Mr O'Neill said the cuts would be achieved by way of reduced spending on
marketing and business development and lower credit loss provisions.
But the American Express official said he could not explain how American
Express could confidently predict that its credit provisions over the next
three years would be reduced sufficiently to ensure overall cuts of up to
Dollars 1bn a year by 1995.
Meanwhile, Mr Robinson was on the defensive yesterday as he sought to
counter allegations that he was more actively involved than previously known
with company operatives who ran a late-1980s smear campaign against Mr
Edmond Safra, the Swiss-based banker.
In 1989 Mr Robinson apologised publicly to Mr Safra and acknowledged that
persons acting on behalf of American Express had been the source of 'untrue
and defamatory' media stories about Mr Safra.
American Express agreed to donate Dollars 4m to Mr Safra's charities after
it admitted its personnel had been responsible for 'an unauthorised and
shameful effort' to use the media to malign Mr Safra and Republic National
Bank of New York, which Mr Safra controls.
A book to be published this week claims Mr Robinson initiated an American
Express investigation of Mr Safra in 1986 that spawned the smear campaign
and received several briefings from an aide who was deeply involved in the
anti-Safra campaign.
The book, 'Vendetta: American Express and the Smearing of Edmond Safra', is
by Mr Bryan Burrough, the Wall Street Journal reporter.
In the book Mr Burrough quotes Mr Harry Freeman, a former top aide to Mr
Robinson, as saying it was 'a one hundred per cent probability' that Mr
Robinson was briefed in detail about the smear campaign.
Mr Freeman, who last month launched a Dollars 50m libel suit against Mr
Burrough and The Journal over a 1990 article about the Safra campaign,
yesterday said through his lawyer that his comments had been 'ripped out of
context'.
Mr Robinson said yesterday: 'I was not aware of, did not authorise, nor
condone any effort to smear Edmond Safra or his associates.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11090</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Agache profits rise sharply
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FINANCIERE Agache, one of the French luxury goods groups linked to Mr
Bernard Arnault, saw net profits rise sharply to FFr1.82bn (Dollars 330m) in
1991, from FFr230m in 1990 writes Alice Rawsthorn.
Agache experienced a slight fall in sales to FFr27.65bn from FFr29.08bn
because it ceded control of the Conforama chain to the Pinault industrial
group.
The Conforama sale was largely responsible for the exceptional credit of
FFr1.99bn received by Agache last year, an significant increase on the
FFr109m credit for the previous year. The level of consolidated net profits
rose 59 per cent to FFr6.01bn in 1991, from FFr3.78bn in 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11091</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Time Warner may reschedule
Dollars 7bn of loans
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALAN FRIEDMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TIME WARNER, the debt-laden US media and entertainment company, is seeking
to reschedule Dollars 7.2bn of bank loans in what could be the biggest US
corporate debt restructuring of the year.
The New York-based company, which recently saw the ousting of Mr Nick
Nicholas, president and co-chief executive, has employed Chemical Bank and
Bankers Trust as the agent banks to handle most of the debt rescheduling.
Chemical and Bankers Trust have begun marketing a Dollars 6.2bn loan for TW
that would replace other bank loans taken on in 1989, at the time of the
costly Dollars 14bn merger of Time with Warner Communications.
Although TW's operating subsidiaries are profitable, the heavy debt burden
has pre-occupied top management and resulted in large losses for Time Warner
since the merger. Among the reasons why Mr Nicholas was ousted in February
was his disagreement with Mr Steve Ross, the Time Warner chairman, over how
to solve the company's debt problems.
The Time Warner debt rescheduling plan calls for the maturity of the Dollars
6.2bn new loan to be stretched out beyond current commitments.
At present Time Warner is supposed to make huge annual repayments of
principal that could have crippled the company - some Dollars 2.3bn next
year and Dollars 1.4bn each year from 1994 to 1997.
The interest rate on the new loan is expected to be about one percentage
point above the London interbank offered rate (Libor), which should be about
50 to 75 basis points higher than the present average cost on bank debt.
Interest rates on Time Warner debt have been high in part because the
company came into existence as one of the biggest and last of the highly
leveraged transactions (HLTs) of the 1980s.
Time Warner's total debt is Dollars 8.7bn. The company also has another
Dollars 6.3bn of preferred stock that was generated by the 1989 merger.
Debt servicing cost Dollars 966m in 1991, which pushed the loss to Dollars
99m for the year. But the cost of dividends on the preferred stock plunged
Time Warner into a much larger Dollars 692m deficit last year.
The preferred dividend costs led to an ultimate Dollars 150m loss in the
first quarter of 1992, which eclipsed the company's Dollars 3m net profit.
Along with the Dollars 6.2bn new loan, Time Warner is presently completing a
Dollars 1.1bn private placement among institutional investors.
The company should also receive Dollars 1bn from Toshiba and C. Itoh of
Japan, the Japanese companies that are buying 12.5 per cent of Time Warner
Entertainment (TWE), a new subsidiary that will contain the film, cable
television programming and cable operating assets of the group. But that
money will go out of the company again since TW plans to spend another
Dollars 1bn to buy shares in American Television and Communica-tions (ATC),
a publicly quoted cable operating subsidiary that will be part of TWE.
Yesterday, as word of the debt rescheduling began to spread, Time Warner's
share price declined Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 103 5/8 .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11092</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Siemens advances 8% on strong
domestic market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SIEMENS, the German electrical and electronics group, yesterday reported a
rise of 8 per cent to DM859m (Dollars 521m) in net profits for the first
half of its current financial year, with business growing faster at home
than abroad.
It said activity improved slightly towards the end of the second quarter.
But progress was different throughout the group, with standard electrical
products feeling the impact of the worldwide economic weakness.
Among the best performing sectors were telecommunications and medical
technology. The overall east German order inflow was DM1bn higher at
DM2.4bn, but this partly reflected the first-time inclusion of Siemens' new
subsidiaries there.
The domestic market provided the main impetus behind Siemens' turnover and
orders, with foreign business relatively flat. Mr Karlheinz Kaske, chief
executive, said in March the worldwide economic slowdown did not appear to
be ending quickly. Turnover in the first six months ended March 31 rose 8
per cent to DM36bn; while Germany showed 12 per cent increase, foreign sales
were only 5 per cent higher.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11093</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: GAN profits decline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Groupe des Assurances Nationales (GAN), one of France's three big
state-controlled insurance companies, sustained a slight decline in net
profits of 1.7 per cent to FFr2.32bn (Dollars 421m) in 1991, from FFr2.36bn
in 1990, writes Alice Rawsthorn.
GAN, which is preparing for a share sale probably later this year as part of
the French government's partial privatisation programme, is raising its
dividend by 9.3 per cent to FFr50.3, despite a drop in earnings per share to
FFr209.6, from FFr230.9
The company, chaired by Mr Francois Heilbronner and involved with banking
through its controlling investment in the CIC group, saw its overall sales
rise by 21 per cent to FFr116bn. The level of capital also rose 25 per cent
to FFr22bn.
Its net banking revenue rose by 10.6 per cent to FFr16.9bn. Last autumn GAN
announced its was increasing its majority stake in CIC from 56 to 80 per
cent.
Insurance, which is still the largest part of the group, mustered an
increase in turnover of 18.5 per cent to FFr39.7bn despite the competitive
state of the French insurance industry. However, GAN is believed to have had
difficulty in its UK and Italian insurance interests last year because of
the unstable state of the markets in those countries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11094</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / International Company News: Testing time for French
insurance groups - Alice Rawsthorn examines an industry preparing for
partial privatisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The financial figures of France's grand old insurance companies which have
been announced over the past week or so have not made pleasant reading.
The bad news began last Wednesday when Axa, the largest private sector
insurer, announced a 28 per cent fall in net profits to FFr2.4bn (Dollars
436m). Union des Assurances de Paris (UAP), the state-controlled company
which is the biggest single force in French insurance, followed on Thursday
by disclosing an 11 per cent decline to FFr3.8bn.
The week ended with Friday's news that Assurances Generales de France (AGF)
had made static profits of FFr2.7bn. This week began with yesterday's
announcement from Groupes des Assurances Nationales (GAN), which, like AGF
is a state concern, that its net profits had slipped by 1.7 per cent per
cent to FFr2.3bn.
This picture of sluggish profits comes at a sensitive time for the French
insurance industry which is preparing for the government's partial
privatisation programme, pressing ahead with its international expansion and
facing significant changes in its traditional domestic market.
So far France's insurance groups have led fairly sheltered lives thank to
their hold over their home market. The French market slowed last year and
the Paris property sector weakened, thereby posing problems for insurers,
such as GAN, which have been active investors in the capital. But the French
insurers have been spared the horror stories that have hit their US and UK
counterparts. They are also, according to Mr Tom Bennett, European insurance
analyst at Paribas, 'solid, asset rich, reasonably well-run businesses'.
The life insurance market is poised for healthy growth in France following
the forthcoming reforms of the pension system which should create a
lucrative new market for the insurers in private pensions.
The outlook for the non-life sector is not so rosy. The growth potential is
lower and this is the area where competition on pricing - and therefore on
profitability - has been the most fierce. Moreover the mutual companies, the
specialist insurers servicing particular groups, are expanding rapidly in
motor and home insurance.
But the real threat to the big French groups is the structural change in
distribution patterns. At present they sell their products through networks
of agents working for them on an exclusive basis. The agent system protects
the vested interest of the established insurers by making it difficult - and
expensive - for new competitors, notably foreigners, to expand in France.
However, there are moves among the agents to break away from their exclusive
relationship with individual insurers to operate as brokers. The brokers are
also becoming more powerful due to an influx of foreign investment.
There are also signs of some big insurers attacking the status quo. Axa has
quietly started direct sales of motor insurance. If other big insurers
follow, direct selling could become as common in France as in the UK where
it represents 10 per cent of the market.
This might increase the French majors' market share in the short term, but
it could weaken their position by making it easier for new players to
expand.
The industry faces these changes at a time when the three state-controlled
companies - UAP, AGF and GAN - all need to present a sales pitch to the
stock market when the state sells part of its holdings, possibly later this
year. The plans for partial privatisation have yet to be finalised. The
insurers do not yet know if they will be able to raise capital in the share
sales.
One reason why they are so keen for capital is to finance their
international expansion. Over the past 10 years the big French companies
have been diversifying into other European countries. So far they have met
with mixed success. Some companies, such as GAN, ran into difficulty in
their foreign markets last year.
Undeterred the French insurers are continuing their expansion. AGF is locked
in a legal battle over its attempt to invest in Aachener &amp; Munchener
Beteilungs of Germany.
AGF and UAP are willing to bide their time until their deals come to
fruition. Luckily they have the resources to do so.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11095</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Bank of Scotland expands in NZ - Sector
surprised by such a move in current economic conditions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERRY HALL and JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WELLINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BANK OF SCOTLAND is increasing its involvement in New Zealand retail banking
by acquiring a controlling interest in two banks, Countrywide and United,
which are to merge.
The move has caused some surprise in banking circles as there had been
speculation that Bank of Scotland, whose chief executive is Mr Bruce
Pattullo, might withdraw from New Zealand following intense competition in
the retail banking sector in the current recession.
Countrywide is to buy the United Bank for NZDollars 182.5m (Pounds 56.7m).
Bank of Scotland, which has owned 40 per cent of Countrywide for the past
three years is to increase its stake to 60 per cent of the combined
operation.
It is acquiring the 20 per cent shareholding in Countrywide owned by General
Accident, the Scottish insurer.
Bank of Scotland will also fully underwrite the purchase of United Bank and
provide bridging finance.
Countrywide is listed on the New Zealand stock exchange and is expected to
make a cash issue to help fund the expansion.
The merger will create New Zealand's sixth biggest trading bank, with assets
of Dollars NZ350m and a 150 strong branch network.
Both Countrywide and United were previously building societies before they
gained banking licences. Both have large mortgage portfolios, assets which
made them attractive targets for takeover.
It is understood that both the Hong Kong Bank, which is seeking to expand in
New Zealand, and the ASB Bank, which is controlled by Australia's
Commonwealth Bank, investigated buying the United Bank. These banks would
not comment yesterday.
United has been owned for the past two years by the financially troubled
State Bank of South Australia, which bought it in July 1990 for NZDollars
150m.
The State Bank was advised to sell it among other assets by JP Morgan, the
investment banker. Mr Ted Johnson, group general manager of State Bank, said
he was 'well pleased with the result which completed the downsizing of the
bank."
United has traded profitably since the State Bank takeover and reported a
NZDollars 16m net profit in 1990-91.
Mr Peter Clapshaw, chairman of Countrywide, said the directors had asked
Bank of Scotland to increase its interests to give 'solidity' to the share
register, and to provide it with a fully commited majority shareholder.
General Accident, which will receive NZDollars 27.1m from Bank of Scotland
for its 20 per cent stake in Countrywide, said the disposal is in line with
its current policy of concentrating on its core business of insurance,
writes James Buxton.
In New Zealand and Australia GA's insurance business is handled by New
Zealand Insurance which it acquired in 1988 for Pounds 264m, a year after it
took the Countrywide stake. Initially it suffered heavy losses.
However, last year NZI sharply reduced its losses and produced an 'excellent
result' in New Zealand, while NZI Bank, having cut its deficit to Pounds
800,000 in 1991, pulled out of banking in February this year, giving up its
license.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11096</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: How dives to Pounds 1.3m as recession takes
toll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
RECESSION IN the construction industry hit How Group, the Midlands-based
building services contractor, which saw pre-tax profits for 1991 fall from
Pounds 4.21m to Pounds 1.3m.
The final dividend is cut to 1.5p to make an uncovered total of 2.5p (3.6p);
earnings worked through at 1.82p (5.94p). The shares gained 1p to 32p,
compared to a net asset value per share of 56p.
Turnover fell to Pounds 223.9m (Pounds 236.6m). The group wrote off Pounds
1.5m for bad debts and made exceptional provisions of Pounds 1.02m for
redundancies as the workforce was cut 18 per cent to 2,670.
Engineering services reported a loss before tax of Pounds 2.16m (Pounds
2.42m profit). Mr David Summerfield, chief executive, said order books fell
30 per cent year on year.
The maintenance division improved pre-tax profits from Pounds 519,000 to
Pounds 1.27m. Fire services turned round to pre-tax profits of Pounds
504,000 (Pounds 67,000 loss) despite lower turnover. This followed the
centralisation of the division to one site.
Year-end net cash was Pounds 5.2m (Pounds 3.6m) while net interest
receivable increased to Pounds 426,000 (Pounds 388,000).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11097</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Irish Life below forecast in dull equity
markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM COONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   DUBLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRISH LIFE, the Republic's largest insurer in the life and pensions market
and its biggest fund manager, reported embedded value for 1991 of IPounds
540m (Pounds 490m).
This is IPounds 5m less than forecast in the prospectus at flotation last
July, reflecting the general fall in equity and property markets since the
group was valued at March 31 last year.
Embedded value - a financial yardstick increasingly used by life assurance
companies to more accurately reflect their market worth and earnings -
measures the net value of present and future surpluses expected to be
generated on current business on the company's books. In Irish Life's case
it includes income generated from both its investment and insurance arms.
These first full results since privatisation showed pre-tax profits of
IPounds 40.6m. A dividend of 5.44p is recommended, payable from earnings of
10.23p per share.
Mr David Kingston, chief executive, said that embedded profits arising from
investment business 'were substantially lower' than forecast due to the poor
performance of the equity and property markets. However, these have been
largely offset by higher embedded profits resulting from a 13 per cent
growth in new recurring premium sales in Ireland last year to IPounds 50.4m,
which has increased Irish Life's domestic market share in the life,
endowment mortgages and pensions businesses from 27.7 per cent to 29.5 per
cent.
Overall premium income in Ireland fell by 3 per cent to IPounds 448.7m, due
to a sharp fall in the more volatile single premium market. In the UK total
premium income grew by 12 per cent to IPounds 93.1m,although new business in
recurring premiums fell by 10 per cent to IPounds 19m. US premium income
jumped 94 per cent to IPounds 78.3m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11098</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Iveco Ford Truck Pounds 39m in the red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IVECO FORD TRUCK, the UK truck maker, plunged to a net loss of Pounds 38.6m
last year from a deficit of Pounds 19.9m in 1990 and a profit of Pounds 9.6m
in 1989.
In the past two years the UK truck industry has suffered the steepest
decline into recession in the post-war period.
Iveco Ford Truck is jointly owned by Iveco, the commercial vehicles
subsidiary of Fiat of Italy, and Ford of the US, with Iveco holding
management control.
Last year's loss was exacerbated by redundancy costs as the workforce was
cut by some 30 per cent. The loss before special items, such as
restructuring costs, totalled Pounds 27.9m.
Truck production at Iveco Ford's Langley, Berkshire, plant fell by 32.7 per
cent last year to 5,826, the lowest point for more than 10 years. The plant
was on short-time working for much of the period.
The Iveco group, which includes Seddon Atkinson, saw a 39.9 per cent drop in
UK new truck registrations last year to 7,555 in an overall UK truck market
which shrank by 33.7 per cent to 32,184.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11099</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: ICI loses fight over US patent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL ABRAHAMS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IMPERIAL Chemical Industries, the UK industrial group, has lost a battle to
protect the US patent on Nolvadex, its best-selling breast cancer drug.
The patent for the drug has been successfully challenged by Barr
Laboratories, an independent New York-based generic manufacturer, which said
yesterday it expected to market a generic equivalent within a year.
Normally, sales of previously patented products fall by 40 per cent in two
years when faced by generic competition.
Although ICI refuses to give details of product sales in specific
geographical areas, analysts believe about half of Nolvadex's annual sales
of Pounds 248m are in the US.
'ICI could lose about Pounds 20m from its bottom line from this decision,'
warned Mr Charles Lambert, a chemicals analyst at Smith New Court.
ICI said it planned to appeal against the ruling made at the southern
district court of New York.
It is alleged to have submitted incomplete data when it filed patents in the
US.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11100</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Jupiter announces two disposals as profits
hit Pounds 1.17m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JUPITER TYNDALL, the financial services group, announced pre-tax profits of
Pounds 1.17m for the 10 months to December 31 and announced the sale of two
trust companies to Westpac Banking Corporation (Jersey).
Consideration for St Helier Trust, which was engaged in trust and fund
administration in Jersey, was Pounds 5.55m, plus repayment of Pounds 115,000
of inter-company debt.
Tyndall Bank and Trust (Bahamas) will be sold for just over Pounds 1m, if
the Central Bank of the Bahamas approves the deal.
Jupiter Tyndall was assembled in the course of 1991. First, Jupiter Tarbutt
Merlin, the privately-owned fund management group, reversed into Vantage
Securities, an investment trust. Then Jupiter Tarbutt took over Tyndall
Holdings, and the combined company was renamed Jupiter Tyndall.
As a consequence of these changes, the company has not produced comparable
figures for 1990. The 10 month results consolidate the results of Jupiter
Tarbutt for nine months and those of Tyndall for the last three months of
the year.
Net turnover for the 10 months was Pounds 5.01m. The pre-tax profit of
Pounds 1.17m consisted of operating profits of Pounds 1.02m and other income
of Pounds 150,000. Earnings per share were 4.4p. The final dividend is 3p,
giving a total of 5p.
The company said the figures did not reflect the underlying trading
performance. Profits were 'significantly lower' than they would have been if
Jupiter Tarbutt's profits had been consolidated for the full 12 months and
if the expenses of the merger had not occurred. The profits of the trust
companies (about Pounds 115,000 for the eight months to December 31) were
excluded.
Mr John Duffield, chairman, said that 'the full effects of cost savings and
the increased business flow which will accrue to the combined group are now
starting to show through in improved operating performance and the enlarged
group is trading in line with the board's expectations.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11101</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Littlewoods scores 2% rise to Pounds 97m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LITTLEWOODS, the retailing and football pools chain owned by the Moores
family, last year succeeded in shrugging off the worst effects of the
recession by reporting a 2 per cent improvement in pre-tax profits.
But the company sharply deflated repeated speculation that it might seek a
public listing. 'The family very much wish to retain their private company
status,' said Mr Leonard van Geest, chairman.
Mr Desmond Pitcher, chief executive, said it was too early to tell what
effect the government's plans to create a national lottery might have upon
Littlewoods' pools business.
But he said some 'absurd' figures had been bandied about for how much it
might raise and pointed out that Littlewoods already contributed Pounds 400m
annually to various sporting and arts foundations.
In 1991 Littlewoods' pre-tax profits advanced from Pounds 94.8m to Pounds
97m as turnover grew strongly from Pounds 2.37bn to Pounds 2.59bn.
The company's star performer was its home shopping division, which lifted
profits from Pounds 53.5m to Pounds 56m as it expanded its agency network by
200,000 to more than 3m.
Littlewoods had been seeking to sell the home shopping business to raise
funds for the expansion of its other retail interests but decided to take it
off the market earlier this month after it received no suitable offers.
The company's 124 chain stores increased profits from Pounds 29.4m to Pounds
30.3m. Its chain of 117 Index catalogue stores is expected to be profitable
in the current year after sustaining losses for several years. In 1991 Index
lost Pounds 3.7m, a reduction on the Pounds 6.7m deficit recorded in the
previous year.
Littlewoods said it had met with an encouraging response from the two stores
it opened last year in St Petersburg. The rouble-currency store had traded
successfully, creating a non-remittable surplus of Pounds 1m which will be
reinvested in further growth should the opportunities arise. The company is
investigating opening another four stores.
Its hard currency store traded less well because of the scarcity of
convertible currency in Russia.
The company is also expanding its Littlewoods International business with
the aim of buying goods in south-east Asia and wholesaling them to other
retailers in Europe and North America.
The company's 32 family shareholders, who are all direct descendants of the
two founders, shared about Pounds 400,000 in dividends. Littlewoods paid out
a further Pounds 1m to its preference shareholders.
Mr Pitcher said he was not a great enthusiast about the state of the
economy. The current year had started well but March had been 'awful'
because of the uncertainty ahead of the election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11102</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Hanson plans disposals to cut debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROLAND RUDD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HANSON, the Anglo-American conglomerate, is to make a series of disposals to
reduce net borrowings which have risen to Pounds 1.5bn following last year's
acquisition of Beazer, the building and aggregates group.
Mr Derek Bonham, newly-appointed chief executive, yesterday said that he
wanted the group to move back into a net cash position as soon as possible.
'There is a distinct possibility that there will be a series of disposals of
some of our smaller businesses,' said Mr Bonham.
Mr Bonham said that while the current debt position posed no immediate
problem he preferred to adopt a cautious response which argued for net cash.
Hanson's overall debt is about Pounds 9.5bn against cash of Pounds 8bn.
Borrowings increased after Hanson took over Beazer's Pounds 1.2bn debt and
off-balance sheet debt which Mr Bonham has brought back on to Hanson's
balance sheet.
The move to reduce borrowings is likely to heighten speculation that the
group is further preparing to make a big acquisition.
However, Mr Bonham said the conglomerate was more likely to look for
'distressed sellers' or embark on what he called 'a bit of cherry picking'
in buying divisions from other big companies.
He explained that Hanson planned to concentrate on the management of its six
or seven businesses, including Peabody Coal in the US and Imperial Tobacco
in the UK, which produced about 75 per cent of its Pounds 1.3bn pre-tax
profits for the year ended September.
Asked whether the group was keen to buy a UK business in order to help with
its advance corporation tax problems, Mr Bonham said: 'That is to put the
cart before the horse. Hanson must be run on commercial grounds first. If
tax benefits then flow from a particular situation so much the better.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11103</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Better second half helps limit fall at Moss
Bros to Pounds 1.32m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOSS BROS, the menswear retailer and hire chain, yesterday announced
slightly better-than-expected profits and said improved margins and cost
controls helped it weather recession in the high street.
Pre-tax profits fell to Pounds 1.32m (Pounds 2.39m) in the year to January
25. This followed a poor first-half performance when interim profits fell
from Pounds 1.1m to Pounds 102,000.
Mr Rowland Gee, managing director, said it was still too early to predict
recovery in menswear retailing.
Turnover for the 109-store group fell to Pounds 51.8m (Pounds 54.8m). Cecil
Gee, which mainly trades in London, was worst affected and saw a 10 per cent
fall in sales. But London was now recovering more quickly than other
regions, Mr Gee said.
Suit Co, spread throughout the UK and therefore better insulated from
recession in the south-east, lifted turnover slightly. Its estimated share
of the UK suit market grew from 3.2 to 5.8 per cent.
The hire division increased its market share from 25 per cent to 35 per cent
with last year's purchase of Dormie from Sears Menswear for Pounds 775,000.
Gross profits increased slightly to Pounds 24.6m (Pounds 24.5m) due to
better buying and stock control, and despite last April's 2.5 per cent VAT
rise. This cost the company about Pounds 500,000 because the increase was
not fully passed on to customers.
There was a Pounds 1.5m prior year tax credit from reduced provisions for
capital gains tax on the 1988 sale of its Covent Garden shop.
Earnings fell to 5.19p (9.43p) per share before the tax credit, but rose to
14.18p if it is included.
The directors are recommending a maintained final dividend of 3.5p, to make
an unchanged total of 5p.
The shares gained 4p to 118p.
COMMENT
Moss Bros' evidently stronger second half augurs well for the coming year.
But as Mr Gee points out, predicting the timing of recovery is tricky
because of distorting features last year, such as the VAT rise and an
earlier Easter. Even if confidence returns, consumers may prefer to buy new
kitchens before new suits. Yet most of the rental reversions are out of the
way, and the VAT losses will not have to be repeated. Forecast profits of
Pounds 1.6m put the shares on a multiple of about 19, in line with their
sector. Given the company's affinity for the steady rather than the
spectacular, the rating looks about right.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11104</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: IRH shares suspended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRADING in International Resort Holdings, the golf course and property
group, was suspended at 33p yesterday as the company announced that its net
asset value had 'seriously diminished'.
IRH, which warned in January that the profits outlook of the main
development division was uncertain, said the group had incurred losses for
the year to the end of March 1992.
Trading in the USM-quoted group will remain suspended pending clarification
of its financial position.
It is believed that the net asset value of IRH has fallen to less than half
the Pounds 5.6m called up share capital, prompting the Stock Exchange
announcement. At the end of March 1991 IRH had debt of about Pounds 13m and
assets valued at Pounds 16m.
The group has been in talks with its banker, Gamelstaden, which also holds
15 per cent of the equity. If a refinancing based on a debt for equity swap
or a rights issue cannot be agreed, then IRH faces administration or
receivership.
An extraordinary meeting is to be called to inform shareholders of the
options facing the group. An announcement is expected by the week-end.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11105</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Dares cuts loss to Pounds 28.5m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
DARES ESTATES, the property company which only published its interim results
having secured agreement with its banks a bare four weeks before the
December 31 year-end, has reported pre-tax losses of Pounds 28.5m for the
year, shaving Pounds 1.96m off last time's Pounds 30.5m.
Its banks gave Dares until the end of 1992 to match its interest costs with
its rental income, but, in the year under review, the former rose to Pounds
12.2m (Pounds 10.5m) and the latter declined to Pounds 7.6m (Pounds 10.9m).
Losses on ordinary activities grew to Pounds 10.8m (Pounds 3.25m) mainly
because of the widening gap between rents and interest.
Knocking the pre-tax figure further were exceptional charges of Pounds 17.8m
(Pounds 27.2m).
As a result of its losses Dares has again passed the preference dividend.
Losses per share were 15.76p (19.82p).
Post-tax losses were Pounds 27.4m (Pounds 34.9m). Net assets at the year-end
were down at Pounds 7.41m (Pounds 40.4m), less than half the called-up share
capital - a position that the Companies Act 1985 demands should trigger an
extraordinary meeting.
During the year the disposal of properties accrued Pounds 79.9m - borrowings
were reduced to Pounds 95.3m (Pounds 156.6m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11106</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: French Connection bank deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH Connection Group, the USM-quoted fashion manufacturer and retailer,
has agreed new bank facilities after its founder added a further Pounds 2m
to his loans to the company.
Mr Stephen Marks, who owns about 70 per cent of the equity, has now lent the
company a total of Pounds 3.6m.
The company has been in discussions with its bankers, with Barclays as the
agent bank, since last year.
During 1991 it dismissed its chief executive and its finance director and
incurred a pre-tax loss of nearly Pounds 5m on turnover of Pounds 23.3m
(Pounds 28.7m) in the first half.
Mr Michael Shen, former chief executive, has sued for wrongful dismissal.
Latest figure for net debt was on July 31, when it stood at Pounds 5.5m, or
84 per cent of shareholders' funds. With full-year figures to be announced
next month, the company would give no further balance sheet details
yesterday.
The business is being reviewed by a new management team headed by Mr George
Wardale, former chief executive of Highland Spring, the bottled water
company.
His appointment and that of Mr John Ellis, formerly of George Wimpey, the
builder, were also announced. Mr Marks continues as chief executive.
Mr Wardale led a turnround in the fortunes of Highland Spring, which he
joined from Lonrho in 1986. He said: 'I have chosen this company to spend
the next few years of my life and I would not have done so unless I had
thought that it was not only a decent company, but also that the deal was
doable.'
He said the core parts of the business were French Connection wholesale and
retail, and the Nicole Farhi shops. The Bukta subsidiary was not regarded as
core.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11107</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Blenheim advances 51% to Pounds 27.8m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BLENHEIM GROUP, the organiser of trade exhibitions and conferences,
increased pre-tax profits by 51 per cent, from Pounds 18.4m to Pounds 27.8m,
in the six months to February 29.
The share price gained 33p to close at a new high of 508p yesterday. The
shares were trading at less than 200p little more than a year ago.
Mr Neville Buch, chairman, said the group had a diverse portfolio of
exhibitions in each of the main countries in which it operated.
Turnover grew by 45 per cent to Pounds 103m (Pounds 71m). About half of it
lay in France, while the UK and the US accounted for nearly 20 per cent
each. German language venues accounted for most of the rest.
Even in the recession-hit UK sales had increased by more than 16 per cent.
Mr Buch said there had been a drift to quality - trade customers had
continued to attend what they regarded as the definitive shows in their
sectors.
So far this year, the total number of visitors at all the group's events had
increased to 412,261 (381,086). The average per show had gone up to 14,216
(13,141).
Acquisitions accounted for about 10 per cent of turnover and profit. Since
1987, Pounds 311m has been spent on building up what the group sees as
brands in the trade exhibition market and on overseas expansion. Mr Buch
said the rate of company purchases had moderated.
'We are now in a phase of running the business better, making selective
acquisitions, deriving full benefits from economies of scale and our
databases, and replicating events in different markets.'
Goodwill write-offs left the group with negative net worth of nearly Pounds
75m at the half-way stage, about Pounds 15m down on the year-end. Net debt
grew from just under Pounds 24m to Pounds 42.1m in the six months.
Mr Christopher Crowcroft, finance director, said acquisitions totalling
Pounds 14m and variations in the level of advance payments from customers
accounted for this. The underlying trend was downwards.
Operating profit of Pounds 30.7m (Pounds 20.5m) covered interest payments
nearly 10 times.
Mr Crowcroft said the group was working on further improvements to operating
margin by cutting its promotion costs and using its databases to refine the
targeting of customers.
The change of year-end to December would even out the seasonal impact on the
business. Under the old period, to August 31, both the autumn and
January-February high seasons for exhibitions fell in the first half, giving
it about two thirds of the profit. Under the new arrangement, each half
would have one of the peaks.
Earnings per share advanced by 30 per cent to 20.5p (15.8p). The interim
dividend goes up from 2.33p to 2.7p.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11108</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / UK Company News: Wellcome may seek listing in New York
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WELLCOME, the drugs group, is understood to be planning a New York Stock
Exchange listing as part of the sale by the Wellcome Trust of a large part
of its shareholding.
Wellcome Trust, the medical charity, is reducing its stake from 73.6 per
cent to a minimum of 25 per cent through a sale this summer. Later this week
it is expected to get High Court clearance to take its stake below 50 per
cent.
It is thought that Robert Fleming, the UK merchant bank which is the global
co-ordinator for the sale, believes that the key to the success of the sale
is getting US institutional investors to buy.
Without strong demand from the US it could prove difficult to sell the full
48.6 per cent available at near the market price. The final amount to be
sold will not be determined until close to the price fixing. At yesterday's
close of Pounds 10.15, down 17p, the 48.6 per cent is worth about Pounds
4.2bn.
The issue is likely to be organised in a similar way to a US-style initial
public offering. The same structure will be used throughout the world.
Although Wellcome's roots are in the US and nearly half its profits are made
there, it is not well known on Wall Street.
Less than 2 per cent of the shares are held internationally, whereas about a
quarter of Glaxo's are US held. While some 40 US analysts publish research
on Glaxo, only six US houses write about Wellcome, and of these four have
London-based analysts researching the company.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11109</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Rank to sell 22 hotels to reduce debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE RANK Organisation has put 22 of its UK hotels up for sale, including the
Royal Garden and Royal Lancaster hotels in London. The company, whose
interests include cinemas, film distribution, bingo and Butlin's holiday
camps, said that it had received several approaches but it did not expect to
find one buyer for all the hotels.
Mr Michael Gifford, chief executive, said the sale of all the hotels would
take several years. He expected to sell one or two hotels before the end of
the financial year in October, with a few more being sold the following
year. City estimates of the total value of the hotels - five in London and
17 in the provinces - range from Pounds 300m to Pounds 350m.
Rank will retain more than 30 other hotels which are linked to operations
such as Butlin's and the Shearings coach holiday business. Mr Gifford said
the sale would help the group reduce net debt from 64 per cent of
shareholders' funds at the end of the last financial year to 50 per cent.
Rank's shares rose 13p on the announcement, closing at 739p. The view in the
City was that the relatively expensive hotels did not fit in well with
Rank's other businesses, which tend to cater to the mass market.
Mr Paul Slattery of Kleinwort Benson said the hotel business was one in
which Rank was 'a mile wide and an inch deep. They're not a major player in
hotels and they're unlikely to become one. They will be able to concentrate
on those businesses in which they're committed to growing.'
He said the sale of the provincial hotels was likely to prove difficult.
Other groups, including Forte, have provincial hotels for sale. The number
of establishments on the market has been swollen by hotels that have gone
into receivership.
Interest in the London hotels - the Athenaeum, the Glou-cester, the Royal
Garden, the Royal Lancaster and the White House - is expected to come from
outside the UK. Hotel analysts said any number of US, European or Asian
companies might be interested in increasing their presence in London. Mr
Slattery said: 'Every international hotel group has got a map somewhere in
its office with a flag stuck into London.'
Lex, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11110</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Japan's banks braced for a capital storm: The effect of
capital adequacy standards
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
For Japanese bankers and their borrowers, at home and abroad, March 31,
1993, looms ever larger.
It is the day that tough capital adequacy standards set by the Bank for
International Settlements come into effect.
Until the end of last month, Japanese banks hoped to make the grade with a
combination of boosting their capital, cutting growth in assets, including
loans, and luck.
But this month's 15 per cent plunge in the Tokyo stock market has thrown the
bankers' calculations into confusion. Mr Tsuneo Wakai, chairman of the
Federation of Bankers' Associations of Japan, warned this week that if stock
prices remained at current depressed levels until next March, Japanese banks
would fail to meet BIS requirements. He warned this would dampen
international confidence in Japan's banking system and economy.
Mr Wakai's fears may already have been realised. In the past month foreign
bankers in Tokyo have reported a sharp increase in inquiries from overseas
clients about the creditworthiness of Japanese financial institutions.
Nevertheless, in spite of Mr Wakai's concerns, there is little evidence of
panic among Japanese bankers. Instead, they plan to postpone drastic steps
until later in the financial year in the hope the stock market might
recover. One senior banker says: 'We will not take any difficult decisions
until after September.'
For borrowers that means the stock market plunge will probably not bring
further tightening of the credit supply from Japanese banks. But companies
seeking funds next year could face an anxious time.
Banks can improve capital adequacy ratios by raising capital or by cutting
asset growth. Japanese banks have done both: they raised equity until the
stock market plunged in 1990, then took out subordinated loans, which for
BIS purposes count as capital.
Meanwhile, they cut asset growth from a peak above 15 per cent in the late
1980s, to an estimated 4 per cent in the year to the end of March 1992. As a
result, most banks met the BIS final standard of 8 per cent for the ratio of
capital to risk-weighted assets.
But the plunge in the stock market, led by a sharp fall in bank shares, has
pushed most leading banks below 8 per cent. Japanese banks count as capital
a portion of unrealised gains on share portfolios - gains eroded by the
stock price fall.
The decline in confidence has been so serious that the Ministry of Finance
last week announced preliminary figures for the banks' financial results and
reassured investors that Japanese banks were sound.
Fortunately for Japanese banks, BIS rules contain no sanctions. The Japanese
finance ministry will decide on penalties - and it is unlikely to do
anything to undermine the banks' interests at such a delicate time. US and
European regulators are also unlikely to pressure Japan for fear of the
impact on international confidence in Japanese banks.
Banks with ratios below 8 per cent may see credit ratings cut by the rating
agencies - but most agencies have already marked Japanese banks down heavily
in the past two years in response to the world economic slowdown and
mounting bad loans in property markets. Similarly, poor BIS ratios could
affect investors' opinions of bank shares - but this may have been
discounted in the recent sharp price plunge.
One answer might be to change BIS rules. But Bank of Japan officials have
ruled out a unilateral appeal from Japan to BIS, as this could appear an
admission of weakness. As a last resort, the Bank of Japan might try
persuading the US and European central banks to revise the rules jointly.
But this could still look like a cry for help from Japan.
So it will be for Japanese banks to work out their own salvation. For the
current year, leading banks plan to raise more subordinated debt. But BIS
limits the subordinated debt which can be counted as capital - and some
banks are near the ceiling.
The capital base will also be reinforced by profits. However, banks'
successes in increasing revenues from current businesses - mainly by
widening interest rate spreads - is being offset by losses suffered through
writing off past bad loans. According to the finance ministry, banks'
operating profits in the year to last March rose 26.8 per cent but net
profits (after write-offs) fell 24 per cent.
So, barring a sharp stock market recovery, banks will be forced to cut asset
growth or, probably, reduce assets. So far, they have done this mainly by
cutting money market exposure and other financial market investments. They
will press ahead with securitisation - parcelling loans into small lots and
selling them to institutional investors.
The banks have been helped by decline in demand for loans in Japan because
of the economic slowdown. So, as Bank of Japan officials point out, there
has been no general credit crunch in Japan. Nor have there been any
conspicuous cases of Japanese banks denying credit to overseas borrowers.
Certainly, borrowers in some sectors, notably property, are squealing for
credit. But their problems do not stem from BIS-imposed constraints but from
the plunge in property prices in Tokyo, London and New York.
However, there is a real concern that general credit shortages could emerge
if the Japanese economy begins to recover, as expected by the authorities,
at the end of 1992, as companies will want funds for restocking. Mr Reese
Harasawa, a planning department manager at Mitsubishi Bank, says: 'When the
economy picks up there could be a problem if borrowers are denied loans.
That's a delicate issue.'
At the same time, increasing numbers of companies will seek to refinance
equity-linked bonds they issued in the boom of the late 1980s. The peak in
bonds falling due comes next year. The president of a leading Japanese
software company, seeking to refinance Dollars 100m (Pounds 56m) of bonds
falling due next year, says he has already begun talking to his main bank
but does not know if he can raise a loan to repay the bonds. 'This is now my
biggest headache,' he says.
Japanese bankers try to reassure borrowers saying they are sticking to their
original lending plans (set before this month's stock market fall) which
call for keeping the growth in foreign assets to around zero, and to between
2 per cent and 3 per cent for assets overall.
Top priority will go to servicing a bank's best customers, which will
usually mean old-established Japanese borrowers. But a Bank of Tokyo
official says banks will pay attention to quality - seeking to maintain
credit quality and boost lending margins. So even blue-chip borrowers may
have to pay more for funds.
Banks dislike admitting that some would-be borrowers will be turned away.
But they almost certainly will. As one banker says: 'If a new borrower comes
to us with a new proposal we would have to think very seriously. I believe
we may well say 'no'.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Japanese         Risk weignted capital      Nikkei index level at which
Banks            ratio (end Sep 1991)       capital ratio falls below 8%
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Dai-Ichi Kangyo            8.38%                      15,624
Sakura                     7.57%                      18,611
Sumitomo                   8.94%                      11,711
Fuji                       8.72%                      15,974
Mitsubishi                 8.71%                      16,194
Sanwa                      8.50%                      15,151
Tokai                      8.34%                      17,051
Kyowa-Saitama              8.90%                      12,478
Bank of Tokyo              8.50%                      19,024
Daiwa Bank                 9.01%                      14,007
Hokkaido Takushoku         8.80%                      16,258
Industrial Bank of Japan   8.39%                      15,369
Long Term Credit Bank      8.56%                      15,118
Nippon Credit Bank         8.03%                      17,668
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: IBCA
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11111</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / ABF falls 5.4% to Pounds 175m at half year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ASSOCIATED BRITISH FOODS, the Sunblest bread to Silver Spoon sugar group,
yesterday reported a 5.4 per cent fall in pre-tax profits to Pounds 175.2m
as investment income fell and baking margins came under pressure. The
figures cover the six months to March 14.
Mr Garry Weston, chairman, said the economy lacked buoyancy and trading
conditions were depressed. He saw no sign of an immediate improvement. The
shares fell ahead of the results but recovered to close unchanged at 427p as
the profits were at the top end of expectations.
Mr Weston said that, without a material uplift in the economies where ABF
operates, second-half results would 'at best' match the previous year,
suggesting a pre-tax profit for the year of at most Pounds 322.5m, down from
Pounds 332.4m.
The figures were affected by the Pounds 880m acquisition of British Sugar,
owned for 12 weeks of the first half of 1990-91. It contributed sales of
Pounds 370m and trading profits of Pounds 74.5m in the first half, compared
with Pounds 170m and Pounds 33.2m.
Group turnover rose 17.4 per cent to Pounds 2.1bn, and trading profits were
31.5 per cent up at Pounds 160.4m.
British Sugar's profits more than offset the fall in income from financing
the purchase. However, investment income fell from Pounds 84.4m to Pounds
36.6m, with Pounds 10m of the fall attributed to lower interest rates.
Interest payable was Pounds 21.8m against Pounds 21.3m. Net cash was around
Pounds 350m at the half year, down from Pounds 416.7m at the September
year-end which is a seasonal high point.
After a slightly higher tax rate of 32.4 per cent from 31.3 per cent there
was an extraordinary charge of Pounds 10.6m which is a provision for the
fall in value of the group's stake in Berisford International. Last year's
accounts included a Pounds 100.5m write-down of the investment. The holding
has been written down to 18p a share.
In the UK and Europe sales were 19 per cent up at Pounds 1.8bn, and trading
profits 37 per cent ahead to Pounds 141.8m. Excluding British Sugar, other
operations increased sales by 6 per cent to Pounds 615m and trading profits
were down by Pounds 3.4m to Pounds 42.3m.
Earnings per share were 25.8, down from 27.7. The first interim dividend is
unchanged at 8.5p. However, ABF said that, following the change in year-end,
the entire increase for the 1991-92 financial year would be included in the
March 1993 dividend. Lex, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11112</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Top Tokyo brokers to cut dividends
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN'S big four securities companies - Nomura, Yamaichi, Daiwa, and Nikko -
are being forced to write off Y129.9bn (Pounds 550m) in securities losses
following the steep fall in the Tokyo stock market.
The companies are also, with the exception of Nomura, cutting dividends
sharply in response to declining profitability.
Daiwa said yesterday it would declare Y36.45bn in securities losses in the
fiscal year ended in March because the market price of securities it holds
have plunged below acquisition costs.
The firm also said pre-tax profits would fall nearly 30 per cent below
estimates of Y13bn made in early March, compared with Y119bn a year ago. The
company will cut its full-year dividend from Y14 a share to Y9 a share.
Daiwa's business, like others in the industry, has been hit by a decline in
securities markets caused by the weaker Japanese economy and high interest
rates. Retail customers have also been deterred by scandals last year and
trading volumes have plunged.
Yamaichi will declare securities valuation losses of Y40.75bn and cut its
dividend from Y13.5 a share to Y7.5. Yamaichi expects a pre-tax loss of
Y34bn, against Y67bn profit last year.
Nikko Securities will declare valuation losses of Y18.2bn, and cut its
dividend payment from Y13.5 to Y8.5 a share. Pre-tax profits will decline to
Y2.5bn, from Y72.9bn a year ago.
Nomura will declare Y34.5bn in securities losses, but expects a pre-tax
profit of Y45bn, against Y233.5bn a year ago. Its dividend is not expected
to be cut.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11113</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Kingfisher eyes office products warehouse deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN THORNHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KINGFISHER, the retailing conglomerate which includes Woolworths and B&amp;Q, is
investigating whether to open discount warehouses for office products in the
UK in partnership with Staples, a US speciality retailer.
The two companies are currently conducting a market feasibility study which
may lead to a joint venture agreement to open stores by the year-end. Such a
move would have a significant impact on the UK office products market
although the discussions are believed to be at a preliminary stage.
Staples, based in Massachusetts, runs 125 stores in the US selling a wide
range of deeply discounted office products and furniture in rudimentary
supermarket-style outlets. Its stores are typically 18,000 sq ft making them
bigger than traditional stationery stores in the UK.
Each Staples store stocks about 5,000 brand-name office supplies spanning
computers, snacks and cleaning equipment. The large volume of sales and
cheap locations gives the company considerable economies of scale enabling
it to offer low prices.
Staples, which was founded in 1985, has acquired a reputation for aggressive
organic expansion. It also owns a 16 per cent stake in Business Depot which
operates three office product stores in Canada.
It is not yet clear whether the two parties would simply try to replicate
the Staples format in the UK. But Kingfisher possesses a deep knowledge of
suitable out-of-town retailing locations through its operation of the B&amp;Q
DIY chain.
Last month, Kingfisher announced a 3 per cent improvement in profits before
tax and exceptional items to Pounds 222m and said it was researching further
opportunities for growth. Its attempts to expand by acquisition appear to
have stalled in the absence of suitable targets and the company has put its
emphasis on exploring more aggressive forms of organic expansion.
The UK office equipment market has seen other new entrants in recent months.
Last November, the privately-owned PC World opened a computer superstore in
Croydon, south London. And this March Business Superstores opened a big
office equipment store in west London with plans to open another in
Colindale.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11114</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Letter: Diversity benefits electricity supply, despite
surplus
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DAVID PORTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Juliet Sychrava's report, 'Electricity surplus of 60 per cent is
predicted' (April 24), draws attention to the likely excess of capacity in
electricity generation. It also points out that virtually all of the new
capacity is gas-fired.
The excess capacity is indeed high by the standards of the former
state-controlled industry, but electricity users should welcome the
willingness of new privately owned companies to compete with the ex-CEGB
generators.
Britain should enjoy the benefit of diversity in power generation and that
includes a role for coal, but the electricity industry cannot sustain itself
by pricing its product on the output of fully depreciated coal-fired power
stations. Gas-fired generation, using 'combined cycle' technology, is being
chosen for sound commercial reasons. It is also cleaner and no doubt
eventually it will get credit for that.
One of our leading members bought and converted an ex-CEGB power station.
With manning at only one-third of the previous level, it now achieves much
higher fuel efficiency and double the previous power output - with a massive
reduction in emissions. In most industries, that would be considered a good
investment.
David Porter,
chief executive,
Association of Independent Electricity Producers,
Herodsfoot,
Liskeard, Cornwall PL14 4QX
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11115</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Phones with a view to profit from vision: A range of
videophones is being launched on to business and household markets. Michiyo
Nakamoto examines their prospects
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When the phone rings do you tend to be slouched in your seat, or leaning
back with your feet on the desk? Are you a round-the-clock businessman who
regularly keeps in touch with contacts while soaking in the bathtub?
If so, you may want to rethink your telecommunications habits. The next
phone you buy could be a videophone, capable of sending colour pictures of
you, bath bubbles and all, down the wire.
In the US, Japan, Britain, France and other leading industrialised
countries, companies are introducing a range of videophones to offices and
homes, from high-priced machines connected to personal computers to
affordable models for home use.
AT&amp;T, the American telecommunications giant, is launching a Dollars 1,500
(Pounds 850) videophone for homes next month in the US. Matra, the French
maker of telephone sets, has been selling videophones in France since last
autumn, while Hitachi recently launched several models in Japan. In the UK,
GEC-Marconi is licensing its technology to BT and Amstrad, which plan to
bring out a range of videophones later this year.
BT, in collaboration with IBM, the US computer group, has developed an
electronic card to enable IBM and IBM-compatible personal computers to be
turned into videophones. The cards, which are inserted into the computers,
will be launched early next year.
'A whole new era of visual communications is here,' says Mr Mike Zeaman, of
AT&amp;T Consumer Products in the US. He claims the videophone will open up
numerous possibilities for new uses of the phone at home and in the office.
Deaf people, for example, will be able to communicate by telephone for the
first time.
The practical benefits to businesses are enormous, says Mr Tony Fish,
marketing engineer at GEC-Marconi Electronics. He believes the videophone
will help companies save on travelling costs and time by making it easier to
take decisions over the phone. 'There is a lot of research evidence that
shows people will not make decisions over the phone,' he says. They prefer
to have face-to-face contact.
It will also be far easier to communicate information that requires visual
description - graphics in a brochure, new company logos - over the phone.
Although there are obvious benefits to visual communication, the development
of videophones was originally held back by the technology. A number of
phones capable of sending images has appeared on and off the market since
AT&amp;T introduced its first Picturephone in 1964, but the problems of
transmitting visual information down a phone line meant that early
Picturephones could send only still, black and white pictures.
However, companies including AT&amp;T in the US and GEC-Marconi in the UK, which
have been working on the technology for many years, are now able to send
between two and 10 colour picture frames a second down a regular phone line
to produce moving colour images at the other end.
The result is colour video in slow motion, reminiscent of the TV broadcasts
of the first astronauts on the moon. But manufacturers believe the image
quality will be acceptable to most consumers if the price is kept reasonably
low. BT plans to sell its residential unit, made by GEC-Marconi, for Pounds
399.
Another breakthrough is the recent adoption of an international standard for
digital videophones. This allows digital videophones of different makes to
communicate. The absence of an internationally agreed standard meant that a
BT videophone, for example, could not talk to an AT&amp;T model.
Manufacturers expect the adoption of the standard to spur demand among
businesses, just as the agreement of an international standard for faxes in
1984 triggered widespread demand among corporations for fax machines.
Another sign that the industrialised world is ready for videotelephones, say
manufacturers, is the growing use in corporations of videoconferencing - an
expensive and larger scale system of visual communications.
'Our experience with videoconferencing shows us that people really take to
it,' says Mr Jim Barron, public relations manager for visual services at BT.
People have become accustomed to being videoed so they are less shy in front
of the camera and more aware of its benefits. Last year, says Mr Barron, BT
doubled its turnover from videoconferencing sales.
Since the videophone enables groups of people to talk to each other, it is
also a much more flexible communication tool than the conventional
telephone.
Yet, in spite of the advantages, Mr Goldman expects the market for
videophones to grow slowly over the next few years, because it will take
time to build up an installed base of users.
For home use, one big obstacle is the lack of compatibility of different
manufacturers' products. Unlike digital videophones, residential machines
are based on an analogue system, for which no international standard has
been agreed. Analogue videophones made by different manufacturers,
therefore, cannot speak to each other.
So far there are no moves to establish such a standard for analogue phones.
Manufacturers, such as GEC-Marconi, are hoping that dominance in the
marketplace will establish their own system as the de facto standard.
Image quality will also deter some people. Although the latest videophones
can send and receive moving colour pictures, only a limited amount of
information can be transmitted through regular phone lines, so the picture
quality is far below that of television.
But the greatest deterrent could still be consumer resistance. For all the
people who are thrilled by the idea of seeing friends and relatives on the
phone, there will be many who dread going on show each time the phone rings.
Few people will relish the thought of a face-to-face confrontation with
telemarketers. And many will be concerned that it will not be as easy to
tell a casual lie - about not coming in to work, for example - over the
phone.
To overcome the problem of privacy, BT has included a special button, which
the receiver of a call has to press to open the camera lens. So if the phone
rings while you are taking a bath, you can answer without fear of exposure.
Whether or not such a precaution is enough to placate the sceptics, the
manufacturers are convinced that the market is set to take off.
In Japan, Hitachi has sold more than 100 units at a price of Y950,000
(Dollars 7,140) each since announcing its videophone early last year. Frost
&amp; Sullivan, a market research company, forecasts that the worldwide market
for visual communications will be in the region of Dollars 3bn a year by
1995.
'It is often pointed out that 60 per cent of a message is communicated
through non-verbal cues,' says BT's Mr Barron. 'That is what makes us think
videotelephony is going to be very, very big.'
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
VIDEOPHONE: THE NEXT STEP IN COMMUNICATIONS
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
European market for videoconferencing
         1990     Dollars 65.44m   estimate
         1995    Dollars 296.00m*  forecast
US market for videoconferencing
         1990       Dollars 894m
         1995      Dollars 8.3bn   forecast
Number of installed videoconferencing units in US
         1990              4,660
         1995            161,199   forecast
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Frost &amp; Sullivan              * includes audioconferencing
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11116</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Letter: Value of a tenant in US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DAVID B SIMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Concerning your editorial ('Tenants squeezed', April 6), your criticism
of the continuing liability of tenants entering into leases following
assignment overlooks an essential point.
At least in the US, financing for real estate projects is based not on the
value of the underlying real estate, however measured, but primarily, and
sometimes entirely, on the creditworthiness of the tenant and the perception
of the lease as a type of bond.
If tenants were to be able to shed their liability by subsequent assignment,
the lenders would not be receiving that for which they had bargained, and
they would withdraw from high-credit net lease financing. At a minimum, any
statutory scheme designed to release an original tenant's continuing
contingent liability, notwithstanding the terms of the lease, should only
take effect following the retirement of any financing predicted on the
original tenant's credit.
David B Simpson,
Holtmann, Wise &amp; Shepard,
745 Fifth Avenue,
New York, NY 10151,
US
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11117</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Letter: Political system
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr KAREL LANNOO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I agree with Edward Mortimer ('European puzzle still unsolved', April
16) where he writes that it is very difficult fo generalise about the
election results in west European countries. I think, however, that there is
one exception, ie the rejection by an important part of the voters of the
traditional political system, which they see as dominated by corrupt,
incompetent and nepotistic politicians. This attitude benefits the extreme
right and new parties and lies at the basis of their success in Belgium,
France, Italy and possibly also in Germany. It is up to western politicians
to come up with credible proposals for the improvement of our political
system. Karel Lannoo,
58 rue de la Brasserie,
1050 Brussels, Belgium
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11118</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Letter: Settle for regular warnings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DESMOND FITZPATRICK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Joe Rogaly's comments on Mrs Thatcher's Newsweek article ('Free to
speak their minds', April 24) are characteristically balanced. Few enough
have acknowledged the right of the undefeated contestant of three general
elections to comment widely and perhaps uncomfortably on matters which she
still regards as of concern.
She will, anyway] Here is how she must see it: in 1979, the country was on
its face in the gutter, partly a comic spectacle but principally a dire
warning to other nations. She changed all that. Some people have not enjoyed
the change, which does not greatly matter since the changes are for good.
But, inevitably, she will for ever fear the undoing of her work in some
vital respect.
This simple view which I dare attribute to her has enough of the truth in it
to command a good measure of respect. So we may as well settle to sharp,
regular warnings against what she will perceive as backsliding. We enjoy the
benefit of her revolution and must be content to live with the tyranny of
her memory.
Desmond FitzPatrick,
Five Trees,
Field Way,
Burnt Common Lane,
Nr Ripley, Surrey GU23 6HJ
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11119</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Letter: Unions argue that lack of funds seriously restricts
EOC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From SUE BOND, JULIE CORNWALL, ROGER MCKEOWN, CATH PICKERING and DOROTHY
ROBSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, As the local trade union representatives at the Equal Opportunities
Commission, we were shocked to read in Diane Summers's article ('EOC is
criticised over value for money', April 22) that the recent review of the
EOC would find that it failed to provide value for money. We are not aware
of any evidence to suggest that the report being prepared will include such
allegations, but there is plenty to suggest that the commission is
constantly achieving the impossible on a shoestring.
The EOC has brought pioneering cases under the equality legislation, carried
out substantive investigations and produced authoritative research and
reports. By its very nature, the work is labour-intensive and the expertise
of the staff is its most important resource. These criticisms can only come
from an attempt to discredit the report and the EOC by implying that money
spent on equal opportunities is money wasted.
The real issue is the pitiful amount of money provided by the government in
the first place. The EOC's grant-in-aid has been drastically cut in real
terms for years. Consequently, our abilities to fulfil the statutory duties
outlined in the Sex Discrimination Act and Equal Pay Act are now seriously
restricted. Staff are already stretched to give legal advice on a wide range
of issues to the thousands of people, mostly women, who have suffered as a
result of discrimination, and who cannot afford a solicitor and usually have
nowhere else to go for help.
What we clearly need are more staff and more resources, and it is the
government that is to blame for undermining yet another vital public
service. Our respective unions have long campaigned for a properly funded
EOC, and our members at the commission intend to continue fighting to defend
our jobs and conditions, the service we provide to the public, and also the
importance of equal opportunities in a far from equal society.
Sue Bond,
Julie Cornwall,
Roger McKeown,
Cath Pickering,
Dorothy Robson,
trade union side officers,
NUCPS and CPSA,
Overseas House,
Quay Street,
Manchester M3 3HN
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11120</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / An opposition in exile
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
You can forget about the opposition for a while. It is of more than passing
interest to know whether or not Mr John Smith becomes leader of the Labour
party, but beyond that we need only look in from time to time. When the
party has been restructured it may become credible. Until then British
politics will be about what goes on among Conservatives.
This is not to say that oppositions make no difference at all. If during
1990 Labour had not reached the high 40 per cents in the opinion polls
(misleading as that may now be seen to have been), the Conservatives would
have had no reason to overthrow Mrs Margaret Thatcher. In the last
parliament Mr Smith skilfully exploited the obvious disagreements between
Mrs Thatcher and her 'excellent' chancellor, Mr Nigel Lawson. Labour saw off
more than one health secretary. The political career of Mr John Moore was
ended; that of Mr William Waldegrave blighted.
In this parliament, however, the advantage to the opposition of a low Tory
majority is offset by both Mr John Major's strategy of seeking a
Conservative consensus and the disarray in which Labour finds itself. This
week's argument about the rules under which a successor to Mr Neil Kinnock
is to be elected is about a mere technicality. What Labour has to do is
detach itself from the trade union movement, find a reason for existing in a
non-socialist world, devise new policies, and perhaps even rename itself. If
it does not follow such a path it may have no future at all; if it does it
will be so preoccupied with its own restructuring for a good while yet that
it will have little energy left with which to mount a vigorous opposition.
Such reflections are not entirely consonant with the election result. Simple
arithmetic suggests that the government ought to tread carefully, lest the
opposition stomp on its toes. Mr Major's victory on April 9 was so
unexpected, and such a signal triumph after a contest fought in
mid-depression, that the relative smallness of the Conservatives'
parliamentary majority was generally overlooked. They are 21 seats ahead,
but in a house of 651 that should not be unassailable. Their advantage could
be eroded as a result of by-election losses. Even if that does not happen,
the government side is in theory subject to harassment by a united
opposition. Tory back-benchers could stage successful rebellions.
Yet, as many of us discovered on the morning of April 10, arithmetic can be
misleading. Tories can manage quite well on a small majority in the Commons,
as Labour must on most of the rare occasions on which it wins. In October
1951 Churchill returned to No 10 Downing Street as the head of a government
with an overall majority of just 17. It lasted for 3 1/2 years, until May
1955, and might have survived for longer had not the great war leader been
obliged to retire on grounds of ill-health. Churchill did not try to reverse
the welfare state reforms pushed through by Labour in the previous six
years, but his administration did begin the dismantling of war-time
controls.
In those gentlemanly post-war years MPs were relatively docile. Expecting to
return soon, Labour did not make life unduly difficult for the government.
In 1970 the then Mr Edward Heath was less fortunate. His victory by 30 seats
was just as much of a shock to the opinion pollsters as this year's upset;
his government was not, however, given such a comfortable ride as
Churchill's had enjoyed 20 years previously. Mr Heath was obliged by the oil
price shock to perform his celebrated U-turn on economic management. He was
brought down in 1974 by the coal miners' strike. The National Union of
Mineworkers behaved at that time as a part of the opposition, the extension
by other means of Labour's parliamentary tactics.
Everything is different now. In 1951 there were nine Liberal and other-party
MPs; in 1970 there were only 12. Since then the 'third force' of
representatives of centre parties and Celtic nationalists has grown, to 44
in the current parliament. For Labour to catch the Tories in a big set-piece
vote it must find an issue upon which all these parties can agree, and it
must win the support in the lobbies of about a dozen Tory rebels.
Something of the sort might have happened, had there been a majority of 21
and not 100, during the debates on the poll tax. The celebrated amendment
moved by Mr Michael Mates, which would have provided for banding of the
Community Charge according to income, might have won through. That was in
the days of Mrs Thatcher and government by ideology. Such a rebellion is
less likely while Mr Major is prime minister, for he has no ideology. He
never forgets the lessons he learned in the Whips office. It would be
uncharacteristic of him to put an issue to the house if he was uncertain of
winning the vote. He will try to square the parliamentary party first, then
come to the Commons. So that is where there is business to be done: among
Conservatives.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11121</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Leading Article: The G7 at an impasse
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
IF MEETINGS of finance ministers and central bank governors of the group of
seven leading industrial countries were intended to deliver day-to-day,
co-ordinated management of the global economy, then its latest one would
have to be judged disappointing. From the American perspective - that the G7
should concentrate, first and foremost, on promoting global economic growth
this year, next year or, indeed, in any year - the meeting in Washington
must have been a failure. Happily, it was not, or at least not altogether.
It has, at least, pushed the case for aid to the former Soviet Union up the
international agenda, though over liberalisation of world trade the G7
remains an egregious flop.
With his remark that the G7 should spend more time thinking about world
growth, the US Treasury secretary, Nicholas Brady, was speaking oft-repeated
lines. Equally familiar by now was the response of the two addressees:
Germany and Japan. In this case, the Japanese refusal to accept a fiscal
commitment even prolonged the meeting by two hours.
It was not always thus. 'Co-ordination' used to mean that the US did what it
wanted, while everybody else also did what the US wanted. Now it means that
the major players first argue with one another, whereupon each does
precisely what it wants.
No accident
This decline of American leadership is no accident. It reflects the
reduction in American geo-strategic leverage upon its principal allies after
the collapse of the Soviet Union, the poor quality of much US economic
policymaking, the weak intellectual case for a monetary and fiscal policy
oriented primarily to short-term growth and, not least, the legacy of past
German and Japanese obedience to American behests.
Germany only flirted, and that rather briefly, with global exchange rate
stabilisation and the search for short-term economic growth. Japan, by
contrast, was seduced. The short-term result was rapid monetary expansion
and asset price inflation. The longer-term result has been the asset price
deflation and economic miseries of today.
No wonder then that the Japanese are unwilling to risk the stability they
have been trying to regain in return for renewed pursuit of short-term
growth. Furthermore, the asset price collapse has been matched by that in
the influence of the politicians. Nobody can now force the Ministry of
Finance to relax the fiscal reins or the Bank of Japan to loosen the
monetary ones.
Intensely irritating
Meanwhile, calls from Washington for smaller fiscal deficits must be
intensely irritating to the Germans. US policymakers have, after all, called
for a fiscal boost by Germany almost every year since the G7 was formed.
More irritating still, the US has itself followed the most consistently
profligate fiscal policy of the three major economies. If global interest
rates are to fall - as, indeed, they must - the US must put its own fiscal
house in order. Otherwise real rates of interest on American long-term bonds
are unlikely to fall from their current high levels.
However inhibited the US may be in putting its case, it does have one.
Fiscal flexibility in Japan would be desirable. Equally, current European
monetary policy is inappropriate to European conditions. Europe has a single
monetary policy, but one dedicated to stability within only one region.
Worse, that region is in the throes of an exceptional shock to its economic
and political stability, as the current strikes in Germany bear witness.
Europe now suffers from most of the disadvantages of economic and monetary
union, but gains none of the advantages.
The G7 log-jam is only likely to be broken by changed economic circumstances
among the main players. The world must hope, instead, that the International
Monetary Fund is right to forecast strong recovery next year. In the
meantime, the G7 has been right to focus attention on providing support to
the reforming countries of eastern Europe and the former Soviet Union.
Equally important, however, is completion of the Uruguay Round of
multilateral trade negotiations. G7 summits have twice promised a successful
end to these negotiations; twice they have failed. The leaders of the G7
cannot afford to leave the issue unresolved until they next meet, in Munich
this summer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11122</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Leading Article: The challenge for legal reformers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WEARING of wigs in court is, according to Lord Hailsham, the former Lord
Chancellor, a matter of the utmost unimportance. More fairly, it might be
said that in deciding to consult judges on the matter, Lord Taylor, the new
Lord Chief Justice, has made a symbolic gesture towards more open and
user-friendly justice. But it is no more than that.
Lord Taylor will need to go much further. A series of damaging miscarriages
of justice has shaken public confidence in the courts and the judiciary. A
great deal is expected of him in restoring that confidence, but the task
will not be easy.
First, he is unable to wipe the slate clean and start afresh. One of his
first tasks will be to hear the appeal of Miss Judith Ward, whose conviction
for the 1974 M62 coach bombing is now widely regarded as unsafe. There are
other alleged miscarriages of justice in the pipeline, all likely to
reinforce disquiet with the system.
Second, there is a limit to what the Lord Chief Justice can achieve on his
own. Ranked second to the Lord Chancellor in the judicial hierarchy, his
primary responsibilities are to run the criminal courts and communicate with
judges and magistrates. Most of his time will be spent presiding over the
Criminal Division of the Appeal Court, but he also sits occasionally as a
trial judge.
His main sphere of influence lies in formulating sentencing guidelines.
Britain imprisons more people per capita than any other western European
state. Radical sentencing reform is needed to reduce pressure on the UK's
old and decaying prison system. Lord Taylor must convince judges and
magistrates of the wisdom of avoiding custodial sentences in most cases
where the offender poses no threat to the public.
Out of touch
There are other areas where he can have an influence. If he is serious about
accessible justice he could persuade judges to provide short summaries of
their judgments in language which can readily be understood by the public.
If he senses judges are out of touch, he could initiate research to find out
why. He should stand up for the jury system and the defendant's right to
silence.
In other areas, Lord Taylor will need to co-operate more closely with
government than his predecessor did. As one of the Lord Chancellor's closest
advisers on judicial appointments he could actively promote the appointment
of more women and ethnic minority judges. And he could encourage the Home
Office to set up a sentencing council to establish a more consistent
approach. Unfortunately he appears unwilling to use his position in this way
 -at a press conference on the day of his appointment he mounted a strong
defence of the status quo. Already there are signs that, like his
predecessor, he is in danger of distancing himself from the politicians in
the superficial belief that this will bolster judicial independence.
Public confidence
Further changes at the top of the judiciary may strengthen the hand of the
reformers. Lord Donaldson, Master of the Rolls and Britain's senior civil
court judge, is expected to retire in July. Lord Mackay, the Lord Chancellor
may also step down in the autumn. Their replacement by judges as committed
to restoring public confidence in the system as Lord Taylor professes to be
could provide the climate for more radical change.
Changes of this sort are essential if the ground is to be well prepared for
next year's report of the Royal Commission on Criminal Justice, which will
also cover matters such as legal aid, the police and the prison service
which lie outside the control of the judiciary.
The government, which has a disappointing record on law and order, will also
need to give a strong lead. The new home secretary, Mr Kenneth Clarke, has
demonstrated his ability to take on the vested interests of teachers and the
health professionals, and may now repeat the exercise with the police and
prison service. If he were to use his influence to promote reform of the
judiciary and courts, the newly appointed leaders of the judiciary would be
hard pressed to oppose it in the way the old-guard turned their face against
Lord Mackay's reforms of the legal profession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11123</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Arts: Kathleen Ferrier Awards
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
As the number of singing competitions multiplies, so the need becomes more
pressing for each to attract public attention and the sponsorship necessary
for large prizes. There has been some ungainly leap-frogging this year, as
each competition tries to keep a nose ahead of its rivals.
On Friday it was the final of the Kathleen Ferrier Memorial Scholarship,
founded in 1953 and the most senior of the awards. This is the 80th
anniversary of Ferrier's birth (how heartening to find all her recordings
available on CD), though that will not have been the only reason for the
enhanced profile of the competition this year. The prize money was well up;
and television cameras were noisily present, always choosing just the wrong
moment to change their films or shift across the hall to get a better angle.
The venue had also been changed to St. John's, Smith Square, while the
Wigmore Hall is closed. For the ten finalists this will not have been a
minor consideration: St. John's is a difficult hall for singers, given to
long reverberance even when it is as well filled as it was on Friday, and
the competitor with the larger voice is likely to be at an advantage.
At first it seemed an equal and not very impressive line-up. Then two
candidates of outstanding quality followed one after the other: the baritone
Nathan Berg and the contralto Alice Coote. Berg, who had already taken a
prize in the BP Peter Pears Competition last year, is fast becoming the
complete artist and his expressive voice is matched by an increasingly
mature musicianship, memorably so in his Mahler song.
Coote had the larger voice, firm and strong in tone, enunciating those
fateful words 'Es ist vollbracht' from Bach's St. John Passion with a
chilling air of finality. A choice between the two was difficult. I would
have been tempted to proclaim a tie, with third prize going to the baritone
Gwyn Hughes Jones, whose singing of Verdi's Don Carlos, impressively
long-breathed if less striking as pure voice, made a stirring end to the
evening.
The judges felt differently, as invariably happens when their impressions
have been formed over the whole week of the competition. First prize went to
Gwyn Hughes Jones; second, though only a whisker behind, Nathan Berg; and
third, Alice Coote. All three should have successful careers in front of
them.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11124</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Arts: Merce Cunningham Dance Company
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOAN ACOCELLA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When Merce Cunningham, in the 1950s, began using chance procedures such as
dice-rolling and coin-tossing to structure his dances, he was trying to
return to the essence of dancing, movement itself. In his view, the
conventional ways of structuring a dance - making it tell a story, making it
illustrate a musical score - obscured the dancing by bending it to the
service of something foreign. As long as the sweep of an arm was dictated by
some other necessity, it was less a sweep, less an arm.
Hence Cunningham's conversion to chance. If, in deciding how many dancers to
put on the stage or where a given section of the dancing should fall, he
rolled the dice and let the dice decide, he could short-circuit the mind's
sentimentalities and, he hoped, produce something like Pure dance, with all
its bright edges.
He has had his wish. Cunningham has now been choreographing for 50 years,
and the most striking characteristic of his work, aside from its formal
beauty, is its objectivity. No dancing on the American stage today is freer
of sentimental pretension. Cunningham's dancers move like animals:
straightforward, unselfconscious. And, by a familiar paradox, this
objectivity gives them a huge subjective force. Just as landscape painting
can sometimes turn up human truths, so Cunningham's dancers, darting about
like birds or fish, evoke states of the soul.
Actually, Cunningham's dances often seem like landscapes. They have that
mood - contemplative. A beautiful example is Loosestrife, one of the three
new dances presented during the Cunningham company's recent season at New
York's City Center. Named after a species of wildflower, Loosestrife is a
quiet piece in which the dancers seem to communicate in a special, hidden
language. One dancer (the lovely, coltish Larissa McGoldrick) does a long
solo, and five others sit and watch. Two dancers perform a duet while
another (the superb Victoria Finlayson) encircles them with a string of
dainty little leaps, like a golden chain.
In most Cunningham works entrances are very important, but never more so
than in Loosestrife. Again and again one dancer will leave and another enter
as several remain dancing on the stage. When this happens, the very air
seems altered by the new person's arrival. In fact, the person may have
entered quite unobtrusively, but this is Cunningham's gift - to magnify
movement, to turn his stage into a world and then make the whole world seem
to change when someone walks in.
The two other new works, Change of Address and Beach Birds, were both marked
by a rather strange mix of greater literalism and greater obscurity than one
is used to seeing in Cunningham. In Beach Birds, danced to a score by John
Cage, the dancers seemed actually to represent birds. They balanced on one
leg like storks; they spread their arms like wings. Later in the dance,
however, the bird metaphor was unceremoniously abandoned. The dancers began
making thick, twisted moves and laying black-gloved hands on one another's
white legs in a manner that was distinctly at odds with the
sunrise-over-the-archipelago mood of the opening. All three new pieces,
furthermore, were heavily loaded with what seemed gratuitously awkward
movements.
Many people have noted that Cunningham's work has become more freighted with
emotion in the last decade. In 1990 Cunningham started using a computer as
an aid in composing his dances. These two opposing developments may account
for the oddly literal and oddly counterliteral quality of the new works.
Thesis, antithesis. One looks forward to the synthesis.
City Centre Theater, New York
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11125</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7ABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Arts: Sonny Rollins
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARRY BOOTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The endlessly unfolding cadenzas of saxophone colossus Sonny Rollins
temporarily displaced the warblings of Joseph and his Technicolor Dreamcoat
from the London Palladium on Sunday. Accompanied by his regular, submissive
but swinging rhythm section, Rollins is in powerful form and expansive as
ever with the rag bag of tunes he always carries with him.
From the calypso-esque original 'Duke of Iron', through standards like 'Darn
That Dream' to the soft C &amp; W corn of 'Tennessee Waltz', 62 year old Rollins
blows a sirocco - small wonder he now needs a day between concerts to
recuperate. The formula has remained unchanged over recent years. Rollins -
who has the look of an animated Easter Island sculpture in sunglasses -
fronts a slavish electric rhythm section of young Jerome Harris on guitar,
the undulating bass of Bob Cranshaw and the spartan drumming of Yoron
Israel. Mark Soskin, a pianist who combines economy with melody and the
rolling trombone of Clifton Anderson complete the line-up.
The structure of the band - and arrangements - exists only to to serve
Rollins' full bodied horn playing. The flowing improvisation, packed with
witty and melodious quotes, is irresistible. Even where he sets out with an
apparently unconvincing groove like his own trademark, 'Don't Stop The
Carnival', Rollins turns it inside out and back again so seamlessly that
only a punning bar dropped in here and there prevents you from swooning.
The rest of the team do not get much of a look in, save Anderson whose
bubbling solos provide a breathing space for Rollins. Mostly they jog along
beside the boss, Cranshaw urging them along with a golden toned and swinging
bass line, Harris chipping off chords alongside Soskin. Economical as he is
with their talents, Rollins band provides a perfectly sprung setting for his
soaring flights.
Life and music have not always been so easy on Rollins and it has sometimes
taken lengthy sabbaticals for him to find his own way - through bop, free
jazz and fusion - to arrive at this essence of improvisation. But, with a
new record on the racks, Here's to the people (Milestone), the combination
of straight rhythm, obvious hooks and a vital way with strangely familiar
material seems to satisfy him now.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11126</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Philip Jones predicted in last week's ITV tribute to Benny Hill that, having
been treated so superciliously during his lifetime, Hill would be lionised
now that he was dead. That will almost certainly prove to be right. You can
check on the sexism, racism, and general political incorrectness of this
hugely popular comic in a repeat of The Benny Hill Show at 8.30 on ITV. It
would surely be healthier if the BBC stopped trying to pretend that
'Crimewatch' was high minded social work and admitted that it was a
tabloid-telly ratings builder. The interesting question today is whether a
new series of spin-off programmes, Crime Limited (8.30 BBC1) will prove to
be more or less like the ambulance chasing 'infotainment' shows which are
attracting such big audiences in the US. We are promised that today 'Nick
Ross and Sue Cook look into the mind of a murderer with the help of an
offender profiler'. All reminders of 'Silence Of The Lambs' wholly
intentional presumably. Channel 4's international arts series Rear Window
returns with a programme about Turkish painter Hanefi Yuter who lives and
works in western Europe (9.00).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11127</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Arts: Jon Kimura Parker - London music
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This Canadian pianist (half Japanese by birth) won the Leeds Competition in
1984, against the likes of his compatriot Louis Lortie, but we still await
significant developments. His last solo programme here, a couple of years
ago in the Queen Elizabeth Hall, included pianistic war-horses that signally
failed to gallop. In the Royal Festival Hall on Sunday he played less showy
Schumann and Chopin better, efficiently and with evident sincerity - but
without surprises, special insights or anything much like individual
character beyond a few tics.
Though the natural Kimura Parker personality seems to be ebullient, if not
exactly effervescent, it was kept on a close rein. 'A well-known personality
in Canada, he has hosted radio and television programmes for the Canadian
Broadcasting Corporation,' the programme-book told us: could that be the
trouble? Having to sell oneself purely as a performer-interpreter might
concentrate the mind much better.
Neither Schumann's Faschingsschwank aus Wien nor even his earlier Papillons
is buttoned-up music, but in Kimura Parker's respectful hands they sounded
tame, short-breathed and short of variety. One brief, happy flash was the
D-flat waltz episode in the eighth of the Papillons, which he invested with
a delectable lilt; but in most of the other quasi-waltzes in Papillons and
especially in the Faschingsschwank, his habit of underweighting the third
beat in the bar starved them of their proper heft and Schwung.
A worse habit might be a result of early admonitions to Bring Out the Tune.
Again and again in his Schumann and in Chopin's complete op. 28 Preludes,
tunes were Brought Out with a percussive note-by-note 'ping', as if to make
sure that even the dimmest audience shouldn't miss them: prettily
crystalline, here and there, but inimical to singing curves or suggestive
shadings. The effect was deadly in the rapturous Intermezzo of the
Faschingsschwank - plonking and prosaic, without elan, not at all what was
meant by Schumann's 'Mit grosster Energie'.
There was a complementary downplaying of 'accompaniments', even those
designed not only to gleam but to interact expressively with the lyrical
burden. In Chopin's F-sharp minor prelude the seething figuration shrank to
a soft, oleaginous mutter, and we scarcely heard the buoyant underpinning of
the E-flat one. The preludes which are largely figuration without 'tunes' -
the D major, the E-flat minor - rattled along featurelessly.
In like fashion, the main rondo-themes of the Faschingsschwank's outer
movements were robbed of their impetus because the busy finger-work which
should power them was reduced to a discreet background: as if Romantic
composers always traded in routine 19th-century feeling, with arbitrary
titivation that can be flattened without musical loss. The bald fact is that
many other pianists, no less scrupulously devoted, are far more interesting
to hear in such music. Why should Kimura Parker want to compete in this
area?
With his first encore, a Rakhmaninov prelude, we suddenly heard a pianist
wholeheartedly attuned to what he was playing: a lovely sound-idyll with a
fluent, penetrating line, full of unconstrained feeling. If an extrovert
West Coast person like him feels overawed by the classical Austro-German
repertoire, he should embrace what comes more naturally. Hyper-educated
Austro-Germans are already a glut on the market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 17
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11128</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / People: Man from the Pru advocates financial derivatives
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Colin Stiasny, the man who made the Prudential the biggest institutional
player in London's financial futures and options markets, is quitting to
join MONUMENT DERIVATIVES, a boutique broker which is less than a year old.
After 19 years at the Pru, Stiasny, 41, says that if he was ever going to
make a move he had to do it soon. Martin Burton, managing director of the
16-strong firm, says that Stiasny's arrival gives his firm greater
credibility among its institutional clients.
Stiasny is one of a growing breed of investment managers who regard the
technique of tactical asset allocation with its heavy use of financial
derivatives as an increasingly important investment tool. Although he
refuses to discuss the scale of the Pru's involvement in the use of
financial derivatives, it is widely regarded as one of the keys to its
successful investment performance in recent years.
It is becoming increasingly difficult and expensive for big fund managers to
switch large sums of money between different types of assets at short notice
by traditional means. 'My job will be to persuade other institutions to do
what the Pru was doing and make much greater use of the financial
derivatives,' says Stiasny.
*****
Glenn Gordon, a fifth generation member of the founding family, has been
appointed managing director of William Grant &amp; Sons, the independent Scotch
whisky distiller, from September.
For the past 15 years, Sandy Grant Gordon has combined the roles of chairman
and managing director but the board has now decided that they should be
split. Grant Gordon will continue as chairman.
Glenn Gordon, at present production director of the company, noted for its
Glenfiddich malt whisky, is a graduate of Yale and a Stanford MBA; he worked
with Procter &amp; Gamble and McKinsey before joining the company which was
founded by his great-great-grandfather, William Grant, in 1886.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11129</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / People: Finance directors for BAe and Courtaulds
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
When an executive leaves one company and its stock drops sharply in early
trading, and the shares of the company he's moving jump, it is clear the
City reckons that person to be an outstanding manager.
Richard Lapthorne (right) who, at 49, takes over as British Aerospace's
director of finance in July, is well regarded by the chemical industry
analysts who have followed his career at Courtaulds, where he has been
finance director since 1986.
Rating his departure as a loss for Courtaulds, they described him as a
first-rate technical accountant who understands the City. Closely engaged in
the tax implications involved in splitting Courtaulds into two companies, he
has also been heavily involved in the operational aspects of Courtaulds. He
is also described as 'lively, ebullient and no retiring violet'.
Lapthorne admits that he has little knowledge of his new company; during his
interview he had met only members of the board and no line managers. He
hopes to bring his experience of tight financial controls and management
information systems to BAe, and also 'a hatred of bureaucracy'.
Lapthorne says he does not intend to stay behind his desk at BAe's
headquarters in the Strand. 'I enjoy flying and plan to see the businesses
so I can understand them. I have a lot to learn and want to get to grips
with the operational issues rather than staying office-bound and becoming
bored out of my mind.'
He is replaced at Courtaulds by Michael Pragnell (left), previously in
charge of the coatings business. Pragnell has an MBA from Fontainebleau, but
has no formal accountancy qualifications. According to Lapthorne,
'Courtaulds has plenty of accountants.'
*****
Peter Ryan has been appointed non-executive chairman of TORDAY &amp; CARLISLE,
replacing Paul Torday who is to concentrate on his duties as group chief
executive. Elliott Hirst, md of Oldham Signs, and Gavin Turner, md of
Elfab-Hughes, have been appointed to the board; Alex Duma has retired.
*****
Michael McLaren has been appointed company secretary of ALPHAMERIC.
*****
Alan Lovell, appointed acting chief executive a year ago, has been confirmed
as chief executive of CONDER.
*****
David Booth has been promoted to finance director of LEX RETAIL GROUP.
*****
Andy Proudfoot has been appointed md of Capita Management Consultancy; he
moves from KPMG. John Hawkins, previously sales and marketing director of
MMC, is appointed marketing director of Telecom Capita. Both companies are
part of The CAPITA Group.
*****
Richard Fernie is promoted to md of Chubb Electronic Security Products, part
of RACAL.
*****
William Watson has been appointed company secretary of EUROPEAN COLOUR.
*****
Duncan Grier has been promoted to finance director of HOWARD HOLDINGS in
place of John Albery who retires in June.
*****
Graham Nixon, formerly chief executive, has been appointed executive
chairman of FERRY PICKERING GROUP, in place of Peter Wardle who has resigned
as non-executive chairman.
*****
Bob Scales, md of LMG Fibrenyle, is also appointed md of LAWSON MARDON
PLASTICS.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11130</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Technology: Seven phone calls for the price of one
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DELLA BRADSHAW
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
How do you cut your phone bills in half - or by even more? One solution is
voice compression technology, where several calls are squeezed down the
equivalent of a single line.
Johnson Matthey, the precious metals company, uses voice compression on two
international links out of London. The calls are squeezed to occupy the
equivalent of 16 kilobits of data - 64 Kbits are usually allocated to voice
calls.
As a result, says Dave Murphy, analyst in the telecoms group at Johnson
Matthey, the company needs to use each of its eight leased transatlantic
voice circuits for only five hours a week in order for them to cost the
equivalent of the ordinary public telephone network.
Johnson Matthey had tried to compress these calls down even further - to
8Kbits/s. However, reports Murphy, because the link has several connection
points where the calls are converted between digital and analogue formats,
the quality of the final call was too poor.
On direct links, however, companies such as Newbridge Networks, of Newport,
Gwent, and Craycom, of Frimley, Surrey, report a growing interest from
companies for this 8 Kbit/s technology.
'You can get seven conversations for the price of one,' points out Barrie
Desmond, marketing services manager at Newbridge in Wales. This customer
demand has been fuelled by a loosening of the telecommunications
regulations, enabling companies to use the technology on private networks.
'Typically 80 per cent of a company's traffic starts and ends within the
company and with different sites,' points out Trevor Hall, senior marketing
director at Craycom.
Equipment from both Newbridge, at the high capacity end of the market, and
Craycom, which sells equipment for smaller companies, uses technology which
goes under the unusual name of codebook excited linear predictive - Celp.
Celp works by predicting the next sounds. Then it takes the difference
between the predicted and actual sounds and compares it with the common
errors in its code book. It selects the one which most resembles the actual
error and transmits an abbreviated code for this pattern - rather than the
error itself.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11131</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Technology: Put yourself on the map - Dave Madden explains
how geographical information can be brought to life
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVE MADDEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Imagine letting your automobile find the nearest car park for you. It will
know if there is enough space available in the facility and if the route is
congested it will plot you another.
Improbable? Not according to Britain's Automobile Association. The AA is
already operating a pilot project with Ford using this sort of in-car
navigation system around Basildon in Essex. Ralph Robbins, the AA's chief
cartographer, envisages supplying traffic routing data from the AA's Road
Watch information service by radio channel to vehicle navigation computers.
Geographical information systems (GIS), which bring maps to life on a
computer screen, display corporate information visually. Cellular radio
networks, sewage systems and Tube tunnels are all possibilities.
Public utilities, embarrassed by digging up one another's assets, were first
to use such systems in the UK. But the retail and transport industries are
as likely to exploit its possibilities as users with miles of physical
infrastructure to locate.
While the same could have been said five years ago, the signs are that GIS
is much closer to taking off today. UK retailers - led by Marks &amp; Spencer,
Tesco and Sainsbury - and financial services groups are able to build new
profiles of their customers and create store and branch location analysis
tools.
Retailers have been surprised by what GIS has shown them. It has made them
reassess things which they either thought they knew or believed did not
matter, such as how far different sets of customers are willing to travel to
shop in different parts of the country.
M&amp;S implemented a GIS system a year ago which allows it to map its own data
on to external demographic, socio-economic and drive-time statistics. For
retailers, says Simon Orebi Gann, M&amp;S's IT executive, GIS has more to do
with extracting meaning from these databases than with drawing pictures.
'The retail trade may not be the first to use a technology, but it is good
at making more of it than people have down previously,' says Orebi Gann.
Ultimately, he adds, GIS is helping retailers to improve their customer
service performance, allowing them to treat customers with greater
individuality.
The AA is also a fair barometer. According to Robbins, the GIS underpinning
the AA's command and control system can locate stranded vehicles and provide
a decision support system for the despatchers. But the AA is not just a
user. It has turned its GIS investment into a business opportunity as a
supplier of geographical information via its distributor Kingswood.
Its experience also highlights the basic obstacle to GIS - the cost. 'The
data is the problem. These systems make no sense without it and until
recently hardware and software vendors did not want to recognise it,'
Robbins says.
It is this issue which confronts the utilities. BT embarked on one of the
UK's most ambitious GIS efforts in 1988 - to computerise its overhead lines
and underground ducts.
But the company abandoned the project and decided to concentrate on its
local network. Currently it is out to tender again, for GIS hardware and
software, with a view to beginning a new pilot in 1993. Those close to the
project believe that it was the data capture element which scuppered BT's
first attempt.
Roger Morgan, GIS development project manager at Thames Water, puts this
experience into context. Thames has a statutory obligation to map its
30,000km of water mains and 80,000km of sewers by 1999. It will have
digitised the clean water network by 1995. But the sewers, inherited from
local authorities with often poor records, will take three years longer.
According to Morgan, if Thames is going to make such a big investment then
it is determined to make the system work. That means the GIS will have to
communicate with other corporate databases - job and asset management
systems, even billing systems. It will fuel Thames's whole operational and
customer service approach.
This sort of integration of diverse systems and databases is beginning to
make sense economically. Rather than just describing an infrastructure, GIS
must now become a means of analysing and managing it - from pretty pictures
to squeezing value from the data.
Andrew Wolfe, managing director of Eurecart, the GIS software arm of French
services group Lyonnaise des Eaux Dumez, argues that as well as maximising
the impact of GIS, integration will also minimise the traditional data
capture effort. The company's object-oriented software, which promises
faster, more efficient programming, helps users to combine conventional
databases. 'It lets them use the data wherever it is now, and simply adds a
layer of graphic reference and symbol.'
Wolfe's technique is demonstrated in one of the most all-embracing GIS
projects yet seen in Europe - an urban reference system for the city of
Lyon, France and its environs.
The system is now at the heart of Lyon's city government - from managing its
parks and gardens to analysing the effect of roadworks on traffic flow in
the city centre. Eventually the system will manage traffic lights
automatically and feed the information into the route planning devices in
private cars. Today Lyon, tomorrow Basildon.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11132</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Technology: Squeezing the life out of innovation -
Technically Speaking
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN SMITH-SAVILLE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Small high-technology manufacturers in the UK and Europe tend to operate in
market niches in which US companies set a fast pace of innovation. This
makes their products vulnerable to rapid obsolescence. European companies
must therefore be particularly innovative in order to gain and keep market
share.
But sustaining high-tech product innovation is costly. Unfortunately the
European market is still too fragmented and conservative to enable many
innovative companies to sell enough units to recover the cost of developing
one product before competition forces them to develop its successor.
The dynamic US market, on the other hand, encourages the early development
of advanced products and is large enough to fund the full costs of
development. This enables US companies to reduce their prices and capture a
large share of export markets. And the prices they set in their export
markets allow little or no margin for recovery of the development costs of
local competitors.
Many European countries recognise the seriousness of the resulting squeeze
on the high-tech manufacturing sector and are providing financial assistance
for technology and product development. In the UK, the Department of Trade
and Industry has introduced the Smart and Spur programmes to provide
financial support for product development in small companies.
However, the present schemes have serious deficiencies. Both are
under-funded. The Spur scheme claims to pay up to 30 per cent of the (fixed)
costs of approved developments. But the overhead recovery rate allowable in
calculating these costs is capped at a maximum of 100 per cent of direct
employment costs.
Many small high-tech companies must support significant product development,
quality assurance and marketing/sales costs, which increase their true
overhead rates to 250 per cent or more. In this situation the maximum
support only corresponds to 17 per cent of the actual costs.
Assistance on this scale is unlikely to be sufficient to enable the
development to proceed. A further deficiency is that decisions regarding the
award of support under the Spur scheme are made by DTl staff who generally
have neither the technical nor the marketing expertise to select between the
proposals presented to them.
The available schemes therefore need considerable improvement before they
can provide the support needed by UK high-tech companies. Additional funds
need to be made available and they must be applied effectively to generate a
good return.
To improve the effectiveness of the support it should continue to be
available only to manufacturing companies employing fewer than 500 people. A
realistic overhead recovery rate should be allowed, capped at not less than
250 per cent.
The total cost of the proposed development should not exceed a moderate
fraction of the total gross margin likely to be generated from sales of the
proposed product. Independent data should be provided to confirm that the
market is of sufficient size, and the applicant for support should be able
to demonstrate that it has previously succeeded in gaining the market share
it proposes with one or more of its other products.
The current Smart scheme should be replaced with a new scheme to provide
initial assistance to companies which are not yet in a position to qualify
for the above type of Spur support. It should be available to companies
under five years old which develop products that have good export potential,
that can improve industrial processes or that have environmental benefits.
The purpose of these proposed changes is to ensure that the support makes a
sufficient contribution to enable small companies to maintain vigorous
product development programmes, is given to companies with a proven ability
to use it effectively and is awarded on objective criteria.
The author is managing director of Signal Processors Limited.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11133</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / People: Bernays poached by Hill Samuel
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Richard Bernays, one of the top executives at Mercury Asset Management, has
been poached by the TSB to be chief executive of its Hill Samuel Investment
Management Group.
Bernays, 49, replaces Neville Bowen, 56, who left earlier this year to head
up Citibank Global Asset Management. HSIMG is one of Britain's largest fund
managers with over Pounds 24bn under management or advice in a hotchpotch of
investment businesses in the UK and overseas.
Hill Samuel's investment performance has been improving; and Hill Samuel
chief executive Hugh Freedberg says that profits on this side of the
business have risen by 70 per cent over the past three years to Pounds
12.2m. However, it is still a very poor return for a group which has Pounds
24bn of funds under management and it is felt that HSIMG could benefit from
a clearer sense of direction. Freedberg says that he has been looking for a
'blue chip name from a blue chip house', to head the operation for some
time.
Persuading Bernays to defect from Mercury Asset Management, where he is one
of several vice-chairmen, is quite a coup for Freedberg. Mercury is the
biggest and most successful of London's publicly-quoted fund managers and
its top management team has been remarkably stable. However, James Dawnay,
chairman of Mercury Fund Managers, left in November to join Martin Currie,
and now Bernays, who has been with the group for 20 years, is on the move.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11134</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / FT Law Report: Digest of Hilary Term cases
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AVIVA GOLDEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GREGOS
(FT, February 14)
In the present appeal, an issue concerned the date on which the legitimacy
of the voyage had to be established and the charterers contended it was the
date when the order was given.  The owners contended, and the arbitrator
awarded, that it was the date when the order became effective and the vessel
was required to comply with it. In rejecting the charterers' appeal, Mr
Justice Evans stated that the charterers' contention, if correct, would mean
that a charterer, who chose a time well in advance of the last voyage and
gave instructions which, even if reasonable at that time, would remain
binding on the vessel regardless of subsequent events. The charterers'
obligation to give voyage order was similar to their obligation to order the
vessel only to safe ports. If a port - safe when the order was given -
became unsafe, then a secondary obligation to change the order arose. There
was no distinction in principle between that situation and one which
concerned the date of the last voyage.
THE BIJELA
(FT, February 18)
Under the York-Antwerp Rules 1974, Rule XIV provided that, where temporary
repairs of accidental damage were effected 'to enable the adventure to be
completed', the cost of such repairs should be admitted as general average
'but only up to the saving in expense which would have been incurred and
allowed in general average if such repairs had not been effected there'. In
the present case, the vessel and its cargo having arrived at port of refuge
and being no longer in peril, it was the shipowners' duty to carry out,
without unreasonable delay, such repairs as were necessary to carry the
cargo to its contractual destination, and to bear the expense of those
repairs. In giving judgment for the defendant, cargo-owners and their
guaranteeing banks on a claim by the shipowners for general average in
respect of temporary repairs to the Bijela, Mr Justice Hobhouse stated that
the cost of performing the voyage and carrying the cargo to destination was
an expense borne by shipowners alone; the risk of accident was one that the
carrier accepted when he entered into the contract of carriage.
LINDEN GARDEN TRUST LTD v LENESTA SLUDGE DISPOSALS LTD AND OTHERS ST MARTINS
PROPERTY CORPORATION LTD AND ANOTHER v SIR ROBERT McALPINE &amp; SONS LTD
(FT, February 19)
In both these cases, building works were carried out under a contract with a
person who had a proprietary interest in the building when the contract was
made. The original employers transferred their interest in the building to
others, and also purported to assign the building contracts. The contracts,
on standard Join Contract Tribunal (JCT) forms, contained a term in clause
17 that the employers would not assign 'this contract' without the
contractor's consent but consent was never obtained. Linden sued as
assignees whereas, in the St Martins case, both the assignors (Corporation)
and the assignees (Investments) sued. In the Linden case, the assignors had
an accrued cause of action against the contractors for Pounds 22,205 by the
date of assignment and that claim was validly assigned. Further breaches
were later discovered, giving rise to a Pounds 236,000 loss for which the
assignors acquired a cause of action in respect of those defects and, after
assignment, Linden became entitled to enforce the claim. In the St Martins
case, when Corporation executed an assignment in favour of Investments,
there was no existing cause of action. Corporation, by the assignment,
transferred to Investments the contractual right to have the building
properly constructed and Investments could sue for breach, the Court of
Appeal held.
THE RUBI SEA
(FT, February 21)
In deciding that the caveators, Ince &amp; Co, should recover their costs of the
arrest of a vessel in priority to all claims, other than the Admiralty
Marshal's charges and expenses, Mr Justice Sheen stated that a warrant for
arrest could not be executed until there had been lodged in the Marshal's
office an undertaking to pay on demand the Marshal's fees and expenses in
respect of the ship's arrest and its care and custody while under arrest.
That undertaking was normally given by the plaintiff's solicitor personally.
In such circumstances, the solicitor could not be expected to delay his
instructions to arrest while he made inquiries as to whether a claimant with
a higher priority intended to enforce his claim. The plaintiff, who first
arrested the ship, preserved the property on behalf of all claimants within
the jurisdiction, his Lordship held.
THE GOLDEN MED
(FT, February 25)
In a transaction for the financing of the building of a ship, the plaintiffs
deposited Dollars 600,000 with the bank. The negotiations broke down and the
plaintiffs demanded the money but the bank refused to pay. In proceedings,
the bank was ordered to return the money and the plaintiffs sought compound
interest. It was common ground that the court had jurisdiction in an
appropriate case to award compound interest in the exercise of its equitable
jurisdiction.  In awarding compound interest, Mr Justice Hirst stated that
the bank was essentially engaged in investment business, and must be
presumed to have used its money for normal banking purposes as part of its
working capital, and thus to have been in a position to earn compound
interest itself. It was wrong to argue that compound interest was only to be
awarded in exceptional cases where the defendant had been guilty of serious
misconduct. The authorities made it clear that such an award was in no way
punitive but related to commercial circumstances.
THE ANTCLIZO (NO 2)
(FT, February 26)
Discharge of a cargo was completed at Bombay but disputes arose between the
parties as to despatch, demurrage and balance of freight. Clause 34 of the
charterparty provided that at port of discharge, time was to count from 24
hours after notice of readiness, 'vessel also having been entered at Customs
House and in free pratique'.  The arbitrators' decision that notice of
readiness given at Bombay was valid was upheld at first instance, contrary
to the charterers' argument that since prior entry did not carry with it an
order permitting inwards entry, only final entry would satisfy clause 34.
The argument had obvious difficulties, the Court of Appeal stated in
dismissing the charterers' appeal. First, if notice of readiness could not
be given until final entry and that did not take place until after inwards
entry had been granted and discharge commenced, it was unlikely that clause
34 was intended to produce the result contended for. To provide for a 24
hours' notice of readiness to be given after discharge had already begun,
made no sense at all. Second, the vessel was physically entered at Customs
House when prior entry was completed. Third, prior entry was important for
importers, who would know they could proceed and arrange for discharge.
FITZWILLIAM (COUNTESS) AND OTHERS v INLAND REVENUE COMMISSIONERS
(FT, February 28)
After the death of Earl Fitzwilliam in 1979, Lady Fitzwilliam and her
daughter, Lady Hastings, were left an estate valued at just over Pounds
12.4m net. After instructions were given to the solicitors, a series of
transactions were entered into to mitigate liability that would subsequently
be incurred on the death of Lady Fitzwilliam. Mr Justice Vinelott quashed a
decision that capital transfer tax was payable on these transactions by
virtue of the Ramsay principles (see (1982) AC 300) as a preordained series
of transactions which, where they made up one single composite transaction,
was held by the House of Lords as liable to producing an unacceptable fiscal
result. Dismissing the Revenue's appeal, the Court of Appeal stated that the
scheme was qualified by the suggestion, apparently acted upon, that Lady
Hastings should receive separate legal advice. The steps taken were not only
not preordained and not cut and dried, but there was recognition of a real
possibility that the proposals would not go through at all. Such a
qualification was fatal to application of the Ramsay principle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11135</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Management (The Growing Business): Fund raisers rein back
their ambitions - In a Nutshell
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Venture capitalists have encountered tough conditions when trying to raise
new funds over the past year. Despite these difficulties, two venture firms
have made good progress with fund-raising though they have had to modify
their ambitions.
Phildrew Ventures raised Pounds 62m towards its target by its first closing
in mid-March and plans to complete fund-raising by the end of June. Phildrew
initially hoped to raise up to Pounds 150m for its third fund but is now
talking of a final target of around Pounds 100m.
Phoenix Fund Managers has raised Pounds 35.5m towards its first fund and
expects to reach its target of up to Pounds 50m (initial target up to Pounds
75m) within the next six months. Mitsubishi provided one third of the funds
with Pounds 14m coming from UK investors.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11136</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Management (The Growing Business): Just the job-share for
personnel - In a Nutshell
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Employing a personnel manager is low on the list of priorities of most small
businesses because of the cost involved. Yet as a business grows, managing
staff can be a problem.
An answer may lie in a pilot programme being undertaken with five south
London businesses to share the services of a personnel manager for a year.
The Locum Personnel Service has set up Q-Tab, a training consultancy, with
funding from Aztec, a south-west London Training and Enterprise Council, and
Wandsworth Council.
Each of the participating companies will pay Pounds 2,000 towards the cost,
equivalent to Pounds 5,600 for each company. They will be allocated 40 days'
help and advice a year.
The personnel manager involved is Trevor Croucher, who has 15 years'
experience in the public sector.
Q-Tab hopes the scheme will be taken up in other areas and plans to repeat
the pilot in its own area if it is successful.
*Q-Tab. Suite 18, Lombard Business Centre, 50 Lombard Road, London SW11 3SU.
Tel 071 350 0759.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11137</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Management: The Growing Business - Golf clubs where the
grass is greener
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES BATCHELOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The length of golf club waiting lists, the distance from the chairman's home
and the presence of swans on a river have all been used by companies to help
choose a new location, according to a guide to company relocation, writes
Charles Batchelor.
These real examples demonstrate how not to come to a decision on a new
address, The Director's Guide to Relocation Management* points out. One
company selected a site for commercial reasons and then changed its mind in
favour of a location five minutes' from the chairman's home while another
briefed its advisers to find 'a town with character on a river with swans'.
'Miscalculations during the relocation process can lead to the loss of key
employees, plummeting morale and escalating costs,' the guide notes.
More serious reasons for companies deciding to move include high property
prices, the end of a lease, the redevelopment of the current premises and
deteriorating accommodation and facilities.
The guide calculates that a company moving from London to the Midlands could
save Pounds 9,000 a year per employee on running costs, rent, rates and
labour costs. But companies should set against these savings the one-off
costs of the move which average Pounds 14,500 per employee, including visits
to the new area, temporary accommodation and removal costs.
If a company advances a bridging loan to an employee, this may increase the
cost to between Pounds 20,000 and Pounds 50,000 in the present, difficult
housing market.
The decision to move is a trade-off between future cost savings and the
one-off relocation costs but there can be other important benefits to a
company, the guide says.
It can allow a business to project a new image, make organisational changes
and improve its working environment and the performance of staff.
The guide covers finding the right location; how to help employees and keep
them in touch with developments; and how to organise the physical move.
Even otherwise well planned moves can run into last minute difficulties. One
company arrived at its new site only to find it had forgotten to have keys
cut for the new building; a second found access to its new building cut off
by roadworks; while a third forgot to arrange for its telephones to be
connected.
*Institute of Directors and Black Horse Relocation. From Director
Publications, Mountbarrow House, Elizabeth Street, London SW1W 9RB. 80
pages. Pounds 9.95.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11138</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Happier staff with profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CATHERINE MILTON, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STAFF at the most profitable UK companies are significantly more satisfied
with their jobs than staff at less profitable companies.
The finding, part of a survey of 140,000 staff, conducted by International
Survey Research (ISR) at 55 companies, used 10 standard measures of
satisfaction. Staff at the most profitable companies were more satisfied on
every count. ISR believes staff satisfaction is necessary for profitability.
Mrs Rhiannon Chapman, director of the Industrial Society, the independent
body that promotes harmony at work, said: 'Staff feel more directly involved
in the business and therefore more able to contribute when they know how
their area of work affects profits. It may be that the most profitable
companies are more willing to give out that kind of information.'
Dr Adrian Furnham, a reader in psychology at London University, said the
survey did not show that staff satisfaction caused profits. 'It may be,
however, that the most profitable companies also have the best selection
procedures and select out the neurotics. There is a clear connection between
neurosis and work dissatisfaction.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11139</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Differences over Ulster objectives
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DIFFERENCES between British and Irish ministers' aspirations for Northern
Ireland surfaced publicly yesterday - pointing to possible difficulties in
'round table' talks that are about to start on Northern Ireland's future.
Ministers met in London and agreed a three-month gap in the regular
Anglo-Irish conferences, allowing cross-party talks to start in Belfast
tomorrow.
They expressed a 'strong hope' that the talks, which collapsed last July and
were revived ahead of the general election, would lead to 'a new beginning'
for Northern Ireland and its relations with the UK and Dublin.
Sir Patrick Mayhew, the new Northern Ireland secretary, and Mr David
Andrews, the Irish foreign affairs minister, put different emphasis on the
goals of the talks.
Sir Patrick said it had been agreed that Northern Ireland would remain part
of the UK as long as the majority of those living there wished it to be.
'Therefore the British government will rise from the (conference) table
still holding to that reaffirmation.' He was also realistic in his hopes for
the talks - suggesting that he might be content if agreement was reached
only on a devolved government.
Northern Ireland's population wanted politicians, 'to produce some kind of
agreed accommodation that will represent an advance on circumstances which
exist in Northern Ireland at the moment,' he said.
In contrast, Mr Andrews said Northern Ireland's constitutional position in
the UK, 'are matters, of course, that will have to be discussed in the
talks.'
He pointed out that Unionists wanted to discuss the articles in the Irish
constitution that claim the territory of the north. 'If articles two and
three of the constitution of our country are up for discussion, is there any
reason why other constitutional positions are not up for discussion?' he
asked.
His comments might heighten Unionist suspicions about the Irish government's
motives. Mr David Trimble, Ulster Unionist MP for Upper Bann, accused Dublin
of 'a ploy to break down the talks'.
His comments are not irreconcilable with Sir Patrick's views. Mr Andrews did
not dispute that the 1985 Anglo-Irish Agreement says the province's
constitutional position depends on the will of its people.
The British and Irish governments announced a Pounds 66.5m upgrading of the
Belfast-Dublin railway, a frequent target of terrorist bombings. The
European Community will fund 75 per cent of the cost.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11140</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Menem delays his re-election decision
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BARHAM and STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUENOS AIRES
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Carlos Menem of Argentina said yesterday he would decide within a
year whether to run for re-election, after his present term ends in 1995.
The question of re-election, which would require reform of the clause in the
constitution that prohibits successive presidential terms, has become one of
Argentina's most controversial political issues as the Peronist president
approaches the middle of his six-year term.
In an interview, he said: 'This is not a Peronist project or a project of
Carlos Menem, it's an old project that was begun by the (opposition) Radical
party' which held the presidency immediately before Mr Menem took office.
He added that the question of whether he would be a candidate for
re-election was premature, stating that he would make a decision in a year.
Mr Menem said reform of the 1853 constitution would require a two-thirds
majority of Congress to convene an assembly that would re-write the
constitution. There is concern in the business community that a re-election
bid would overshadow economic reforms, which are considered a priority.
There is also fear that a sovereign assembly would be empowered to undertake
a drastic revision of the constitution, focusing on social aspects which
would saddle the economy with added costs. Recent constitutional reforms in
Brazil and Colombia have been blamed for obstructing economic changes there.
Mr Menem emphasised that he was committed to maintain the momentum of
economic reform in Argentina. He dismissed speculation that he and Mr
Domingo Cavallo, his widely respected economy minister, were at odds and
that the latter would resign.
The president warned, however, that all members of the cabinet were
expendable. 'Ministers are like fuses - they are the ones who get worn out.'
Asked whether economic reform depended too heavily on Mr Cavallo, the
president said it depended on himself. 'Without Menem, there are no
possibilities for Argentina.'
The president is reported to view Mr Cavallo as a potential rival in a
future presidential election.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11141</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Gaidar defends import and income taxes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM and PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Yegor Gaidar, Russia's first deputy prime minister, warned US businessmen
yesterday that his country was obliged to tax imports and foreign residents'
incomes.
He said Russia had lifted import duties temporarily during the period of
price liberalisation, in order to impose the discipline of import
competition on domestic producers who might otherwise have been tempted to
raise their prices too much. It was now necessary, he told a meeting at the
US Chamber of Commerce in Washington, to reimpose a flat import duty.
'We are not using this import tariff to protect our domestic producers, we
just want to raise tax revenue,' said Mr Gaidar, who was in Washington to
attend international financial meetings.
Russia's new income tax, meanwhile, has worried some foreign businessmen who
say they will be unable to move employees to Russia because the new top rate
of 60 per cent would be so severe a cost.
Mr Gaidar said the income tax was 'a sad story', but necessary to comply
with International Monetary Fund requirements. 'The problem is we have a
strongly undervalued rouble, so when we apply our income tax to foreigners
they have very high incomes in roubles,' he said.
Mr Gaidar said a proposal to use a special exchange rate to convert
foreigners' incomes for tax purposes had been rejected by the IMF, but said
he still hoped to introduce some special exemptions or privileges for
foreigners.
The industrialised nations yesterday approved in principle the establishment
of a Dollars 6bn (Pounds 3.3bn) stabilisation fund for the rouble, writes
Peter Norman.
The Group of 10 - actually 11 nations comprising the G7 plus Belgium, the
Netherlands, Sweden and Switzerland - said it was willing to activate the
General Arrangements to Borrow that would provide the IMF with financial
support needed to set up the stabilisation fund.
In his address to the IMF's policy-making interim committee, Mr Norman
Lamont, UK chancellor, said the stabilisation fund should boost confidence
in the currency once a sufficiently tight monetary stance in the rouble-zone
countries had been established. But it would be difficult to find a correct
parity for the rouble.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11142</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Third world 'may set up trade blocs'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DEVELOPING countries cannot be expected to spend as much on environmental
protection as rich countries. They may also have to set up their own
regional trade blocs if the Uruguay Round trade liberalisation talks are not
concluded soon.
These warnings were delivered by Mr Alejandro Foxley, the Chilean finance
minister and chairman of the joint IMF/World Bank development committee,
whose meeting today is expected to focus mainly on trade and environmental
issues, ahead of the Earth Summit to be held in Rio de Janeiro this June.
He said poor countries were worried that industrialised nations would 'sneak
in' new protectionist barriers under the guise of tougher environmental
standards. Poor countries should be allowed to phase in environmental
controls over a long period.
On trade, Mr Foxley said developing countries were deeply disappointed that
their unilateral efforts to liberalise trade had elicited little response
from industrialised countries. Rich countries still spent Dollars 250bn
(Pounds 141.2bn) on agricultural protection, five times the amount of
development aid.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11143</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / G7 places onus of improved world growth on Japan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN rather than Germany has become the focus of efforts by other
industrial countries to boost world growth, it emerged at the Group of Seven
meeting in Washington.
Japanese objections to pressure from the US and others for easier Japanese
fiscal policy and lower interest rates delayed the end of the meeting on
Sunday by about two hours as Mr Tsutomu Hata, finance minister, and Mr
Yasushi Mieno, governor of the Bank of Japan, fought to keep hostile
language out of the communique.
As is usual when the G7 has differed over policy, the finance ministers of
the US, Japan, Germany, France, Britain, Italy and Canada summed up their
talks in an elliptical text. In the latest case they omitted to mention
member countries by name when outlining desirable policies.
The only country for which the G7 proposed particular policy moves was
Russia, which was given detailed instructions on how to reform its economy
in a separate statement issued after the 11-hour meeting.
Reading between the lines of the G7 economic communique, it was clear that
Japan's partners thought Tokyo should do more to boost world growth. They
noted that 'the decline of the yen since their last meeting (in January) was
not contributing to the adjustment process'. In an obvious reference to
Japanese fiscal policy, they said policy makers in 'countries with large
surpluses and declining growth. . . should be mindful of the possibilities
of strengthening domestic demand'.
This advice fell on unreceptive ears, however. Mr Hata said 'additional
Japanese measures are not necessary at this juncture and if anything they
would become harmful' by fostering inflationary pressures. Mr Mieno said
there was no need for Japan to ease credit.
After publicly trading complaints about each other's fiscal policies in the
days ahead of the meeting, there was surprisingly little squabbling between
Germany and the US in the talks. 'We did not feel under attack or on the
defensive,' said a beaming Mr Theo Waigel, Germany's finance minister, after
the meeting.
To some extent, the arguments about Germany's high fiscal deficits had been
fully rehearsed ahead of the meeting. In addition, some participants felt it
was 'bad form' to attack Germany when the government was accepting strike
action as the price for resisting high public-sector pay claims. Mr Waigel
also has made clear that Germany will clamp down on public spending in the
years ahead.
When asked whether Germany would accelerate its fiscal policy actions, Mr
Don Mazankowski, the Canadian finance minister, said: 'I think that they
have. . . They have announced policies that do just that.'
A renewed emphasis on the need for governments to reduce their fiscal
deficits was one of the main elements of Sunday's G7 communique.
The ministers said it was important 'to reduce government demands on private
savings to facilitate needed capital spending'. They underlined 'the need to
reduce fiscal deficits in all countries with large budgetary imbalances
through credible medium-term consolidation strategies'.
In a sentence that applied respectively to the US and Germany, they said
deficit reduction was 'important both for countries with long-lasting fiscal
imbalances and for countries experiencing exceptional adjustment
challenges'.
In an obvious reference to Germany, they said: 'Those countries with large
fiscal deficits, relatively high inflation, excessive wage developments and
tight monetary policy should follow a balanced policy approach to facilitate
improved growth.' None of the past week's suggestions from the US and
International Monetary Fund that Germany should accelerate fiscal
consolidation survived in the G7 text.
In a passage that could apply to the UK, the US or Italy, ministers said:
'Certain other countries with large deficits that have experienced weak
growth should avoid actions that would jeopardise medium-term efforts to
consolidate budget positions.'
Using words that could apply to France, the G7 said 'appropriate measures
should be pursued to enhance medium-term growth prospects while maintaining
public expenditures under control' in countries where fiscal balances have
been contained and recession avoided.
Correct fiscal policies were cited together with control of inflation and a
successful curbing of wage pressures as necessary for lower interest rates.
The G7 held back from telling any central bank to alter its monetary policy,
however.
The final text also registered a slight increase in G7 optimism about global
economic growth prospects.
After their previous meeting in Garden City, Long Island, the G7 ministers
had put their concern that economic activity had weakened higher up in the
final text than a list of those factors that would foster world economic
growth.
This time the order was reversed. The ministers 'noted that additional signs
of recovery had emerged in some of their countries'. However, they were
still 'concerned that aggregate G7 economic activity this year would be
below potential and growth would be inadequate to achieve a reduction in
unemployment'.
On leaving the meeting, ministers insisted that Sunday's talks built on an
existing strategy for strengthening the world economy. 'We re-asserted the
positions that we took back in January where there would be concerted and
positive action taken on the part of all the member countries to promote
growth,' Mr Mazankowski said.
However, it remains to be seen how far these words will be translated into
more growth in the world economy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11144</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Trade News: France pays less over export losses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE French government paid FFr9.05bn (Pounds 910m) net to exporters last
year to cover losses on state-guaranteed contracts to foreign clients unable
to pay. This was down from FFr11.5bn in 1990, William Dawkins reports from
Paris.
This also reflects a decline in exporters' claims for unpaid bills in global
trouble spots, plus a rise in the cash recovered from clients in default,
said Compagnie Francaise d'Assurance pour le Commerce Exterieur (Coface),
the French state-controlled export credit agency.
Coface, which handles payments on medium-term and some political risks on
the state's behalf, said net claims on government-guaranteed contracts were
running at about the same rate as last year. They could reach anything
between FFr6bn and FFr12bn, depending on the outcome of a few large
contracts in Latin America and the Maghreb, Mr Philippe Remond, agency
director-general, said.
Coface yesterday showed stagnant net profits of FFr142m on its own
operations, mainly insurance of short-term credits and political risks in
stable industrial countries, which it insures on its own account, with no
state guarantee. Mr Pierre-Yves Cosse, a former executive of Banque
Nationale de Paris who became Coface chairman last October, said the results
compared well with competitors in a tough trade year. The group was capable
of taking on more business now covered by the state on the grounds that it
was thought too risky for commercial insurers.
Coface started taking on political risks, such as nationalisation, in the EC
(previously state-guaranteed) last year. It went further this year, to
insure against political risks in all members of the Organisation of
Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) except Turkey, and to guarantee
exchange rate losses on foreign trade flows.
Coface has surprised competitors with its recent aggressive expansion, with
its purchases over the past year of 3 per cent in Trade Indemnity, the UK
insurer, 25 per cent in La Viscontea, the Italian credit insurance group,
16.5 per cent in Unistrat, a political risks insurer, and 45 per cent in
Forex Finance, a French adviser in treasury management. It has made joint
ventures in commercial information with Austrian and German partners, to
boost its east European debt recovery.
The strategy was to turn Coface into a diversified export finance group,
with a full range of services, Mr Cosse said. He warned of a 'question mark'
over Coface's ability to reinsure risks in years to come because of the
turmoil at Lloyd's of London, the main European centre for trade credit
reinsurance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11145</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Trade News: US, Japan closer to machine tool deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US has agreed with Japan key elements for phasing out by the end of 1993
'voluntary' quotas on machine tools, the US trade representative's office
said yesterday.
The deal comes after five months' talks following the announcement by
President George Bush in December that the industry, which he said was vital
to national security, should have another two years of quotas.
In 1986, Japan and Taiwan agreed to limit their exports to their 1981 market
share in several categories of machine tools. Both governments, especially
Taiwan, have been less willing this time. A Japanese official said Tokyo
would sign only after the US had agreed a similar pact with Taiwan.
Under the pact, Japan will keep its US market share for
numerically-controlled lathes, machining centres and numerically-controlled
punching and shearing machines to the present level this year, limiting any
increases to 2.31-2.8 percentage points next year, Japanese officials say.
Under the 1986 pact, Tokyo limited its market share to 57.47 per cent
(lathes), 51.54 per cent (machining centres) and 19.25 per cent (punching
and shearing machines).
An Association For Manufacturing Technology official said the pact with
Japan was expected to provide leverage for a Taiwan deal. Extra pressure is
being supplied by Congress.
The arrangement would allow imports from Japan to rise over their 1987-91
Voluntary Restraint Agreement levels by 264 units in 1993, with two-thirds
of the increase coming in the second half of the year. Included in this
would be 125 lathes, 119 machining centres, 14 punching and shearing
machines and six milling machines.
Two senators and two congresswomen have introduced legislation to freeze
quotas at their original levels, but in its present form, the bill has
little chance of passage.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11146</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Trade News: Vietnam lacks the power to lure investors
 -Electricity shortages top list of foreign companies' complaints
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOREIGN companies seeking to profit from Vietnam's economic reforms are
beginning to place electricity shortages at the top of their list of
complaints that already includes bureaucracy, corruption, an economic
embargo by the US and a rudimentary legal system.
In the south, where the dry season is coming to a close and hydroelectric
plants are running out of water, businesses have to survive four days or
more a week without power from the local electricity grid.
Vietnamese officials are aware of the impact the power shortage is having on
their efforts to attract more foreign capital, particularly since
four-fifths of planned investment in Vietnam is in the more entrepreneurial
south.
'Lots of companies come to the south but have no power,' said Mr Pham Dac
Duyen, deputy director of the state committee for Co-operation and
Investment in Ho Chi Minh City.
Short-stay visitors might not notice. Hotels are allowed electricity all
day, every day, although the Saigon Times weekly magazine reported recently
that there appeared to be no legal basis for this privilege. 'How to get
priority for electric power supply is a secret only we know,' it quoted a
hotel manager as saying, 'so do not put it in your paper.'
The magazine reported that 160,000 workers had been laid off in Ho Chi Minh
City and said some companies, including a paper mill and a plastics factory,
had failed to meet their orders on time. Mr Nguyen Duy Le of the local
branch of Vietnam's Chamber of Commerce and Industry said: 'It's keeping
foreign investors away.'
Both the government and the private sector have adopted stop-gap measures.
The authorities are negotiating to buy gas turbines and renovate ageing
thermal power stations, and small companies are resorting to imported
second-hand generators.
'There's enough loose cash around for people to buy a generator and run a
factory of 40 people,' said one banker in Ho Chi Minh City, boasting that he
bought a powerful but noisy machine for a mere Dollars 2,000. A Taiwanese
joint venture constructing Vietnam's first export-processing zone is said to
be considering the purchase of a decommissioned power plant from China
through a Hong Kong company.
In an attempt to end the power rationing in the longer term, the Hanoi
government started construction this month of a 1,414km, 500kV power line to
take surplus electricity from the north down the narrow backbone of central
Vietnam to the south.
The Dollars 300m line is supposed to be completed by the end of next year,
although Vietnamese officials say privately that the end of 1994 is a more
realistic target.
Another big project is the proposed construction of a Dollars 300m gas
pipeline from the southern offshore White Tiger oilfield to the coast by a
joint venture between PetroVietnam, the state oil company, and Canadian
partners Liquigaz and SNC-Lavalin. The gas from the oilfield, now flared and
wasted, would be used to supply power stations in the south.
Both the electricity line and the gas pipeline need foreign finance, which
is difficult to secure while Vietnam remains in arrears on debt repayments,
and while the US maintains its economic embargo and vetoes the disbursement
of funds by multilateral financial institutions.
Even in the north, where electricity generating capacity far exceeds demand,
an unreliable distribution system can play havoc with machinery, computers
and air conditioning.
'In the north, we have one advantage the south doesn't have,' said Dr Luu
Bich Ho, economist at the State Planning Committee in Hanoi, in an
interview. 'The electricity is available all day, except in special cases.'
A couple of minutes later, the lights went out.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11147</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Trade News: 'Textbook' pact cuts US-Canada beer trade
curbs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE North American beer market is expected to become more competitive and
more integrated, after a landmark US-Canada agreement to dismantle several
long-standing trade barriers.
The agreement, the culmination of years of wrangling, is widely seen as a
textbook example of the potential benefits of liberalised trade to business
and consumers. The compromise was reached last weekend after each country
had threatened to impose stiff duties on beer imports from the other. Mr
Peter Clark, an adviser to the Brewers' Association of Canada, said
yesterday the changes would mean significant economies of scale in the
Canadian industry.
By giving US brewers easier access to the Canadian market, the agreement
steps up pressure on Canadian provinces to drop restrictive practices which
have contributed to high costs for Canadian brewers. Lower production costs
would enable the industry to bring down domestic prices, and spur it to
expand export markets.
Under the agreement, Canadian provinces will drop discriminatory mark-ups on
US beer by June 30. British Columbia, Ontario, New Brunswick and
Newfoundland will also no longer set a minimum price for beer imports,
linked to the minimum for domestic brands. Ontario is to rescind its
requirement that US beer be sold only in six-packs. A key element of the
pact will require beer stores in Ontario and British Columbia, and grocery
stores in Quebec, to start stocking US beer by September 30, 1993. Imported
beer is now sold only through provincially owned liquor outlets.
US brewers have only a 3 per cent share of Canadian consumption, but US beer
is about 30 per cent cheaper in the key Ontario market than Canadian brands.
By gaining access to beer stores, the US makers will be able to compete more
directly against Canadian beer.
The cost discrepancy is largely due to provincial rules barring sales of any
domestic beers not produced in the province. These curbs are expected to end
on July 1. Meanwhile, the industry is pressing for permission to rationalise
production of individual brands across the country. Brewers are also
pressing barley producers for lower prices, and asking the federal
government to improve their cash flows by changing the point at which excise
taxes are levied.
The Canadian industry hopes the accord will speed talks to end US federal
and state curbs against foreign beers. These include discriminatory excise
taxes and onerous distribution requirements. A Gatt panel, responding to
complaints by the EC and Canada, has called for these barriers to be
scrapped.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11148</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Trade News: Scania-Poland bus accord
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCANIA, the Swedish truck and bus maker, has reached an agreement in
principle to assemble vehicles in Poland, Kevin Done writes.
It is to form a joint venture with Capena, a Polish company maintaining and
repairing heavy buses and special vehicles.
The venture plans to assemble several hundred vehicles a year. Capena,
located west of Gdansk, has a workforce of 500. Scania set up an
importer/distributor, Eurowax, in Poland last year and has delivered about
150 vehicles there over two years. It has about 8 per cent of the Polish
market for imported heavy commercial vehicles.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11149</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World Trade News: Iran Air orders Airbuses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRAN Air has ordered two Airbus Industrie A300-600R airliners worth an
estimated Dollars 171m (Pounds 96.6m), its first order from the European
consortium since the 1979 Islamic revolution, Airbus said yesterday, Reuter
reports from Paris.
The sale could clear the way for more aircraft orders by Iran, which has not
bought any large western-made commercial aircraft since the 1970s.
The aircraft will be equipped with CF6-80C2 engines made by General Electric
of the US.
An Airbus official said the order had been approved by the US, which last
year blocked efforts by Iran to buy four British Aerospace aircraft.
'Hopefully, the US approval is a sign of a change in US policy in this
area,' a Boeing official said.
Another industry official said Iran 'desperately needed to renew their
aircraft fleet. Most of their equipment is from the 1970s'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11150</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Seeking a growth path out of apartheid: The minister charged
with facilitating the economics of transition
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP GAWITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF OFFERED an hour with the cabinet minister of their choice, most South
African businessmen would probably choose Derek Keys.
The combination of a successful private sector career, an engaging though
forthright personality, and stewardship of a ministry critical to South
Africa's hopes for economic growth are the reasons Mr Keys would probably be
placed ahead of other influential figures, including (until his resignation
at the weekend) Mr Barend du Plessis, the finance minister.
Indeed, there is already speculation that Mr Keys might succeed Mr Du
Plessis, who stepped down pleading exhaustion after eight gruelling years.
Many in the business community, however, would want Mr Keys, minister of
trade, industry and economic co-ordination, to stay where he is.
Mr Du Plessis' resignation in effect marks the end of an era of siege
economics. Now the priority is growth. Nobody disputes that if political
transition is to succeed, the economy will have to be put onto a higher
growth path to arrest the trend of declining living standards.
Three months into his tenure at trade, industry and economic co-ordination,
Mr Keys has begun to elaborate how he is approaching his task. He brings to
it the same minimalist style which characterised his time as chairman of the
mining house Gencor.
In his maiden speech to parliament, Mr Keys said the issue he was prepared
to become obsessed by - and the reason for his accepting the job - was how
to raise the level of investment in new productive capacity, as a means of
stimulating growth and job creation.
The premise of his analysis is that the South African economy is basically
sound and hence does not require dramatic measures to put it on to a higher
growth path. What is needed, he argued in an interview recently, to realise
this latent potential is investor confidence. Mr Keys believes this is
essentially the province of the private sector. He singles out only two
tasks here for government: that it should be consistent and transparent in
its policies, and that it should be seen to be going in to bat for local
business abroad.
Two concerns arise about this analysis. Is Mr Keys doing enough to stimulate
economic growth, and should he not be giving more attention to the
productivity of the civil service, and of government spending in general?
Mr Keys certainly has support for his 'steady as she goes' approach. Mr
Michael O'Dowd, executive director of Anglo American Corporation, the
country's biggest business group, argued recently that 'So far from being a
'basket case', the performance of the South African economy in conditions of
great adversity has, in recent years, been most impressive.' He says, and Mr
Keys would agree, that what is needed is more of what is already under way:
reduction of tariffs to boost exports, deregulation and a lowering of
inflation.
Certainly, those looking for a package of stimulatory measures from Mr Keys
are going to be disappointed. Although he accepts the case for a downward
trend in tariffs, he is not planning any dramatic cuts, arguing that the
country's tariff barriers, in general, are not high.
He does not give much prominence to privatisation, saying that there are not
suitable candidates at the ready, and is silent on the issue of tax reform,
though the government is committed to lowering corporate and individual tax
rates.
On industrial policy, he prefers the idea of an incremental approach,
'choosing winners', rather than blanket measures to stimulate industry.
Mr Keys argues that a shopping list of policy initiatives is unnecessary.
'The economy is as strong as a horse, but it's got too many jockeys at the
moment. Government is sitting facing forwards, hoping the horse will start
off moving. The ANC is on it, facing backwards, trying to get the horse to
move backwards. Cosatu (the country's dominant union grouping) is sitting on
sideways, hoping to claim the credit regardless of whether it goes forwards
or backwards. The private sector is standing holding the horse's reins, but
it is bemused by what is happening on top of the horse. I see my job as
simply persuading the private sector to start putting one foot in front of
the other and to start leading the horse, regardless of what the jockeys
think they are doing.'
Despite the confusion among the jockeys, Mr Keys believes there is a
'remarkable degree of economic convergence' between the main political
actors. His sanguine view of South Africa's future economic policy is based
on the belief that there is growing consensus across the world about what
constitute sound economic policies.
'We're in a world which is founded on those principles and to key an open
economy like South Africa's into that world pretty well determines what kind
of internal policy you're going to have.'
On discordant noises continuing to emanate from the ANC about economic
policy, Mr Keys says: 'There has never been an unsatisfactory statement out
of the ANC in a situation that has involved dialogue. Wherever there has
been dialogue we've found that people can get onto the same wavelength.'
Pressed as to how the government would respond if, for example, the ANC
remained committed to nationalisation, Mr Keys suggests that this could
delay the arrival of a transitional government.
Perhaps a more important concern is supervision of state spending and the
civil service. Mr Keys's predecessor Wim de Villiers had authority over
these areas, but they are not part of Mr Keys' portfolio and he believes his
energies are better harnessed elsewhere. But there is still widespread
consensus that the state is getting poor results for the money it spends.
There is, of course, good reason for Mr Keys not to become involved in any
overhaul of the civil service. It is a political hot potato: it is dominated
by Afrikaners, and any programme to axe jobs would be painful for a
government already concerned by the erosion of support among its traditional
supporters.
Many would argue, however, that the government cannot allow possible
achievements on the growth side of the economy to be undermined by
overspending in the state bureaucracy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11151</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Beijing cautions Patten on tough line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON HOLBERTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA HAS cautioned Mr Chris Patten, Hong Kong's governor-designate, about
trying to act tough with Beijing, and said he should work instead for a
smooth transition of the colony's sovereignty to China in 1997.
The Beijing-controlled Ta Kung Pao newspaper said in a commentary yesterday
that Mr Patten should take no notice of the 'empty comment' in the British
press urging him to be tough with China.
'It is far away from the reality in Hong Kong,' the commentary said.
This, the most forthright commentary by Beijing to date, follows a cautious
welcome given to his appointment by China's foreign ministry spokesman in
Beijing at the weekend.
The ministry said it hoped Mr Patten would contribute to the maintenance of
the colony's long-term stability and prosperity, and to a smooth transfer of
power in 1997.
Improvement of relations with China will be one of Mr Patten's most pressing
challenges when he arrives in the colony in July.
He will find that Beijing is seeking an ever-larger role in the colony's
affairs while it is dragging its feet in bilateral talks about the
transition from British to Chinese sovereignty.
Ta Kung Pao said that Mr Patten's real achievement as Britain's last
governor of the colony should be in co-operation with China to achieve a
smooth transition for Hong Kong.
'From Mrs Thatcher to John Major, British prime ministers have successfully
resolved Hong Kong problems on the foundations of the Sino-British Joint
Declaration and co-operation with the Chinese government. It has nothing to
do with attitudes.'
Months of speculation over the successor to Lord Wilson, the colony's
present governor, were ended on Friday when Mr Major announced Mr Patten's
appointment to the governorship. He will be the colony's 28th British
governor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11152</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Far Right Edges Towards Negotiations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTH AFRICA'S ultra-right Conservative party has taken a step towards
negotiations on a post-apartheid constitution following its decisive defeat
last month in the all-white referendum on political reform, Patti Waldmeir
writes from Johannesburg.
However, the party yesterday expelled its most enthusiastic supporter of
negotiations, Mr Koos van der Merwe, a maverick MP who has argued for
immediate participation in constitutional negotiations.
The move illustrates the realignment in white politics since the referendum,
in which the ruling National party gained an overwhelming mandate to abolish
apartheid. With the first ever multi-racial elections expected to take place
by early next year, white politicians are jockeying for position. Last week
five white members of the liberal Democratic party joined the African
National Congress, while the Conservative party has so far expelled two
moderate MPs.
At a caucus meeting at the weekend, the Conservative party decided to enter
talks with the National party on setting up a white state, or volksstaat.
This would be the first step to entering negotiations in the multi-party
Convention for a Democratic South Africa (Codesa).
It is understood that the pro-negotiation faction within the Conservative
party has gained the advantage over hardliners, who refuse to negotiate
about anything other than white self-determination.
The party said Mr van der Merwe, who has long favoured negotiations, was
expelled for repeatedly breaching party discipline. During the referendum
campaign, he advocated policies in sharp contrast to the official CP
platform.
Several CP members of parliament are believed to support Mr van der Merwe's
position, but it is not clear whether they will now join him to form a
right-wing party which would eschew the more radical CP policies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11153</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Malaysia calls for cash to protect environment
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUALA LUMPUR
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DR MAHATHIR Mohammed, the Malaysian prime minister, declared yesterday that
the industrialised world's fear of global environmental damage had given
poor countries new leverage to demand assistance for the development of
their economies.
Opening a conference of more than 50 developing countries, aimed at forging
a common position for the Earth Summit to be held in Rio de Janeiro in June,
Dr Mahathir insisted, in a typically combative speech, that the North would
have to transfer money and technology to the South if developing nations
were to protect the environment.
'It is the rich who must be prepared to sacrifice their progress in the
interest of our development,' he said.
'The negotiations to prepare for Rio reflect the continuing attempt by the
South to bring the North to the table to overcome over four decades of
neglect on the growth and development of the South.
'Fear by the North of environmental degradation provides the South the
leverage that did not exist before. It is fully justified for us to approach
it this way.'
Dr Mahathir's statement could provoke charges of ecological blackmail from
his opponents. However, he announced simultaneously an undertaking by the
Malaysian government to ensure that at least 50 per cent of the country's
land area shall remain under permanent forest cover (although that appears
to include plantations and is compared with 70 per cent today).
He also challenged his audience of Third World ministers and western
observers to adopt 'an initiative for the greening of the world' that would
increase global tree cover to 30 per cent by 2000 from the current 27.6 per
cent.
'All nations must set national greening targets and those which have no
suitable land must contribute adequate funds to developing countries with
available land,' he said.
Malaysia's confrontational stance - one minister this week accused
environmental pressure groups in the West of terrorism and likened them to
the Nazis - has failed to win the wholehearted support of other developing
countries.
Among the industrialised countries, the US has emerged as the most reluctant
to commit itself to environmental targets. Yesterday, Mr Robert Ryan, who is
overseeing US government preparations for the summit, told a news conference
that 'consumer sovereignty' was a very important principle.
'We are not going to tell people what they can or can't consume,' he said,
declining to explain why the US government should control consumption for
national health or environmental reasons, but not to help the global
environment.
Other rich countries were more conciliatory, admitting that they had
mismanaged their own natural resources and agreeing to give developing
countries more say in the Global Environment Facility.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11154</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Hyundai shares sale probe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SEOUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SOUTH KOREA'S Securities Supervisory Board (SSB) yesterday said it would
investigate the sale of shares in companies from the Hyundai group, the
country's second biggest conglomerate, by Mr Chung Ju Yung, its founder.
The investigation involves a Won172bn (Pounds 126m) sale of shares in
unlisted group companies that Mr Chung offered to employees in January. Mr
Chung used the proceeds to finance his new anti-government political party,
the Unification National Party (UNP).
Mr Chung is alleged to have violated trading rules by having sold the
unlisted shares and collected the proceeds prematurely.
The sale of unlisted shares must not take place until 20 days after the
authorities are notified, but the SSB suspects Mr Chung conducted the sale
during the mandatory waiting period.
Although the case is considered only a technical violation of share trading
rules, the government has been strictly interpreting financial rules
pertaining to Hyundai, as part of its recent political conflict with Mr
Chung.
He sold some of his shares in Hyundai Heavy Industries, Hyundai Elevator,
Hyundai Housing &amp; Development, Hyundai Merchant Marine and Koryeo Industrial
Development. Of the 130,000 workers who took up the offer, employees of
Hyundai Motor and Hyundai Precision &amp; Industry were among the biggest
purchasers of the shares. The SSB investigation will involve all seven
companies.
The case stems from a recent investigation of Hyundai Electronics Industries
(HEI) by the Office of Bank Supervision to determine whether it illegally
used bank loans to finance the UNP.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11155</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Dutch tax burden criticised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE DUTCH central bank yesterday praised the government for having cut the
budget deficit, but criticised the way the reduction was achieved.
Mr Wim Duisenberg, the bank's president, said the government was relying too
heavily on raising tax revenues through such indirect levies as increased
taxes on petrol and natural gas. Another factor behind the decline in the
financing deficit was an accelerated programme of tax collection.
'There is but one road towards the restoration of a fundamentally sound
state of public finance: bringing down the share of public expenditure in
national product,' he told a news conference.
In 1991, the budget deficit eased to 3.75 per cent of gross national
product, below the government's target of 4.25 per cent, and is expected to
drop to 3.25 per cent this year.
However, by the end of its four-year tenure in office in late 1993, the
centre-left coalition government of Mr Ruud Lubbers would have exceeded its
original projections for tax revenue in the period by Fl 10bn (Pounds
3.05bn), Mr Duisenberg said. In the same period, social insurance premiums
would have generated Fl 3.5bn more than planned in 1989.
This trend reduced the purchasing power of consumers and the profitability
of Dutch companies and ultimately exerted negative pressure on economic
growth, he added.
On Friday, Mr Lubbers, who leads the Christian Democrats, said he accepted
that the budget would lead to a 1 per cent decline in the purchasing power
of the lowest-paid in 1993, while medium- and higher-income households would
gain by 1.5 per cent and 1 per cent respectively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11156</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Turks pin EC hopes on British presidency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT MAUTHNER and JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ANKARA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TURKEY is putting its faith in the forthcoming British presidency of the
European Community to further its ambitions of forging a closer relationship
with both the EC and the nine-nation Western European Union (WEU) defence
organisation, Mr Hikmet Cetin, Turkish foreign minister, told the Financial
Times in an interview.
Though the Turkish government has reluctantly accepted the EC's decision,
taken more than two years ago, to put Turkey's application for full
membership of the EC on ice for the foreseeable future, it continues to seek
early activation of the financial arrangements provided for by the country's
1963 association agreement with the EC. It also wants to be included in the
Community's new Mediterranean policy.
Both developments are being blocked by Greece, which is a full member of the
EC and can exercise therefore a veto in the community's Council of
Ministers. But Greece's attitude is causing increasing irritation in other
EC capitals, and Mr Douglas Hurd, British foreign secretary, made clear
during a visit to Ankara last week that he wants to 'enhance' Turkey's
relationship with the community and the WEU.
Mr Cetin recognises that Turkey was unlikely to become a full member of the
Community before the end of the century, but he emphasised that, no matter
what happened, Turkey would pursue its long-term objective to become 'part
of Europe and to be in all the institutions of Europe.'
He made clear that, important as Turkey's economic relations with the
Community were, his government was equally concerned about its future
defence relationship with western Europe. He was particularly grateful to
Britain and one or two other Community countries for having supported,
during the Maastricht treaty negotiations at the end of last year, Turkey's
full participation in the WEU. But he was decidedly unhappy about the
eventual decision by the Community as a whole to offer only associate
membership.
'Turkey has contributed to European defence in the past, and Turkey has also
paid for it. We think that Turkey contributed to the ending of the Cold War
in this part of the world. Now, it should not be the policy to say to Turkey
that it is no longer needed and that Turkey should be given second
class-membership. That cannot be accepted,' Mr Cetin said.
'Associate membership of the WEU can be accepted by Turkey for a temporary
period only if we know that we will become a member of the EC in the future.
Just during that temporary period, Turkey can accept associate status, and
in that case it will nevertheless expect to participate in all actions of
the WEU.'
Mr Cetin emphasised his concern at the probability that, if Greece were to
become a full member of the WEU and Turkey were given only associate status,
the bilateral problems of Turkey and Greece would be transferred to the
whole defence organisation.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11157</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / A gap at the high table of power play: Hans-Dietrich
Genscher, Germany's master diplomatist, leaves a legacy of success
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STRASBOURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE CRUMPLED figure of Mr Hans-Dietrich Genscher has haunted the corridors
of world diplomacy for so long that his face, like the Cheshire cat's, will
take some considerable time to disappear.
Under Chancellors Helmut Schmidt and Helmut Kohl, Mr Genscher honed his
skills to emerge as the unsurpassed master of coalition wheeler-dealing. His
passion for power play was never put to better advantage than during the
helter-skelter international negotiations leading to German reunification in
1990.
The foreign minister built his penchant for jet-travel diplomacy into a
personal trademark. His globe-trotting revealed much about his restlessness,
but little about the man himself.
Extending the Ostpolitik of Chancellor Willy Brandt, Mr Genscher continued
with aplomb this policy of developing links with west Germany's eastern
neighbours. Five years ago, he became the first senior western politician
publicly to back Mr Mikhail Gorbachev's reform measures in the Soviet Union.
Without the bonds of sympathy to Moscow, Mr Kohl and Mr Genscher would never
have pulled off German unification quite so quickly.
Despite - and because of - his success, he could never throw off altogether
a reputation for putting tactics before principles. Mr Brandt, who resigned
as chancellor in 1974, as well as Mr Schmidt, whose downfall in 1982 was due
to his foreign minister's decision to back Mr Kohl, both had extensive
experience of Mr Genscher's talents for manoeuvre.
He believed deeply in his mission to help restore the post-war credibility
of German foreign policy. Ever thin-skinned, he was deeply hurt to be told
that, because of his role in toppling Mr Schmidt, he was not trusted by Mrs
Margaret Thatcher.
Reunification was his finest hour. Mr Genscher was born in a village outside
Halle in eastern Germany and made annual Christmas pilgrimages to his
homeland during the years of division. However, like Mr Kohl, he believed he
would never live to see the two parts of the fatherland reunited.
After the fall of the Berlin Wall, Mr Genscher realised, with typical
alertness, that the opportunity for unity might be short-lived. His resolve
to take it was single-minded.
An emotional high-point came in early autumn, 1989. He stood on the balcony
of the West German embassy in Prague to announce the liberation of hordes of
east German refugees who had been camping in the grounds, hoping to escape
to the west.
After the catharsis of unity, an exhausted Mr Genscher seemed to lose his
touch. He failed to recognise the international mood during the approach to
the Gulf war last year. At times, it seemed the foreign minister was trying
to elevate Germany's absenteeism from the multinational anti-Iraq task force
to a higher form of morality.
Mr Genscher also clung for longer than others in the west to the belief that
Mr Gorbachev would remain in charge of an intact Soviet Union. In view of
the hope and the D-Marks invested by the Germans in the Soviet leader, this
was forgivable, but it did not improve the reputation of a man famed for
deciphering the shifting runes of international politics.
Mr Genscher is a complicated personality, though not quite as complicated as
his favoured long strings of high-sounding subordinate clauses can sometimes
make him seem. There is a stern touch to him. He adores wise-cracking and
carnival festivities, particularly when he is the centre of attention, but
instructs his speech-writers never to put jokes into his public addresses.
He once expressed indignation when Mr Douglas Hurd, then Britain's home
secretary, made a whimsical remark about modernisation of nuclear missiles
in a speech at Dusseldorf. He bears grudges, and remembers favours. He
recently indicated to Mr Hurd, now foreign secretary, that, since Germany
had helped Britain at the Maastricht summit, the UK should be more
supportive of Bonn's controversial line over recognising Croatia.
By becoming foreign minister of a united Germany, he realised his life's
ambition. Since he has made the foreign ministry his personal fiefdom by
having placed favoured officials in all the key posts, he can be sure that
Genscherism will live on, at least for a few more years.
Asked what he would do with more spare time, Mr Genscher once answered that
he would re-order the books in his library at home in the hills near Bonn.
Perhaps he will write one, too - probably about Genscherism.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11158</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / Pay deal agreed in Norway
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   OSLO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Norway's main trade union group agreed a wage deal with employers for
300,000 workers yesterday, but 2,000 seamen went on strike, halting vital
ferry services, Reuter reports from Oslo.
'We didn't get what we wanted on every point, but we're advising our members
to accept the deal,' said Yngve Haagensen, head of the main LO union
grouping after all-night talks with the Confederation of Norwegian Business
and Industry.
The deal, averting a threatened strike by 12,000 of the confederation's
300,000 private sector members, would give modest wage rises, with the
lowest-paid benefiting most.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11159</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / French dockers return to work
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH dockers returned to work yesterday after a five-day strike over
working practices that crippled main ports and cost the economy an estimated
FFr1bn (Pounds 102m), Reuter reports from Paris.
The CGT union, which organises most of the country's 8,300 dock workers,
called off the stoppage at Marseilles and Bordeaux on Sunday after the
government had agreed to discuss its reform programme. Both ports were back
to normal yesterday.
French dockers still work to conditions laid down in 1947 that include a
140-day working year.
The government says the sector is becoming dangerously uncompetitive. Union
leaders fear that reform would lead to heavy job losses.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11160</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World News In Brief: Belfast casualties
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A child and a soldier were injured in a bomb attack on a military patrol in
Belfast. A device, believed to be a coffee jar bomb, was thrown at a
military patrol in Old Park Road in the north of the city.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11161</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A7AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920428
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  28 APR 92 / World News In Brief: HIV payments
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Doctors will be asked to name patients who may be eligible for cash payments
to compensate them for infection with the HIV virus following NHS blood
transfusions and tissue treatment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11162</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / (CORRECTED) Japan's banks face Y1,297bn loss: The effects of
the sharp decline in portfolio valuations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Correction (Published 28th April 1992) appended to this article.
JAPAN'S city, long-term credit and trust banks have announced a total of
Y1,297.3bn in portfolio valuation losses from the decline of the Tokyo stock
market.
The losses have forced some of the banks also to revise earnings estimates
downward for the year ending last month.
Sanwa Bank was hit hardest, with losses amounting to Y145bn (Dollars
1.09bn).
The bank said net earnings would decline 10 per cent compared to earlier
estimates of Y120bn. Last year earnings were Y123bn.
The Industrial Bank of Japan and Fuji Bank reported losses of more than
Y90bn. The losses are in aggregate nearly five times more than last year.
The losses directly affect current profits, and some banks have aggressively
sold securities on which they can realise a capital gain to boost the bottom
line. The banks continue to hold significant hidden profits on other
securities whose market value remains above acquisition costs.
Valuation losses have been partly offset by rising interest rate spreads as
rates decline, and the banks are reporting higher operating profits as a
result.
The disclosure of losses is required under stock exchange rules. They
appeared timed to follow Ministry of Finance attempts to calm investor fears
about the health of the banking system.
The ministry last week said the banks were 'very sound', in spite of rising
bad loans linked to the property sector. The announcements were aimed at
convincing investors the banks' problems were manageable.
However, the ministry's efforts appear to have raised further questions
about the likely growth of non-performing loans in the current year, about
which the ministry had no comment. The valuation losses are also dated to
the end of March, after which the stock market plunged. Further losses will
have to be declared if the market fails to recover.
Valuation losses for the banking sector in 1991 came to Y1,734bn, said the
ministry.
Japan's big squeeze, Page 12
 ---------------------------------------
     BANK LOSSES ON SECURITIES
 ---------------------------------------
Sanwa Bank                Y145.0bn
Industrial Bank of Japan   Y98.5bn
Fuji Bank                  Y96.4bn
Sumitomo Bank              Y88.2bn
Tokai Bank                 Y84.7bn
Sakura Bank                Y78.9bn
Daiwa Bank                 Y72.7bn
Dai-ichi Kangyo Bank       Y72.0bn
 ---------------------------------------
Correction (Published 28th April 1992)
In yesterday's edition of the Financial Times the securities valuation
losses of the Tokai Bank were incorrectly listed in a table as Y84.7bn.
This amount was the valuation loss of the Bank of Tokyo. The Tokai Bank's
correct valuation loss was Y54.7bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11163</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / (CORRECTED) The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Correction (Published 28th April 1992) appended to this article.
UK COMPANIES TODAY
COMPANY MEETINGS:
CIA, 1 Paris Garden, SE, 12.00
ECC, The Brewery, Chiswell Street, EC, 10.30
Kynoch (G. &amp; G), Beaufort House, 15 St. Botolph Street, EC, 3.00
Mayflower Corp., 30 Queens Annes Gate, SW, 11.30
Medeva, Institute of Directors, 116 Pall Mall, SW, 10.00
Microvitec, Stakis Norfolk Gardens Hotel, Hall Ings, Bradford, 12.00
Murray Intl. Trust, 7 West Nile Street, Glasgow ,10.30
Scottish Eastern Inv. Trust, Saltire Court, 20 Castle Terrace, Edinburgh,
12.00
Tudor, Pedmore House, Ham Lane, Pedmore, Stourbridge, West Midlands, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Dares Estates
How
Molynx
Serif Cowells
Smith (James) Estates
Walker (J. O)
Wensum
Interims:
Blenheim
Lyles (S)
TOMORROW
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Calderburn, The Dunkenhalgh Hotel, Clayton-le-Moors, Accrington, Lancashire,
12.30
Capital &amp; Counties, 40 Broadway, SW, 11.45
Edinburgh Oil &amp; Gas, 10 Coates Cresent, Edinburgh, 11.30
Expamet Intl., The Royal Automobile Club, 89 Pall Mall, SW, 12.00
Hillsdown Hldgs., Holiday Inn, 128 King Henry's Road, Swiss Cottage, NW,
2.00
Lambert Howarth, Dunkenhalgh Hotel, Clayton-le-Moors, 12.00
Law Debenture Corp., Princes House, 95 Gresham Street, EC, 9.30
More O'Ferrall, The Cafe Royal, Regent Street, W, 10.00
Natl. Westminster Bank, Natl. Westminster Hall, 15 Bishopsgate, EC, 11.00
Williams Hldgs, The Intl. Convention Centre, Broad Street, Birmingham, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Brown &amp; Jackson
Edinburgh Inv. Trust
Explaura Hldgs.
Ingham
S &amp; U Stores
Sennah Rubber
Television South West
Waterford Foods
Yule Catto
Interims:
Govett Strategic Inv. Tst.
Moran Hldgs.
WEDNESDAY APRIL 29
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Ansbacher (Henry) Hldgs., Priot House, 1 Mitre Square, EC, 11.45
BBA, The Savoy Hotel, Strand, WC, 11.30
Calor, The Baltic Exchange, 14-20 St. Mary Axe, EC, 11.30
Carlisle, Howard Hotel, Temple Place, WC, 11.00
Courtaulds Textiles, London Marriott Hotel, Duke Street, W, 10.45
Doeflex, 56 Holmethorpe Avenue, Redhill, 12.00
Era, Strand Palace Hotel, Strand, WC, 11.00
General Accident, Pitheaclis, Perth, 10.00
Headline Book Publishing, Royal Society of Arts, 8 John Adam Street, WC,
11.00
Kleinwort Benson, 20 Fenchurch Street, EC, 12.00
Manders, Goldthorn Hotel, Penn Road, Wolverhampton, 12.00
Molins, Barber Surgeons Hall, Monkwell Square, Wood Street, EC, 12.15
TLS Range, Lancashire County Cricket Club, Talbot Road, Stratford, 12.00
Thornton Pan-European Inv. Trust, 33 Cavendish Square, W, 5.00
Wassall, The Farmers' and Fletchers' Hall, 3 Cloth Street, EC, 11.30
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Bank of Scotland
British Fittings
Brixton Estate
Brown (N)
Eadie
Hopkinsons
Travis Perkins
Interims:
Drayton Asia Trust
Majedie Inv.
Rosehaugh
THURSDAY APRIL 30
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Barclays, 30 Threadneedle Street, EC, 2.30
Billam (J), Sheffield Moat House Hotel, Chesterfield Road South, Sheffield,
11.00
Blagden Inds., Saddlers Hall, Gutter Lane, Cheapside, EC, 12.00
British Aerospace, London Marriott Hotel, Duke Street, 3.00
Ferrum Hldgs., 57 Melville Street, Edinburgh, 12.15
Fife Indmar, 115 Hanover Street, Edinburgh, 12.00
Gaskell, Pines Hotel, Clayton-le-Woods, Chorley 10.30
Kode Intl., 25 Copthall Avenue, EC, 12.00
Mayborn, Dylon House, Worsley Bridge Road, Lower Sydenham, SE, 10.30
Peek, 89 Pall Mall, SW, 11.30
Reuters, The Sedgwick Centre, E, 11.30
Servomex, Buxted Park Hotel, Buxted, Uckfield, East Sussex 12.30
TR High Income Trust, Mermaid House, 2 Puddle Dock, EC, 12.30
Try, Cowley Business Park, High Street, Cowley, Uxbridge, Middlesex, 12.00
Watmoughs Hldgs., Forte Crest Hotel, Bramhope, Leeds, West Yorkshire, 11.30
Wimpey (George), Savoy Hotel, WC, 12.00
Wood (Arthur), Bradwell Works, Longport, Stoke-on-Trent, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
CI
Le Creuset SA
McLaughlin &amp; Harvey
Scottish Mortgage &amp; Tst.
Interims:
Chemex Intl.
Kwik Save
McCarthy &amp; Stone
FRIDAY MAY 1
COMPANY MEETINGS:
American Trust, 4 Melville Crescent, Edinburgh, 12.15
BLP, 21 Wilson Street, EC, 10.00
Clarke (T), Savoy Hotel, WC, 12.00
Greggs, Gosforth Park Hotel, High Gosforth Park, Newcastle upon Tyne, 11.45
ICI, Royal Lancaster Hotel, Lancaster Terrace, W, 11.00
MTL, Power Court, Luton, Bedfordshire, 4.00
Sheffield Insulations, Grosvenor House, Charter Square, Sheffield, 11.00
Strong &amp; Fisher Hldgs., 41 Tower Hill, EC, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Conroy Petlm. &amp; Nat. Res.
I &amp; S UK Smaller Co's
Upton &amp; Southern
Company meetings are annual general meetings unless otherwise stated.
RESULTS DUEICI, the chemicals giant, announces its first quarter results on
Thursday. Pre-tax profits are expected to be between Pounds 195m and Pounds
225m compared with Pounds 198m for the same period last year. The figures
will include an exceptional profit of between Pounds 15m and Pounds 20m on
the disposal of the salt business.
Analysts' attention will be focused on the pharmaceutical division which in
recent quarters has been producing most of the group's profits. Its trading
profits are likely to be up on a weak quarter last year, although the
results for this March are likely to be poor following price rises in the
US.
The performance of the agrochemicals division, which generates much of its
profits in March, will also be closely watched, as will industrial chemicals
to gauge the extent of the pick-up in the US economy.
Interim figures from Associated British Foods, the Sunblest bread to British
Sugar group, on Monday are hard to call following the change of year-end to
September last year. The half year will include a full contribution from
British Sugar, acquired in January 1991, but the income from the diminished
cash pile will be lower.
Milling and baking has been a difficult business so estimates are for a fall
in pre-tax profits from the Pounds 185m comparable figure. The range is
wide, from Pounds 160m to Pounds 175m.
Kwik Save, the discount food retailer, has been the subject of many rumours
recently, some of which - such as the management succession  - might be
explained with Thursday's interim figures. The expectation is for pre-tax
profits rising from Pounds 48.1m last time to around Pounds 52m.
Bad debts will be closely watched at Travis Perkins, the builders' merchant,
which reports on Wednesday. It is forecast to reveal a sharp decline in
annual pre-tax profits from Pounds 20.4m to around Pounds 13m. However,
investors should be reassured by the lack of gearing and the maintained
dividend.
DIVIDEND &amp; INTEREST PAYMENTS TODAY
Alba 1p
Alliance Tst. 29p
Do. 4% (2.8% net) Prf. Pounds 1.4
Do. 4 1/4 % (2.975% net) Prf. Pounds 1.4875
Do. 5% (3 1/2 % net) Prf. Pounds 1.75
Baring Puma Fd. Dollars 0.064
Exchequer 13 1/2 % 1994 Pounds 6.75
Do. 15% 1997 Pounds 7.5
Five Arrows Chile Fd. Dollars 0.35
Gartmore Emerging Pacific Inv. Tst. 0.13p
General Electric Dollars 0.55
Macallan-Glenlivet 0.5125p
Molex Dollars 0.005
Do. A Dollars 0.005
Pacific Assets Tst. 1p
Pifco Hldgs. 3.5p
Do. A 3.5p
Renishaw 2.5p
St. Andrew Tst. 4.85p
Texas Instruments Dollars 0.18
Thai Prime Fd. Dollars 0.045
TOMORROW
Asahi Breweries 6.3% Bds. 1997 Y164500
Bank of Nova Scotia CDollars 0.26
Bradford &amp; Bingley Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1995 Pounds 270.39
Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce CDollars 0.33
Canadian Pacific CDollars 0.08
Dainippon Ink &amp; Chemicals Inc. 6 1/4 % Nts. 1999 3.125pc.
Furukawa Electric 6 1/4 % Bds. 1997 Y156250
Scottish Eastern Inv. Tst. 0.96p
Wessanen (Kon.) NV FL1.88
WEDNESDAY APRIL 29
Abtrust Pfd. Inc. Inv. 2.90625p
Bensons Crisps 2.15p
Capital &amp; Counties 5p
Dartmore Inv. Tst. 2.6p
Instituto de Credito Oficial Stat. Gtd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1992 Dollars 275.14
THURSDAY APRIL 30
Alexon 5% (3.5% net) Prf. 1.75p
Amber Day 10 1/2 % Red. Prf. 1999/2002 5.25p
Arcadian Intl. 8% Uns. Ln. 1989/94 Pounds 4
Attwoods (Finance) NV Gtd. Red. Cnv. Prf. 4.25p
Auto Funding A Fltg. Rate Nts. 1996 Pounds 280.14
Baltic 2.5p
Banco de Santander SA Pta110
Bankers Inv. Tst. 10 1/2 % Deb. 2016 Pounds 5.25
Bank of Montreal Fltg. Rate Debs. Sers. 9 1996 Dollars 125
Bank of Nova Scotia Fltg. Rate Debs. 2000 Pounds 266.8
Barclays Bank 12 3/8 % 1996 6.1875pc.
Batleys 10% Prf. 5p
Beckenham 9% Red. Prf. 4.5p
Black (Peter) 0.77p
Blacks Leisure 10% Prf. 5p
Blundell-Permoglaze 7 1/4 % Uns. Ln. 1990/95 Pounds 3.625
British-American Tobacco 6% (4.2% net) 2nd Prf. 2.1p
Brown &amp; Tawse 7% (4.9% net) Prf. 2.45p
Burmah Castrol 6% (4.2% net) 1st Prf. 2.1p
Do. 6% (4.2% net) 2nd Prf. 2.1p
Do. 7 1/4 % (5.075% net) Red. Prf. 2.5375p
Do. 8% (5.6% net) Prf. 2.8p
Calderburn 4.9p
Campbell Soup Dollars 0.195
Cantors 7 1/2 % (5 1/4 % net) Prf. 2.625p
Cap. &amp; Counties 5 3/4 % Prf. 2.875p
Chemical Banking Corp. Fltg. Rate Senr. Nts. 1999 Dollars 43.75
Chemring Cnv. Red. Pfd. 3p
Do. 4.9% Prf. 2.45p
Citicorp Banking Corp. Gtd. Fltg. Rate Sub. Cap. Nts. 1996 Dollars 131.25
Do. Gtd. Fltg. Rate Sub. Cap. Nts. 1997 Dollars 131.25
Collateralised Mortgage Securities (No. 4) Mtg. Bkd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2027
Pounds 251.3
Do. (No. 6) Mtg. Bkd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2027 Pounds 265.12
Do. (No. 12) A Mtg. Bkd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2028 Pounds 263.56
Cookson 7% (4.9% net) Pfd. 1.225p
Crowther (John Edward) Hldgs. 5 1/2 % (3.85% net) Prf. 1.925p
Daiwa Intl. Finance (Cayman) Sub. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2001 Dollars 1106.25
Dartmoor Inv. Tst. 6 1/4 % RPI Linked Deb. 2005 Pounds 3.619
Dow Chemical Dollars 0.65
Dundee &amp; London Inv. Tst. 5% (3 1/2 % net) Prf. Pounds 1.75
EFT 0.77p
Ellis &amp; Everard 7 1/4 % Deb. 1987/92 Pounds 3.625
English Prop. Corp. 9 7/8 % 1st Mtg. Deb. 1997/2002 Pounds 4.9375
ERF Hldgs. 10% Prf. 5p
Estates &amp; General 6% Cnv. Red. Prf. 3p
Estates Property Inv. 10% 1st Mtg. Deb. 2011 Pounds 5
Do. 7 3/4 % Uns. Ln. 1989/92 Pounds 3.875
Evans of Leeds 11% 1st Mtg. Deb. 2025 Pounds 5.5
First Natl. Fin. 10% Sub. Uns. Ln. 1992 Pounds 5
Foreign &amp; Colonial Inv. Tst. 7% Uns. Ln. 1988/93 Pounds 3.4
Forte 10 1/2 % Mtg. Deb. 1991/96 Pounds 5.25
Do. 9.1% Uns. Ln. 1995/2000 Pounds 4.55
Gartmore Value Invs. 12.34% Deb. 1995 6.17p
General Motors Acceptance Corp. of Canada Fltg. Rate Nts. 1996 CDollars
608.59
Great Northern Iron Ore Properties Dollars 1.55
Great Western Financial Corp. Var. Rate Nts. 1993 Dollars 123.23
Guildhall Prop. 6% (4.2% net) Prf. 2.1p
Halifax Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Ln. Nts. 1996 Sers. A Pounds 43.62
Heavitree Brew. 11 1/2 % Prf. 5.75p
Honda Motor 5.9% Bds. 1997 Y150778
Do. 6% Bds. 1999 Y153333
Intereurope Tech. Srv. 2p
Jackson (Wm.) 7 1/2 % (5 1/4 % net) Prf. 2.625p
Johnson Matthey 8 1/2 % Mtg. Deb. 1985/95 Pounds 4.25
Kingfisher 8 1/2 % Cnv. Uns. Ln. 2000 Pounds 4.25
Land Securities 6% 1st Mtg. Deb. 1988/93 Pounds 3
Do. 7 1/4 % 1st Mtg. Deb. 1991/96 Pounds 3.625
Latham (James) 8% Prf. 4p
Lionheart Cnv. Red. Prf. 24.5p
Do. 7% Cnv. Red. Prf. 24.5p
Local Authority Short-Dated Bds. 10 3/8 % Bds. 4/11/92 Pounds 5.1875
Logica 1.15p
London American Ventures Tst. 3 1/2 % Deb. Red. Pounds 1.75
Do. 4% Deb. Red. Pounds 2
London Merchant Securities 7 3/4 % Uns. Ln. 2000/05 Pounds 3.875
Lookers 4.2p
Lowe (Robert H) 6 1/2 % (4.55% net) 1st Prf. 2.275p
Do. 87.5% Cnv. Red. Prf. 4.375p
Lowe's Co's Inc. Dollars 0.14
Malaysia 6% Sov. Exch. Bds. 2001 Dollars 300
Maunders (John) 2.3p
Mayne Nickless Europe ADollars 0.175
McAlpine (Alfred) 5.8p
Do. 9% Prf. 4.5p
Murray Split Capital Tst. 3.3p
Natl. Westminster Bank Var. Rate Cap. Nts. 2000 Dollars 1181.25
Newarthill 6.775% Prf. 3.3875p
News Corp. ADollars 0.05
News Intl. 2.092p
NHL (1) Securities Dfd. Int. Mtg. Bkd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2028 Pounds 851.53
Northern Rock Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1992 Pounds 132.4
Province of Nova Scotia 16 3/4 % Ln. 2011 Pounds 8.375
Owners Abroad 2.2925p
Peel Hldgs. 10% Prf. 2.5p
Do. 9 7/8 % 1st Mtg. Deb. 2011 Pounds 4.9375
PHH Corp. Dollars 0.3
Portsmouth &amp; Sunderland News. 6% Prf. 3p
Do. 11 1/2 % 2nd Prf. 5.75p
Ransomes Cnv. Prf. 4.125p
River &amp; Mercantile Tst. Stppd. Prf. 2.55p
Royal Bank of Canada Fltg. Rate Debs. 2005 Dollars 36.46
SCECorp Dollars 0.68
Scot. Inv. Tst. 4% Perp. Deb. Pounds 2
Do. 4 1/4 % Perp. Deb. Pounds 2.125
Do. 5% Perp. Deb. Pounds 2.5
Scot. &amp; Newcastle 4.6% Prf. 2.3p
Do. 6.425% Prf. 3.2125p
Seagram Distillers 12 3/8 % Deb. 2012 Pounds 6.1875
Secured Ln. Finance No. 1 A Mtg. Bkd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2018 Pounds 281.05
Do. Mezzanine Mtg. Bkd. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2018 Pounds 300.72
Shaw Carpets 8 1/2 % Deb. 1988/93 Pounds 4.25
Shires Inv. 4.2p
Templeton Emerging Mkts. Inv. Tst. 1% Cnv. Uns. Ln. 2001 0.5p
Texaco Intl. Financial Corp. 8% Cnv. Gtd. Ln. 1981/99 Pounds 4
Thorntons 1.25p
TMC PIMBS First Financing No. 2 2029 Pounds 268
Do. Fourth Financing No. 5 2029 Pounds 243.37
Do. Third Financing No. 4B 2029 Pounds 269.72
Torday &amp; Carlisle 3p
Transamerica Corp. Dollars 0.5
TR City of London Tst. 10 1/4 % Deb. 2020 Pounds 5.125
TR High Income Tst. 0.8p
TT 10 7/8 % Cnv. Red. Prf. 1997 5.4375p
USDC Inv. Tst. 3.25p
USF &amp; G Corp Dollars 0.05
Reg Vardy 1.3p
Vaux 7% (4.9% net) Prf. 2.45p
Do. 4 1/2 % (3.15% net) A Prf. 1.575p
Do. 6 1/2 % (4.55% net) A Prf. 2.275p
Wells Fargo Fltg. Rate Sub. Nts. 1992 Dollars 141.67
Wood (Arthur) 4.1p
Wyevale Garden Centres 1.24p
FRIDAY MAY 1
APV 3.15% Prf. 1.575p
Do. 4.55% Prf. 2.275p
Do. 5 1/4 % Prf. 2.625p
American Tel. &amp; Telegraph Dollars 0.33
Ameritech Corp. Dollars 0.88
Bell Atlantic Corp. Dollars 0.65
BellSouth Corp. Dollars 0.69
BET 4 1/2 % 2nd Deb. Pounds 2.25
Blagden Inds. 5p
Bristol Corp. 3 1/2 % Deb. Pounds 1.75
British Inv. Tst. 5 1/4 % (3.675% net) Prf. Pounds 1.8375
British Mohair Hldgs. 6% (4.2% net) Red. Prf. 2.1p
British Shoe Corp. 6 1/2 % (4.55% net) 3rd Prf. 2.275p
BTP Cnv. Red. Prf. 3.75p
CALA 1.15p
Canning (W) 7 1/2 % Uns. Ln. 1988/93 Pounds 3.75
Dunedin Worldwide Inv. 1.75p
Edinburgh Inv. Tst. 7 1/2 % Deb. 1995 Pounds 3.75
English &amp; Dutch Inv. Tst. Ptg. Certs. FL5.25
Do. 8% 1st Prf. FL0.8
Do. 8% 2nd Prf. FL0.8
European Assets Tst. FL0.11
Exch. 3% Gas 1990/95 Pounds 1.5
Do. Gtd. 4 1/2 % Bds. Red Pounds 2.25
Expamet Intl. 6.2p
Fleming Mercantile Inv. 1.9p
Frogmore Esates 3.4p
Fyffes Cnv. Prf. IR4.125p
Genfinance NV 11.31% Ln 2007 Pounds 5.655
Government of Gibraltar 11 7/8 % Ln. 2005 Pounds 5.9375
Glaxo 7 3/4 % Uns. Ln. 1985/95 1.9375p
Glaxo Hldgs. 6p
Halifax Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1997 Pounds 519.02
Hardys &amp; Hansons 5% (3 1/2 % net) 1st Prf. 1.75p
Do. 4% Irrd. 1st Mtg. Deb. Pounds 2
Howden 0.7p
Intl. SE of the UK and the Republic of Ireland 10 1/8 % Mtg. Deb. 2016
Pounds 5.0625
Johnson Cleaners 18.7p
Kalon 1.5p
King &amp; Shaxson 5% (3 1/2 % net) Prf. 1.75p
Lamont 6% (4.2% net) Prf. 1.05p
Do. 5.6% 2nd Prf. 2.8p
Do. 10% 3rd Prf. 5p
Lewis (J) Props. 8 1/4 % Mtg. Deb. 1993/98 Pounds 4.125
Lincol Natl. Corp. Dollars 0.73
Lloyds Chemists Red. Cnv. Ptg. Prf. 2005 3.75p
Marks &amp; Spencer 10% (7% net) Prf. 3.5p
Marshalls 10% Prf. 5p
Merchants Tst. 4% Perp. Deb. Pounds 2
Mid Southern Water 10% Red. Deb. 1995/98 Pounds 5
City of Montreal 3% Perm. Deb. Pounds 1.5
Natl. Westminster Bank 9.45% Sub. Nts. 2001 Dollars 4.725
Nicor Inc. Dollars 0.59
Norwich Corp. 3% Red. Pounds 1.5
Nottingham Corp. 3% Irrd. Pounds 1.5
NYNEX Corp. Dollars 1.16
Pacific Telesis Dollars 0.545
Parkland Text. 3.15% Prf. 1.575p
Pentos 3 1/2 % (3.15% net) Prf. 1.575p
Photo-Me Intl. 1.3p
Reading Corp. 3 1/2 % (1978 or after) Pounds 1.75
Ricardo Intl. 1.9p
Sanderson Murray &amp; E. 7p
Scot. Inv. Tst. 3 1/2 % Pfd. Pounds 1.75
Do. 3.85% Pfd. Pounds 1.925
Do. 4.55% A Prf. Pounds 2.275
Scot. &amp; Newcastle 7.6% 1st Mtg. Deb. 1989/94 Pounds 3.8
Sheafbank Property Tst. 5 1/4 % Prf. 2.625p
Do. 6% Cnv. Prf. 3p
Southwestern Bell Corp. Dollars 0.73
Torchmark Corp. Dollars 0.4
US West Inc. Dollars 0.53
Varity Hldgs. 7 1/2 % Deb. 1987/92 Pounds 3.75
Watmoughs 8p
Whitbread 7% (4.9% net) 3rd Prf. 2.45p
Correction (Published 28th April 1992)
Calor Group's annual meeting will be held at noon tomorrow at the
Ironmongers Hall, Shaftesbury Place, Aldersgate Street, London, EC2. The
venue was incorrectly reported in yesterday's Week Ahead column.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11164</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CFVAXAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Russia faces delay in membership of IFC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   Washingtion
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Early Russian membership of the International Finance Corp (IFC), the World
Bank affiliate charged with promoting private-sector investment, has been
thrown into doubt by problems in the US administration.
Russia and the other 14 former Soviet republics have completed the
formalities to become members of the International Monetary Fund and the
World Bank. But the US has so far not given the go-ahead to a limited
increase in IFC capital that would allow Russia and other republics to join
the affiliate.
The difficulty lies in the US Congress. Russia and the republics will be
able to join the World Bank as it had sufficient unallocated shares to give
Russia a 2.92 per cent of World Bank capital and the former Soviet
Republics, including Russia, 5.25 per cent.
The IFC, however, only had about half the number of unissued shares required
to make the former Soviet states into members with the same shareholdings as
in the World Bank.
A selective capital increase is needed to accommodate the new entrants but
it is unclear whether the US, which holds 25 per cent of IFC capital and can
therefore block any move to alter the corporation's shareholding, will
support such a scheme.
Wrangling with Congress over the US budget led to months of delay before
Washington agreed last year to a Dollars 1bn (Pounds 571m) increase of IFC
capital, to Dollars 2.3bn. There are hopes in Washington that the latest
problem over IFC capital can be solved soon.
Meanwhile, the IFC is building up its operations in the former Soviet Union
by focusing on the provision of know-how. It recently won a contract to help
privatise 2,000 shops in Nizhny Novgorod, formerly the Russian city of
Gorky.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11165</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A9AADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Spain faces strikes over jobless benefits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SPAIN is facing serious labour unrest this summer and autumn, following the
announcement at the weekend by the General Workers' Union (UGT) that it is
to hold a half-day stoppage next month, and a general strike of possibly 48
hours in October, both in protest at government cuts in unemployment
benefits.
The UGT and the other large union, the communist-led Workers' Commissions
(CCOO) are to meet this week to co-ordinate further mobilisations. The CCOO
will probably persuade the UGT to convert its May stoppage into a 24-hour
strike.
Both unions are promising a series of rolling sectoral strikes if the
government does not withdraw its decree to cut unemployment payments.
The government, which has made the cuts to trim the growing deficit
(equivalent to Dollars 4bn) in the official employment institute, says they
are necessary to help the country cut its public sector deficits before it
enters the EC's economic and monetary union (Emu). Mr Carlos Solchaga,
finance minister, insisted this weekend that the decree would not be
withdrawn.
The government and the ruling Socialist Party, which was initially unnerved
by the scale of the decree, were closing ranks at the weekend and appear to
have decided to confront the unions. The party is likely, even so, to force
some changes to the decree in parliament this week. Officials say these will
be minor and will not change the decree's thrust.
Other ministers, including cabinet members well to the left of Mr Solchaga,
were rallying to support him at the weekend.
The employment institute's deficit has nearly trebled since 1987. Combined
with the introduction of temporary contracts, designed to encourage
recruitment of labour, its system of benefits payments has become widely
abused. Some unemployed people receive more in institute benefit than they
did when working.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11166</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A9AACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Romanians give ecstatic welcome to former king
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VIRGINIA MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUCHAREST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THOUSANDS of Romanians filled the streets of Bucharest yesterday to welcome
back their former king, Michael of Hohenzollern, who was visiting the
capital for the first time since 1947, writes Virginia Marsh in Bucharest.
Police struggled to keep back good-natured crowds who had gathered since
early morning around St George's church in the city centre, where the former
king, aged 70, celebrated the Orthodox Easter with members of his family.
Ex-king Michael declined to make political statements to the crowd, which at
one point reached an estimated 100,000. He stood on the church balcony and
exchanged traditional Easter greetings with his supporters.
Although the crowd gave him an ecstatic welcome, many had mixed feelings as
to whether the monarchy should be reinstated in Romania.
The country's royalist party, the Liberal Monarchists, have no parliamentary
representation. However, some opposition parties whose 14-party coalition
attracted strong support in local elections in February, have said they will
hold a referendum on the issue, if successful in general elections due this
summer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11167</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A9AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Nine die
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nine motorcyclists, in Le Mans in France to watch the 24-Hour motorcycle
race, were killed late on Saturday in three sets of accidents which all took
place outside the competition.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11168</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD1A9AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Earthquake
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An earthquake and two powerful aftershocks which jolted northern California
at the weekend caused damage estimated at Dollars 10m, destroyed scores of
homes and buildings, injured 70 people and left five missing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11169</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Monday Interview: Avuncular provider of advice - Lewis
Preston, president of the World Bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE and PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Six months after taking over as president of the World Bank, the world's
premier development institution, Mr Lewis Preston is dipping his toes in
media waters. His handlers have finally persuaded him to start giving press
interviews. They have not all gone well. A frosty piece in the New York
Times described him as spending the interview 'slouched in the corner of a
carved-wood sofa' and being more interested in his pictures of wild birds
than in economic development.
Today, the blue-blooded former Wall Street banker is sitting up straight and
radiating charm. Peering over half-moon spectacles, a mug of coffee in one
hand, he seems avuncular rather than gruff or intimidating. Indeed, one
could almost believe this is not the World Bank president but an amiable
retired banker who has wandered into the Washington office of an old friend.
During a decade at the top of J P Morgan, one of the few big US banks to
emerge relatively unscathed from the debt-ridden 1980s, Mr Preston
studiously avoided publicity. Regularly consulted by the world's top central
bankers, he preferred to wield influence from behind the scenes. It is clear
he would like things to stay that way.
'The bully pulpit doesn't interest me a bit,' he declares. For Mr Preston,
who devoted 40 years of his life to J P Morgan, it is institutions, not
individuals, that matter. Already intensely loyal to his new home, he says
the test of his performance will be 'what people think of the bank, not what
they think of me'.
But does the World Bank president, given his potential influence on
development issues, not have a special duty to speak out? He rejects the
argument. It is vital, he believes, for the bank to establish intellectual
leadership, but it does not matter if issues are articulated by him or by
other bank officials. What counts is how well the institution performs.
So far, he says, he has found little wrong with the bank's policies. But
'hate mail' from development lobbyists suggests the execution of policies
falls short of excellence. He hopes that tough management skills honed at J
P Morgan and an 'ability to delegate' will enable him to make improvements.
Bank officials have found the first few months of the Preston presidency
bracing. He started by axing an entire tier of senior management, releasing
around 240 staff for more productive roles. He has since turned his
attention to the bank's opaque internal budget. This is so confusing, he
says, that it is impossible to identify whether resources are misused. He is
certain, however, that there is 'a lot of fat here'.
The one policy that he has gone out of his way to endorse is poverty
alleviation. He says he is not making a rhetorical flourish when he
describes it as the bank's 'overarching objective'.
But should this be the main goal? After all, at an early stage of
development, poverty was the last thing to concern successful capitalist
economies such as the US. Should the bank not aim mainly at stimulating
growth?
Mr Preston is clearly uneasy at the ideological overtones of the question.
'I don't think the trickle-down theory is very satisfactory . . . You have
to have a social safety net in place for the most disadvantaged people.'
Without such policies, you are wasting money: 'Ad-justment programmes won't
work.' He hints that one of Mr Boris Yeltsin's initial problems was his
failure to understand that Russia does not have an adequate safety net.
Has the bank not been left behind in the former Soviet Union, where the
International Monetary Fund has established itself as the principal outside
adviser? No, says Mr Preston. The fund's lead role in the early stages
reflects its macroeconomic responsibilities. 'We've been working awfully
closely.'
The bank is cranking up to lend heavily. From the middle of 1994, it will be
lending Dollars 4bn-Dollars 5bn a year to the former Soviet republics.
Eastern Europe will be receiving a further Dollars 3bn. All told, the former
communist countries will get a quarter or more of all bank loans,
significantly changing the character of the institution.
Mr Preston concedes that the shift of resources - some of the bank's best
personnel as well as cash - is making its traditional Third World clients
nervous. But he says the timing of the collapse of communism was fortunate.
The bank was underlent and now has considerable headroom for extra lending.
Smiling broadly, he adds that the bank has anything but a shortage of
economists.
He does worry, however, that global competition for capital could adversely
affect the poorest countries. The bank is trying to drum up support for the
10th replenishment of the International Development Association, its soft
loan affiliate. If IDA 10 is to be as generous in real terms as the bank's
previous effort, it will have to raise about Dollars 18bn. But Mr Preston
believes significantly more money is needed, both to reflect the growing
number of potential recipients (which now include Vietnam and Cambodia) and
the expanding cost of measures to protect the environment.
One lesson the bank has taught him is that there is no conflict between
economic development and the environment. 'It is absolutely clear that they
are not in tension,' he says. A recent trip to southern Africa helped
convince him that the poor tend to suffer most from environmental
degradation.
But surely there must be a conflict at some level? Suppose everybody in
China drove a car. What would happen to carbon emissions or global warming?
Mr Preston hesitates. He knows his briefing papers must contain the answer.
But he does not remember it. Perhaps his experience in southern Africa was
too limited, he muses.
What about the future of the bank? With more than 5,000 mostly
Washington-based staff, is it not too big and remote? Could not some of its
functions be undertaken by the private sector? After all, two of the bank's
most senior officials have recently left to start up a private venture for
channelling risk capital to developing economies.
Mr Preston's thinking on such issues is at an early stage. 'We have no
monopoly on brains,' he concedes, 'although we sometimes seem to have a
monopoly on insensitivity.' He hints that there is nothing sacrosanct about
present arrangements: 'If anybody can deliver a service better than us, we
ought to be using them.' He also appears sympathetic to arguments for
greater decentralisation. 'My instincts are that we should have more people
in the field.'
He says the big change already well under way is the bank's metamorphosis
from a lending institution to a provider of advice. He is not embarrassed
that the bank's net transfers to many clients are declining as old loans are
repaid. This is happening 'all over Latin America' and is a sign of the
success of past programmes. He says people are wrong to think loans are the
only lever for influencing policy. At J P Morgan, he recalls, old clients
did not reject his advice just because they no longer needed his loans.
Looking ahead, he seems unruffled by the many problems confronting
policymakers. The industrial economies are in a shaky condition. The former
Soviet Union is in turmoil. Millions are starving in the Third World. Yet Mr
Preston's elegant, two-storey penthouse office is a haven of tranquillity.
The man seems as reassuring as his old furniture. You feel he will work
patiently for practical solutions to complex problems, untroubled by strong
ideological convictions.
The bank has fallen into a safe pair of hands. Mr Preston does not pretend
to be a development expert, an intellectual or an economist. But he appears
to have other, rarer virtues: steady nerves, sound judgment, and enough
confidence cheerfully to admit that he does not know all the answers.
The one danger is that his four private decades at J P Morgan have left him
not fully prepared for his role at the helm of a very public institution.
Given the scale of today's problems, the bank needs more than a capable
manager working on budgets behind the scenes. It needs somebody capable of
articulating a vision for development, of providing global leadership on
issues as controversial as the environment and the transition from
communism. Mr Preston has yet to rise to such challenges.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                        PERSONAL FILE
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1926 Born New York City. Served in Marine Corps before graduating from
Harvard College.
1951 Joined J P Morgan, the New York bank. Served clients in south
western US and later in the commodities industry.
1966 Head of J P Morgan's London office. Developed Eurocurrency
business, becoming executive vice-president, international banking, in
1968.
1976 Vice-chairman and director, J P Morgan.
1980-90 Chairman and chief executive, J P Morgan.
September 1991 President, World Bank.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11170</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Something to offer: Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
After a short burst of noises off, the French parliamentary establishment
looks ready to ratify the Maastricht Treaty on European Union without a
serious fight. For a moment the right-wing RPR Gaullists seemed set to throw
themselves into a wild nationalist war-dance, calling on their ancient gods
to confound President Francois Mitterrand's federalist schemes; but common
sense has now been restored.
At first Mr Jacques Chirac, leader of the Gaullists, had only seen the
Maastricht treaty as an archetypal weapon for attacking President
Mitterrand; curiously, he seems to have overlooked the fact that a
successful attack would be fatal for his own political ambitions. The defeat
of the Maastricht treaty would be a serious blow to Mr Mitterrand; but it
would also put paid to any prospect that he, Jacques Chirac, could be
elected president of the republic.
As a result, there is a tacit compromise, which will allow the treaty to go
through. But it has also cleared the ground for a much more important
debate, on the substantive purpose of the Maastricht treaty. President
Mitterrand is selling it as the guarantor of peace and stability in western
Europe; but the Socialists are now selling it as the engine of economic
growth.
The idea sounds banal: the Community has always been sold as the engine of
economic growth. The difference is that the French Socialists are now saying
that the member governments must together take active new steps to make the
Community into an engine of economic growth.
Ten days ago, Mr Pierre Beregovoy, prime minister, told the Senate that the
economic policies of the 12 'are not sufficiently co-ordinated'. He said he
had written to the presidents of the Commission and the Council, asking them
to take 'initiatives' to ensure that Europe become 'an accelerator of
growth'.
The new line was reinforced last Thursday by Mr Michel Rocard, former prime
minister and virtual candidate for the Socialist party in the next
presidential elections. In Le Monde, he urged support for the Maastricht
treaty, very largely because he believed the Community had the means to
become a zone of high growth.
'Most of the dramas and difficulties of the world come from the general
slowdown of economic growth,' he said. 'We shall not beat unemployment
except through significantly stronger growth. And significantly stronger
growth implies the intervention of a single and coherent public authority
over a large territory.
'I believe today that a true intellectual revolution is necessary to recover
the use of those rules which brought us continuously strong growth (in the
past), and which suppose the careful use of monetary, budgetary, customs,
regulatory and above all fiscal instruments.'
The new line is obviously political. The Socialists were hammered in the
recent regional elections, and they desperately need a message of hope to
counter the prospect of defeat in next year's legislative elections.
Unemployment is the main problem; but since the commitment to European
monetary union prevents an independent French economic policy, Europe must
have an economic policy instead.
The problem is that the Socialists' new line is in manifest conflict with
the thrust of the Maastricht treaty which they have just negotiated. Every
aspect of the programme for economic and monetary union (Emu) is
deflationary, from the high interest rates being imposed by the Bundesbank
to the compulsory cuts in national budget deficits; yet the Socialists are
effectively calling for collective economic reflation.
This is, in fact, the deal they thought they had bought: a hard monetary
policy run by the Bundesbank, but in the context of a European economic
policy run by the 12 governments. Unfortunately, the monetary and budgetary
deflation is already in place; but the European economic policy does not
start until 1999. If then.
Economists may say a European reflation is impossible; but after their
previous disasters, we need not be mesmerised by their latest certainties.
Remember that this is the tribe that sold us Bretton Woods, floating rates,
and fixed rates; Keynesianism, monetarism, and structural adjustment; each
time with the same supercilious self-sufficiency.
Some say there is no remedy apart from liberating labour and other markets;
but if this means a deliberate policy of greater insecurity and poverty for
the working class, forget it. The world has seen the results of 10 years of
Thatcherism, and it seems to have few takers among the conservative parties
on the Continent, none among the Socialists.
Only one thing is really impossible: that mainstream political parties
should admit to permanent impotence in the central business of government,
which is economic policy. Voters in the French regional elections fled both
the Socialists and the conservatives, because neither side offered any
solution to unemployment. If Emu means anything, it must mean a recovery
through pooled influence over economic policy. Credible political leaders
must have something to offer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11171</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / International Capital Markets: The coming fall in real rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY HARRIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE of the certainties in economics, to paraphrase Professor Paul Krugman,
is that what cannot be sustained will stop. (Professor Krugman, by the way,
is one of the very few economists who can be recommended as light reading.)
What has to adjust will adjust. The trick is to guess when and how we will
do it. Now apply that thought to real interest rates.
Real rates have been unusually high for some time now, and some forecasts
circulating seem to assume that this is the new normality; but in the long
run, it can't be. Existing private borrowers pay high real rates - high in
comparison with expected price increases in their own line of business -
because for the time being it looks preferable to bankruptcy. But this
simply deepens the hole they are in. Unless rates fall, or prices rise, they
will simply go broke later, as is becoming uncomfortably obvious at the
moment.
Governments can play ostrich rather longer. They cannot forever pay rates
that are higher than the real growth of the economy; that is the true
definition of the debt trap. For long periods, though, they can neglect the
problem; or they can get away with it through asset sales or by raising
taxes. While this goes on we remain trapped in our present situation, in
which private borrowers are crowded out of the market, simply refused credit
at any price. Government meanwhile wonders why the forecast recovery never
comes.
In the end, slow growth cuts revenues, the assets run out, while higher
taxes stifle real growth, and so further reduce the real rates which are
affordable. A vicious circle, in short. The adjustment will then come in one
or all of three ways: inflation, or default, or better policies. There are
no other possibilities.
Blank default is probably only conceivable in one or two countries which
have especially heavy public debt which is still growing faster than the
economy. In Italy, for example, there are already early signs of a buyers'
strike in the bond market. Inflation, which is what made the Italian deficit
system work for so long still looks likelier; the market is trying to
discount both possibilities.
British investors, watching foreign investors bid for our gilts, may feel
smug. But it is currently fashionable to compare the 1990s with the 1930s;
so it is worth remembering that in 1932 the British government invented a
half-respectable form of default, by calling in high-coupon gilts before
redemption date, and replacing them with 2 1/2 per cent stocks. This
once-in-a-generation trick might appeal to a future British government, if
it could hope thereafter to run a balanced budget.
Inflation, though, is rather likelier, and could happen even in a flat
economy as it did in the 1930s, through reduced competition. At that time it
was officially encouraged, with the Bank of England as the leading sponsor
of defensive cartels. Now we have creeping cartelisation - for example the
swap-shop now set up by ICI, which was a defensive creation of the 1930s -
and creeping protectionism.
This picture of the future may look a little far-fetched, but it looks like
the one the market is discounting. If bonds are risky in some sense, and
renewed inflation a strong possibility, then the high level of equities on
Wall Street, and indeed in London if you allow for thin dividend cover,
makes good sense. It is hardly the result that our authorities, including
the backward-looking disciplinarians in Paris and in the IMF, intend; they
think they are fighting inflation. It is, all the same, the kind of
adjustment which may have to happen if they remain obstinate.
Give them the benefit of some doubt, though, and the picture changes. If
they wake up to the fact that their squeeze is quite unnecessary in the
coming years of banking caution, and if continued stagnation makes the Fed's
example more attractive then they can let real rates fall sooner. Bonds are
a bull market, but recovery follows - as in the US - some way behind. Then
the yield gap closes, and bonds are the place to be. And British investors
are also offered an each-way possibility: indexed gilts should rise strongly
in any scenario short of official default. Place your bets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11172</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Goodyear results beat forecast
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GOODYEAR Tire &amp; Rubber, the sole surviving big US tyre-maker, has reported
strong first quarter results which exceed the company's earlier estimates.
Net income for the three months to March 31 was Dollars 66.3m, or 94 cents a
share, against a loss of Dollars 90.1m, or Dollars 1.54, a year earlier.
Last year's results included after-tax restructuring charges of Dollars
59.7m or Dollars 1.02 a share.
Sales for the quarter were Dollars 2.8bn compared with Dollars 2.5bn.
Earlier this month, Goodyear predicted first-quarter sales of about Dollars
2.7bn with net income reaching Dollars 60m to Dollars 65m.
Mr Stanley Gault, chairman, attributed the sales growth to increased
automotive industry production and higher sales of replacement tyres. He
said: 'Contributing to the continued earnings improvement were production
efficiencies resulting from higher utilisation of capacity and lower raw
material costs, both of which led to a decrease in the cost of goods sold as
a percentage of sales.'
Operating income from Goodyear's tyre business climbed to Dollars 186.6m
from Dollars 62.8m on sales that rose 11.6 per cent to Dollars 2.3bn. Unit
tyre sales rose 16 per cent in the quarter.
Goodyear's general products business had operating income of Dollars 52.9m,
up 60.3 per cent in the quarter, on sales that rose 5.9 per cent to Dollars
485.3m.
During the latest quarter, Goodyear narrowed its operating loss from its oil
transportation segment to Dollars 9.3m from Dollars 25.1m a year ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11173</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: SBC fails to match previous year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN RODGER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ZURICH
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWISS Bank Corporation said its after tax operating income 'did not quite
match 1991's excellent first quarter performance'.
No figures were revealed, but the bank, Switzerland's second largest, said
income from trading was 3.9 per cent lower and net interest earnings were
below last year's levels. On the other hand, it claimed, commission income
was up a substantial 16.4 per cent and income from the derivatives business
also grew.
The bank's total assets grew by SFr4bn (Dollars 2.6bn) since the beginning
of the year to SFr172.7bn, primarily as a result of currency movements. The
shift towards customer lending continued with interbank lending down 3.4 per
cent and customer lending up 4 per cent to SFr109.7bn.
Interbank deposits dropped by 5.1 per cent, or SFr2bn, while customer
deposits, mainly in demand and time deposits, rose 6.3 per cent.
Union Bank of Switzerland, Switzerland's largest, said its net profit in the
first quarter was higher than in the same period last year, with all
businesses except capital markets contributing. Also, the contribution from
foreign branches and subsidiaries to the consolidated result was slightly
weaker.
Bank Leu said this year's first quarter profits were satisfactory but did
not give figures. It said earnings from foreign exchange and precious metals
trading rose substantially, while interest earnings and commission income
increased slightly.
The bank, part of the CS Holding group, was unable to repeat the very good
result achieved in securities business in the first quarter of 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11174</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Cross border M&amp;A deals
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
BIDDER/INVESTOR      TARGET     SECTOR      VALUE              COMMENT
                                          (POUNDS)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Total (France) Petrogal (Portugal) Oil     518m              Portugal's
                                                        biggest privat-
                                                            isation yet
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Solvay (Belgium) Unit of Tenneco (US)Minerals  282m Strengthening No 1
                                                           position
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
ICI (UK)/Du Pont (US) Agreed Swap Acrylics/  250m        ICI continues
                                  nylon                   restructuring
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Philip Morris (US)   Tabak        Tobacco    118m        60% stake
                 (Czechoslovakia)                          approved
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Ivax Corp (US)   Waverley    Pharmaceuticals 22m        Continuing
               Pharmaceutical
                   (UK)                                 Euro expansion
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Cookson     Leach &amp; Garner (US) Industrial  10.1m     Leach puts
(UK)                             materials            outstanding 50%
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
IBM (US)   MT-Computers      Computers       n/a     Majority stake
           (Hungary)
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
International   Jameston       Platinum      n/a     SA becoming
Platinum        Exploration
(Canada)        (S Africa)    exploration             attractive
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Flexible
Ducting (UK)     Matzen &amp;
                 Timm            Ducting     n/a     Furthering
                (Germany)                            strategic
                                                     expansion
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Guoco Group Benchmark Bank (UK)   Banking
(Hong Kong)                                  n/a    Follows Hoare
                                                    Asia buy
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: FT Mergers + Acquisitions International
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11175</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: GPA share agreement in principle with Aer
Lingus
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GPA, the world's largest aircraft leasing company, has reached an agreement
in principle with Aer Lingus, one of its largest shareholders, over a
crucial feature of its controversial share flotation, scheduled for June.
Aer Lingus, the Irish airline, has agreed in principle to 'some degree of
lock-up' of shares, according to a company spokesman. The sale of new and
existing shares - which could value GPA at between Dollars 3bn and Dollars
4bn - cannot go ahead until a lock-up agreement, preventing existing
shareholders from selling more than an agreed amount during and after the
sale, has been reached.
Although the agreement in principle represents a step forward, details of
the amount of shares to be sold and the duration of the lock-up are still
under negotiation.
Aer Lingus wants to sell a large portion of its 9.9m shares, while GPA is
trying to limit the sale to between 5 per cent and 15 per cent of the
shareholding. Aer Lingus, like Air Canada, another large GPA shareholder, is
keen to sell its shares to help strengthen its own balance sheet.
Similarly, a number of Japanese banks are keen to shore up their capital by
selling their shares at an attractive price, following the recent declines
in the Japanese stock market.
Mr Tony Ryan, GPA chairman, said the group expects to announce a price range
for the shares next month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11176</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Burrowing on amid the financial gloom: Eurotunnel's growing
problems
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON and ANDREW TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROTUNNEL'S 220 banks are becoming inured to crisis, though they fear that
the channel tunnel company's latest financial problems are perhaps its most
serious.
The 19 leading lenders to the company, known as the instructing banks, were
given the grim details of Eurotunnel's financial plight by Sir Alastair
Morton, the company's chief executive, on Friday.
He reiterated that Eurotunnel was in breach of its banking covenants and
therefore needed their permission to continue drawing on its banking
facilities. The deadline for receiving that permission is in June, when
Eurotunnel will run out of cash.
Under its borrowing contracts, Eurotunnel needs agreement from 65 per cent
of banks as measured by the value of their loans. Bankers, led by four agent
banks - National Westminster and Midland from the UK, Credit Lyonnais and
Banque Nationale de Paris from France - say receiving that support is by no
means a foregone conclusion.
Many banks are feeling strapped for cash, given that so many companies are
running into financial difficulties when capital is in short supply. Bankers
say they expect Japanese banks, suffering from an acute shortage of capital
because of the fall in the Tokyo stock market, to be particularly difficult
to corral into allowing Eurotunnel to continue drawing on the facility.
Eurotunnel has credit facilities of around Pounds 8bn, but the main lending
facility from commercial banks is for Pounds 6.8bn (Dollars 12bn). Of this
commercial line, Eurotunnel has already drawn Pounds 4bn. Though some banks
may not wish to provide the remainder, bankers say that in the end they
probably will give permission in the form of a waiver of the breach of the
relevant banking covenant.
'With the tunnel just over a year from opening, it would be irrational to
stop the funding now,' said a leading banker.
Sir Alastair says he would not have had any doubts about getting permission
from the banks, were it not for a decision last month by an independent
disputes panel which tripled monthly progress payments made by Eurotunnel to
its contractors to Pounds 75m, starting from next Thursday.
The panel ruled that Eurotunnel should negotiate a new lump sum to cover the
increased cost of fitting out the rail tunnels and building two passenger
terminals at Folkestone in Kent and Sangatte, northern France.
It offered to fix a price if the two sides could not agree. Eurotunnel says
the panel has tilted a delicate balance of power in favour of the
contractors. It 'tossed a hand grenade' into the negotiations, said an
appalled Sir Alastair.
Eurotunnel on Thursday took the issue of increased progress payments and the
panel's request that it renegotiate a new global figure for this part of the
contract to independent arbitration by the International Chambers of
Commerce in Brussels.
Meanwhile, Eurotunnel has still to decide whether it will increase progress
payments. Transmanche Link (TML), the consortium of five British and five
French construction companies building the project, has said it will run
into cash-flow problems later this summer if payments are not increased. It
has threatened to halt work on parts of the project where payments are
insufficient to cover its costs.
On the issue of the final cost of constructing the terminals and fitting out
of the tunnels, the two sides are as far apart as ever. TML is claiming
about Pounds 1.5bn at 1985 prices for the lump sum contract which was
originally expected to cost Pounds 620m. Eurotunnel has offered to pay a sum
approaching Pounds 1bn, leaving a gap of about Pounds 500m.
Arbitration could take several years which would give Eurotunnel time to
finish construction and open the project before it might need to raise more
money from shareholders to to pay contractors - should arbitrators rule
against the group.
The uncertainty complicates an already difficult relationship with the
banks. Because of the late opening of the tunnel and the delays in running a
London-Paris passenger service, Eurotunnel was already in breach of its
covenants and therefore in need of a waiver. However, it did not believe it
would have any difficulty obtaining this waiver, until the ruling of the
disputes panel was released.
It would be devastating for Eurotunnel if TML were to win its claims. A TML
victory would represent a much more serious breach of its banking covenants,
because it would constitute a change to the construction contract.
Equally serious covenant breaches would arise from any further significant
delays in the opening dates or increases in interest rates, which seriously
diminished the company's cash flow and forced it to raise new money.
In those cases, Eurotunnel would require support from 90 per cent of its
banks by value to have continued access to funds. Sir Alastair believes it
would be impossible to win such a majority.
If there were such an apocalypse, the outlook for Eurotunnel as a company
would be uncertain. The banks could opt to keep the company in existence,
but control it more tightly. Or they could replace it with a vehicle of
their own, which would finish and operate the tunnel.
In either case, there would be only one certainty - Eurotunnel's shares
would be worth pennies or nothing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11177</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Pension funds
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
In light of the Maxwell affair, it is worth considering what the market can
expect by way of legislation affecting the UK pensions industry. The obvious
point to make is that a new Pensions Act is unlikely to repeat the impact of
changes 20 years ago in the US, when the introduction of prudence as an
investment principle led eventually to the expansion by pension funds into
overseas assets. UK funds are by comparison already well diversified by
assets and markets.
Tighter restrictions on self-investment apart, the main purpose of any new
UK rules will be not so much to influence where pension fund money is
invested as to limit the scope for Maxwell-style looting. Logically, that
means addressing such obscure areas as trust deeds and the safe custody of
assets, as well as the independence of fund managers.
These issues have already been worked over by a parliamentary committee. Its
recommendations, if implemented, would make occupational funds more secure.
Trustees would have better-defined responsibilities and fund managers would
have to separate investment activity from the safe custody of assets. The
question is whether such measures would be as costly as the fund management
community has argued. The answer is probably not. Nor is it clear that fund
managers would have a case for passing on extra costs to the clients the new
measures would be designed to protect. As the parallel debate on soft
commissions has shown, fund managers have been remarkably adept at keeping
cost savings for themselves.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11178</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Guinness
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
For the fundamental investor, one of the year's most curious revelations has
been that of Mr Warren Buffett's Dollars 265m purchase of Guinness shares.
'Guinness,' Mr Buffett observed last month, 'earns its money in much the
same way as Coca-Cola.' As it happens, Mr Buffett owns 7 per cent of
Coca-Cola. When he disclosed his stake three years ago, the shares were on
the same historic multiple of 17 which Guinness now enjoys. Coca-Cola's
multiple has since risen to 34. Is it conceivable that Guinness could go the
same way?
The criteria on which Mr Buffett invests are a matter of record. The
business should be simple, with a strong market position, proven management
and a history of consistent earnings growth. Guinness fits the description
admirably. The question is how far the market undervalues those qualities.
Coca-Cola and Gillette have outperformed the US market by 140 per cent and
80 per cent respectively since Mr Buffett bought into them three years ago.
But in the preceding three years, both shares had performed only modestly.
In the three years before the Guinness stake was disclosed, Guinness had
trebled against the London market. On that basis, Mr Buffett seems a little
late for the party.
But his record argues against dismissing him lightly. A case might be made
as follows. The top four spirits companies in the world - Guinness being the
largest - account for only around 15 per cent of world spirits consumption.
There are markets in the Far East, South America and Eastern Europe yet to
be fully exploited. Even in more developed markets, there is room for a
further shift to international brands. Much of Guinness's recent growth has
come from jacking up the price of Scotch. That is plainly a finite process;
but Scotch is by now only half the business in profit terms. While spirits
margins levelled out last year, margins in beer jumped from 12 per cent to
14 per cent. Plainly, Mr Buffett is right to value Guinness's management.
Perhaps the most important qualification is that Guinness shares, like those
of Coca-Cola, enjoyed their strongest run when the markets put the highest
value on growth combined with defensiveness. As pharmaceutical stocks on
both sides of the Atlantic have shown lately, the markets can change their
minds sharply about that when the business cycle starts to turn up. Then
again, stocks like Merck and Glaxo were on very demanding multiples. After
Guinness's own modest setback recently, its p/e ratio of 17 is just one
point above the average for the London market. Guinness seems unlikely to
prove one of Mr Buffett's star investments. He could be on to something just
the same.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11179</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The Lex Column: Banking on new capital
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It has become almost automatic for each downward lurch of the Japanese
equity market to prompt cries of alarm over the implications for
international bank credit. Since Japanese banks rely on unrealised equity
profits for part of their capital, they must in theory withdraw further from
international lending as share prices fall. But does this mean the rules on
bank capital drawn up by the Bank for International Settlements are
unnecessarily tight? And if so, should they be relaxed for everyone, or
should Japanese banks get special exemption till the market recovers?
The answer on all three counts is probably not. Banks in the UK, Germany and
Switzerland have the spare capital to pick up any slack in international
lending. So any worries about the availability of credit are not necessarily
due to the BIS requirements.
Nor is the immediate capital problem for Japanese banks that dire, as the
Ministry of Finance in Tokyo pointed out last week. Most can still raise
capital through issues of relatively inexpensive subordinated debt. Such
issues may not, however, exceed 50 per cent of core or so-called tier 1
capital. If either the stock market or the yen fell much further, the banks
could come against this limit. They would then have to raise new tier 1
capital through preference shares whose dividends have to be paid out of
taxed income.
The prospect of that expense might provoke a more rapid retreat from the
world arena. There would, however, still be little point in the finance
ministry softening the rules. It has no formal obligation to enforce them,
but credit rating agencies would certainly respond to exemptions by
downgrading Japanese institutions, pushing up their cost of funds. Overseas
authorities would in theory be entitled to refuse banking and securities
licences to Japanese banks which failed to meet the requirements. In short,
BIS requirements are likely to pose more problems for shareholders in
Japanese banks than for the world at large, especially since the slide in
domestic property prices has yet to be fully felt in their profit and loss
accounts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11180</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Italian politics left in turmoil as President Cossiga quits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ITALY'S political system has been thrown into disarray following the
resignation of Mr Francesco Cossiga as president.
Mr Cossiga's decision to step down, announced live on national television on
Saturday evening, increases the political uncertainties following the April
5 general election. The result delivered a sharp rebuff to the established
parties and caused further fragmentation of the already complex party
system.
The timing of Mr Cossiga's move now leaves the country in a political limbo
as the president normally would have been expected to nominate a premier to
assemble a new government.
Hence the first task for Mr Cossiga's successor, who must be elected within
15 days by members of the upper and lower houses of parliament as well as
regional representatives, will be to pick a prime minister.
The choice has become particularly complex in view of the fact that the
previous four-party coalition led by Mr Giulio Andreotti, who resigned on
Friday, will probably need the support of at least one other party to ensure
a stable majority in parliament.
Mr Cossiga said he had decided to resign just over two months before his
term formally expires in July because Italy now needed a strong president to
ensure the formation of a 'strong and authoritative' government.
In an emotional 45-minute address to the nation, he presented himself as a
lonely figure trying to force change on an ossified political establishment,
which had shown itself unwilling to read the signals for reform from the
general elections.
The problems faced in electing leaders for the Senate and Chamber of
Deputies, when members of the new parliament met for the first time last
week in Rome, illustrated how difficult finding a political majority has
become.
Mr Cossiga had threatened to resign more than once in recent months. He may
have been finally swayed by the election on Friday of Mr Oscar Luigi
Scalfaro as leader of the Chamber of Deputies and Mr Giovanni Spadolini as
leader of the Senate. Both men had opposed Mr Cossiga's calls for a stronger
presidency.
Mr Cossiga said the single European market, the crisis in state finances,
the need for economic recovery and the fight against organised crime were
the main challenges facing a new government.
Silent Cossiga, Page 2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11181</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Guerrilla chiefs head for Kabul
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFGHANISTAN'S new ruling council last night prepared to fly to Kabul, the
capital, today amid signs that guerrillas backing it had gained the upper
hand in fighting against mujahideen rivals.
Mr Sibghatullah Mojadidi, who has been charged with taking office at the
head of the 51-strong council, finally decided yesterday after a weekend of
fierce clashes that it was safe to head for Kabul from Peshawar, in
Pakistan. But by the time his party had arrived at the airport, in failing
light and deteriorating weather, it was too late to depart.
Mujahideen officials said Mr Mojadidi would leave this morning if the
situation in Kabul remained relatively calm.
Throughout yesterday Kabul echoed to the sound of automatic weapons and
artillery fire. Clashes erupted between forces loyal to Ahmed Shah Masood,
the Jamiat-i-Islami commander - who backs the new council  - and Gulbuddin
Hekmatyar's Hezb-i-Islam forces after Kabul fell to mujahideen fighters on
Saturday.
A Jamiat commander in the area of the Bala Hissar (old fort) said between 20
and 30 people had been killed there. The overall death toll was expected to
be much higher.
There was no telling last night whether Afghanistan would be plunged into a
fresh civil war after the end of the 13-year conflict between the Islamic
guerrillas and the communist regime.
Celebrations over a mujahideen victory turned to bloodshed as Pushtun
nationalists and Hezb guerrillas showed their determination to resist
domination of Kabul by non-Pushtun forces loyal to Mr Masood.
Mr Masood was appointed head of a six-man security committee by mujahideen
leaders in Peshawar on Saturday and given orders to secure the city. Three
of the other members were from his Jamiat party while two prominent Pushtuns
were also included. Pakistan yesterday supported the committee and new
ruling council.
Support by an overwhelming majority of the guerrilla groups as well as the
United Nations had given legitimacy to the council, Pakistan's foreign
ministry said.
Mr Mojadidi condemned the assault on Kabul by Mr Hekmatyar who ordered his
men into the city on Saturday after rejecting the council and the plan for
the transfer of power. Last night Hezb forces controlled key pockets of
Kabul, including the Ministry of the Interior.
Jamiat vehicles manned by heavily armed guerrillas patrolled the deserted
streets of the capital.
General Nabi Azimi, former head of the Kabul garrison who has been
co-operating with Mr Masood, called on the security forces to obey him. But
two other Pushtun nationalist generals - General Mohammad Rafi and General
Watangarn, the former minister of defence - were siding with the Hekmatyar
forces.
Reports and analysis, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11182</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Labour seeks order in leadership race
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH and DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SENIOR LABOUR party figures will seek to impose some order on the elements
of farce in the party's leadership contest by insisting at today's meeting
of Labour MPs that there will be no immediate change to the rules.
But the renewed claims about which of the candidates for leader and deputy
leader were on course to secure the necessary 55 signatures from Labour MPs
 -sparked by the weekend's confusion about the rules  - have fuelled the row
over demands that all candidates should be able to address their colleagues
before nominations close tomorrow.
The issue will come to a head at the same meeting, where the demands are
unlikely to be met.
Continuing disarray in the election process is dismaying Labour MPs who
believe it is damaging the party severely by highlighting ways in which
Labour is not fully democratic.
A letter, which was sent to candidates on Friday by Ms Joyce Gould, the
party's organisation director, suggested that if a first-choice candidate
did not secure enough nominations, the MP concerned could nominate a
second-choice candidate.
After consultations, which included Mr Neil Kinnock, the Labour leader, and
Mr Larry Whitty, general secretary, senior party officials said yesterday
that, in spite of what was in the letter, there had been no change to the
rules. An MP could change his or her mind about who to nominate at the last
minute, but could not send in two nominations.
In a television interview yesterday with Mr Brian Walden, Mr Bryan Gould, a
candidate for both the leadership and the deputy leadership, admitted that
his request for the rules to be clarified had prompted the letter. He
fiercely rejected the idea that this meant he had manipulated the rules and
insisted that he was confident of being nominated for both posts.
However, supporters of other contenders reacted angrily, saying the
clarification seemed intended to benefit Mr Gould.
Mr Ken Livingstone, the leadership candidate supported by the left-wing
Campaign Group, said there was 'clear evidence' that party officials and
perhaps some MPs had tried to influence which candidates would appear on the
ballot paper.
The general union TGWU is today expected to announce that it will conduct a
workplace ballot of its members to decide how to cast its vote.
However, the engineering union AEU reiterated its position yesterday that it
had no money left for a postal ballot and refused to countenance a workplace
ballot. The AEU's leadership strongly favours a looser link with the Labour
party and an end to the block vote.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 14
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11183</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Observer: Expensive taste
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Who said west German inflation was only 4.8 per cent? The cost of a fancy
ice cream cone - our correspondent's favourite is maple walnut - in
Frankfurt's Opernplatz, flanked by the mighty Deutsche Bank and the elegant
Opera House, is DM3 this season, a rise of 20 per cent on last year.
No wonder the poor old Bundesbank is losing track of the money supply and
strikes are in the air.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11184</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Observer: Guru relaunch
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The forecasting record of the City's economic gurus has been pretty terrible
of late, so now is as good a time as any for Dr Paul Neild to prove that he
has not lost his old touch. The man who was Extel's number one-rated
economic guru for 11 years until 1985 is joining County NatWest.
Observer's younger readers can be forgiven for wondering why anyone should
be bothered about Neild's return. After all, he has spent the last three
years in front of the TV cameras after a bad back cut short his job as head
of equities at Phillips &amp; Drew. Indeed, he won the Wincott broadcast
business journalist of the year award last week for his 'incisive yet
entertaining' reporting of the economic scene for Channel 4 news.
Admittedly, it has been seven years since Neild was P &amp; D's chief economist.
But in his heyday he was a bigger star than newcomers like Goldman Sachs'
Gavyn Davies, Roger Bootle of Greenwell Montagu, Tim Congdon of Lombard
Street Research, or P &amp; D's Bill Martin.
Although, Neild was incommunicado yesterday, County NatWest's Bob Semple was
overjoyed by his coup and said that it was another sign of the renewed
confidence in his firm. Given Neild's walk-on role in the Blue Arrow affair,
his arrival at County NatWest is the clearest sign to date that County is
prepared to put this unhappy episode behind it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11185</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Observer: Rounding up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A favourite quiz question for all who believe that corporatism has been
buried in the UK: which successful strike in the late 1980s was led by a
director of the Bank of England and a governor of the BBC?
The answer is the engineering hours dispute; the men in question, Gavin
Laird and Bill Jordan, respectively general secretary and president of the
Amalgamated Engineering Union.
But, in spite of their eminence, Laird and Jordan come well down the league
table of union bosses' pay. They will this week receive a 5 per cent pay
rise from the union's national conference, taking each man's salary to
Pounds 31,762. Only George Brumwell of the building union, Ucatt, does worse
in the top 10 unions' list, with Pounds 27,000.
At the top end is Alan Jinkinson of white-collar union Nalgo on Pounds
55,000, Ken Gill, left-wing leader of technical union MSF on Pounds 52,000,
and John Edmonds, leader of the GMB on Pounds 48,000. However, Laird and
Jordan might be due for a big pay rise: the engineering union is about to
merge with the electricians' union, the leader of which, Paul Gallagher, is
on nearly Pounds 40,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11186</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Observer: Happy ending
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
It all began when the parrot fell off its perch. Mrs X of Wales was very
upset when her pet parakeet passed away shortly after she bought a new gas
fire. Could it have been the fumes from the faulty equipment?
The Gas Consumers Council swung into action and Mrs X soon had a new gas
fire. But the drama did not stop there. British Gas 'asked her to dig up the
body, wrap it in a carrier bag and put it in the freezer until a post-mortem
could be carried out'.
Mrs X refused and told British Gas that if they wanted the body they should
come and 'dig it up themselves'. Although the cause of death of the bird was
never established, the annual report of the GCC proudly reports that Mrs X
accepted a cash settlement for the 'inconvenience caused'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11187</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Observer: End of a family affair
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
If Barclays' chairman, Sir John Quinton, has been told by his board of
directors to give up his job, then the episode is more than a little ironic.
He has done more than any of his predecessors to turn Barclays into a proper
business, rather than a family-run bank, yet here he is being replaced by
yet another member of one of the founding families.
Sir John is already notably older than his two predecessors were when they
stepped down. And while his time at the top has not been a great triumph, he
hasn't acquitted himself any worse than the likes of Sir Timothy Bevan or
Sir Anthony Tuke, the two previous chairmen, who got the job partly through
their family connections.
Indeed, Sir John's decision to step down from the board when he retires is
admirable. It enables the new chairman to get on with the job without being
second-guessed all the time by his predecessor. By contrast, when Sir John
took over the Barclays' chair in 1987, he had to face across the boardroom
table the two prior chairmen, the son of a previous chairman, plus three
other members of the founding families.
Apart from Sir John and Tom Fisher, another faithful retainer who kept the
seat warm while the younger family members went to war, Barclays' chairmen
have always been drawn from one of the founding families. There have been
three Tukes, two Bevans, two Goodeneoughs, and one Barclay. It now sounds as
if the Buxton end is going to be given a go.
It is hard to imagine any other multinational institution which draws its
chairmen from such a narrow family clique and with such consistency. It
would not be so bad if they owned a large chunk of the equity. But Sir
Timothy Bevan and Andrew Buxton, who make up the dwindling family presence
on the board, own far fewer shares in total than Sir John Quinton.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11188</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Lessons to be learnt in vocational training: Improving
skills at the workplace and in schools requires funds and flexibility, say
practitioners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS and LISA WOOD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
In the scramble to boost opting-out of schools and tighten up further on
trade union law, Mr John Patten and Mrs Gillian Shephard, the education and
employment secretaries, could lose sight of an urgent national priority:
high-quality training and vocational education.
Almost half of 16-year-olds currently leave full-time education; even the
most ambitious growth figures for the next decade still leave one-quarter
out of the system. In any case, for many of those that stay on, schools and
further education colleges, largely concerned with entry to higher
education, have little to offer. The 20 per cent A-level failure rate is
their grim statistical memorial.
Many of those going straight to work at 16 have fared little better. By
European standards, Britain's training regime is poor, with nothing
comparable to Germany's 'dual system' of work-plus-training.
The response of the last Thatcher government was to hand training over to
employer-led Training and Enterprise Councils (Tecs) while seeking to
improve work-related skills among pupils and young employees. Serious
problems are evident on both fronts.
On the schools front, two state-funded initiatives - 'Compacts' and the
Training and Vocational Education Initiative (TVEI) - have made a mark.
Sixty-two Compacts arrange agreements between employers and pupils under
which an employer undertakes to offer a job with training - or training
leading to a job - in return for the pupil performing to an agreed standard.
TVEI provides funding - about Pounds 20,000 per school - for secondary
schools to develop links with business and foster vocationally oriented
studies.
Schools are concerned that funding for both schemes - totalling Pounds 125m
in 1992-93 - is due to be withdrawn over the next few years. Some Compacts
face the prospect as soon as next April: by then they are supposed to have
gained sufficient private funding to sustain themselves, but few are likely
to have done so.
Improving links between the worlds of school and work is one thing: ensuring
that pupils leave school with - and/or subsequently secure  - vocational
qualifications another.
Last year's white paper on education and training gave prominent billing to
the latter. A single system of national vocational qualifications (NVQs)
covering 80 per cent of the workforce is to be accredited by the National
Council for Vocational Qualifications (NCVQ) by the end of this 'general
vocational qualifications' (GVQs) will be introduced, offering a vocational
route through the sixth form or further education colleges.
NCVQ and the three main providers of vocational qualifications - RSA, City
and Guilds and the Business and Technician Education Council (BTEC) - look
set to meet the deadlines. But the challenge to turn the results into a
successful vocational system remains considerable in three respects:
Parity of esteem. Will employers and universities treat NVQs and GVQs with
respect - or as second-rate courses for A-level 'drop-outs'? Much depends on
the quality of the new two-year GVQs - five varieties of which (for
business, manufacturing, art and design, health and social care, and leisure
and tourism) are to be piloted in 100 centres this year, and offered
generally next. There is widespread concern at the emphasis on the 'testing
competence' approach, and on the haste of their introduction. NCVQ is due to
review the pilots at the end of this year, when they will have been going
for only a matter of months. 'It could be the seven-year-old tests all over
again: chaos, followed by endless revisions,' says one insider.
Changing horses. Once the new qualifications are up and running, most state
funding will be tied to them alone. Tecs and Scotland's Local Enterprise
Companies (Lecs) will be virtually obliged to fund only NCVQ-approved
courses. It is vital, therefore, that the new structure 'takes off', for
whether it does or not the existing range of qualifications will be
drastically curtailed. Not all the omens are good: BTEC expects 270,000
first-year students this September, its highest number ever - yet some
employers are expressing disquiet at the content of new courses. Vocational
qualifications in schools. As yet only 137 schools offer the BTEC first
diploma (equivalent to GCSEs) and a mere 40 the National (equivalent to
A-levels).
Not until NVQs and GVQs are as common as A-levels in schools can the reforms
be judged a success. This is not just a matter of overcoming parental and
professional prejudice: schools will need fresh facilities, and extra staff
and training for existing teachers. None of this will come cheap.
Injecting NVQs into Youth Training (YT), the scheme for 16-19-year-olds, and
Employment Training, the programme for unemployed adults, is the
responsibility of the new Tecs.
The original targets set by Sir Norman Fowler, the architect of Tecs when
employment secretary, were ambitious - by 1996 more than 80 per cent of
16-19-years-olds were to have achieved an NVQ at level two, equivalent to
four GCSEs. Sir Norman's successor, Mr Michael Howard, revoked such targets.
The Confederation of British Industry has resurrected them, but only as
voluntary targets.
Tec funding for YT and ET is linked to a complex formula, which takes no
account of these voluntary targets. Many Tecs complain that their three-year
corporate plans, which included strategies for working towards the targets,
are ignored by government.
Instead the government, for a second year running, has cut in real terms
their budgets for YT and ET. Tecs, in turn, are cutting the amounts paid to
training providers. Training organisations, which include charitable
providers, claim many of them could be forced out of business.
Many Tec chairmen fear training and the acquisition of qualifications will
suffer seriously under the cuts. Mrs Gwynneth Flower, chief executive of
Central London Tec, says: 'There comes a time when cutting back on the price
must have an impact on the quality of training and the attainment of
qualifications. I believe we at Centec have got to that point now.'
Tecs argue that government must either increase funding or enhance their
flexibility in offering training programmes. According to Mr Peter Clarke,
chairman of North and Mid Cheshire Tec: 'Funding has now dried up, and if we
don't get fresh flexibilities we might as well pack up.' His Tec questions,
for instance, why adult training is tied into long-term unemployment and is
not available to individuals immediately after redundancy.
Mrs Shepard is unlikely to grant such flexibilities unless Tecs fight hard
for them. Whether G10, the group of chairmen which represents the Tec
movement to government, can fight hard remains to be seen. Mr Edward
Roberts, chairman of G10, says: 'Politicians should decide what they are
voting this money for ET and YT for. Is it to take people off the
unemployment register or to create a better pool of skilled labour?'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11189</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Flood pumps up fears of urban disintegration: The state of
America's infrastructure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When a quarter of a billion gallons flooded out of a damaged tunnel into the
basements of downtown Chicago recently - shutting down offices, department
stores and futures exchanges alike - many city managers held their breath.
Was this the latest, most devastating manifestation of the fissures opening
in America's ageing urban infrastructure - after the collapse of the Mianus
River Bridge on the Connecticut Turnpike that killed three motorists; after
the cracking concrete that forced the city of New York to shut down its
Williamsburg bridge in 1988; after the rupture of a 36-inch water main that
flooded four blocks of central Washington earlier this year?
For those who have long complained of the dwindling flow of federal money
for urban investment projects, the Chicago flood seemed an omen of potential
disasters in store for other cities, even though the particular
circumstances of the accident had little direct relevance to other cities.
'My judgment is that you can find in almost every major American city that
this (infrastructure) is close to crisis,' says Dr Robert Wood, a professor
at Wesleyan University and former secretary of housing and urban development
under President Lyndon Johnson.
But advocates of increased public investment have been crying wolf for a
long time now, and warnings tend to fall on deaf ears.
Total public spending on infrastructure in the US has declined steadily as a
proportion of gross national product, from 3.6 per cent in 1960 to 2.6 per
cent in the mid-1980s, according to statistics compiled by Apogee Research,
a Maryland organisation that specialises in the sector.
The effects of this decline in spending appear to show up in reviews of the
physical condition of existing infrastructure. The US government says 22.6
per cent of the nation's 576,508 bridges have structural deficiencies, and
in New York state the proportion rises to is 61 per cent.
Sewers built 80 or 100 years ago in east-coast and midwestern cities are
near or past the end of their normal life, while lead waterpipes need
replacement. Population growth has brought many roads to saturation point,
and heavier-than-expected traffic has shortened the life expectancy of the
road paving.
Looked at another way, however, the picture is less depressing. Over the
same 25-year span in which infrastructure spending has fallen in relation to
GNP, according to Apogee, annual infrastructure spending has increased by
more than 50 per cent in constant dollars, and has kept pace with population
growth, remaining remarkably steady at about Dollars 400 a head.
Mr Richard Mudge, Apogee's president, warns that engineering-based
assessments of the need for infrastructure investment, such as surveys of
structurally deficient bridges, can be misleading. 'It used to be in the
early 1980s that everybody who wanted to invest in infrastructure did needs
studies - they went out and counted potholes. But that misses the original
motivation for infrastructure investment, which they recognised in the 19th
century, which was that it is a vehicle for growth,' he says. 'Assessing
physical condition is important, but you must then step back and see whether
you need that road or that bridge.'
Mr Joseph Casazza, who has been public works commissioner for Boston since
1968, says he believes his city is doing reasonably well in keeping its
capital stock in shape. 'There's no question I have concerns, there's no
question the city is old, but I don't perceive a public safety problem where
we are going to have to close a bridge or something,' he says.
Boston's bridges, however, are Mr Casazza's biggest worry. 'A lot of them
are 85 years old, a lot have come to the time when they should be replaced,'
he says. One bridge, built in the days when the vessels passing underneath
were 60 feet wide, spans a 100-foot channel. Today, new vessels with double
hulls to guard against environmental disasters are 95 feet wide, and can
barely squeeze through.
Like other forms of public spending, however, investment in infrastructure
is suffering from a tight fiscal squeeze. The federal government, with an
expected deficit of Dollars 400bn this year, has cut back on its grants to
states.
The states themselves have almost all faced their own fiscal crises in the
last two years, and are passing on to their cities a smaller portion of the
money they receive from the federal government. 'In the last couple of
years, states have done a lot of temporary budget cuts. There is now a
realisation that we have a fairly long-run structural fiscal problem,' says
Mr Raymond Scheppach, executive director of the National Governors'
Association.
This fiscal strait-jacket is unlikely to be loosened in the near or medium
term. City managers know that they will have to continue to survive on
limited budgets. As Boston's Mr Cassaza says: 'When it's a public safety
issue, you don't have meetings and write memos, you just go out and fix it,
and somehow you find the money.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11190</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Arts: The Thieving Magpie - Opera North/Leeds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Opera North celebrate the Rossini bicentenary with the new production of a
work especially dear to all Rossinians. La gazza ladra, a semiseria opera,
is pastoral in convention, radical in approach to that convention. In its
treatment of a historical case of social injustice - a servant-girl
condemned to death for stealing cutlery actually filched by a tame magpie -
it moves with unflinching steadiness from innocent domestic comedy to dark
tragedy.
The opera is not the less powerfully affecting for adhering to the intimate
confines of the semiseria tradition. On its own it should have put paid to
the durable 'lazy Rossini' calumny once and for all. But like all
masterpieces of art whose innovations are concealed beneath a supposedly
familiar surface, it poses particular problems of reception for those who
come to it with their Rossini notions fixed entirely by The Barber.
Structurally, it is a 'big' achievement for a semiseria - amply developed
and scored (as befits a work written for La Scala), requiring patient
unfolding, delicate characterisation, singing at once emotionally expressive
and freely virtuosic, and a producer's ability to phase the movement toward
tragedy. For all these reasons, La gazza ladra is given far less often than
it deserves: this production is the first in Britain since ENO's of 1978.
Gratitude to the company is therefore unfettered - but not blind. Opening
night did not, I feel, entirely rise to the occasion. That may well happen
during the run; on Friday the throat infections of two leading singers,
Andrew Shore as the villainous Mayor and Matthew Best as the heroine's
much-tried father, must surely have left their mark.
Already the ensemble virtues of the production, by Martin Duncan in Sue
Blane's designs, and the sensitive qualities of Ivor Bolton's conducting
were much in evidence. Jeremy Sams's new translation is crisply singable,
with characteristically felicitous touches. The sepia-tinted cut-out scenery
and use of footlights manifest both 'period' sensibility and quick,
intelligent modern stagecraft. All the roles are aptly acted; in a
marvellously rounded portrayal of Victorian values in action - which
includes, of course, the sexual harassment of servant-girls - Mr Shore
proved the evening's star in spite of vocal vagaries.
But during the evening I came to sense slightly less complete trust in the
work's inherent vitality than I expect from an Opera North show. Damagingly
heavy cuts have been made to the score. The production opens with comically
dancing servant-folk and closes with an ill-advised infusion of late 20th
century psychodrama: the heroine Ninetta, fatally undone (in Mr Duncan's
eyes) by her trials, goes bonkers during the opera's final strains of
happy-ever-after music. Good 'political' insight, bad production idea.
In between, certain episodes were handled with superb economy. What was
missing on Friday was an overall security of tone - and, to be tactlessly
frank, a sufficiently vigorous display of Rossini singing skills. Banishing
the memory of Della Jones's 1978 ENO Ninetta, I still found Anne Dawson
lacking in attack, sharpness of delineation, forwardness of tone. Her
characterisation, so seriously and gracefully undertaken, can be deemed
'English' in both the good and less good connotations of the epithet.
Ditto the gentle, musicianly Pippo (one of opera's great pants parts) of
Elizabeth McCormack, and too many smaller roles undersung; Arwel Huw
Morgan's ripe Fabrizio is an honourable exception. The Giannetto of Barry
Banks, an excellent high tenor, is particularly ill served by the cuts. On
Friday the promise of the show was never fully realised. But subsequent
performances may well tell a different tale - and the opera itself is a
wonder.
Leeds Grand Theatre; in repertory until May 9, then on tour to Nottingham,
Manchester, Leeds and Sheffield
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11191</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Arts: Five hundred years of careful growth - Architecture
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By COLIN AMERY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The college of the Blessed Virgin Mary, St. John the Evangelist and the
Glorious Virgin St. Radegund is better known as Jesus College, Cambridge.
When the college was founded in 1496 by John Alcock, Bishop of Ely, he took
over the convent buildings, including the priory church which was begun in
1150. Jesus College is fortunate in having a site that is extremely spacious
 -the five courts are surrounded by generous gardens and playing fields.
Large trees add to the park-like atmosphere and there is a homogeneity about
the mainly brick buildings, although the college's architectural history is
long and complex.
The first glimpse of the college from Jesus Lane is an intriguing one -
trees seen over old brick walls, the square tower of the chapel looking
almost like a parish church, and then the slender opening that leads to the
narrow entrance path, known as 'the chimney'. This is the main pedestrian
approach, usually lined with abandoned bicycles, ending at the Tudor
gatehouse.
It is one of the simplest and best gatehouses in Cambridge, dating from
around 1500 and looking at its most romantic when the college flag is flying
from the battlemented top.
Once a visitor has passed through the gatehouse into first court, one of the
architectural conventions of the college is immediately apparent  - the
three-sided court: first court, second court, chapel court, and north court
are all open on one side. This makes the college seem fluidly connected to
its parkland and gardens and adds an intensity to the experience of the
fully enclosed, four-sided cloister court. The north side of the original
cloister was the refectory of the convent and is now the college hall. There
are some fine Early English gothic arches that remain in the cloister from
the original Chapter House.
The simple brick three-storey ranges typify the Jesus style and different
architects at different periods have added buildings in a careful and
coherent way. Alfred Waterhouse (of Manchester Town Hall, the Natural
History Museum and the Prudential in London's Holborn) added the north range
of the second court in 1870 and managed to be disciplined by the convention
of low-key brick walls, adding only a slight touch of flamboyance with an
asymmetrical tower and spire. In the 1920's and 1930s the architect Morley
Horder added connected ranges around the southern end of the chapel court.
Horder (1870-1944) is an almost forgotten contemporary of Sir Edwin Lutyens,
who is best known for his traditional country houses, particularly in the
Cotswolds and Dorset. He was renowned for his Bohemian appearance and for
designing a modest house for Lloyd George, but he should be re-examined as
he was a master of materials and built, like Lutyens, at a time when English
craftsmanship was still practised and taught. He also built Westcott House
in Cambridge and the National Institute of Agricultural Botany - an exercise
in the Wren manner. His substantial group of stone Italian Renaissance
buildings for the University of Nottingham are his best known works.
In the 1960s the college added a large new court by the Cambridge architect
David Roberts, with student rooms arranged on an echeleon plan to maximise
sunlight. It is in a different tradition from the rest of the college and
only its distance from the older buildings renders it acceptable.
Recently the college announced that it planned to build a new court to
commemorate the quincentenary in 1996 of its foundation. The site was
selected to the south of the Morley Horder neo-Tudor buildings on what is
now a car park and part of the Master's garden.
The college, advised by the architect Fellow, Nicholas Ray, prepared a
master plan and embarked on the delicate procedure of choosing an architect.
A committee of twelve, chaired by the Master, Lord Renfrew, considered 30 or
so firms and reached a shortlist of eight. Great care was taken, and the
eight firms were interviewed in their offices. Then selected buildings by
four of the original eight firms were visited and finally two were chosen to
prepare sketch proposals for the development.
Selecting an architect is a difficult business and the college procedure
seems to have been exemplary. The two firms finally chosen to compete were
Edward Cullinan and Partners and Evans and Shalev. Interestingly, the two
were briefed together and then paid a reasonable sum to prepare schemes that
had to be presented to the college and the whole fellowship. There was a
clear majority of Fellows in favour of the Evans and Shalev scheme.
Evans and Shalev are now best known for their law courts at Truro (winner of
the Financial Times Architecture Award) - a fine contemporary building that
is very sensitive to the townscape and context of Truro. They also won the
competition to design the Tate Gallery in Cornwall that is under
construction on a sensitive and important site in St. Ives. Their scheme for
Jesus College is first class and promises to add a very distinguished new
court to the college.
It deals with the difficulties of the historic context in a sensitive way.
The designers have sensed the architectural atmosphere of the college and
followed the language of well-proportioned windows in substantial brick
walls which are trimmed in real stone. There are pitched roofs behind
parapets that align in height with the rest of the college. These architects
understand appropriateness - designing what is fitting for the context but
with a strong character of its own.
There are three phases of the proposed development: firstly a new college
library and computing centre, secondly some 60 residential rooms, and
thirdly an auditorium to seat 200 with associated music teaching rooms.
Limited funds at present have meant that the architects have had to produce
designs that allow for a phased development and also for the unlikely
possibility that some phases may never be built.
The library will be built first. It has a formality and dignity that suits
its purpose as well as subtle and potentially beautiful lighting effects
from the unusual windows and vaulted ceiling. The circular top-lit stair is
reminiscent of the similar space at Truro, where it is a great success.
As the college has gone to such trouble to find good architects who have
prepared a sensitive and effective design for a difficult site, it is much
to be hoped that benefactions will soon be found to build the entire new
court to as high a standard as possible. What better way of marking five
hundred years of careful college growth on this beautiful Cambridge site?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11192</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Arts: White Woman Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MALCOLM RUTHERFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Bush and the Irish have done it again. Sebastian Barry's White Woman
Street is little more than talk, but it goes down very well on the tiny Bush
stage that always manages to look bigger than it is.
The setting is Ohio 1910 and, Barry being an Irish playwright, it is of
course Easter. White Woman Street is the name of a town where there was once
the only white whore for 500 miles around. Legend has it that she was
revered like a saint; the Indian whores were not a patch on her and it was
said that sailors preferred to lie with a dolphin rather than touch the
Indian women.
Trooper O'Hara visited the white woman some 20 years ago only to find an
Indian in her place. It is widely believed that he murdered the Indian,
although we learn later that she was a virgin who slit her own throat.
Trooper (Jim Norton) is now on his way back to the town with a bunch of
fellow drifters. They are also going to rob a train.
Nothing much happens. The men talk, sleep and do a rather effective mime of
riding across the Ohio landscape - a striking set designed by Kendra
Ullyart. There are a mixed bunch, as big a racial mix as you can get in a
quintet, including a black, a Russian whose mother was Chinese, and Blakely,
the Englishman who came from Grimsby. Trooper himself came from Sligo. The
only other character is the fairly westernised Red Indian barman.
As an exercise in anti-climax, the build-up to the train robbery is
cunningly done. We do not see it take place and are left to assume that the
robbers have been fought off. Trooper emerges blood-stained, and dies
thinking of Ireland. That is about it.
The satisfaction is in the dialogue and the playing. Barry establishes a
remarkable camaraderie between the diverse drifters. It is sentimental, as
when talking about memories of Easter, but not displeasing. It shows wildly
different people co-existing together and putting up with each other's
moods. George Irving's Blakely perhaps stands out, but you can admire the
group as a whole. The play is directed by Caroline FitzGerald, who
specialises in Irish work. It is no more, and no less, than a good Irish
tale.
Bush Theatre, London W12, (081) 743 3388. Moves to Peacock Theatre, Dublin,
May 21
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11193</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Management: An opportunity not to be missed - The campaign
to promote women is slowly starting to deliver the goods
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARY BOGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When Opportunity 2000 was launched last October, some people scoffed, saying
that this new campaign to help working women was mere window dressing.
Others applauded, arguing that it proved employers had at last accepted that
women faced problems at work, and had decided it would be in their best
interests to do something about it.
John Major, who launched the scheme with such razzamatazz six months ago
tomorrow, may feel he has done his bit by picking two women for his new
cabinet. But what have the 61 companies who joined the scheme achieved?
The Financial Times has interviewed more than a quarter of the campaign
members, chosen at random, to discover whether they are living up to the
promises they made in October. The interviews reveal a great variety of
approach, but suggest equal opportunities is being taken increasingly
seriously.
Very broadly, the companies divide into two groups. In the first are
organisations which have already done a great deal for their female
employees. The foundations for cultural change have been in place for some
time: over the last six months, these companies have been developing,
extending and adding to existing policies. This group includes the Wellcome
Foundation, the Metropolitan Police, BT, J Sainsbury, Barclays Bank, British
Rail, IBM and Littlewoods.
The second group have had more fundamental work to do in building their
policies. These companies include Digital, Rank Xerox, Lucas, Grand
Metropolitan, ICI, the National Health Service, Glaxo and British Airways.
All of this second group have looked at their existing equal opportunities
policies and decided to go back to basics. This has meant devising new
strategies, establishing where women are in their organisations and
discovering what impedes their progress. It has also meant making sure that
line managers are committed to cultural change, and setting up monitoring
systems to track results.
Digital, for example, has put in place an Opportunity 2000 steering team
whose first job is to understand where the barriers to women lie. Rank Xerox
has introduced a new, 'positive' equal opportunities policy, developed with
the help of employees. It is currently building equal opportunities into
performance and business appraisal. ICI, meanwhile, has been developing a
monitoring system to track the changes in the female workforce by function,
grade and division.
At Lucas and GrandMet, the most important area of work has been to make sure
that middle managers are commited to change. Both are taking great care to
impress the business reasons for change on their managers; GrandMet is
organising awareness workshops for its top 250 managers worldwide.
A quite different line has been taken by another decentralised, global
company, Glaxo. Equal opportunity is one of Glaxo's corporate values, but it
is left to each business, acting in 'enlightened self-interest', to
implement it. The problem is that change is not consistent throughout the
group, and some parts have proved slow on the up-take. Glaxo has therefore
decided to monitor the initiatives centrally to see if a more co-ordinated
approach might be better.
Meanwhile, all the companies interviewed have been working on policies to
break down the barriers to recruitment and promotion of women, and to make
it easier for them - and for some men  - to combine a career with a family.
In the first category, BT is examining ways of training women to increase
their chances of becoming managers. British Rail is setting new recruitment
targets to increase the number of women in a male-dominated company;
Barclays is reviewing its selection of high-flying employees, and women's
access to training generally. GrandMet is insisting that headhunters include
the name of at least one high-calibre woman on all short-lists.
As for career and family, all companies interviewed have tried to address
the issue, with many introducing or extending flexible working arrangements.
Most companies see this as the most economical answer to the childcare
issue. At British Airways, flexible working makes it easier to serve
customers outside the normal nine-to-five day, while ICI reports pleasing
results from job-sharing, saying it has made its workers more committed and
has been cost effective.
Flexible working seems to be what women themselves want, as it keeps up
their confidence and skills. A number of companies have started offering
career breaks to part-timers and Rank Xerox guarantees part-time work to
women returning from maternity leave.
Littlewoods is the only company with firm plans to open a workplace nursery
while Barclays is offering a 'responsibility break' allowing men and women
caring for sick, old or disabled people to take up to six months off work.
It is also trying to upgrade the status of part-time work, by giving its
part-timers the same benefits - on a pro rata basis - as full-time
employees.
The very existance of these changes does not prove that Opportunity 2000 is
working. Indeed companies could simply be making changes to their policies
that they would have made anyway.
But all those interviewed said the campaign had given a new focus to their
plans and increased their awareness of the issues. Those directly
responsible for equal opportunities said the campaign had made their jobs
easier, helping them get through to the board and line management.
Most companies also thought the campaign had helped develop a more strategic
approach and had taught them more about best practice in other
organisations.
A few went further and pointed to the beginnings of cultural change in their
companies. ICI, for example, said men who turned down overseas jobs for
family reasons were no longer ridiculed, while Lucas said women were
becoming more assertive in asking for the working arrangements they wanted.
BT says that women are slowly stopping behaving like surrogate men.
These are early days for Opportunity 2000. Although the first signs are
encouraging, it will be some time before the long-term success can be
measured. One test will be whether the women themselves feel more valued. So
far, only a few companies are planning to measure their policies this way.
The second test is in the numbers - how many women are actually making it to
more senior jobs?
To measure this, many campaign members are relying on existing monitoring
mechanisms. However, the problem with monitoring is that it will only tell
you if there are, say, more female middle managers in finance. It will not
say whether the increase is good, bad or indifferent.
A better approach, adopted by seven of the organisations interviewed -
including the NHS, British Airways and Littlewoods - is to estimate in
advance the degree of progress. These companies argue that such goals are
important for bringing about, as well as measuring, change.
Other companies fear that employees may mistake goals or estimates for
quotas. GrandMet, ICI and Digital say that goals are irrelevant in a
recession, as recruitment has come to a standstill. However a further group
of companies is considering setting goals for the future.
Whether the companies set goals for internal use, most Opportunity 2000
members are presenting a vague face to the public. Most of the goal
statements issued at the launch lacked rigour and detail.
It seems that companies may be ready to start changing their policy. Whether
they are ready to do so under full public scrutiny is another matter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11194</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Port prepares for flotation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL TERRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Port of Tilbury, privatised six weeks ago in a Pounds 32m management and
employee buy-out, has announced plans to move to a stock exchange listing in
five years.
Mr John McNab, the chief executive, said the port expected to have repaid by
then the Pounds 20m lent by National Westminster Bank towards the purchase
from the Port of London Authority.
He said the port would concentrate on developing cargo feeder traffic with
Continental deep-sea ports, building up its growing European cruise business
and redeveloping excess land for a maritime business park.
The port's prospects would be significantly strengthened, he said, by the
freeport status it expected to secure from Customs and Excise this summer,
allowing businesses to defer payments of VAT and customs duty on cargo
brought into the port. Liverpool is the only other UK maritime freeport.
Of the Pounds 32m payment for the port, Pounds 11.9m was jointly invested by
the port's management and the venture capitalist, Schroder Ventures.
Next month the port's 900 employees will be invited to purchase further
shares worth a total of Pounds 1.15m. Last week they were each given 135
ordinary shares free.
In the three years since the abolition of the Dock Labour Scheme, Tilbury
has moved from losses of Pounds 4.1m to a profit of Pounds 2.2m this year.
Since 1989 the port has invested more than Pounds 11m in capital projects.
Cargo volumes for 1991 totalled 5.9m tonnes. Mr McNab told a gathering of
customers and port employees that the port expected to double its cargo
handling capability to 15m tonnes by the year 2022.
Michael Terry edits European Freight Management, a Financial Times
newsletter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11195</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Plants give clue to preservation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CAMBRIDGE scientist claims to have discovered a means of preserving food
and medicines by mimicking the ability of some plants to survive years of
drought.
Mr Bruce Roser found that drought-resistant plants owed their abilities to a
molecule called trehalose. Experiments showed that adding trehalose to a
range of compounds enabled them to be dried out completely and then restored
at will.
Trehalose works by maintaining the shape of molecules and preventing damage
after their water content is removed, Mr Roser said. 'It embalms them like
amber traps insects.'
Quadrant, a company that he set up to develop his findings commercially, is
negotiating with two Japanese food companies.
Mr Roser and his colleagues also claim to have discovered the gene that
instructs cells to produce trehalose naturally, opening the prospect of
creating new varieties of drought-proof wheat and other types of crop.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11196</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Executive pay rises attacked
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE British Institute of Management has criticised executives after a survey
found that directors of big businesses awarded themselves pay rises
averaging 9.3 per cent last year.
The institute survey, published today, found that employees received rises
of about 8 per cent while middle managers were awarded about 6.3 per cent.
Mr Roger Young, BIM director general, said directors of large companies
should heed the example of managers. 'They must take a long hard look at
their remuneration packages and ask themselves if their increases are
justified.' He added: 'Now we are in recession they must be seen to be
tightening their belts along with everyone else.'
He warned that directors who continued to reward themselves far more than
their employees would 'have to answer for it'. He said: 'The politics of
envy will ensure that increases in taxation will greatly reduce their real
earnings.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11197</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Exports seen to rally in spite of strong currency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DANIEL GREEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UK EXPORTS will rise strongly this year in spite of high interest rates and
the strength of sterling, a report published today by Oxford Economic
Forecasting, a private-sector research body, says.
The group outlines three forecasts: low growth, in which consumers continue
to save at the present rate; high growth, with a sharp swing from saving to
spending; and a central case, which it prefers.
That, it says, would see growth consistent with government predictions. UK
gross domestic product should rise by 1 per cent this year.
The report argues that, with the election past, the government's priority is
the strength of the recovery rather than its timing.
There is therefore no need to cut interest rates quickly. Although that
keeps sterling strong, it need not damage exports because labour costs
should stay competitive over the next few years. With world trade rising,
exports should grow by 4 per cent both this year and next.
A National Westminster Bank report at the weekend said the government had
room for only a  1/2 -percentage-point cut in rates. Further reductions
depended on German rates.
The Oxford group's report tempers its confident tone by warning that
consumers might continue to cut their debts for the next two or three years.
Exporters in tourism, banking and other contributors to invisible earnings
are confident that sales will grow this year. A survey of 80 exporters by AT
Kearney, the management consultancy, found more than two thirds expecting an
improvement in 1992. The Continentis the main market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11198</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Semiconductors sense a scramble: As hopes of an end to
recession start to brighten, economic barometers show mixed climate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE semiconductors market, a barometer of economic activity, is showing such
strong signs of a pick-up in demand that it may experience a shortage of
supplies by the end of the year, according to leading semiconductor
manufacturers.
In growing numbers, manufacturers in the UK report a strong surge in orders
in the first quarter of this year. In some cases, they are seeing extended
lead times as customers place product orders in advance.
'We have now come to the bottom of the semiconductor cycle,' says Mr Raymond
Ambrose, manager of marketing development and research at SGS-Thomson
Microelectronics in the UK. 'Recovery is under way and we are looking at 5
per cent to 10 per cent growth rates this year.'
The growing demand has been driven largely by new applications in the
computer, telecommunications and automotive sectors.
Demand for semiconductors in the computer, or data-processing, sector has
been driven by notebook computers and workstations rather than personal
computers, says Mr Ken Sanders, managing director of Texas Instruments.
The US company has also seen a steady improvement in demand since about
November, and the trend has continued into this year. In the first quarter,
Texas Instruments' net revenue from UK businesses, of which semiconductors
comprise about 60 per cent, has been the highest since the early 1980s,
according to Mr Sanders.
In the telecommunications industry, demand is fuelled by growth in mobile
communications. In the automotive sector, it is due to the consistent
increase in the application of electronics in cars.
Motorola, the US group that has enjoyed two separate months of record
bookings and billings this year, believes there is 'a genuine increase in
demand'.
The rise is strong enough to support about 10 per cent growth in 1992, which
it considers significant, as the market was basically flat last year.
NEC, the Japanese group, said that if its first-quarter UK revenue were
annualised, it would show a better result than in 1988, when the
semiconductor industry was at the top of its last high growth cycle.
The Electronic Components Industry Federation expects the automotive sector
to show the strongest growth in semiconductor demand at 28 per cent this
year and overtake the military sector in terms of the value of semiconductor
sales.
Most manufacturers say that if the increase seen in the first quarter
persists, the industry might soon see another year of high growth, repeating
its historical boom-and-bust pattern. 'I fully expect that we will go into
another boom situation,' Mr Ambrose says.
It will be a welcome break for the industry, which has seen demand and
prices plummet in the past few years.
The federation estimates that the sales value of semiconductors in the UK
grew by just 0.8 per cent to Pounds 1.23bn last year from Pounds 1.22bn
after a decline in the previous year of 5 per cent from Pounds 1.28bn.
After the past lean years, however, As demand picks up increasingly later in
the year, the market could very well experience constraints in supply. Faced
with persistent sagging demand and collapsed prices, manufacturers have
refrained from investing in new capacity. Supply constraints are beginning
to appear in some areas. 'By the end of this year we could begin to see a
bit of a scramble,' Mr Ambrose says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11199</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Patient makes slow progress: As hopes of an end to recession
start to brighten, economic barometers show mixed climate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BATTERED UK economy, like a hospital patient coming round from major
surgery, appears to be heading for recovery. But the first steps are proving
painfully slow.
In a signal that the recession, which started about mid 1990, might be
nearing an end, a Gallup survey at the end of last week showed consumer
confidence sharply higher since the election.
Sectors such as TV advertising, recruitment and housing show signs of life,
while over Easter many retailers reported buoyant sales.
In the past month, several surveys of business opinion have indicated
increased optimism - a message likely to be echoed tomorrow when the
Confederation of British Industry publishes its quarterly report on
prospects for manufacturers.
Few people in business, however, predict a quick end to the country's
longest recession since the 1930s.
Mr Peter Clappison, finance director of the BBA automotive parts group,
said: 'We are seeing greater optimism, but very little (in terms of extra UK
orders) is coming through the door.'
Mr Cameron McLatchie, chairman and chief executive of British Polythene
Industries, Europe's biggest maker of polyethylene film for agriculture,
construction and retailing, said the order profile from customers remained
'flat'.
Several industry representatives said, however, they had seen signs of
increased economic activity in recent weeks, some of it possibly helped by
the removal of political uncertainty after the election.
Mr David Powis, director of the British Forging Industry Association, which
represents 100 companies in areas such as cars, aerospace and mining
equipment, said: 'Over the past four to six weeks, member companies have
been reporting greater levels of customer inquiries.'
Mr Jim Winship, director of the Pizza and Pasta Association, which has 700
members in the food industry and catering, said: 'Companies are behaving as
though a recovery is going to happen, for instance by stepping up marketing
support for their products and services.'
Mr Ian McColl, finance director at plastic pipe and industrial equipment
maker Victaulic, said: 'The telephone is ringing more often. Since the
election our customers seem to have done more to crystallise their plans.'
As for the business exhibitions industry, which depends on a range of
companies spread across manufacturing and services, prospects are brighter.
Mr Bill Richards, of the Exhibition Industry Federation, said: 'A year ago
our members were moaning about the recession. Now they are finding customers
are actually confirming plans for future events.'
The harsh business climate has benefited one group of companies - insolvency
practitioners. Even in that area, though, it is possible to find signs that
the recession may be drawing to a close.
Mr Peter Phillips, a partner in Buchler Phillips, a leading insolvency
practice, said many of the companies being put into liquidation were the
result of bankers 'clearing out intolerable debts in favour of more exciting
projects'.
He added: 'We have been through the biggest boom in insolvencies for 30
years. But I feel the worst in terms of the state of the economy is behind
us.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11200</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Tecs pressure Shephard on training policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT must decide whether its training priority for young people is
guaranteeing a place to everybody or offering quality training, Mrs Gillian
Shephard, the new employment secretary, has been told by the leaders of
training and enterprise councils.
G10, the group of Tec chairmen that represents the movement to the
government, made clear at its first meeting with Mrs Shephard that it wanted
to change its relationship with the government.
Before the general election, relations between Tecs and the Department of
Employment were soured after heated negotiations over funding for 1992-93.
The government has reduced funding for many of the programmes operated by
Tecs, including Youth Training and Employment Training, the scheme for
unemployed adults.
Tecs - not all of which have yet settled their budgets  - are obliged to
guarantee a training place to all young people who want one. This year many
are claiming that the quality of training will suffer because of the cuts.
Many fear they will be unable to guarantee training places to all young
people. Tecs want more freedom to tailor programmes at a local level.
According to a confidential memo of the meeting with Mrs Shephard, held 10
days ago, G10 said Tecs wanted to influence policy. It told Mrs Shephard
that the strength of Tecs was developing effective local initiatives.
G10 said the government should fund Investors in People, the Tec-operated
scheme to improve training for people in work. At present, Tecs have no
specific funds for the project. It is understood they want about Pounds 20m
to fund the plan.
The memo said the meeting was cordial. Mrs Shephard 'warmly endorsed' the
Tec concept and said she hoped they would be 're-invigorated'.
Lessons to be learnt, Page 13
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11201</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Growth in staffing targets for women
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARY BOGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH companies are starting to set targets for the number of women being
hired and promoted within their organisations, as part of a general move to
improve the lot of women at work.
The finding came from interviews conducted by the Financial Times with
companies participating in Opportunity 2000, the campaign designed to help
working women, which was lauched six months ago tomorrow by Mr John Major,
the prime minister.
More than 60 organisations signed up to the initiative in October and a
further 350 contacted Business in the Community, the voluntary organisation
behind the campaign, in the first month.
The issue of numerical targets for the employment and promotion of women has
been been controversial among employers, and split the launch committee of
Opportunity 2000.
Many companies fear numerical targets might be seen as tantamount to quotas.
They argue that that would imply positive discrimination and might lead to
the 'male backlash' seen in the US.
Of the 16 large organisations interviewed, seven have introduced targets and
a further six could not rule out introducing them in the future. British
Airways, British Rail, IBM, Lucas, Littlewoods, the National Health Service
and Rank Xerox already had, or planned to have, some form of numerical
goals.
The six that said they would consider such a step if existing policies did
not increase the numbers of women in management included Wellcome
Foundation, Barclays Bank, Digital, Grand Metropolitan and ICI.
ICI and GrandMet said it was not appropriate to bring in targets at the
moment because of the recession.
The companies that put targets in place argued that they were essential if
the companies were to ensure that their equal-opportunities policies
succeeded.
All companies in the initiative have taken some action to improve the lot of
women since they signed up. The male-dominated Metropolitan Police pointed
to a growing acceptance of equal-opportunities policies. Superintendent
Peter Brandt, the Met's former head of equal opportunities, said: 'Officers
today have wives and daughters with professional careers so they understand
the issues better.'
Some companies, including BR, GrandMet, Rank Xerox and Barclays Bank,
expressed concern that Opportunity 2000 might lead employees to think
women's interests were being pursued over those of the disabled or ethnic
groups.
Management, Page 10
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11202</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / TUC wants oil rig safety consultation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OFFSHORE OIL and gas operators should be required to consult employee
representatives when preparing safety measures, the Trades Union Congress
says in a submission today.
Under new Health and Safety Commission proposals - which follow the
recommendations of the Cullen report into the Piper Alpha disaster in 1988
in which 167 men died - operators will have to prepare detailed safety cases
setting out how they would deal with all issues related to health and
safety. Each safety case will have to be accepted by the Health and Safety
Executive.
In a memorandum to the executive, the TUC said it welcomed the proposed
framework for 'one of the most hazardous working environments'. But it said
those at the sharp end of industrial risk should have the opportunity to
have an influence on safety measures. About 150 survivors and relatives
attended the opening of a memorial to the victims of Piper Alpha yesterday.
A 2.5-metre high pink granite stone was unveiled in Strathclyde Park, near
Glasgow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11203</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / TGWU to present shake-up plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TGWU general union will tomorrow announce the biggest shake-up in its
history as it attempts to overcome a deep organisational and financial
crisis.
Mr Bill Morris, general secretary of the TGWU, Britain's largest union, will
announce the first findings of a management consultancy report by Klein &amp;
Co, the US-based union consultants, which is likely to recommend cutting
some of the 11 regions and reducing their financial and political autonomy.
The union's right wing, which has its power base in the regions, is ready to
accept the phasing-out of the smaller regions - probably the south coast,
east coast and north-east, all of which have fewer than 50,000 members. It
may, however, resist the challenge to the financial powers of the regions
that would come from centralising the payment of union dues.
Klein is also expected to recommend reducing the 14 trade groups, making
better use of the union's computers and introducing proper budgets and
financial planning. Some of those points may emerge at a later stage in the
consultancy exercise.
The central drive of the changes will be to roll back some of the legacy of
decentralisation left by Mr Frank Cousins and Mr Jack Jones, leaders in the
1960s and 1970s, who reacted against the centralised, authoritarian regime
of the 1940s and 1950s.
Mr Morris, who is backed by the dominant broad-left faction on the union
executive, wants to bring in the changes without reviving the political
in-fighting for which the union is well known. He will need to take further
tough rationalisation decisions - on top of the recent increase in union
dues - if the TGWU is to start breaking even.
The union expects to raise nearly Pounds 1m a month from the 18 per cent
increase in dues agreed in February.
But some TGWU officials say privately that the financial crisis is even
worse than the published estimates have so far revealed.
The union suffered a Pounds 10m deficit last year. Before the rise in
contributions, a deficit of Pounds 11.6m had been expected for this year.
Planned savings of Pounds 5m this year from rationalisation and job cuts
will thus have to go ahead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11204</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Five contestants in the race to be Commons referee
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Peter Brooke
Age: 58
Constituency: City of London
The Northern Ireland secretary until the election is seen as the Tory front
runner. He is admired for his wit, patience and courtesy but some Tories
have said they would not support him because they think the office of
Speaker should not go to someone so fresh out of the cabinet.
Paul Channon
Age 56
Constituency: Southend West
The former cabinet minister - he left office in 1989 after an unhappy time
as trade secretary and then transport secretary - has stayed in the Commons
to become a senior backbencher. His 30 years' service at Westminster may
attract some Tories but he seems the outside candidate.
Terence Higgins
Age: 64
Constituency: Worthing
The chairman of the all-party Treasury committee and of the liaison
committee of committee chairmen, he is the senior figure of the select
committee system set up in 1979. He has demonstrated his independence of
government, but some colleagues favour a less dry personality.
Sir Giles Shaw
Age: 60
Constituency: Pudsey
A popular former middle-rank minister and on the 1922 executive. He has
particular support from the 'knights of the shires'. He has served as a
chairman of committees considering legislation but he may be too much a Tory
establishment figure to attract opposition support.
Betty Boothroyd
Age: 62
Constituency: W Bromwich
The only Labour candidate has attracted praise as a deputy speaker for
humour and warmth: she responded 'call me madam' when asked how she should
be addressed. Some MPs favour electing the first woman to the office but
most Tories may want to retain it for one of their own.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11205</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / European puts itself on course for full recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN THE late Mr Robert Maxwell wanted to influence the direction of The
European he simply picked up the telephone - frequently.
On one occasion, Mr Maxwell even broke into an office after deciding he
should become editor-in-chief and direct operations himself.
The new proprietors of the international weekly newspaper, Mr David Barclay
and his brother Frederick, who own ships and hotels, do things differently.
Whenever they think it is time for a discussion about strategy or the future
of the venture, they invite Mr Charles Garside, the editor, and Mr Alan
Chamberlain, the managing director, for a good lunch in a top hotel in Monte
Carlo, where they live.
No picture of the Barclay brothers has appeared in The European. They still
have not set foot in the paper's office in London and may never do so.
Mr Garside, who at the beginning of January was not only editor but the only
employee of the paper, said: 'They read the paper from cover to cover and
they have been delighted with the way the paper has been progressing.'
Next month there will be small but sure signs of progress. The European will
bring back Elan as a separate third section covering everything from arts to
lifestyle, and start promoting the title again.
Last week the paper took on 18 people, half of them journalists, to add to a
staff of 50.
Circulation is believed to be starting to pick up and is between 150,000 and
200,000. The official circulation figure for the last six months of 1991 was
167,000.
Mr Garside said: 'We gave an immediate guarantee that we were selling over
150,000 on the day we took over. We are doing better than that but it will
be our policy to let the ABC (official circulation figures) speak for
themselves.'
He will not be drawn on how the paper is doing financially. Observers
believe that before the threat of closure the paper was losing about Pounds
1m a month and is unlikely to be losing more than Pounds 1m to Pounds 2m a
year now.
Mr Chamberlain, who has worked for the publicity-shy Barclays for about 10
years, said: 'It's the most exciting job I have ever had. We are serious
players and we are running a business. People are starting to feel
comfortable dealing with us.'
Mr Garside, remembering Mr Maxwell, who always promised editors freedom and
could never keep his hands off, said editorial independence is not only what
he was promised but what he actually got from the quiet brothers in Monte
Carlo.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11206</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Call for study of gas market change
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Michael Heseltine, the trade and Industry secretary, is being urged by
gas consumers to launch an investigation into recent changes in the gas
market.
The Gas Consumers Council, which represents the UK's 17m gas users, says in
its annual report today that it believes proposals by the Office of Fair
Trading (OFT) for restructuring British Gas and creating more competition in
gas supply might mean higher prices.
The reforms were agreed after a long row between British Gas and the OFT.
They compel British Gas to cut its share of the industrial gas market by 50
per cent within three years and allow other gas suppliers to use its
pipelines.
The consumers council report warns that there is a limited amount of gas in
the UK market and more competition might force the price of this gas higher.
Sir James McKinnon, the director-general of Ofgas, the industry's watchdog,
said both domestic and industrial consumers would benefit from competition.
Industrial consumers that were buying from suppliers other than British Gas
were very satisfied and had seen price cuts of between 7 per cent and 9 per
cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11207</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Local authorities head for first clash with Howard
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOCAL AUTHORITIES are heading for their first clash with Mr Michael Howard,
the environment secretary, over a government decision which they say will
cost councils at least Pounds 60m in the current financial year, and Pounds
100m in 1993-94.
Mr Jeremy Beecham, chairman of the Labour-controlled Association of
Metropolitan Authorities, has written to Mr Howard seeking an urgent meeting
about plans to pay councils a lump sum for certain loan charges from the
start of October, instead of continuing with specific grants.
The Department of the Environment has consistently assured local authorities
that the commutation of the specific loan charge grants for some housing and
urban-programme spending into a lump sum would be financially neutral
overall.
Councils, however, argue that because the distribution of the grant is not
based on the debt charges actually faced, there are significant differences
between the amounts of grant some authorities will lose, and the charges
they will continue to face. For Manchester, for example, the change is
expected to mean an extra budgetary requirement of more than Pounds 1m in
1992-93. They are also concerned that the method of interest-rate
calculation disadvantages many councils.
Councillors warn that in the current year the sums might almost certainly be
found only by cuts in areas such as education and social services.
To try to avoid service cuts, the AMA will urge the government to relax the
'minium revenue provision' rules, which ensure that councils set aside a
certain amount each year for debt repayment, in order to bridge the gap
between the amount of grant lost and the loan charges they will face.
Local government officials were incensed that while councils are acutely
conscious of government limits on their budgets, civil servants played down
the issue at one meeting, saying it added only another couple of pounds to
poll-tax levels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11208</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / MPs face many voices in vote for Speaker
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE House of Commons faces the prospect today of the first contested
election for its Speaker, who presides over Commons proceedings, for more
than 40 years, as it became clear that Miss Betty Boothroyd, Labour's
candidate, will be proposed by Mr John Biffen, a former Tory cabinet
minister.
The arrangements when MPs meet this afternoon, under the chairmanship of Sir
Edward Heath, the 'father of the House' - the MP with the longest continuous
service - may tax even those who remember the last contest in 1951. Then
there were only two candidates, while this time there may be four Tory
candidates as well as Miss Boothroyd.
Many Tories believe that if the Tory field is split, Miss Boothroyd is
certain to win, possibly leading some Tories who favour other candidates to
support the first Conservative proposed.
As a result, some Tories believe there should be a change in the rules set
out in Erskine May, Westminster's procedural 'bible', to make the contest
less dependent on the first nomination. Erskine May says that once one
candidate has been proposed and seconded, then the debate proceeds to a vote
only if another candidate is put forward in an amendment. Whether the
original or alternative candidate wins further candidates can then be put
forward in a series of 'knockout' votes, in each of which MPs choose between
two.
The proposed change, which stands little chance of being accepted, would
mean that the first vote is simply on whether Miss Boothroyd should be
Speaker. Only if she were rejected would the Tory vote have to be divided
between individual candidates.
The process of successive divisions is so drawn-out that in the event MPs
may not wish to follow such a procedure through to the end, and may settle
on one candidate at an early stage if he or she seems likely to prevail
overall.
In an uncontested election, the proposer and seconder of the Speaker
conventionally come from opposite sides of the Commons, but there is some
doubt about which of the Tory candidates would get cross-party backing if
Miss Boothroyd is in the running. Miss Boothroyd's supporters say she has
the support of up to 15 Tory MPs.
The Speakership has conventionally been in the gift of the largest party,
but the question is one MPs can decide for themselves and there is no 'party
line'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11209</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Call to keep tax help for home sales: Pressure to extend
'holiday' for stamp duty on housing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT is coming under pressure to extend the 'holiday' from stamp
duty for most house purchases unless there is a clear and sustained revival
in the housing market.
Some Tory backbenchers have already said privately that they believe the
government would have great difficulty in re-imposing the previous stamp
duty arrangements, and there have also been representations from the
construction and housing industry.
The decision to lift the point at which the 1 per cent levy becomes payable,
from Pounds 30,000 to Pounds 250,000, was announced in December as part of
the government's measures to help home owners. It is due to run out in mid
August.
Ministers will be determined to reserve their position until it becomes
clear whether or not the housing market has recovered on the back of the
measures already taken and on the renewed confidence in the wake of the
election.
The government does not intend to abolish stamp duty on house purchases and
puts some faith in the idea that the impact of the change will have most
effect only as the August 19 deadline approaches.
Ministers will also argue that further cuts in interest rates, when they can
prudently be made, will have more impact on the market than the future of
stamp duty.
The continuing political sensitivity of housing was demonstrated by the fact
that representatives of the construction industry have already had an
introductory meeting with Mr Michael Howard, the new environment secretary.
Since the election, some estate agents have expressed confidence in a rise
in house purchases, but there has been more caution about predicting a
sustained recovery. Instead, they have drawn attention to the position last
year, when there was an improvement immediately after the Gulf war but sales
fell sharply as summer approached.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11210</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Ulster talks set to reopen this week
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ATTEMPTS to resolve Northern Ireland's political future by 'round table'
talks are expected to resume this week after getting the go-ahead from
British and Irish ministers at a meeting in London today.
The negotiations between Unionist and nationalist leaders that collapsed in
July may reopen on Wednesday, possibly leading to devolved government for
the province.
Sir Patrick Mayhew, Northern Ireland secretary, will meet Mr David Andrews,
Irish foreign minister, today for an Anglo-Irish conference meeting under
the 1985 Anglo-Irish Agreement. They are expected to agree a three-month gap
before the next meeting, so satisfying the Unionist demand for the
conferences to be suspended during negotiations.
The Northern Ireland Office is committed to giving the talks the best
chance. Officials and politicians realise however that difficulties over
apparently minor procedural points wrecked the initiative last time.
The first 'strand' of talks, chaired by Sir Patrick, would be on the
internal government of the province.
The second strand would be on relations between Northern Ireland and the
Irish Republic and become the point at which Dublin entered the talks. Last
time there were lengthy disputes over the location of the second strand and
over who should chair it.
Sir Ninian Stephen, a former governor-general of Australia who eventually
emerged as an acceptable independent chairman, is available again.
It is uncertain whether Unionist leaders will allow the talks to proceed to
strand two at the speed that is preferred by the nationalists.
The third, and final, strand would be on relations between the UK and
Ireland and might lead to a replacement for the 1985 agreement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11211</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Poll tax leaves legacy of debt
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BETHAN HUTTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE POLL TAX has entered its final year, but its legacy of debt collection
looks set for a long life.
Mr Martin Pilgrim, of the Labour-controlled Association of Metropolitan
Authorities, said: 'The last bills have just gone out, but we reckon we will
be collecting it until the end of the century.'
Arrears vary around the country from less than 5 per cent to almost 40 per
cent.
Some local authorities have come up with novel ways of speeding up
collection. Brent Council in north London pays for a monthly four-page
newspaper supplement. It publishes lists of people against whom liability
orders have been granted, to embarrass them into paying. The most recent
issue offered a 5 per cent discount on the full charge of Pounds 271 if
people paid up by April 14.
'We had people queueing up outside the town hall,' said a council official.
The non-payment issue is particularly severe in Scotland, where the tax was
introduced a year before it was in England and Wales. At the end of last
month, Strathclyde Regional Council had 38 per cent of its total Pounds
375.5m billed for 1991-92 outstanding, in spite of an advertising campaign.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11212</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Third world stresses aid need
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DEVELOPING countries yesterday urged the industrialised countries not to
forget them in the developed world's discussions of aid for eastern Europe
and the republics of the former Soviet Union.
Ministers of the Group of 24 (G24) developing countries, meeting in
Washington yesterday before the spring gatherings of the International
Monetary Fund and World Bank, welcomed the plan spelt out by their
counterparts in the Group of Seven (G7) leading industrial countries to
provide Dollars 24bn of aid for Russia.
'The transfer of resources to these countries should be additional to - not
at the expense of - the developing countries,' said Mr Alhaji Abubakar
Alhaji, finance minister of Nigeria and chairman of the G24 committee.
He said industrial countries so far had committed themselves to keeping up
their aid to the developing world. 'But it is our duty to continue to remind
them of this responsibility and this need because our problems continue to
deteriorate,' he added.
The G24 communique also called on the IMF to intensify its surveillance of
the economic and trade policies of the main industrial countries. The
ministers said they noted 'with the greatest concern' the fiscal and current
account deficits of the industrialised countries.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11213</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Doubt over Russia's IFC entry
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EARLY Russian membership of the International Finance Corp (IFC), the World
Bank affiliate charged with promoting private-sector investment, has been
thrown into doubt by problems in the US administration, writes Peter Norman
in Washington.
Russia and the other 14 former Soviet republics have completed the
formalities to become members of the International Monetary Fund and the
World Bank. But the US has so far not given the go-ahead to a limited
increase in the capital of the IFC that would allow Russia and other
republics to join the affiliate.
Russia and the republics will be able to join the World Bank as it had
sufficient unallocated shares to give Russia a 2.92 per cent of World Bank
capital and the former Soviet republics, including Russia, 5.25 per cent.
The IFC, however, only had about half the number of unissued shares required
to make the former Soviet states into members with the same shareholdings as
in the World Bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11214</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World Bank sets out plan to aid republics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE World Bank yesterday set out an ambitious two-stage plan for helping the
former Soviet republics, involving annual loan commitments of up to Dollars
5bn (Pounds 2.86bn) within two years.
The bank, which is holding its spring meetings with the International
Monetary Fund in Washington this week, said it was not a supplier of
'short-term money' and would be supporting the republics 'for the long
haul'.
The first stage, for the 12 months starting this June, would involve Dollars
2.5bn in loans to finance essential imports. The focus would then switch to
loans to support radical reform of the oil and agriculture sectors.
By the middle of 1994 the bank expected to be lending Dollars 4.5bn-Dollars
5bn a year to the former Soviet Union. About half of its planned lending is
earmarked for Russia.
Mr Wilfried Thalwitz, vice-president for Europe and central Asia, said the
immediate problem was a 'tremendous compression of imports'. Russia's
capacity to import had declined by about 40 per cent, delivering a heavy
blow to domestic industry.
The bank would spend Dollars 2.5bn on a 'general import rehabilitation
operation'.
A second generation of loans would address structural problems in the oil
and agricultural sectors. In the oil industry the priority was to establish
a pricing, tax and legal structure that would lead to both a revival of
domestic production and foreign investment by western oil companies.
In agriculture the pay-off would be less rapid. The priority was to reduce
enormous wastage and loss of grain by 'restructuring the entire agricultural
chain'. Changes in relative prices were need to encourage production and
efficiency.
The bank was also looking at road, telecommunications and environmental
projects, including cleaning up the Ural Sea.
Oil gave Russia the capacity to 'get out of its present predicament
relatively quickly'. But the outlook for the poorer republics was bleaker.
Russia was running a Dollars 20bn trade surplus with the rest of the former
Soviet Union. The other republics would not be able to pay for this scale of
imports, putting further pressure on their economies.
Mr Thalwitz said the bank was convinced the main republics were 'dead
serious' about reform. The bank would provide support for the long haul and
the capital it injected would not be short-term money.
Tremendous risks, however, lay ahead. A much-needed reallocation of labour
in industry was hampered by the lack of a social safety net for the
unemployed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11215</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Renewed impetus for farm trade deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BANDAI KOGEN, JAPAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN Community and US farm trade negotiators are to intensify efforts to
reach a compromise on farm trade liberalisation, officials said yesterday at
the end of a summit in Japan of trade ministers.
Failure to reach a deal on the issue has blocked for more than 15 months the
Uruguay Round of talks on world trade reform, jeopardising free trade and
slowing recovery from recession in many economies.
The stimulus for a fresh initiative comes from a meeting in Washington last
week of President George Bush of the US and Mr Jacques Delors, president of
the EC commission.
Expectations of a breakthrough did not materialise but 'new ideas' from the
EC - which included an offer to come closer to the 24 per cent cut in the
volume of the Community's subsidised farm exports being demanded in the
Uruguay Round - appear to have raised hopes.
Mr Hugo Paeman, a senior EC trade negotiator, is to contact Mr Jules Katz,
his US counterpart, on Wednesday to arrange a schedule of working-level
meetings.
Officials at the weekend summit of trade ministers from Japan, the US, the
EC and Canada, at the Japanese mountain resort of Bandai Kogen, talked of a
compromise being reached 'in several weeks, rather than months'.
One EC spokesman insisted: 'The problem is not at the working level, but at
the political level.' However, he confirmed an early conclusion was the
target. 'If we have not got agreement by the time of the Group of Seven
summit in Munich in July, we can forget about an agreement for this year and
perhaps for ever.'
Japan had hoped the Bandai Kogen summit would take place after the Uruguay
Round negotiations had been completed. Set in Fukushima prefecture, the
childhood home of Mr Kozo Watanabe, Japan's trade minister, it was intended
to be '75 per cent pleasure and 25 per cent work'.
The pleasure principle was not wholly abandoned but the fact that the
meeting followed so swiftly the Washington meeting of Mr Bush and Mr Delors
prompted Japanese and Canadian officials to press their EC and US
counterparts for comprehensive briefings on the outcome of the summit.
'Encouraged' by reported headway in Washington, Mr Watanabe then pressed for
a resumption of bilateral talks in the Geneva headquarters of Gatt on tariff
cuts and liberalisation of trade in services.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11216</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Optimists predict little progress for poorest countries
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDWARD BALLS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WORLD BANK cannot be faulted for its optimism. Over the past few years
it has been preaching a new message: a combination of debt relief, trade
liberalisation and less interventionist government can together revive the
economic prospects of the developing countries. Many of these countries have
acted on the bank's advice. So far the developed world has done little more
than listen politely.
Undaunted, the World Bank's latest economic forecasts assume that both
developed and developing countries act on its recommendations. The results,
published recently in this year's Global Economic Prospects and the
Developing Countries report, are moderately pleasing. The average annual
economic growth rate of low- and middle-income countries is expected to rise
to 4.9 per cent in the 1990s, up from 3.2 per cent over the past decade. The
east Asian countries are expected to have slower growth, though their recent
performance has been exceptional.
At first sight these conclusions may seem rather odd. The developed world is
the main market for developing country exports, purchasing 75 per cent of
their manufacturing exports. But the growth prospects for the industrialised
countries look increasingly discouraging. Moreover, exports to the developed
world are likely to be the main source of resources to finance new domestic
investment. Net resource flows to the developing world fell in the 1980s,
and the chances of a fall in real interest rates and a spurt of new lending
look remote.
So why should the bank be predicting faster economic growth? One reason is
that it expects a successful conclusion to the Uruguay Round of trade
negotiations. It estimates that a 50 per cent fall in non-tariff barriers
would raise developing country exports by dollars 50bn (pounds 28.2bn),
almost equal to the total net flow of official development assistance in
1991. But the bank's confidence in the Gatt process may be misplaced.
Developing country imports constitute only 3.1 per cent of the total
consumption of the main developed countries. But the percentage of these
imports covered by non-tariff barriers has grown in the past 10 years.
If liberalisation rather than protectionism does prevail, the immediate
gains will be unevenly shared. More than half the extra exports would accrue
to east Asian countries. But the long-term impact could spread much wider.
The link between growth in exports and in gross domestic product is strong,
as the chart shows. Further liberalisation might encourage more governments
to pursue the free-trade and market-friendly policies that have boosted
growth in east Asia in recent decades. While the developing country share of
labour-intensive manufactures doubled between 1965 and 1989, this increase
was entirely due to the rise of east Asian economies. But other developing
countries, in Latin America and more recently India, are now following their
example.
Yet the World Bank report contains little good cheer for sub-Saharan Africa,
where the majority of low-income countries are located. Weak and corrupt
governments and the throttling burden of accumulated debts mean that most
sub-Saharan countries have made little progress to date in liberalising
their economies and upgrading the education and skills of their population.
Instead, they remain highly dependent on primary commodity exports -
manufacturing exports constitute only 19 per cent of total exports, against
69 per cent in east Asia. Those structural adjustment efforts that have been
attempted, notably in Nigeria, have effectively ground to a halt; while
creditor governments remain unwilling to agree to the Trinidad proposals for
low-income country debt reduction.
The World Bank expects the world's poorest countries merely to tread water
over the next decade. Even if its relatively optimistic expectations are
correct, GDP growth across Africa is barely expected to keep pace with
population growth. Poverty will remain as entrenched as ever. If the bank is
wrong, then real incomes per head will continue to fall.
INTERNATIONAL ECONOMIC INDICATORS: PRODUCTION AND EMPLOYMENT
Yearly data for retail sales volume and industrial production plus all
data for the vacancy rate indicator are in index form with 1985=100.
Quarterly and monthly data for retail sales and industrial production
show the percentage change over the corresponding period in the
previous year, and are positive unless otherwise stated. The
unemployment rate is shown as a percentage of the total labour force.
Figures for the composite leading indicator are end-period values.
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                      UNITED STATES
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 Retail            Unemp-  Vacancy  Composite
                 sales  Industrial loyment  rate    leading
                 volume production rate   indicator indicator
1985             100.0   100.0      7.1      100.0     103.0
1986             105.7   101.0      6.9       98.0     108.2
1987             108.3   105.9      6.1      105.5     110.0
1988             112.2   111.6      5.4      106.1     114.4
1989             114.7   114.5      5.2       99.3     113.4
1990             114.2   115.7      5.4       84.5     109.3
1991             112.0   113.5      6.6       61.9     114.8
1st qtr. 1991      -3.9    -2.3      6.4       64.5     111.1
2nd qtr. 1991      -1.6    -2.8      6.7       63.0     112.3
3rd qtr. 1991      -1.4    -2.1      6.7       60.9     112.8
4th qtr. 1991      -0.5    -0.5      6.9       59.1     114.8
1st qtr. 1992               1.0      7.1
March 1991        -2.1    -3.6      6.8       63.1     111.1
April             -2.1    -3.0      6.5       62.8     111.3
May               -1.1    -2.7      6.8       62.4     111.9
June              -1.7    -2.5      6.9       63.7     112.3
July              -1.2    -2.1      6.7       61.1     112.3
August            -1.8    -2.3      6.7       60.6     112.4
September         -1.2    -2.0      6.6       60.9     112.8
October           -0.8    -1.4      6.7       58.4     113.3
November          -1.3    -0.2      6.8       59.1     114.1
December           0.5     0.2      7.0       59.8     114.8
January 1992       4.9    -0.2      7.0       56.3     115.5
February           3.9     1.1      7.2       59.0     116.4
March                      2.1      7.2
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                     JAPAN
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 Retail            Unemp-  Vacancy  Composite
                 sales  Industrial loyment  rate    leading
                 volume production rate   indicator indicator
1985             100.0   100.0     2.6     100.0     96.7
1986             106.5    99.7     2.8      94.3    105.4
1987             113.8   103.1     2.8     108.3    115.4
1988             122.8   112.9     2.5     135.9    123.0
1989             132.8   119.9     2.2     147.0    126.7
1990             142.0   125.3     2.1     149.7    124.7
1991             145.0   128.0     2.1     144.5    123.7
1st qtr. 1991       3.0     6.0     2.0     148.1    125.1
2nd qtr. 1991       2.6     3.1     2.1     146.4    124.4
3rd qtr. 1991       1.0     1.2     2.1     141.6    124.7
4th qtr. 1991       1.9    -1.6     2.1     141.2    123.7
March 1991         2.4     3.5     2.1     142.6    125.1
April              2.5     3.8     2.1     152.6    124.9
May                1.8     4.3     2.1     146.4    124.6
June               3.4     1.1     2.1     140.5    124.4
July              -0.3     2.5     2.2     149.8    124.4
August             4.5     0.1     2.1     137.5    124.4
September         -1.2     0.9     2.1     137.3    124.7
October            1.6    -1.8     2.1     144.4    124.4
November           4.1    -1.0     2.1     139.8    124.1
December           0.0    -1.9     2.1     139.1    123.7
January 1992       0.8    -4.0     2.1     137.8    123.8
Febraury                  -4.2     2.0     125.1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
GERMANY
                 Retail            Unemp-  Vacancy  Composite
                 sales  Industrial loyment  rate    leading
                 volume production rate   indicator indicator
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
1985            100.0   100.0      7.2    100.0     104.3
1986            103.6   102.2      6.4    136.4     104.1
1987            107.4   102.5      6.2    149.4     105.2
1988            110.6   106.2      6.2    164.7     111.4
1989            113.6   111.4      5.6    218.9     114.2
1990            122.7   117.2      4.9    260.6     114.9
1991            129.7   120.7      4.3    269.8     111.5
1st qtr. 1991     12.1     4.7      4.3    267.1     113.3
2nd qtr. 1991      9.8     5.6      4.3    277.0     113.2
3rd qtr. 1991      0.4     1.9      4.4    275.2     112.8
4th qtr. 1991      1.0     0.1      4.3    260.5     111.5
March 1991       11.5     4.4      4.3    272.8     113.3
April             9.1     6.8      4.3    274.6     113.0
May               7.1     3.2      4.3    275.4     113.1
June             13.4     6.8      4.3    278.6     113.2
July              3.3     3.6      4.4    278.4     112.9
August           -1.9     1.3      4.4    278.4     113.1
September        -0.1     0.8      4.4    270.3     112.8
October           3.3     0.6      4.4    261.3     112.3
November         -0.2     1.7      4.3    258.1     111.7
December         -0.2    -2.1      4.3    262.9     111.5
January 1992     -1.9     0.2      4.3    271.9     111.3
February         -1.9     3.2      4.3    283.3     111.1
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                          FRANCE
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 Retail            Unemp-  Vacancy  Composite
                 sales  Industrial loyment  rate    leading
                 volume production rate   indicator indicator
1985             100.0  100.0      10.2   100.0     101.7
1986             102.4  101.1      10.4   107.2     108.6
1987             104.5  103.1      10.5   117.6     107.9
1988             107.9  107.3      10.0   134.9     112.7
1989             109.6  111.3       9.4   161.3     112.4
1990             110.1  112.7       8.9   165.6     106.6
1991             109.7  113.2       9.4   129.9     106.5
1st qtr. 1991      -0.5    0.9       9.0   133.1     106.5
2nd qtr. 1991      -1.4    0.1       9.3   130.1     108.1
3rd qtr. 1991       0.0   -0.6       9.5   132.4     108.4
4th qtr. 1991       0.2    1.6       9.7   124.3     106.5
March 1991         0.5   -1.4       9.1   132.0     106.5
April              0.4   -0.1       9.2   129.1     106.9
May               -2.0    0.2       9.3   129.5     107.6
June              -2.5    0.2       9.4   132.0     108.1
July               3.2   -0.7       9.5   134.9     108.5
August            -0.8   -0.7       9.5   134.1     108.5
September         -2.3   -0.4       9.6   128.0     108.4
October            1.4    0.7       9.7   124.5     107.7
November           0.7    1.5       9.7   125.8     107.2
December          -1.5    2.6       9.8   122.8     106.5
January 1992       0.2   0-. 4       9.8
February           3.8    0.3       9.9
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                           ITALY
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 Retail            Unemp-  Composite
                 sales  Industrial loyment leading
                 volume production rate    indicator
1985             100.0  100.0      9.6     103.9
1986             108.0  104.1     10.4     110.7
1987             113.8  106.8     10.9     112.9
1988             110.2  114.2     10.9     117.8
1989             118.4  118.7     10.9     116.1
1990             115.0  118.0     10.3     112.5
1991                    115.4      9.8     115.6
1st qtr. 1991      -1.9   -2.1      9.9     113.8
2nd qtr. 1991      -7.9   -2.2     10.0     114.5
3rd qtr. 1991       0.9   -3.7      9.6     115.3
4th qtr. 1991             -0.7      9.9     115.6
March 1991         5.7   -3.3     na     113.8
April            -12.4   -3.6     na     114.0
May               -9.6   -2.4     na     114.1
June              -1.8   -0.4     na     114.5
July              -3.7   -2.3     na     114.7
August             1.6   -6.6     na     115.2
September         -2.6   -2.2     na     115.3
October                  -1.5     na     115.3
November                  1.1     na     115.4
December                 -1.7     na     115.6
January 1992             -1.4              115.4
Febraury                 -0.2              114.5
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                  UNITED KINGDOM
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
                 Retail            Unemp-  Vacancy  Composite
                 sales  Industrial loyment  rate    leading
                 volume production rate   indicator indicator
1985             100.0  100.0      11.2   100.0     102.2
1986             105.2  102.4      11.2   116.1     105.3
1987             110.7  105.7      10.3   141.2     109.6
1988             117.7  109.5       8.5   144.3     108.1
1989             119.8  109.9       7.1   124.7     105.5
1990             120.4  109.4       6.8    97.9     103.6
1991             119.5  106.1       8.9    68.1     107.8
1st qtr. 1991      -0.8   -2.9       7.8    81.8     104.8
2nd qtr. 1991      -2.0   -5.9       8.7    64.1     107.1
3rd qtr. 1991      -0.5   -2.2       9.4    61.6     108.3
4th qtr. 1991       0.4   -0.8       9.7    65.5     107.8
1st qtr. 1992      -0.3
March              2.0   -3.2       8.2    81.0     104.8
April             -2.2   -6.7       8.4    70.4     106.1
May               -3.4   -6.0       8.7    63.1     106.9
June              -0.5   -5.0       8.9    58.6     107.1
July              -0.6   -2.0       9.2    60.6     107.4
August            -0.2   -2.6       9.4    62.1     107.8
September         -0.7   -2.1       9.6    62.1     108.3
October           -0.1   -1.6       9.6    60.3     108.7
November           1.6   -0.6       9.7    63.9     108.3
December          -0.4   -0.3       9.9    72.1     107.8
January 1992       0.8   -1.2      10.1    71.1     107.6
February           1.3   -1.6      10.2    72.4     107.8
March             -3.0
 -----------------------------------------------------------------------
All series seasonally adjusted. Statistics for Germany apply only to western
Germany. Data supplied by Datastream and WEFA. Retail sales volume: data
from national government sources except Japan and Italy (value series
deflated by OECD using CPI). Refers to total retail sales except France and
Italy (major outlets only) and Japan (department stores only). Industrial
production: data from national government sources. Includes mining,
manufacturing, gas, electricity and water supply industries except Japan
(mining and manufacturing only) and UK (also includes construction
industries). Unemployment rate: OECD standardised rate which adjusts as far
as possible for the different definitions of unemployment used in official
sources. Vacancy rate indicator: relevant vacancy measure divided by total
civilian employment, expressed in index form. Derived from OECD series. US -
help-wanted advertising, Japan -    new vacancies, Germany and France -
all jobs vacant, Italy -    no data available, UK -    unfilled vacancies.
Composite leading indicator: OECD data. Each is a combination of series,
cyclical fluctuations which usually precede cyclical fluctuations in general
economic activity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11217</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Old foes resume the bickering: Notebook
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A MEETING of finance ministers of the Group of Seven would not feel right
without a bout of public bickering between the US and Germany.
At a press conference yesterday Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance minister,
was still visibly peeved by the US Treasury's criticism of German fiscal
policy. 'Complaints and accusations don't help,' he said, adding that 'I'm
not going to be put in the dock'.
Meanwhile, the national champions - Mr David Mulford, the US Treasury
under-secretary for international affairs, and Mr Horst Kohler, state
secretary in the Bonn Finance Ministry - have been seen talking to each
other in Washington after trading charge and counter-charge last week.
This latest spat, triggered by Mr Mulford's claim that Germany's high fiscal
deficits were becoming a structural problem and exporting slow growth to the
Europe, rapidly moved up the Richter scale of public rows. If Mr Mulford
thought he could make his strictures acceptable by insisting that the US was
not trying to prescribe policy for Bonn, he must have suffered a shock.
US officials were certainly taken aback by the sharpness of Mr Kohler's
reply, which accused Mr Mulford at one point of making 'one-sided and partly
false public comments'.
While some officials in Washington put the whole thing down to Mr Mulford's
insensitivity and Mr Kohler's thin skin, others could see a method behind
the US Treasury's megaphone diplomacy.
If the US had first raised its worries about Germany's fiscal policy in
yesterday's G7 meeting, the day's discussions on Russia and the world
economy would have been overshadowed by a round of table banging.
If foreign exchange reserves are a guide to a country's ability to import,
it is no wonder that Russia's imports have collapsed.
A new International Monetary Fund economic review of the Russian Federation
discloses that the reserves of the Russian central bank fell to just Dollars
12m (Pounds 6.7m) at the end of January.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11218</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Stress on need to cut fiscal deficits
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Excerpts from the G7 communique after the meeting of finance ministers and
central bank governors of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the UK and
US.
The ministers and governors remained concerned that aggregate G7 economic
activity this year would be below potential and growth would be inadequate
to achieve a reduction in unemployment. In some countries recovery is still
delayed, while growth has slowed significantly in other countries which had
experienced relatively stronger growth earlier.
The ministers and governors reviewed their economic policies with a view to
strengthening world growth. With regard to fiscal policies they emphasised
the importance of movement to reduce government demands on private savings
to facilitate needed capital spending. In that context, they underline the
need to reduce fiscal deficits in all countries with large budgetary
imbalances through credible medium-term consolidation strategies.
This is important both for countries with long lasting fiscal imbalances and
for countries experiencing exceptional adjustment challenges. Those
countries with large fiscal deficits, relatively high inflation, excessive
wage developments and tight monetary policy should follow a balanced policy
approach to facilitate improved growth. Certain other countries with large
deficits that have experienced weak growth should avoid actions that would
jeopardise medium-term efforts to consolidate budget positions.
Where fiscal imbalances have been contained and where recession has been
avoided, appropriate measures should be pursued to enhance medium-term
growth prospects while maintaining public expenditure under control. In
those countries with large surpluses and declining growth, policy makers
should be mindful of the possibilities of strengthening domestic demand
thought appropriate measures.
On monetary policies the ministers and governors welcomed the reductions in
cost and price pressures in most of their countries, which have permitted
significantly lower interest rates in several cases. Nevertheless, real
interest rates remain high, hampering global investment and growth. They
were of the view that satisfactory progress on inflation , curbing excessive
wage pressure and progress in consolidating fiscal positions would create
the basis for lower interest rates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11219</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Fund to stabilise rouble agreed
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The following is an excerpt from the G7 communique on its meeting with
Russian representatives.
1) The finance ministers and central bank governors of the G7 countries met
today with deputy prime minister Yegor Gaidar and other representatives of
the Russian Federation to discuss the historic events unfolding in Russia.
2) The Russian representatives described the economic situation in their
country, Russia's financing requirements in 1992, the reforms that have
already been implemented and their intentions regarding their timing and
adoption of additional policy measures which would permit Russia to
implement an economic programme meriting IMF support.
3) The minister and governors welcomed the reforms already undertaken in
Russia. They urged Russia and the IMF to complete negotiations at an early
date on a comprehensive stabilisation and reform programme that provides
for:
reduction of the budget deficit to stabilise the economy and reduce the role
of government.
curbing monetary growth to bring inflation under control and stop the
extension of credit to unviable enterprises.
establishment of the legal framework and contractual rights necessary to
permit the development of a market economy. reform of the agriculture and
energy sectors. a foreign exchange mobilisation system that enables the
independent states of the former Soviet Union to meet their international
payments.
a unified and market-determined exchange rate set at a realistic level.
4) In this context, the ministers and governors expressed their commitment
to support Russia's reform efforts during the transition by providing the
recently announced Dollars 24bn aid package within the context of an agreed
IMF programme.
5) To this end, they are prepared to provide up to Dollars 18bn through a
substantial bilateral assistance together with other countries, through
considering further deferral of Russia's outstanding indebtedness, and
through supporting significant financial resources from the international
financial institutions.
6) The ministers and governors are prepared to support G10 activation of GAB
to finance Dollars 6bn currency stabilisation fund for Russia. This fund is
intended to help stabilise the rouble, facilitate convertibility of the
currency and promote confidence in the reform effort.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11220</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / German coalition majority fading, according to opinion poll
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Chancellor Helmut Kohl's ruling coalition in Germany is no longer supported
by a majority, while the far right Republicans are creeping up in
popularity, according to the latest national opinion poll, writes Quentin
Peel.
The monthly survey in the weekly magazine Der Spiegel shows Mr Kohl's own
Christian Democrats (CDU) and their Bavarian allies, the Christian Social
Union (CSU) slipping to 37 per cent support, a drop of 3 points over the
past month.
At the same time the Republicans, who won seats for the first time in the
Baden-Wurttemberg state parliament earlier this month, increased their
support by the same amount - from 2 to 5 per cent  - just enough to get
seats in the national parliament, if there was an election tomorrow.
The opposition Social Democrats pushed up their support from 38 to 39 per
cent, and the Free Democrats, junior partners in the Kohl coalition,
maintained their support at 10 per cent. The Greens slipped marginally from
7 to 6 per cent.
The poll, confirms that the issue of controlling the inflow of asylum
seekers is the single most important issue for west German voters. East
Germans are more concerned about unemployment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11221</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / German strikes expected to bring chaos today: Trial of
strength between public sector unions and government comes to a head
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By QUENTIN PEEL and PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN, WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TRAINS and buses, post, refuse disposal, and a string of other public
services are expected to be severely disrupted in western Germany from today
after all the public sector unions voted overwhelmingly in favour of strike
action.
Before dawn today, public transport workers began to walk out in the first
full-scale public sector strike to hit the country for 18 years. Postal
workers, railway employees, hospital administration and school services and
white-collar workers are also to be involved.
The action amounts to a trial of strength between the trade unions, and both
central government and the local authorities, in the latest annual wage
round.
At the same time, pay negotiations between the employers and the
construction workers' union, IG Bau, broke down on Saturday, and IG Metall,
representing the country's 4m engineering workers, has already called for
'massive warning strikes' this week in support of its own wage claims.
The unrest could affect the entire German economy at a time when it is
already labouring under the burden of paying for unification with the east.
There was a hint of a desire for compromise last night, when Mrs Heide
Simonis, Social Democrat (SPD) finance minister of Schleswig-Holstein and a
key member of the employers' side in the public sector negotiations,
proposed a pay deal increasing the lowest wages by more than the 4.8 per
cent currently on offer.
Mr Bjorn Engholm, the SPD leader, called for an urgent resumption of
negotiations, and a new government offer in the coming week. However thus
far the government, represented by Mr Rudolf Seiters, the interior minister,
has refused to improve on 4.8 per cent, compared with an arbitration panel
proposal of 5.4 per cent, and a union demand of 9.5 per cent.
Mrs Monika Wulf-Mathies, leader of the OTV public sector union, said the
unions would 'prove very quickly that without the public services, nothing
runs at all'. The OTV is reported to have a strike fund of DM600m. 'We can
keep going,' she said.
Postal workers started strike action on Friday, and over the weekend public
theatres and concert halls were also closed when stage-hands, make-up
artists and ticket sales staff walked out. Striking train safety inspectors
were expected to halt express trains by midday today.
Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance minister, yesterday gave an upbeat
assessment of German economic developments, announcing that the economy of
western Germany grew by 1 per cent between the fourth quarter of last year
and the first quarter of 1992, writes Peter Norman in Washington.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11222</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Walesa seeks powers to choose cabinet members
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Lech Walesa of Poland signalled yesterday he is intent on
installing a cabinet of his own choosing and broadening his executive
powers. This would mean dropping the centre-right minority government headed
by Mr Jan Olszewski.
The president said on the main evening TV news yesterday that he needed 'the
means to act effectively' and that he was now convinced the country had to
have a 'cabinet of professionals which transcended party divisions.'
He added this would mean 'greater powers for the president' in a system
modelled on the French constitution, 'where the prime minister answers to
the president.'
Mr Walesa, who was elected president at the end of 1990, is looking to
rising discontent to propel his drive to dominate the executive and
parliament.
However, he will need a majority in parliament to make the necessary
constitutional changes. This might be difficult as the MPs may well unite to
resist Mr Walesa's demands.
Poland's constitution has the prime minister and his cabinet answering to
parliament, with the president merely responsible for nominating the
premier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11223</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Spain faces labour unrest
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Spain is facing serious labour unrest this summer and autumn, following the
announcement at the weekend by the General Workers Union (UGT) that it is to
hold a half-day stoppage next month, and a general strike of possibly 48
hours in October, both in protest at government cuts in unemployment
benefits, writes Peter Bruce in Madrid.
The UGT and the other large union, the communist-led Workers' Commissions
(CCOO) are to meet this week to co-ordinate further action. Both unions are
promising a series of rolling sectoral strikes if the government does not
withdraw its decree to cut unemployment payments.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11224</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Lull in Sarajevo fighting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THERE was a lull in fighting around Sarajevo, the capital of the former
Yugoslav republic of Bosnia Hercegovina, ahead of peace talks today in
Lisbon, the seat of the European Community presidency, writes Laura Silber
in Belgrade.
EC negotiators say the resumption of talks among the leaders of Bosnia's
4.35m Moslems, Serbs and Croats is contingent on a stable ceasefire. About
300 people have been killed and some 2,000 wounded in the fighting over
Bosnian independence. However, fighting was reported yesterday in Zvornik,
eastern Bosnia, as well as in the north and west of the region.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11225</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Sweden pledges SKr30bn cuts to reduce deficit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S centre-right government promised SKr30bn (Pounds 2.85bn) spending
cuts over three years to reduce the budget deficit which is forecast to
reach SKr101.8bn in the 1992-93 tax year, writes Sara Webb in Stockholm.
The cuts, mainly in welfare benefits, local and central government, come on
top of cuts of SKr27bn from the government's 1992-93 budget in sickness
benefits, interest rate subsidies on housing and grants to local
authorities.
Swedish bonds, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11226</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Silent Cossiga may yet return from the dead: It is too soon
to write a political obituary
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS an unusually taciturn Mr Francesco Cossiga whom avid Roman
journalists tailed through the city yesterday from Mass at 7am to lunch and
beyond.
Less than 24 hours after announcing his resignation to more than 5m
television viewers, the Italian president maintained a silence more typical
of his Sardinian origins than his past two years as president. He has become
better known for his off-the-cuff remarks, often about his party colleagues
and usually bathed in vitriol.
But it is too soon to write Mr Cossiga's political obituary. Having plunged
Italy into a political crisis unparalleled even by its rumbustious
standards, Mr Cossiga may still see himself as a potential saviour.
For among the list of potential candidates for his post, which includes Mr
Giulio Andreotti, the outgoing premier, and Mr Bettino Craxi, the Socialist
leader, is probably Mr Cossiga himself.
In his resignation speech, he made much of the need for a strong,
newly-elected president, who would have the political and moral authority to
knock heads together among party leaders, whom he accused of failing to
recognise voters' call for change at the polls on April 5.
Mr Cossiga's harsh political barbs have brought him few friends in political
circles but his comments command wide public support. He has cast himself as
the mouthpiece for Italians frustrated with a party political establishment
which seems more intent on settling old scores than solving the country's
problems. Yet Mr Cossiga has often been as much the culprit as others.
His resignation speech was full of the emotional touches which have
characterised many of his recent outbursts. He presented himself in the now
familiar role of a lone fighter against an all-powerful political
establishment.
For all its high principles, Mr Cossiga's departure bore the marks of the
bitter personal antagonisms that have marked his last two years in office.
The Christian Democrats, still Italy's biggest political grouping, were his
prime target. Mr Cossiga has been deeply angered by the party's unwillingess
to bow to his wish for some new form of parliamentary order, in which he
might play a guiding role.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11227</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Post Office engineers agree 22-hour week deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A 22-HOUR working week, possibly the shortest for any group of full-time
workers in British industry, has been agreed between management and union
negotiators for some Post Office maintenance engineers.
Volunteers from among the 800 engineers will get Monday to Friday off in
return for working up to 22 hours over the weekend. A full week's pay at
normal weekday rates - between Pounds 240 and Pounds 270  - will be received
by the volunteers for the weekend shifts of up to 12 hours for part of the
year. The short total working week, to be introduced as a pilot scheme, is
designed to compensate for the unsocial hours.
The deal is being hailed by the National Communications Union, which
represents the engineers, as a breakthrough in efforts to reform the working
week and preserve jobs. Most manual workers still work 39 hours a week,
although several hundred thousand in the engineering sector have recently
won reductions to 37 hours after a strong campaign by unions.
Among white-collar employees, working weeks of under 35 hours are still
uncommon. When overtime is taken into account, British men work the longest
hours within the European Community.
Mr Bill Fry, NCU president, said the time had come for unions to take a
'more imaginative approach to the structure of the working week'. He said
the agreement represented an important breakthrough which would help defend
jobs and assist the Post Office's own engineering and construction section
to compete effectively with outside contractors.
The Post Office agreement has been welcomed by management as well as union
negotiators. Demand for construction and maintenance work tends to be
concentrated in the last part of the financial year because of budget
holders' 'natural caution' in the early months of the year, the Post Office
said. At the same time, it is less disruptive for engineers to gain access
to plant and premises at the week- ends when the postal operation is
quieter.
The combination of these two factors has meant that, until now, the Post
Office has had little for engineers to do on weekdays from April to July
but, at the same time, it was also having to pay overtime rates for weekend
work. It is expected that about 10 per cent of the engineers will volunteer
for the weekend shifts.
The Post Office's move is the latest example of efforts by employers to cut
down on overtime payments. Annualised hours agreements - contracting with
employees to work a certain number of hours over a year, rather than a week
 -are increasingly common.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11228</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / G7 nations split over strategy to aid world growth: Meeting
gives go-ahead to Dollars 6bn rouble stabilisation fund for Russia
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE WORLD'S leading industrial countries welcomed Russia and the other
former Soviet republics into the fold of market economies yesterday but
continued to show signs of internal dissent over how best to foster world
economic growth.
After an unusually long 11-hour meeting in Washington, the finance ministers
and central bank governors of the Group of Seven countries issued a
cautiously phrased communique that papered over their differences.
Although it underlined the importance of strengthening consumer and investor
confidence and restoring sustained non-inflationary growth in the G7
countries, it did not, in contrast to the previous G7 statement issued in
January, detail what individual countries should do.
It was understood that much of the delay in the talks was caused by Japanese
resistance to US calls for increased public spending and lower interest
rates.
Before the meeting began, Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance minister, said
he was 'not going to be put in the dock' because of Germany's high public
borrowing requirement following unification. He rejected US claims that
Germany's overall fiscal deficit was as high as 6 per cent of gross domestic
product and insisted that there would be a moratorium on the level of state
spending until the mid-1990s.
Hopes of an early cut in German interest rates were dashed when Mr Helmut
Schlesinger, the Bundesbank president, said that the bank had no room to
lower rates in view of the rapid growth in Germany's monetary aggregates and
inflationary pressure on the wages front. However, Germany saw no reason to
raise rates or tighten monetary policy.
A number of countries, including Britain, have backed the US argument that
Germany's large deficits lie behind the Bundesbank's high interest rates,
and so have exported slow growth and unemployment to Europe and the rest of
the world. Reflecting this concern, the final communique underlined 'the
need to reduce fiscal deficits in all countries with large budgetary
imbalances through credible medium-term consolidation strategies'.
Welcoming the former Soviet republics into the International Monetary Fund,
the G7 gave the green light to a Dollars 6bn (Pounds 3.4bn) rouble
stabilisation fund for Russia.
The meeting was joined by Mr Yegor Gaidar, Russia's first deputy prime
minister, yesterday afternoon. It heard details of Russia's economic reform
and stabilisation plans, including a forecast from Mr Gaidar that Russia
would reduce its fiscal deficit to 5 per cent of gross domestic product in
the first half of this year, from around 20 per cent last year.
The G7 - comprising the US, Japan, Germany, France, Britain, Italy and
Canada - recommended that an emergency IMF financing facility, known as the
General Arrangements to Borrow, should be activated to give the IMF the
financial backing needed for the stabilisation fund.
It is expected that another club of industrial countries - the Group of Ten
 -will activate the Gab today so that the IMF can draw funds from it when
required. The formalities needed for Russia and most other former Soviet
republics to join the IMF and its sister organisation, the World Bank,
should also be completed today, paving the way for detailed talks on the
rouble fund, a Dollars 4bn IMF standby credit for Russia, and World Bank
loans to the former republics.
Mr Schlesinger indicated that Germany was less than enthusiastic about the
planned activation of the Gab. He and British officials suggested that the
rouble stabilisation fund could be subject to tougher conditions than the
stand-by credit that Russia will negotiate with the IMF.
World Bank sets out plan to aid republics Page 4
Communique details Page 4
Gift of the Gab Page 15
Avuncular provider of advice: interview with Lewis Preston, president of
the World Bank Page 30
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11229</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Political asylum requests halved under tougher British
controls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MARSH, European Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE number of people applying for political asylum in Britain has dropped by
more than half this year as tougher Home Office screening controls start to
bite.
Officials believe that the latest statistics suggest a significant
proportion of last year's record 44,743 applications for asylum may have
reflected bogus requests.
This is because people requesting asylum, most of whom are already in the
country, have been required since the end of last year to go in person to
the Home Office asylum division in Croydon, rather than apply by post.
Potential asylum seekers may also have been deterred from applying by
Britain's tougher public stance on the issue.
The fall is to an average 1,730 applications a month in the first three
months compared with an average 3,730 last year. It is in sharp contrast to
the experience of other European countries such as Germany which are
continuing to experience growing inflows.
A total of 35,000 foreigners applied for asylum in Germany alone in March.
Based on current trends, this is almost twice as many as are likely to
register in the UK during the whole of this year.
The Home Office figures are likely to take the heat out of the debate over
immigration when the much-criticised Asylum Bill is re-introduced for
parliamentary scrutiny after the Queen's Speech on May 6.
The government postponed the bill by withdrawing it from the committee stage
in the House of Lords two months ago. The legislation is due to be
resubmitted to parliament either in the summer or in the autumn. It will
embody amendments which were made during its passage through the Commons
this year.
The government and refugee organisations such as Amnesty International have
been pointing for months to the problem of multiple applications. Individual
foreigners have been completing several asylum forms in different names.
Asylum seekers receive social security benefits as soon as their application
form has been officially lodged, giving them the chance of fraudulently
drawing extra benefits.
The average time for an application to be processed has been 14 months,
longer if appeals are involved.
Amnesty International has criticised the government in the past for not
channelling more resources towards processing asylum applications.
The Home Office has responded by stepping up recruitment and training. The
asylum division now has 550 staff, compared with just 50 in 1988. It now
spends Pounds 10m a year on processing requests, against only Pounds 1.7m
two years ago.
Extra resources have allowed more rapid handling of outstanding
applications. Decisions were taken on a total of 6,329 applications in the
first three months of the year. The government, however, believes it will
still take several years to clear the backlog of around 60,000 undecided
asylum cases inherited from previous years.
Editorial comment, Page 12
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11230</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Enterprises set targets for number of women hired
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH AIRWAYS, British Rail, IBM, Lucas, Littlewoods, and the National
Health Service are among UK enterprises which have started to set targets
for the number of women being hired and promoted within their organisations.
Interviews conducted by the Financial Times with compa-nies taking part in
Opportunity 2000, the campaign designed to help working women launched six
months ago by Mr John Major, the prime minister, reveal that more than 60
organisations have signed up to the initiative.
Growth in staffing targets for women, Page 7,
Opportunity not to be missed, Page 10
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11231</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Stage awards
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Actor-writer Alan Bennett took two top prizes at the Olivier Awards, winning
in the outstanding actor and outstanding entertainment categories for his
comedy Talking Heads.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11232</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Leeds take title
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Leeds United won the Division One league championship for the first time
since 1974 after beating Sheffield United 3-2.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11233</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Nine die
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Nine motorcyclists, including one Briton, were killed in a series of
accidents in Le Mans, France, where they had gone to watch the 24-hour
motorcycle race.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11234</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Oil spill fears
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An oil tanker carrying about 430,000 barrels of oil broke up and sank off
Mozambique, raising fears of a massive oil spill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11235</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Low turnout
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Heavy rain caused a poor turnout at a Glasgow rally called by Scotland
United, formed to campaign for a referendum on Scotland's constitutional
future.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11236</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Crash kills 39
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
All 39 passengers and crew died when an aircraft chartered by Iran's
national petrochemical company crashed on an internal flight to Tehran.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11237</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: SA minister quits
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Barend du Plessis, South African finance minister and a chief negotiator at
the multiparty constitutional forum, is to resign on May 1 due to
exhaustion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11238</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / World News in Brief: Officials accused
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Four executives of Mexico's national oil company, Pemex, and five local
officials were accused by the attorney-general of responsibility for last
week's sewer explosions which killed 200 people in Guadalajara. He said
petrol must have been leaking from a ruptured pipeline into city sewers for
several weeks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11239</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK power station 'dirtiest' in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DRAX, a coal-fired power station owned by the privatised generator National
Power, was yesterday branded as the 'biggest polluter in Europe'.
This followed the first publication of government figures on the 20
'dirtiest' power stations in England and Wales.
Drax, the Yorkshire power station, tops the list. It emits nearly 270,000
tonnes of sulphur dioxide and nearly 83,000 tonnes of nitrogen oxide - both
gases that cause acid rain  - every year according to the figures
'Drax is the biggest polluter in Europe,' claimed Ms Fiona Weir, a
campaigner with Friends of the Earth, the environmental lobby group.
FoE obtained the list of stations and their emissions from the Department of
the Environment.
Twelve of the power stations on the list belong to National Power, and eight
to PowerGen, the other big generator.
Emissions from the power stations should have been placed on a public
register under the Environmental Protection Act of 1990, the government's
flagship environmental legislation. But so far no stations have been
registered under the act because of a bureaucratic wrangle between the
generators and the Department of the Environment.
National Power said: 'We are spending Pounds 700m on fitting cleaning
equipment at Drax, and spending Pounds 1bn on clean gas-fired technology.
'We are also importing low-sulphur coal.'
National Power and PowerGen have appealed against some crucial information
appearing on the register - which they are entitled to do under the act. The
generators said they had no intention of concealing details of emissions
from their stations.
'We are very happy for all information to be in the public domain,' said Mr
Ed Wallis, chief executive of PowerGen. 'But they asked us for the emissions
for a year ahead. A competitor could have analysed them and deduced our fuel
strategy, which would have been unfair.'
Their appeal, which has gone to the secretary of state, will be settled
imminently, the Department said.
However, the appeal hearing started last April and Mr Heseltine, the former
environment secretary, had not published his decision on the case by the
time of this year's general election.
Ms Weir said the year delay in coming to a decision in what is regarded as
an important test case of environmental legislation was 'scandalous'. FoE is
keen for the appeal to be settled, so that it can begin to challenge
individual stations' applications under the act.
All power stations on the list already meet the standards set by the act,
say generators.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11240</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Work, learn and don't procreate: America
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
How should a wealthy society treat those who cannot (or will not) help
themselves? In the US, patience with passive welfare policies seems suddenly
to have snapped. State legislatures of all political hues are experimenting
with policies designed to change behaviour. Sensing an issue with political
mileage, President Bush has just approved radical welfare experiments in
Wisconsin.
Mr Tommy Thompson, the Republican governor of Wisconsin, is pioneering a
policy known as 'wed fare' or 'bridefare'. This aims to encourage teenage
mothers to marry by allowing them to keep benefits even if their husbands
have a modest independent income. At the same time, Wisconsin plans to
penalise welfare mothers who have additional children. At present, teenage
mothers get Dollars 440 a month, rising to Dollars 517 for two children and
Dollars 617 for three. In future, the payment for a second child will be
reduced to Dollars 479 with no further increment for larger families. Under
a scheme known as 'learnfare', the state has already cut the welfare cheques
of teenage mothers who fail to attend high school.
In New Jersey, liberal Democrats are taking the lead. Mr Wayne Bryant, a
black representative from a poor district, dismisses conventional welfare as
a modern form of 'slavery'. He says wage earners do not get a pay rise just
because they have another child, so why should welfare mothers? Mr Jim
Florio, the state's liberal governor, aims to 'wean people off welfare' by
forcing them to become responsible for their actions. He wants to cut
welfare payments for extra children and implement a form of bridefare.
California is leading a pack of other states considering similar reforms.
The reformers - dubbed 'new paternalists' by their critics  - say their aim
is not to save money. Policies aimed at changing behaviour will require
additional resources: clients have to be monitored more closely while
schemes such as learnfare involve higher education spending.
However, with state budgets under intense pressure because of the prolonged
economic slowdown, the reforms are being introduced in a climate of
austerity. Economies are often the main priority: 14 states have cut
benefits for able-bodied adults, including Michigan, which has abolished all
such assistance. In California, the most controversial reform is a planned,
across-the-board cut of up to 25 per cent in family benefit rates.
The drive to modify personal behaviour - to make the poor adopt middle-class
attitudes - is a natural progression from the last big welfare reform, the
Family Support Act of 1988. This aimed to encourage self-sufficiency by
requiring states to enrol a gradually increasing proportion of welfare
recipients in work or training programmes. Critics are already dismissing it
as too timid: exemptions mean that its 'workfare' provisions may eventually
apply to only a small fraction of welfare rolls.
Is the new paternalism desirable? Libertarians will argue that unconditional
payments - a basic income or negative income tax  - are preferable to social
engineering. Yet given the failure of passive policies, a determined attempt
to influence behaviour seems worth trying. For many families, the difference
between poverty and prosperity will be determined by attitudes to work,
study, marriage and lifestyle. The proof lies in the success of many
immigrants who arrive with few skills or resources.
But the morality of punishing parents by cutting their children's benefits
is questionable. It is also nave to expect quite small financial incentives
to make a huge difference. Welfare is needed precisely because a fraction of
the population will not or cannot respond readily to economic signals. In
the past two decades, the real value of US welfare benefits has fallen by an
average of 27 per cent, without curbing welfare rolls. There is also little
correlation between state benefit rates - which vary enormously  - and
welfare populations.
This is because welfare dependence partly reflects structural economic
change. The sharp decline in the relative pay of unskilled workers has
created a trap: after allowing for childcare, transport and other costs of
work, many single heads of household cannot earn enough to replace even the
shrunken benefits now offered. In many cases, the only viable alternatives
are welfare or two wage packets - and I doubt if bridefare will miraculously
alter attitudes to marriage.
The trouble with policies to mould behaviour is that they rely too heavily
on sticks and not enough on carrots. Neither federal nor state government
yet seems prepared to fund even the modest job training provisions that form
the core of the 1988 law. Senator Daniel Patrick Moynihan, the New York
Democrat who fathered the bill, reckons that federal funding needs to be at
least quadrupled from today's miserly Dollars 1bn a year.
Pending fundamental changes in attitudes to family formation, the surest way
to reduce welfare dependency is to boost the earning power of single
parents. That means much greater investment in training and perhaps
experimentation with public sector programmes that guarantee jobs for
long-term welfare recipients. The new paternalists are right to attack the
culture of dependency. But they do not deserve to be taken seriously unless
they back reforms with more hard cash.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11241</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Foreign Exchanges and Money Markets: Markets assess G7
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BLITZ
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The results of yesterday's G7 meeting in Washington are certain to dominate
trading today as the market looks for any sign of loosening in either German
or Japanese fiscal policy, writes James Blitz.
By the end of last week, many analysts had given up on the idea that Germany
might respond to US pressure to loosen policy. But the Bank of Japan's
approach on interest rates and money supply is likely to have an impact on
dollar/yen trading.
According to Gerard Lyons, chief economist at DKB
UK clearing bank base lending rate 10.5 per cent from September 4, 1991
International, much will depend on what the BoJ decides to do. 'The forex
markets believe that if Japan boosts spending, it will be interpreted as a
decision not to cut rates. That will give support to the Yen.' If, on the
other hand, Japanese rates come down, the Japanese may still have sought
some agreement with the Fed to support the Yen if it starts to fall.
As the week progresses, attention is certain to fall even more firmly on the
dollar as a string of important economic statistics come out of the US.
Among the most important is First Quarter GDP, due out tomorrow, which the
markets believe should show a rise of 1.7%. Figures for consumer confidence
and personal consumption are also due out tomorrow and Wednesday,
respectively.
'All these figures are likely to show that the economy is in the early
stages of recovery, and should give further support to the dollar,' said Mr
Lyons. But an immediate surge in the dollar's value is unlikely. 'We have
seen stability in Yen/dollar rates recently,' he says. 'I think that rather
than talk of sharp movements, the US statistics will give a firm
underpinning to the dollar.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11242</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Economics: Contradictory messages about the strength of
recovery in the US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FOCUS shifts to the US this week where a welter of statistics will be
scrutinised for evidence of economic recovery. Few would dispute that it is
taking place,but recent data has failed to cast much light on how strongly.
Mr Mark Cliffe, an economist at Nomura Research Institute in London, warns
that, although this week's release of the advance estimates of gross
domestic product for the first quarter will provide some indication of the
strength of the recovery, the contradictory message of its constituents will
leave room for a wide range of estimates for the second quarter.
The contradictory messages cited by Mr Cliffe include the retail sales
component of consumer spending, which rose by a sharp annualised gain of 9.2
per cent on the previous quarter, and industrial production, which showed a
quarter-on-quarter fall of 4.3 per cent.
Highlights of the week ahead, with median forecasts in brackets from MMS
International, a financial information company include:
Today: US, March existing home sales; Japan, March retail sales (down 0.1
per cent on year); Australia, March motor vehicle registrations (up 3 per
cent); Canada, February employment earnings; UK, first sitting of newly
elected parliament.
Tomorrow: US, first quarter GDP - advance (up 2 per cent), first quarter GDP
deflator - advance (up 3.2 per cent), fourth quarter after tax corporate
profits, first quarter employment, April consumer confidence (56.0), March
new home sales (unchanged), presidential primary in Pennsylvania; UK, CBI
publishes April industrial trends survey; France, fourth quarter GDP -
detailed quarter on quarter results; Japan, provisional figures for March
industrial production (down 1 per cent), February leading diffusion index,
first quarter corporate service price index; Australia, March manufacturing
production statistics.
Wednesday: US, March personal income (up 0.3 per cent), March personal
consumption expenditure (up 0.2 per cent); UK, March net new building
society commitments (Pounds 2.6bn); France, March final consumer price
index; Australia, first quarter consumer price index (up 0.5 per cent on
quarter, up 2.2 per cent on year); Canada, March industrial product price
index (up 0.5 per cent), March raw material price index; Japan Green Day
Holiday - all markets closed.
Thursday: US, March factory goods orders (up 1 per cent), March factory
goods shipments, March leading indicators (up 0.3 per cent), March Chicago
NAPM, April Michigan sentiment, March import price index, March export price
index, initial claims for week ended April 18th (410), M1 for week ended
April 20 (Dollars 5.5bn), M2 for week ended April 20 (Dollars 5.8bn), M3 for
week ended April 20 (Dollars 2.7bn); Japan, March construction orders, March
construction starts, March housing starts (down 0.6 per cent); Australia,
February import price index; Canada, February real GDP at factor cost (up
0.1 per cent on month), February building permits (up 1 per cent).
Friday: Europe - May Day. Most European markets closed excluding UK; US,
April NAPM index (55 per cent), March construction spending (up 0.5 per
cent); Japan, April Tokyo consumer price index (up 2.2 per cent on year),
excluding perishables (up 2.5 per cent on year), March consumer price index
 -nation (up 1.9 per cent on year), excluding perishables (up 2.3 per cent
on year).
During the week: Germany, April cost of living (up 0.3 per cent on month, up
4.5 per cent on year), March import prices (up 0.4 per cent on month, down
1.1 per cent on year); Italy, March trade balance ( - Lr1.8 trillion);
France, March unemployment rate (9.9 per cent); Japan, March trade balance -
IMF basis, March current account  - IMF basis, March foreign bond
investment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11243</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Swedish Bonds: Investors receive confusing signals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT HAS been a week of mixed news for Sweden's government bond market.
The good news came in two doses: first a statement from the governor of the
Central Bank saying he wanted to see the krona tied more closely to the
European Monetary System; and secondly a firm commitment from the
Centre-Right coalition government, which came to power last autumn, to its
policy of low inflation.
The bad news was the fact that Sweden's forecast budget deficit is well
above earlier expectations, leading to concern about government borrowing.
'We want the present unilateral linkage of the krona to the Ecu to be
replaced by a system whereby the krona is tied to each individual
EMS-currency with a central rate around which the exchange rate fluctuation
is permitted to be plus/minus 2.25 per cent,' said Mr Bengt Dennis, governor
of the Riksbank, on Thursday. 'That is the system which the majority of EMS
countries use and which we will put into practice when we become members of
the EC.'
He added that by doing so, the krona's theoretical exchange rate fluctuation
against the majority of EMS currencies would be almost halved.
'A closer link to the other EMS currencies would definitely mean less
fluctuation in the krona, reduce the risk of future devaluations and force a
tight monetary policy,' said one Swedish banker.
Friday's supplementary budget also contained some welcome news for the bond
market. Mrs Anne Wibble, the finance minister, stressed her government's
commitment to keeping inflation down, overturning years of high inflation
under the Social Democrats.
Consumer prices (December-to-December) increased by 10.7 per cent in 1990
and by 8 per cent last year, but are forecast to rise by only 2 per cent in
1992 and by 2.2 per cent the year after, the Centre-Right government said.
However, concern about the size of the budget deficit rather overshadowed
the good inflation projections. The central government budget deficit for
the 1992-1993 fiscal year (which runs from July 1-June 30) is estimated at
SKr101.8bn, corresponding to 6.9 per cent of GDP.
Only four months ago, the government had forecast a figure of SKr71bn, so
the more pessimistic revision came as a rather unpleasant surprise. The
government warned that there would be a further weakening in the 1993-1994
fiscal year before the deficit started to decrease.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11244</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / US Money and Credit: Yields have only one way to go
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONCE again long-term bond yields have risen above 8 per cent, but unlike six
weeks ago, it is likely that this time they will will stay there.
Historically, bond yields bottom out when a recession ends, and ascend
alongside the economic recovery. Given that even the most bearish of
commentators now admits that the US economy has slipped the shackles of
recession, that domestic interest rates and inflation have probably reached
their lows, and that supply pressures linked to the Budget deficit will
continue to weigh on Treasury prices, bond yields have only one way to go
from here, and that is up.
The economists at Donaldson, Lufkin &amp; Jenrette, the Wall Street broking
house, succinctly sum up the outlook for the Treasury markets in their
latest circular, which targets 6 per cent on the two-year note and 8.5 per
cent on the 30-year bond by the year end.
Say the folk at DLJ: 'Our forecast continues to be based upon the perception
of economic activity accelerating to 3 per cent, inflation not receding
below 4 per cent, Treasury financing needs continuing to exert pressure on
the market, likely increases in long bond offering sizes, and moderate
policy firmings by the Fed during the second half of the year. We currently
see little opportunity for even a short-run significant rally in bond
prices.'
The most recent economic statistics - for March durable goods orders and
unemployment insurance claims - leave little doubt that the recovery is well
under way, although how fast that recovery will progress remains in doubt.
The clearest evidence yet of recovery will be available tomorrow, when first
quarter Gross Domestic Product (GDP) figures are released. Forecasters are
expecting GDP to have risen somewhere between 1.5 per cent and 3 per cent in
the opening three months of the year, with consumer spending shown to have
risen at an annual rate of 3.5 per cent over the period.
Also expected out in a busy week for figures are April consumer confidence
(forecast to increase to 57 per cent), March new and existing home sales
(both projected to fall slightly), March personal income and spending (up
about 0.3 per cent), March factory orders (up 1.2 per cent) and April's
purchasing managers' report (which is expected to rise to 55 per cent).
If the economic numbers fail to push yields any higher, the quarterly
refunding announcement could do the job just as well. Much of last week's
decline in prices, and the rise in yields above 8 per cent, was due to
concern among dealers already loaded with inventory about the approaching
refunding round.
Estimates of the size of the May refunding operation centre around Dollars
37bn or Dollars 38bn, slightly higher than the previous quarter's Dollars
36bn, with the extra supply spread evenly among three-year and 10-year
notes, and 30-year bonds.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11245</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / European Bonds: Despondent mood spread by Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A LITANY of bad news from Germany last week, dashing hopes of an imminent
interest rate cut, left European bond markets in despondent mood. The
mounting threat of strike action over pay settlements, coupled with a leap
in German monetary supply, sent European bond prices tumbling, since it has
effectively put further interest rate cuts elsewhere in Europe on hold.
'Speculation about unilateral easing of interest rates ahead of Germany is
misguided,' said Mr Steve Major, senior European bond analyst at Credit
Lyonnais Euro-Securities.
The expected delay in interest rate cuts has refocused attention on Europe's
higher yielding bond markets. The UK gilts market stands to benefit most,
particularly with currency worries out of the way, and the possibility of a
move into the narrow band of the ERM in the air. In addition, Italy -
despite political uncertainty  - and Spain also appear attractive. So far
this year the spread between Spanish and German bonds has narrowed nearly 50
basis points.
If the lowering of interest rates is put on hold by the Bundesbank, the
higher yields available in these markets are more attractive in the
meantime.
'In a way, the Bundesbank is doing us a favour,' said Mr John Hesket, head
of international bonds at Baring Asset Management. 'By virtue of its tight
monetary stance, we can be sure that inflation is going to be killed, and so
rely on reasonably high real returns.'
Of all the European markets, the Ecu bond market looks in worst shape.
Growing concern over the ratification of the Maastricht treaty continues to
depress the market.
Although European bond markets have so far failed to attract the substantial
shift of funds predicted at the start of the year, other leading bond
markets are far from enticing.
'When the shift comes, it will be into European bonds, but no one is in what
could remotely be described as a hurry,' said Mr Kit Juckes, international
economist at S. G Warburg.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11246</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Gilts: Attention turns to Pounds 2.5bn auction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ALL eyes in the gilt-edged securities market will be fixed on Wednesday's
auction by the Bank of England of Pounds 2.5bn worth of long-dated gilts -
the biggest gilt auction so far.
There is some nervousness in the market both due to the large volume of
bonds and also because no one knows to what degree the class of securities
on offer will appeal to overseas investors.
Any problems encountered by the Bank in selling the bonds - 8.75 per cent
Treasury stock maturing in 2017 - would set poor auguries for the other
auctions being planned for later this year.
It appears the Bank will need to organise at least one auction every two
months during 1992-1993. This will be part of the programme of selling
Pounds 30bn or so worth of gilts - with the money raised funding Britain's
public sector borrowing.
In theory, such a large amount of gilt issues could depress prices and push
up yields because of a surfeit of supply over demand.
According to Mr John Shepperd, an economist at SG Warburg Securities,
securities maturing in 2017 are in a part of the yield curve where overseas
interest is difficult to gauge. Many of the bonds on offer this week and in
later auctions will probably need to find homes in non-UK institutions if
Britain is to find enough buyers for the bonanza of securities which will be
issued over the year.
However, the events of the past few weeks have probably cheered the Bank as
German and Japanese investors in particular have emerged among the strong
buyers of gilts since the election.
Inflows of cash from such investors have also been a factor boosting
sterling, which has gained from DM2.85 before the election to just under
DM2.93 at the end of last week.
Strong overseas support for gilts has led to a broad rise in prices since
early April, although last week this went slightly into reverse. The
short-dated Treasury 10 per cent bond maturing in 1994 lost  3/4 of a point
to close on Friday at 100 13/16 for a yield of 9.55 per cent - as against
9.4 per cent the week before.
There was a  1/4 point fall for the longer-dated 9 per cent Treasury
security due in 2008, which closed at 99 7/16 . Its yield correspondingly
rose somewhat, from 9.03 per cent to 9.06 per cent.
The price drop for gilts partly took its cue from a corresponding fall for
German government bonds - which act as the benchmark for much of the
European bond market. German bonds fell back as a result of a large increase
in the German money supply. That indicated that inflationary pressures
remain strong, and thus diminished the prospects of an early cut in
borrowing rates by the Bundesbank.
In Britain, hopes early last week that the Treasury might soon sanction a
cut in UK base rates, held at 10.5 per cent since September, fell back
later. That was largely on calculations that the UK's room for manoeuvre on
changing borrowing costs would be limited by the probability that the
Bundesbank would keep its own rates high for the foreseeable future.
Economic data published last week in the UK had little influence on the gilt
market. The statistics were mainly shrugged off on the basis that they
applied to March, prior to the election result which many in the City argue
may set the scene for a weak economic recovery later this year.
However gilt yields could be pushed up if any evidence over the next two
months points to a stronger recovery than has so far appeared to be likely.
Indications of a revival were pointed to mainly by the latest trade
statistics which showed the underlying volume of imports grew by 3 per cent
in the first quarter compared with the final three months of 1991.
Underlying export growth over the period was flat, underlining the slowdown
in the world economy which might damp the pace of any UK upturn - a
development which would restrain inflationary pressures and so act as a spur
to gilt prices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11247</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / International Bonds: Spotlight on credit analysis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR EVIDENCE that a corporate bond market is developing in Europe, look no
farther: a band of specialist credit analysts is springing up around the
City of London, bringing a new approach to European bond investment.
The new breed of fixed income analysts is no different in many ways from the
army of equity analysts that already follows the most heavily-traded stocks.
The name of the game is the same, to spot undervalued securities and tip off
investors about their merits.
Investors remain concerned primarily with currency and maturity when picking
bonds to buy. Credit comes a poor third: provided a bond carries a single-A
rating from one of the leading rating agencies (or, for some choosy
investors, a double-A) then many investors look no farther.
Two things are changing. One is the growing list of European companies that
is looking to tap the international bond markets.
According to Mr Mike Denham, head of fixed income at Prudential, one of the
few UK investment institutions to start developing in-house credit skills:
'We expect to see some increased opportunities in the debt markets due to
the increasing disintermediation of banks. That means we have to have a
better understanding of credit quality.'
The second change is the EC's progress towards monetary union. Convergence
of European bond yields may have been put on hold temporarily, but few in
the bond market doubt that economic and monetary convergence between members
of the EC will continue in the long term.
As that happens, there will be less opportunity to turn a profit by playing
the spreads between different European currencies - and so a greater
attention to the spreads between different credits.
US banks - which, thanks to the more developed US bond market, have
experience in credit research since the mid-1970s - are among the leaders in
developing specialist analysis in London, although they are far from alone.
JP Morgan Securities, for instance, imported a credit analyst from the US 18
months ago and now has three people working in the area in London. Merrill
Lynch appointed its first credit analyst in London three years ago, while
Morgan Stanley has followed suit more recently. Among European banks, UBS
has recently appointed a credit analyst to work in its debt and treasury
division.
Credit Suisse First Boston has been in the business longer than most, with
its first analyst in place five years ago. But it, too, has been developing
recently, bringing together its internal credit analysts with others who
advise investors to create a five-person team. CSFB's analysts have been
organised on industry lines, much as equity analysts are usually organised.
Almost without exception, all these banks expect to recruit more specialist
analysts in the near future.
Growing attention to credit analysis has given birth to a new kind of
literature from the bond-market houses, similar to the 'tip sheets' sent out
by equity analysts. Recent examples: a paper on the UK property sector from
CSFB, a disquisition on the virtues of Welsh Water from Barings, and an
analysis of the relative value of selected Eurodollar credits from JP
Morgan.
Does this signal tough new competition for the rating agencies, which until
now have had a virtual monopoly on public credit information?
Not necessarily, since the independence of the credit analysis emanating
from bond houses may at times be open to question. Much of it is part of a
service to corporate clients, generated to back up new bond issues launched
by a particular house. Other research is intended to stimulate investors to
trade.
Rating agencies, though, offer no comment on the value of securities. They
are also frequently criticised for being late when changing their ratings -
leaving plenty of scope for analysts to delve for undiscovered value in the
growing European corporate bond market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11248</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Syndicated Loans: Aircraft deal provides further test for
India
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A Dollars 600m loan to finance the purchase of aircraft for Air India is
expected to be put out for syndication among banks in London later this
week, the latest test of the growing confidence among international bankers
in the country's economy.
India's access to international capital has been greatly enhanced since its
budget in February. Measures to open up the economy to greater competition,
reduce the budget deficit and allow partial convertibility of the rupee have
encouraged a growing group of financiers to lend to the country again.
The purchase of four Boeing 747-400 aircraft by Air India was backed late
last year by ANZ and Citicorp, which together advanced Dollars 600m as a
bridging loan pending completion of export credit agreements. With that
process now complete, the banks are understood to be ready to put the deal
out to syndication, a move that will test the international banking
community's willingness to advance a substantial credit to the country.
India's rehabilitation in the eyes of the international banking community
was demonstrated with the completion of a Dollars 100m credit earlier this
month to pay for imports of crude oil and petroleum products.
The lending margin on the facility was set one third lower than on a similar
credit arranged six months ago, signalling greater confidence in the Indian
economy. The latest oil-related credit was the first significant facility to
be arranged since the February budget.
The 180-day syndicated bank credit, arranged in London by ANZ Grindlays for
Indian Oil Corporation, bears an interest margin of 1 percentage point over
the London interbank offered rate (Libor). The banks charged a 1.5 point
interest margin for a similar facility for IOC agreed last November.
Other credits to India are expected in the coming months. Eximbank of the US
has made clear that it will back Dollars 1bn-Dollars 2bn of exports to the
country.
'The positive signs have encouraged companies to look at India as a market
to sell capital goods,' says one banker involved in recent credits for the
country.
The partial convertibility of the rupee is likely to change the financing of
imports of capital goods into India. Rather than being forced to borrow in
foreign currency to finance imports, Indian companies are now able to
convert rupees to pay for foreign purchases, potentially reducing the demand
for foreign currency lending.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11249</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Groupe Bull announces 1,100 further job
cuts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GROUPE BULL, the French state-owned computer maker, yesterday announced
1,100 fresh job losses to sharpen its competitiveness in the recession-hit
computer industry.
This follows the 9,000 job cuts made over the past 18 months, as part of a
complete overhaul by Mr Francis Lorentz, chairman, of the previously
cumbersome and bureaucratic company's organisation.
The new reductions, all in France, represent 2.76 per cent of the
39,800-strong world workforce, on top of the 19 per cent reduction made last
year. Bull has 16,400 staff in France.
The job losses come on top of Bull's original restructuring plan, but are
part of the same aim of streamlining the group structure and boosting
efficiency, said officials.
The net loss of jobs will be less severe because Bull is also hiring new
staff to work on its wide-ranging technology, research and commercial
alliance announced in January with International Business Machines of the
US.
These posts will be offered to those due to lose their old jobs, and all
involved will be offered retraining or help to find alternative employment.
Bull said it hoped to avoid redundancies. The plan has won the approval of
the group's works council.
The move comes three weeks after Bull said it more than halved losses to
FFr3.3bn (Dollars 590m) net last year, from a record FFr6.79bn in 1990. It
warned it did not expect to break even until next year, rather than 1992 as
planned.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11250</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: First-quarter setback for Royal Trustco
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE RECESSION, higher non-performing loans and lower spreads reduced profit
at Royal Trustco, Canada's second-largest trust company, in the first
quarter.
Profit was CDollars 24m (USDollars 20.3m), or 6 cents a share, down 38 per
cent from a year earlier. Loan volume was weak and assets dipped CDollars
4bn to CDollars 36.6bn from a year earlier.
Expenses remained relatively high, while non-performing loans are mostly in
the depressed real estate sector. At March 31 they totalled CDollars 1.1bn,
including CDollars 440m for the British subsidiary and the balance in north
America.
Royal Trustco is the key financial services unit of the Bronfman interests
of Toronto.
Toronto Dominion Bank has had its credit rating reduced slightly by Canadian
Bond Rating Service because of problem loans in the troubled Ontario
economy.
Net non-performing loans rose to 2.9 per cent of total loans at October 31
last, and although they have since declined slightly, they are still higher
than the industry average.
Midland Walwyn, Canada's biggest retail brokerage, earned CDollars 11.4m, or
37 cents a share, in the first quarter, up from CDollars 3.5m, or 27 cents a
share, a year earlier.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11251</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: WMC warns of strike impact at nickel mine
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTERN Mining Corporation (WMC), the Australian resources group, said
production at its Kambalda nickel operations in Western Australia had been
seriously affected by industrial action in the three quarters to the end of
March.
Mr Hugh Morgan, managing director, said overall production was satisfactory,
but nickel and gold output had been affected by the company's long-running
dispute with the miners' union.
WMC's third-quarter production report showed that ore treated at Kambalda
fell to 763,000 tonnes over the first nine months, compared with 910,024
tonnes in the comparable period of the previous year.
The company has been in dispute with the unions at Kambalda since last year.
A 19-day strike ended earlier this month when workers were ordered to return
by the Western Australian Industrial Relations Commission.
WMC says negotiations are continuing, but claims that Kambalda can only
remain open if workers agree to replace five-day mining in shifts with
continuous mining over seven days.
The group announced in November that it intended to abandon plans for a
ADollars 105m (USDollars 80.7m) expansion of nickel production at Kambalda
because of opposition from the union, which it said had 'reneged' on an
earlier deal.
The proposed expansion would have increased deep mining at several mines in
the Kambalda area, where WMC produces around 35,000 tonnes of nickel a year.
The project was part of a ADollars 400m programme intended to increase the
group's nickel output to 65,000 tonnes a year from 53,000.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                   NRI TOKYO BOND INDEX
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                   PERFORMANCE INDEX
                                     Average
December 1983 = 100                  yield   Last   12 wks   26 wks
                          23/4/92     (%)    week     ago      ago
Overall                    172.07   5.52   172.20   170.98   164.48
Government Bonds           170.37   5.43   170.71   169.92   162.73
Municipal Bonds            173.39   5.99   173.00   172.60   166.71
Govt.- guaranteed Bonds     176.15   5.97   175.78   174.90   169.15
Bank Debentures            168.33   5.23   168.50   166.69   160.68
Corporate Bonds            174.88   6.28   174.68   172.68   166.85
Yen-denom.  Foreign Bonds  179.59   6.86   179.36   176.81   171.95
Government 10-year??         5.82            5.74     5.56     5.97
?? Estimated par yield
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Nomura Research Institute
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11252</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Japanese stores turn in sharp falls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN BUTLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
JAPAN's department stores saw profits fall sharply last year as business
conditions turned sour following a period of rapid expansion that left
companies saddled with high depreciation expenses.
Supermarket chains none the less reported rising sales and profits as
foodstuffs remained one of the few areas of consumer spending unaffected by
the downturn in the economy.
Mitsukoshi, Japan's largest department store group, said pre-tax profits
fell by 43.1 per cent to Y10.99bn (Dollars 81.7m) in the year to the end of
February. Sales rose by a sluggish 1.1 per cent to Y876.6bn as consumers
reduced purchases of luxury items.
Mitsukoshi blamed the profit decline on a rise in capital investment, and
said that capital spending in the current fiscal year would be Y25bn below
last year's Y68.3bn. After-tax earnings were down by 38.3 per cent to
Y5.0bn, and the company said net earnings were expected to decline by
another 25 per cent in the current year.
Takashimaya said its pre-tax profits fell by 34.8 per cent to Y13.35bn,
while sales rose by 9.8 per cent to Y839.8bn. Management costs and the cost
of sales both rose, while financing costs increased.
The company reported a 73.9 per cent plunge in after-tax profits to Y5.1bn
and predicted that another difficult year lay ahead.
Matsuzakaya said pre-tax profits fell by 30.2 per cent to Y10.02m in the
year to the end of February, the first decline in eight years.
Although sales rose by 7.6 per cent to Y501.96m, depreciation costs doubled
to Y8.6bn. After-tax profits were off by 73.3 per cent to Y4,027m.
Pre-tax profits at Daimaru were off by 39.4 per cent to Y6.07bn as a result
of the higher cost of sales and rising interest payments. Sales were up
marginally to Y608.3bn as clothing and art sales were hit.
Net profits were boosted by an extraordinary gain of Y1.1bn in land sales,
but were still down by 9.7 per cent to Y3.19bn.
In the supermarket sector, Daiei, which boasts the largest sales, enjoyed a
rise in pre-tax profits of 3.3 per cent to Y27.54bn. Sales rose by 10 per
cent to Y2,025.9bn, boosted in part by Daiei's takeover of its affiliate in
Hokkaido.
After tax, profits rose from Y8.9bn to 9.3bn, and Daiei said profits would
continue to rise this year, in part because of its recently established ties
with Chujitsuya, a supermarket company active in the Tokyo area.
Ito-Yokado, which controls the Seven-Eleven chain, reported a 9.4 per cent
rise in pre-tax profits to Y97.1bn. Sales were up by 7.7 per cent to
Y1,459.6bn. After-tax profits were up by 21.8 per cent to Y53.7bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11253</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Girozentrale in public offering
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC FREY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   VIENNA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GIROZENTRALE, Austria's third largest bank, plans an initial public share
offering later this year aimed at widening its ownership beyond the saving
banks which presently control it, writes Eric Frey in Vienna.
Mr Hans Haumer, chairman, said Girozentrale has approved capital of ASch500m
which it can offer as common stock to the public and convert its publicly
traded profit-sharing notes, a hybrid between debt and equity, into
preferred shares. Timing or terms were not specified.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11254</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: US retailers show improvement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TWO bankrupt US retailers, Ames Department Stores and California's Carter
Hawley Hale, have reported results for the quarter ended January 1992
showing some improvement in their operations.
Carter said it made a Dollars 36.2m profit before interest expenses,
reorganisation costs and other non-operating items, in the 13 weeks ended
February 1, compared with a Dollars 16m profit last time. Sales were Dollars
693.3m against Dollars 753.3m. However, Dollars 113.9m for reorganisation
costs meant that the net loss widened from Dollars 72.7m to Dollars 102.3m.
At Ames, there was a small after-tax profit of Dollars 8.1m in the three
months to January 25, compared with last time's Dollars 26.8m deficit - the
first since it filed for bankruptcy protection in April 1990. The company
had sales of Dollars 816.4m, against Dollars 945.8m in the same period a
year earlier.
Meanwhile, at R. H. Macy, the New York-based retailer which also filed for
Chapter 11 earlier this year, control of the company's board is in the
process of reverting from 'inside' managers to 'outside' directors. Macy was
subject to a Dollars 3.5bn leveraged buy-out in 1986, and managers held a
majority of board positions prior to the bankruptcy.
However, a spokesman for the company said that a clause in the buy-out
agreement specified that board control would revert to outside investors if
bankruptcy occurred - and procedure had, accordingly, been put into effect.
Alexander's, another ailing New York department store group, declined to
comment in a response to an inquiry by the New York Stock Exchange on a
sudden rise in its shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11255</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: China Light advances 13% to HKDollars
1.55bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINA Light and Power, the Hong Kong utility controlled by the Kadoorie
family, announced HKDollars 1.55bn (USDollars 200m) profits after tax and
transfers under the Government Scheme of Control for the six months ended
March 1992.
This represented a 13 per cent increase from the HKDollars 1.37bn in 1991
and was broadly in line with market expectations. CLP said that present
indications suggested a slow down in the growth of earnings for the full
year.
Turnover increased 14.4 per cent to HKDollars 5.6bn from HKDollars 4.9bn
while profit after tax but before scheme of control transfers increased 38
per cent to HKDollars 1.28bn.
The directors declared a second interim dividend, representing a half year
pay-out of 44 cents. This was 22 per cent higher than 1991.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 18
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11256</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Downiebrae declines
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Pre-tax profits at Downiebrae Holdings fell from Pounds 634,000 to Pounds
423,000 in 1991, and the dividend is halved to 0.5p per share.
Turnover improved to Pounds 1.56m (Pounds 1.5m) but trading profit slumped
to Pounds 5,700 (Pounds 53,000) as margins came under pressure. Pipe flange
manufacturing lost Pounds 9,000 (profit Pounds 3,000) and profile cutting
made profits of Pounds 15,000 (Pounds 50,000).
Net rental income was static at Pounds 54,500, interest on cash deposits
fell to Pounds 85,000 (Pounds 124,000) and investment income to Pounds
393,000 (Pounds 499,000).
Earnings per share worked through at 1.93p (3.19p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11257</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Usborne in red
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Usborne, the agricultural services, property and motor products group, fell
into pre-tax losses of Pounds 4.12m in the 1991 year against profits of
Pounds 1.63m.
Continuing businesses were profitable but the results were hit by a Pounds
4.1m share of an associates loss and losses connected with discontinued
businesses of Pounds 1.17m. The company said the continuing businesses made
profits in the early months of the present year.
Turnover was Pounds 210m (Pounds 193.9m). After a tax credit of Pounds
167,000 (Pounds 531,000 charge) and an extraordinary charge of Pounds
163,000 (Pounds 648,000) there was a loss for the year of Pounds 4.05m
(Pounds 529,000).
Losses per share were 6.03p (1.68p earnings). A reduced final dividend of
0.3p is proposed making 0.4p (1.5p) for the year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11258</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Youghal loss up
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Increased pre-tax losses of IPounds 3.7m (Pounds 3.4m) were announced by
Youghal Carpets (Holdings), the County Cork-based carpets and textiles
group, for 1991. For 1990 the loss was IPounds 2.84m.
The directors said the results were severely affected by the recession in
the UK where demand for carpets had been affected by the slow-down in house
sales.
In the Irish Republic carpet sales were in line with the previous year. A
fall in yarn sales also reflected the difficult market conditions in the UK.
Strenuous efforts were being made to control costs.
Turnover dropped to IPounds 48.3m (IPounds 55.2m) with an operating loss of
IPounds 1.33m (IPounds 255,000), and there was an exceptional loss of
IPounds 456,000 (IPounds 401,000) being mainly redundancy costs.
Loss per share amounted to 8.33p (6.09p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11259</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Clayton pays less
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Clayton Son &amp; Co (Holdings), the engineering group, finished 1991 with a
pre-tax loss of Pounds 491,000, after Pounds 314,000 at the half way stage,
and is cutting the final dividend to 3p.
The interim was omitted. In the previous year the interim was 2.5p and the
final 9.3p, from pre-tax profits of Pounds 543,000.
Turnover in 1991 improved from Pounds 17.4m to Pounds 19.7m but generated a
loss of Pounds 202,000 (profit Pounds 642,000). Net interest payable rose to
Pounds 297,000 (Pounds 42,000).
Losses per share were 8.89p (earnings 13.8p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11260</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Acorn back to annual profit
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ACORN COMPUTER Group covered from its first half loss to record a pre-tax
profit of Pounds 274,000 for 1991, compared to Pounds 1.58m.
The previous year included Pounds 561,000 exceptional credits.
Sales in the second half regained the levels of previous years to finish at
Pounds 40.9m (Pounds 45.5m), gross margins were improved and operating
expenses well controlled.
With interest costs falling as the cash position improved, the second half
provided a profit of Pounds 694,000. Earnings for the year were 0.4p (2.4p).
Over the year the opening overdraft of Pounds 6.5m was turned into a cash
balance of Pounds 1.4m by December 31.
The group retained its position as the leading supplier in its major market,
UK education. However, spending in the consumer market was severely hit by
the recession.
The Australian and New Zealand companies were making good progress.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11261</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Taunton Cider and Kenwood ready to make
market debut
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PEGGY HOLLINGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THIS SUMMER will see two rapidly-growing newcomers on the stock market with
the flotations of Taunton Cider, Britain's second-largest cider maker, and
Kenwood Appliances, one of the UK's leading household equipment
manufacturers.
Taunton Cider has chosen July for its stock market debut, little more than a
year after the Pounds 100m management buy-out from brewers Bass, Courage and
Scottish &amp; Newcastle.
The listing is expected to value the Somerset-based maker of Red Rock and
Diamond White ciders at between Pounds 130m and Pounds 150m. It is believed
the flotation could double the value of shares held by some 96 per cent of
the company's 500 employees.
Taunton is expected to sell just under 50 per cent of its shares. The group,
advised by merchant bankers Samuel Montagu and brokers James Capel, will
launch a prospectus in June. Forecasts are for profits of about Pounds 16m
this year.
Kenwood Appliances, which was bought by management and Candover Investments
from Thorn EMI for Pounds 56m in 1989, will have a market value of between
Pounds 80m and Pounds 100m, said Mr Timothy Parker, the 36-year-old chief
executive.
Although the flotation date has not been set, Mr Parker said it was likely
to be after annual results are published in June.
The nine-strong management team will end up with about 10 per cent of the
Kenwood shares, he added.
The group aims to raise between Pounds 40m and Pounds 50m, the bulk of which
will be used to pay off Kenwood's Pounds 35m debt.
Sales for the year to the end of March 1992 had increased from Pounds 76m to
Pounds 90m, Mr Parker said. Forecasts are for pre-tax profits of more than
Pounds 9m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11262</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Ramco Oil halved to Pounds 526,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ramco Oil Services, USM-quoted provider of tubes for the oil industry,
reported halved profits in 1991 on turnover down from Pounds 4.78m to Pounds
4.11m.
Pre-tax profits were Pounds 526,000 (Pounds 1.13m) with the fall at the
operating level from Pounds 1.2m to Pounds 343,000. Earnings were down from
3.96p to 2.39p but the dividend is held at 2p per share.
Mr Stephen Kemp, chairman and chief executive, said prospects were good.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11263</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Rationalisation costs leave Jourdan Pounds
519,000 in the red
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THOMAS Jourdan, the industrial conglomerate, traded at break-even in 1991
but after exceptional charges ran up a loss of Pounds 519,000, compared with
a profit of Pounds 1.21m.
The final dividend is again 1p, but that means a cut from 2.5p to 1.5p in
the total. Losses per share were 1.47p (earnings 5.92p).
Sales dropped by 16 per cent to Pounds 25.5m but four of the five
subsidiaries traded profitably. However, losses at Woodstock Furniture and
Pounds 539,000 exceptional rationalisation expenses (Pounds 322,000 credits)
led to the year's deficit.
The scale of Woodstock's operations were cut back sharply both in 1991 and
early 1992 but, like other luxury kitchen makers, it suffered from much
lower domestic demand because of the inactivity of the housing market and
lack of consumer confidence.
In the other sectors (electric appliances, household textiles, china and
pottery, brushes) action taken was a combination of seeking additional
business and cutting back fixed overheads at least in line with the decline
in sales.
Despite the adverse trading gearing was cut from 20 per cent to below 10 per
cent through control of working capital and particulary by control of
stocks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11264</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / UK Company News: Five Oaks Investment makes good progress
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CONSIDERABLE progress was made by Five Oaks Investment, the property group,
in the six months ended December 31 1991, the pre-tax loss being cut from
Pounds 7.88m to Pounds 371,000.
Rental income improved from Pounds 1.48m to Pounds 1.56m, while sales from
investment properties were only Pounds 207,000 (Pounds 1.12m). The biggest
factor, however, was no provision for reduction in value of completed
developments, against Pounds 8.3m last time.
Vacant space in the income producing portfolio had fallen from 5.8 per cent
at the year-end to only 3.5 per cent to date.
In February the Court confirmed the scheme to offset the deficit on
distributable reserves. No ordinary dividend can be recommended yet, nor, in
the absence of reserves, can preference payments be resumed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 16
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11265</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Outram mbo team outbids Pearson
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A MANAGEMENT buy-out team at George Outram, publisher of the Glasgow-based
Herald and Evening Times, looks as if it has outbid Pearson, the publishing
and industrial group, by offering Pounds 75m in the battle for the company.
Mr Tiny Rowland's Lonrho group is believed to have given the team, led by Mr
Liam Kane, managing director, an exclusive option until the end of this
month.
The management team is backed by Scottish financial institutions including
the Royal Bank of Scotland, and Robert Fleming, the London merchant bank.
Pearson, owner of the Financial Times, bid around Pounds 70m.
The planned sale is part of a campaign by Lonrho to reduce debt. It follows
the disposal of Lonrho's Scottish weekly newspapers in a Pounds 45m deal to
Trinity International, publisher of the Liverpool Post and Echo.
Mr Frank Barlow, Pearson group managing director, declined to comment on the
Outram deal yesterday. However, Pearson has a record of not getting involved
in acquisition auctions so an increased bid is unlikely. It will probably
become involved again only if the mbo fails.
Because an mbo deal would not be a concentration of ownership it would not
have to be referred to the Monopolies and Mergers Commission, thereby
speeding up the disposal.
A return to Scottish ownership will also fit in with the present
devolutionary mood among many Scots.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11266</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Axa plans to sell insurance directly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER and ALICE RAWSTHORN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON, PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AXA, the second-largest French insurance group, is launching direct sales of
motor insurance, a move which could have significant consequences for
France's insurance market.
Mr Claud Bebear, Axa chairman, said his group planned substantial investment
in the venture over the next five years. The initiative, begun earlier this
month in the Paris area, involves selling directly to the public through the
mass media, direct mail, and by telephone.
Axa is the first of the large French companies to sell motor insurance
directly. Until now the major companies have sold policies through their
agents. However, two smaller French insurers, Azur and Lloyd Continental,
have already established direct sales operations as have two UK companies -
General Accident and Commercial Union.
In the past the French majors have been reluctant to begin direct selling
for fear of alienating the agents which have had exclusive rights to sell
their products. Agents also act as a barrier against new entrants to the
French market thereby detering potential international competitors.
However, pressure is growing for change from the agents, many of which
favour breaking ties to individual insurers so they can act as brokers. The
French majors also face increasing competition from the growing band of
mutual companies which claim 29 per cent of the French market for motor and
home insurance policies.
Large companies like Axa have been encouraged by the success of direct sales
companies elsewhere in northern Europe, particularly in the UK, where direct
writers - such as Direct Line, the subsidiary of the Royal Bank of Scotland
 -now have a market share of about 10 per cent. Mr Bebear estimates the
market for direct sales in France could be of a similar size.
The Axa chairman also alluded to his group's possible ambitions in the UK.
Axa's two existing UK non-life operations - Westgate and London &amp; Hull - are
both niche operations. Its other UK subsidiary, Axa Equity &amp; Law, has a more
sizeable share of the life assurance sector.
Mr Bebear said his aim was for Axa's UK subsidiary to be at least a third as
big as the top UK composites.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11267</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Economics Notebook: G10, IFIs, the IMF and the gift of the
Gab
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The world's international financial institutions (IFIs) are in the business
of making a yawn out of a crisis.
The drama surrounding the west's financial bail-out of Russia and the other
successor republics of the former Soviet Union is a case in point where one
world problem has been dressed up in the most boring language imaginable.
The full story involves getting to grips with such financial arcana as the
Group of 10 - a club of the world's richest industrial nations that, for
reasons that would take too long to explain here, is comprised of 11
countries - and another monetary obscurity, the General Arrangements to
Borrow (Gab).
Early today in Washington, G10 finance ministers and central bank governors
will meet to activate the Gab. This humdrum sentence is a stark warning that
putting Russia and the other republics on the road to market capitalism will
cost the west dear and could outrun existing financial resources.
The Gab, in IFI-speak, is a 'facility' by which the 11 G10 nations can lend
currency reserves to the IMF so that it, in turn, can lend more to countries
in need. Barring last-minute surprises, the G10 will reach an agreement in
principle today to use the Gab to finance a Dollars 6bn IMF stabilisation
fund to support the rouble - with the proviso that Russia and other
republics using the rouble as their currency comply with strict IMF monetary
and economic conditions before they can tap the fund.
It will be the first time the Gab has been used to help finance an IMF
support programme since 1978 and since the Gab agreement was changed in
1983. Those changes boosted the cash available to the IMF through the GAB to
SDR17bn when expressed in the fund's own reserve currency (about Dollars
23.2bn) and allowed its use to support IMF lending to countries other than
G10 members. In 1983 Saudi Arabia also agreed to provide SDR1.5bn of credit
that could be used with the Gab.
The 1983 changes were agreed to give the IMF sufficient resources to deal
with the Latin American debt crisis. It is a measure of the fund's current
problems that it survived the 1980s without using the GAB and is only now
calling on the G10 to assist.
The Gab is not activated on trivial grounds. According to IMF rules, the
fund's managing director may only draw on the GAB 'if, after consultation,
he considers that the fund faces an inadequacy of resources to meet actual
and expected requests for financing that reflect the existence of an
exceptional situation associated with balance of payments problems of
members of a character or aggregate size that could threaten the stability
of the international monetary system.' (my italics)
Taken at face value, these conditions might suggest the Russians, having
renounced communism, now constitute a greater threat to the international
monetary system than when the former Soviet Union was pledged to the
destruction of the capitalist west.
A more plausible explanation for the IMF turning to the G10 is that it is
strapped for cash.
At first sight, no statement could seem further from the truth. The fund has
capital of Dollars 123bn, or SDR90bn, derived from the subscriptions of its
member countries. It also has borrowings from Japan and Saudi Arabia to
finance special operations.
However, the IMF cannot use all its resources to support economic reform
because there will always be some members in trouble and so recipients of
loans. But its liquidity in recent years has been remarkably stable.
At the extreme, it believes it could draw on around 60 per cent of total
quotas, or SDR54bn, to meet the needs of its less fortunate members.
Adopting a more cautious approach to reflect possible balance of payments
problems among fundamentally sound countries, the fund's usable resources
based on quotas fall to around SDR40bn.
The fund has already loaned about SDR25bn of which about SDR4bn is covered
by borrowings that will have to be paid back over the next two to five
years. For the time being, the IMF's 'pure liquidity' is estimated at
between SDR21bn and SDR22bn.
The problem facing Mr Michel Camdessus, IMF managing director, is that these
funds will be increasingly in demand over the next six to nine months.
In 1990, the IMF committed itself to lending between SDR4bn and SDR5bn. Last
year the figure went up to SDR10bn and a further SDR10bn of commitments is
expected this year. Of these commitments, an estimated SDR7bn to SDR8bn
still has to be disbursed.
The queue of countries wanting support is growing daily:
Russia is in line for a Dollars 4bn IMF standby credit as well as the
Dollars 6bn rouble stabilisation loan to help fill an estimated financing
gap of Dollars 24bn this year.
The other 14 former Soviet republics could require total western support of
Dollars 20bn in 1992, some of which would come from the fund.
India is in the throws of far-reaching market-oriented economic reforms that
require and deserve financial support.
Southern Africa, with 13 nations suffering from the worst drought this
century, will also have big claims on the IMF.
The 1990s have so far thrown four great challenges at economic policy
makers. German unification, the reform of eastern Europe, the economic
transformation of the former Soviet Union and reconstruction after the Gulf
War may increase total investment needs by more than Dollars 100bn a year
between 1992 and 1996, according to the IMF.
Throw into the equation the blocking so far by the US Congress of a quota
increase for the fund to lift resources drawn from membership subscriptions
by 50 per cent to around SDR136bn, and it is clear why Mr Camdessus has
asked the G10 to activate the Gab.
One of the few near certainties in an uncertain world, is that the IMF's
managing director will be back for more support from his richest member
countries before long.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 15
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11268</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Letter: Right time
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ERIK SKON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, When Margaret Thatcher and Ronald Reagan rose to power it was because
they represented political changes wanted by the majority of the people in
Britain and the US.
Today, the main single difference between Majorism and Thatcherism, no
doubt, is that John Major seems to have realised that you cannot just turn
the clocks back; you have also to come up with the contemporary solutions
and ideas. John Major represents the kind of politician who gives people of
the western world a glimmer of hope for the future. Let us just hope that we
can say the same about the next US president. Erik Skon,
45 Naresfield Gardens,
London NW3 5TE
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11269</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Letter: Financial necessities
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr A J WEDGWOOD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Companies' annual reports are a vital means of communication. It is
encouraging that some attempt has been made to measure their effectiveness
('Annual reports marked 'could do better'', April 23). This can even be
developed into an entertaining parlour game.
But am I alone in my concern at the implication that financial analysts need
spend no more than 100 seconds, and preferably less, on extracting five key
items of financial information - and the related inference that five such
items are all that they need?
A J Wedgwood,
partner,
KPMG Peat Marwick,
1 Puddle Dock,
Blackfriars, London EC4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11270</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Letter: Fallacy and geography in banking competition (2)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr RUSSELL LONGMUIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, As the political and legal barriers recede throughout the European
Community, it is still mystifying that in some quarters the UK is not
considered part of Europe. Your eminent correspondent, Prof Bain, appears to
highlight this perfectly when he states that a bid for Midland Bank from a
'European bank' would avoid the competition concerns that would accompany a
bid from Lloyds.
To think of UK banks (and for that matter UK companies) in terms of being
non-European and to consider the effects of takeovers purely in terms of the
domestic market will not help British banks (or companies) to compete on an
equal footing with their French, German, Swiss and Spanish counterparts,
both in Europe and at a global level.
I am sure that many people consider Lloyds Bank to be a European bank and
indeed, no doubt, at some point, a senior official from Lloyds may point out
to Prof Bain that Lloyds has more representation in Germany and Spain than
it does in Scotland, where Prof Bain resides.
Russell Longmuir,
668 Greenwich Street,
Apt 819,
New York, NY 10014, US
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11271</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Letter: Fallacy and geography in banking competition (1)
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr GEOFFREY PACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, There is a fallacy that more banks mean more competition. Anyone with
experience of the banking system in the US or, for that matter, of certain
countries within the EC would testify to this.
The biggest threat to competition within the banking system comes not from
whether there is one more or one less bank in the market but from
over-regulation. While a degree of regulation is clearly necessary for the
protection of depositors and for the overall health of the financial system,
there is plenty of circumstantial evidence to suggest that protecting the
existing status quo of the four clearing banks in the UK would mean less
efficiency and less competition.
An efficient banking market means keeping the market open to change and new
entrants. There are a number of well qualified institutions which could
compete in the product areas mentioned in Professor Bain's letter (April 21)
and, by adopting an open market policy within a supervised environment, the
regulatory authorities could ensure benefits to all interested parties -
depositors, borrowers, shareholders and the public. Geoffrey Pack,
67 Hilltop Drive,
Chappagua,
New York 10514, US
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11272</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Letter: Another measure of Hungary's creditworthiness
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr LASZLO CZIRJAK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I congratulate Nicholas Denton and the Financial Times for the
comprehensiveness and insight of the article, 'A kiss of life from across
the border' (April 21). However, while the article presented the most
pertinent issues in their complexities, it failed to extract one key issue.
From economic or credit perspective analysis, rather than citing just the
per capita indebtedness. A more relative and demonstrative measure of
Hungary's creditworthiness emerges through the application of the
debt/service ratio. Hungary was able almost to double its hard currency
export in about a year, which contributed significantly to reducing the
debt/service ratio to less than 40 per cent at the end of 1991. Moreover,
the net debt has also bean reduced to Dollars 13bn in this year, while
inflation was kept at below the 30 per cent level. Finally, industrial
exports may prove less problematic with low wages, yet the existing high
science-education level in Hungary is the relevant factor for the future.
Laszlo Czirjak,
47 Lafayette Place, 5B,
Greenwich,
Connecticut, 06830, US
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11273</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Letter: Threats posed by the patenting of genes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Drs R C WHELAN and JOHN SAVIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, You correctly state in your editorial: 'Don't patent human genes'
(April 24). The current mess over patents with no proof of gene function is
extremely dangerous. We sympathise with the position that the Medical
Research Council has been forced to take and note that it is easy for other
countries to take the moral high ground when they have not yet done any
scientific work in this area.
It is, however, our observation that this is a dispute that has occurred too
soon in the genome project: it will generate heat but little light on a
critical area for industry. Such National Institutes of Health or MRC
patents, even if granted (possible in the US, very unlikely in Europe), are
not likely to protect subsequent inventions. Attempts to claim anything but
token royalties and fees will certainly result in the NIH being sued by
major US drug companies.
CEST's real worry is that these issues are hampering industrial investment
in genome research. This is the subject of a CEST lead project involving EC,
MRC and European industry.
The dispute may also stir up further 'green' political pressure. By 2000,
this could result in a Europe devoid of a significant biotechnology industry
and dependent for advanced healthcare products on the US.
Genome technologies offer the first real hope of tackling the diseases of
old age, like cancer and arthritis, that will be endemic in the greying
Europe of 2010. That is the real tragedy of this unfortunate international
protectionism by the US government. James Watson is to be applauded as one
of the few Americans to speak out against this policy.
R C Whelan,
John Savin,
Centre for Exploitation of Science and Technology,
5 Berners Road,
Islington,
London N1 0PW
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11274</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Leading Article: A strategy on asylum
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR ALL their local difficulties caused by economic slowdown, the rich
industrialised countries are now, more than ever, havens of peace and
stability for fugitives from troubled parts of the world. Even a
recession-hit island cannot insulate itself from the trend. Britain
registered 45,000 applications for political asylum last year. Although
making up less than 10 per cent of all asylum requests in western Europe,
the UK figure was 10 times as large as in 1988.
The British government saw a political need for action. Last November it set
out legislation to toughen significantly the conditions for foreigners
requesting refugee status. After the Asylum Bill ran into a torrent of
criticism from churchmen, lawyers and the United Nations, the government
toned down some aspects, and then abandoned efforts to push the legislation
through parliament before the general election.
This was a wise decision. An attempt to rush through the measure, ignoring
objections that it was neither just nor practicable, would have looked like
crude expediency.
When the bill makes a renewed appearance in the Queen's Speech on May 6, the
government can make maximum use of the calmer post-election atmosphere. It
should take full account of criticism that the bill, particularly by greatly
restricting appeal procedures, could have turned away refugees with a
genuine case for protection from persecution. Only then will parliament be
able to vote through new measures with a clear conscience.
Backlog of cases
There is no doubt of the general need throughout the west for measures to
improve screening of asylum applicants and speed up processing. Britain has
a backlog of 60,000 undecided asylum cases. This not only clogs up the
system, but also prevents attention being focused on the most vulnerable.
Bureaucratic inefficiency has provided loopholes for unscrupulous applicants
to request asylum in several different names, enabling them to lodge
multiple claims for social security benefits.
To combat fraud and speed verification of claims, the Home Office has
increased its processing staff 12-fold since 1988. Tighter administrative
procedures since last autumn have already had a substantial effect in
reducing abuse. As a result of closer checks into bogus asylum requests, the
government now admits that last year's figure of 45,000 applications was
inflated.
Over-recording
The full extent of the asylum 'phantoms' is not yet known. But a drop of
more than half in the number of UK applications in the first three months
this year gives an idea of the scale of last year's statistical
over-recording. Had the government this spring pushed through an
unnecessarily draconian bill on the basis of application figures now known
to have been exaggerated, the result would have been a travesty.
As it is, the government now has the opportunity to think again before a new
bill becomes law, either in the autumn or in summer next year. There is a
strong case for western governments to harmonise regulations for dealing
with asylum-seekers. The feature of the Asylum Bill allowing introduction of
finger-printing - in line with the position in all EC countries except
Ireland - is clearly sensible.
If asylum is to be preserved, its credibility must also be maintained. For
this reason, those seeking a better economic life must be distinguished from
those motivated by fear of persecution, however arbitrary that distinction
may sometimes appear.
But for economic refugees, too, a policy will have to be found, one that
allows at least some immigration. More important, however, is the need to
give hope to people in the places where they now live. If western
governments are unwilling to open the door to goods from developing
countries, they are likely to face flows of people instead.
A more generous economic policy would be thrice blessed: it would enrich
those who offer greater opportunities for trade; it would enrich those who
receive them; and, by alleviating poverty, it should also help reduce the
political instability and oppression that creates seekers of political
asylum.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11275</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4ABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Leading Article: Isolating Serbia
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE IS now a very broad international consensus that Serbia bears the
largest share of responsibility for the fighting in Bosnia-Hercegovina, and
that the man who can stop it, if anyone, is the Serbian president, Mr
Slobodan Milosevic.
That should not be taken as implying that Serbia alone is to blame. Croatia,
though publicly supporting Bosnia's independence and territorial integrity,
appears to be playing a double game which will allow it either to absorb the
whole republic into some kind of anti-Serb confederation or, if that fails,
to annex the areas of western Hercegovina and northern Bosnia which have a
substantial Croat population. And even the Moslem president of
Bosnia-Hercegovina, Mr Alija Izetbegovic, has recently shown signs of
reneging on his previous moderation, by speaking of a Moslem republic rather
than a multinational one.
The Serbs, for their part, do have some valid arguments. In refusing to let
the issue of independence be settled by majority vote they are invoking
precisely the same logic that was used against them when they suggested a
nationwide referendum to settle the fate of Yugoslavia. In such cases a vote
proves only that one community is larger than the other.
Nor is it true that Mr Milosevic is in complete control of their actions. As
in Croatia, much of the actual fighting is being done by irregular forces
with no clear chain of command. The federal army, many of whose officers are
themselves Bosnian Serbs, is certainly not neutral, but it does not fully
control the local commanders; nor is it directly answerable to Mr Milosevic.
Small enclave
What clearly is true, however, in spite of his denials, is that many of the
irregular forces do emanate from Serbia, and that they have embarked on a
strategy of evicting the Moslems from the towns of eastern Bosnia, until all
of them are bottled up in a small enclave around Sarajevo.
The international community is casting around for ways of convincing the
Serbs that this strategy does not serve their best interests. Military
intervention on the ground is most unlikely and in such a complex situation
would almost certainly do more harm than good - though the option of an air
strike should be kept in reserve to deter the federal airforce from
intervening. The main focus for the time being is on ways of isolating
Serbia.
The only European state which seems intent on thwarting this, and thereby
encouraging Serbia in a self-destructive policy, is Greece. This is to be
explained partly by solidarity among Orthodox Christians, but more
particularly by a shared hostility towards independent Macedonia.
Self-defeating policy
Trapped by an inflamed public opinion and a demagogic opposition, the Greek
government is looking increasingly foolish, and isolating itself within the
EC. It is very unwise to brush aside the explicit renunciation of
territorial claims which Macedonia has written into its constitution, and
thereby to undermine the political standing of the moderate and
statesmanlike Macedonian president, Mr Kiro Gligorov. Moreover, its blockade
of Macedonia has the effect of cutting the overland route by which Greek
goods reach central and northern Europe, and many European tourists reach
Greece. There could hardly be a more self-defeating policy.
Greece's attitude makes it unlikely that an oil embargo on Serbia would
succeed, since oil can reach Serbia through the Greek port of Salonica. Nor
can sanctions do much more damage than has already been done to the ruined
Serbian economy.
In adopting any such measures foreign governments must not lose sight of the
objective, which can only be to make the Serbs reflect seriously on the
future they are building for themselves: a future in which they would have
to reckon with the irreconcilable hostility of their neighbours, whose
territory would be crowded with refugees demanding the restoration of their
homes. Even now a political agreement, under which the Serbs of Bosnia would
agree to support and participate in an independent Bosnian government while
retaining links with their kith and kin in Serbia proper, offers a far more
hopeful prospect.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11276</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The big squeeze in Japan: Companies face a series of
challenges in a changing economy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The recent turmoil in the Tokyo stock market heralds profound changes in the
Japanese economy. Companies fear that the decline in the Nikkei average
indicates something far more serious than a cyclical slowdown. They are
bracing themselves for changes as far-reaching as those caused by the two
oil shocks of the 1970s and the rapid rise of the yen in the mid-1980s.
As Mr Takeshi Nagano, chairman of Keizaidoyukai, the employers'
organisation, said in an interview recently: 'The stock market is weak
because everything is so unclear. The Japanese economy is not weak but its
future is very fuzzy. It's difficult to form a consensus about what to do.'
The main challenge facing business is the increase in capital costs, which
followed the collapse of the financial boom of the 1980s. Other difficulties
include growing labour shortages, spreading deregulation and the rise of
protectionism in the US, the largest buyer of Japanese exports. Moreover,
urgent economic reforms that might stimulate growth are being delayed by
government inaction, including the further liberalisation of agriculture,
transport and land-use laws. After nearly 40 years in power, the ageing
ruling Liberal Democratic Party is losing its vigour.
Faced with the prospect of retrenchment, many Japanese executives are
considering a switch from high-volume/low-margin production, which has
served Japan well since the Second World War, to a low-volume/high-margin
strategy.
Japan has the capacity to implement reform, not least because of the skill
of its workers, the capital reserves of its manufacturing companies and the
healthy state of government finances. Moreover, companies may have the time
to make changes because many of their foreign rivals are facing difficulties
caused by the global recession.
The most sudden challenge to arise has been the increase in the cost of
capital. In 1989, equity-linked funds cost less than 1 per cent. Even bank
borrowings cost blue-chip borrowers less than 4 per cent. Today, equity
fund-raising is hard, and commercial loans cost about 6 per cent. Also,
weighed down by bad property loans, banks' capacity to lend is shrinking.
Industry has not yet felt the pinch, because the economy is slowing, but a
recovery could end prematurely in credit shortages. Mr Akio Morita, chairman
of Sony, the electronics group, said: 'The basic problem for Japanese
industry is the difficulty of financing.'
While investor sentiment will ebb and flow, the shift in capital costs seems
permanent, since it results partly from the financial deregulation of the
past decade. The post-war financial system was designed to channel low-cost
funds to big industry, at the expense of individuals and small companies.
Liberalisation of interest rates has given investors the power to demand
market rates for their money.
Companies also face labour shortages. There are 125 jobs on offer for every
100 job seekers. As the population ages, the number of people of working age
will start falling from 1996. Working hours are also being reduced from an
average of 2,050 in 1990 to a target of 1,800. Labour-saving equipment will
lessen the impact, but the upward pressure on wage costs will not ease.
Business is also being hit by a shortage of land. The cost of land has
forced Tokyo-based Nissan Motor, for example, to build its latest factory in
distant Kyushu, in southern Japan. In spite of the recent sharp price falls,
many businesses cannot afford to buy land in Tokyo or Osaka.
Japanese companies used to respond to domestic pressures by boosting
exports, sometimes dumping goods on world markets at below-cost price.
Today, this practice is much more difficult. With protectionist sentiment
growing in the US and Europe, the Ministry of International Trade and
Industry has been pressing companies to limit export growth. Last month, for
example, carmakers were forced to accept a sharp cut in the ceiling for
exports to the US. Expanding Asian markets will absorb some products - but
not high-value, high-price consumer goods destined for industrialised
countries. The strength of the yen, supported by continuing current account
surpluses, will further squeeze export growth.
Companies would like to rely more on domestic growth. But the prospects have
been dimmed by government inaction on the removal of regulatory constraints.
Land reform is long overdue: in Tokyo, there are still acres of urban farms,
thanks to tax laws which favour using land for crops instead of buildings.
Farm trade liberalisation, including the opening of the rice market to
imports, is even more urgent. By reducing retail food prices, reform could
create new demand for manufactured goods. The Japanese spend 32 per cent of
income on food, compared with 19.5 per cent for Americans.
The LDP-led government lacks the will to act, however. Two years ago it
watered down a land reform bill and is now hesitating over rice imports.
Pressure from this combination of constraints on capital labour and demand
is forcing companies to adopt varying strategies. The pressures on profits
are severe in the principal international industries, particularly
carmaking. Auto companies believe the Japanese market may have reached
saturation - like the US and parts of Europe. Developing countries will
require more cars, but not the high-cost, high-margin models sold in the
industrialised world. Some of Japan's 11 vehicle makers may not survive the
decade. 'We are at a structural turning point for the next one or two
years,' said Mr Yoshifumi Tsuji, president of Nissan Motor.
Electronics makers are still counting on future expansion, notably in office
and factory automation. But in consumer products, the industry has yet to
find a hit to follow the video recorder. The mass commercialisation of
high-definition television seems remote, with the cheapest individual sets
priced at Y1m (Pounds 4,200). Smaller consumer electronics specialists face
grave difficulties, notably the loss-making Sansui. Even Sony suffered an
operating loss for the year to March 1991, its first as a listed company.
It is wrong, however, to generalise. Even within the more hard-pressed
industries some companies, such as the cash-rich Toyota Motor, feel little
pressure from rising capital costs. Whole industries remain buoyant, such as
shipbuilding, owing to orders for big tankers. Consumer services, including
travel, theatres and restaurants, are still expanding.
Nevertheless, overall retail sales are slowing and earnings declining.
Profits have fallen by an estimated average of 15 per cent in the year to
March 1991 for companies included in the Nikkei index, and could drop a
further 10 per cent this year.
The first step for companies is to respond to the cyclical part of the
slowdown. Production is being cut; price-discounting is rampant;
entertainment, advertising and travel are being slashed. Directors are
submitting to pay cuts of up to 35 per cent.
Capital spending is falling. Sony, for instance, is cutting investment in
the year starting this month by Y160bn to Y280bn. Even research and
development spending, precious seedcorn for Japanese groups, is being
trimmed. Hitachi says R&amp;D spending will be held at last year's level, which
means a decline in real terms. Smaller companies are making big cuts: at
Ascii, a software publisher, long-term R&amp;D has been shelved. However, many
businessmen believe these short-term measures will not be enough to cope
with an expected long-term slowdown. 'I'm planning for a seven-year
recession,' said Mr Kazuhiko Nishi, Ascii's president.
Some companies are taking increasingly far-reaching action. Steelmakers, for
example, are reconsidering diversifications: Kawasaki Steel is contemplating
reducing investment in ceramic products. Similarly, companies are
questioning the merits of direct investment overseas: the total fell by 35
per cent last year to Dollars 31.2bn. It will decline further as companies
complete projects started in the late 1980s - such as Toyota's UK assembly
plant  - and postpone new ones.
Equally important are efforts to raise profitability in mainstream
businesses by curbing waste and upgrading products. Matsushita Electric
Industrial, the electronics company, said: 'We are shifting from volume to
quality. This is not a temporary move but a permanent one.' Matsushita,
among others, is also cutting model ranges. An official said: 'The Japanese
television industry produces 300 models. Only 100 can be displayed in the
shops. Only 10 sell well. We can cut this waste without affecting
customers.'
There are also the first signs of corporate consolidation. The Nihon Keizai
Shimbun, the business daily, recently published a list of 31 mergers, mostly
of companies already in the same industrial grouping, or keiretsu. The deals
cover everything from oil distribution to stainless steel.
Do all these changes presage a permanent revolution in Japanese corporate
behaviour, or are they temporary responses to changing circumstances? The
answer is that individual industries and companies will move at different
speeds, but none can fully escape the emerging constraints on growth. The
chase after sales seems certain to give way to a pursuit of profits.
A taste of the future could lie in the industry most exposed to changing
capital costs - banking. Japanese banks have been forced by the erosion of
their capital base to abandon their former hunt for market share in favour
of boosting margins. In international markets, the Japanese share of new
credits to non-bank companies has fallen from 46 per cent in 1985-89 to 5
per cent in 1989 to mid-1991, according to the Bank for International
Settlements.
In manufacturing, too, senior businessmen have begun to contemplate the need
for radical reform. Sony's Mr Akio Morita earlier this year called on
companies to accept that growth had limits and urged giving back more to
employees, shareholders and society - which means earning higher profits and
distributing bigger dividends.
The appeal caused widespread controversy. Mr Yotaro Iida, the chairman of
Mitsubishi Heavy Industries, commented that traditional Japanese capitalism
had strengths as well as weaknesses.
Fundamental change will take time - '10 or 20 years', said Mr Takashi
Ishihara, Nissan's former chairman. Even Mr Morita has said that his
arguments should not be taken as an indication of Sony's policies, only as a
discussion agenda.
However, if the current pressures imposed by the capital markets persist -
as seems likely  - the priority on profit could become permanent. As Mr
Richard Koo, an economist at Nomura Research Institute, an affiliate of
Nomura Securities, said: 'Being a famous name will no longer be enough if a
corporation cannot come up with the goods and offer shareholders a decent
return.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 12
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11277</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Arts: Jordan - Theatre in London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ST GEORGE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Matthew Arnold used to advise against literature which presented suffering
unalleviated by incident. Jordan at the Lilian Baylis Theatre challenges
Arnold: a dramatic monologue based on the life of Shirley Jones, the woman
who killed her son, Jordan, was acquitted of murder in the winter of 1987,
and took her own life on the day she was released from court. This makes
grave and compelling theatre.
If Anna Reynolds' stage-writing debut seems over-emphatic, it is everywhere
blessed with a superb, strong performance from co-writer and solo actor
Moira Buffini as Shirley. She has enough self-consciousness to know her own
desperation and enough madness to self-destruct; and she has the
intelligence to puncture her environment. Also, Fiona Buffini's directing is
meticulous.
The action takes place in a cell beneath the crown court, and flicks
backwards, like some film noir, into Shirley's past: childhood in Morecombe,
motherhood in Portsmouth, remand in Holloway.
Gradually, the details of Shirley's deprived existence emerge. A violent
father gives way to a savage, promiscuous boyfriend who beats both Shirley
and their baby. When the boyfriend leaves, she takes to prostitution,
turning nights with clients into fluffy toys for Jordan.
Out of money, and in desperation, she smothers her child and attempts
suicide; unfortunately she survives to face the rigours of the legal system.
Then follow the psychiatric ward and the court scenes - played from an
oversized chair - which manage both pain and wit. The prosecutor declaims,
'She thinks psychiatrists are a load of crap . . . She is definitely fit to
plead.'
Everywhere the play exalts the ordinary in Shirley's home, the patterns of
survival, in prison the patterns of privilege. Real community exists only in
the maternity ward.
As a women's play tackling women's issues, Jordan needs more acuity; as a
play about imprisonment, this is powerful and knowing. Jordan is never
enjoyable, but always challenging and often enlightening. Remember this is a
true story: Shirley Jones' wonderful bravery deserves to be seen.
Lilian Baylis Theatre (071 837 4104) until 16 May
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11278</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Horizon is devoted to 'Iceman', the body which was found last September by
German hikers on the border between Austria and Italy. Being the seventh
body found on the mountain that year, it was removed in a routine fashion
and only identified later as being 5,300 years old. Artefacts included a
flint knife, copper axe, yew bow, and 14 viburnum arrows. There is immense
excitement in the world of archaeology (8.10 BBC2). BBC1's new sitcom Side
By Side (8.30) sounds like another study of English class attitudes. Gareth
Hunt plays a successful plumber whose DIY home improvements, such as the
'Acropolis' in his garden, irritate his neighbour. Panorama reports on an
apparently chronic water shortage in southern Britain. The south has
suffered its lowest rainfall for 200 years. The programme asks whether
nature alone is to blame, and what can be done (9.30). Most of ITV's evening
is occupied by a two-hour drama about a jazz musician who turns detective
when he becomes involved in a murder mystery: The Jazz Detective runs for an
hour before News At 10 and an hour after.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11279</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Arts: Hamlet - BBC Radio 3/Renaissance Theatre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BA YOUNG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Hamlet turns a new face to every decade, Peter Hall said. Kenneth Branagh's
Hamlet face we have seen. In this recorded production, which he has
co-produced with Glyn Dearman for the Renaissance Theatre Company in
collaboration with the BBC, his face is immaterial; it is his voice that
counts. He could not give a like performance on stage; the soliloquies, for
example, are private, for his own satisfaction (and of course for ours). He
is an assortment of people - a confident young prince, a tearful mourner of
his dead father, a seriously affectionate suitor of Ophelia, a know-it-all
amateur actor, a deadly fencer. One thing he never is, whatever he may say:
he is not mad.
Simple to make Richard Briers's Polonius think so. He is a credulous old
thing, though his advice to Laertes, wiser than often thought, is wisely
impounded. Derek Jacobi's Claudius, not much older than his stepson (who is
thirty), is too actively intelligent to be taken in by such foolery; his
rejected repentance is particularly good. It is easy to persuade Gertrude,
(Judi Dench, ideal) that if her beloved son behaves other than she is used
to there must be something wrong with him. Ophelia (Sophie Thompson) is
never bright enough to know.
On Hamlet's own side we have a sharp Horatio (Michael Williams), and a
sympathetic Fortinbras from James Simmons. Bernardo and Marcellus,
officer-class sentinels, are only too ready to swear silence when the
Ghost's voice threatens from below, for the Ghost is John Gielgud. 'More of
a voice than a character,' Sir John says, yet he effectively mixes anger and
indignation, even in his few lines in Gertrude's closet.
It is great to hear the text as it might have been composed in Shakespeare's
mind, with no secondary concern for scenery or costume or period. The text
is the complete First Folio with the accepted additions from the good
Quarto, and it plays about three and three-quarter hours, with brisk
delivery and comparatively little time given to sound effects.
Ophelia speaks, not sings, her mad songs; if this is to save time, Patrick
Doyle's long intermezzi might have been truncated instead, comely as they
are. Listening with the text in my hand, I noted a good many minor errors,
unless they were editorial changes - worst, when Laertes (James Wilby),
threatening to charge Hamlet 'Thus diest thou', said 'Thus didest thou',
something quite different.
BBC Radio 3, 26 April. Also published as a Random Century Audiobook, on CD
or cassette.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11280</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / People: Cecil Parkinson joins Starmin
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Abdullah brothers, Raschid and Osman, learned a salutary lesson about
what can happen in public companies even when you own significant chunks of
them.
They were ousted at the beginning of 1989 from Evered, the quarry and
building products group which they had turned into an aggressive
mini-conglomerate; now they are determined to do things differently.
With the combined family holding of the Abdullahs' new vehicle, quarry
products company Starmin, standing at around 17 per cent, and the ability to
grow further increasingly dependent on outside shareholders, the time has
come to appoint another non-executive director, in addition to chairman Owen
Rout, and a finance director.
Consequently, former cabinet minister Cecil Parkinson arrives as an
independent director and deputy chairman, the latter post being relinquished
by Raschid Abdullah - who, nevertheless, remains director responsible for
acquisitions and strategy.
At the same time Barry Croucher, for many years financial controller at
Evered and who moved over with the Abdullahs, is promoted to the board as
finance director. Starmin did not have a finance director as such
previously.
Of Parkinson, Raschid Abdullah calls him 'quite an able businessman. We
don't want figureheads just to make the Christmas tree look good'. Parkinson
was a non-executive director of Tarmac and the family business he ran before
entering politics was in the building sector; he is also a qualified
accountant.
'I have known Cecil for five or six years,' adds Abdullah, apparently not
put off by the fact that the introduction was made by Roy Kettle, once at
Tarmac, who took over as chief executive of Evered when the brothers were
ousted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11281</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / People: Flying higher
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Anthony Bolton, one of the most well-known aviation brokers in the London
market, is taking a step up the ladder at CT Bowring, the UK subsidiary of
the world's biggest insurance broking group, Marsh McLennan.
Bolton, now 49, has been appointed chairman of Bowring Worldwide Insurance
Brokers, the Bowring subsidiary that handles wholesale non-marine insurance
business (placing business in the London and other insurance markets on
behalf of retail brokers).
Bolton, who has spent most of his working life with Bowring, was one of a
number of brokers to pioneer the insurance of satellites in London in the
early 1980s.
Bowring has also appointed Norman Waite a director of its marine reinsurance
broking subsidiary, while Roland Seul, a managing partner of Gradmann &amp;
Holler, Marsh &amp; McLennan's German subsidiary, has been appointed a director
of Bowring Marsh &amp; McLennan.
*****
Sir Max Williams has been appointed non-executive deputy chairman of Royal
Insurance, the troubled UK insurance company. Sir Max, now 66, is a former
senior partner of Clifford Chance, and a past president of the Law Society.
He is also a director of 3i, the company chaired by Royal's chairman, Sir
John Cuckney. Sir Max replaces Sir Anthony Tuke, who retired last week.
Sir Anthony (below), chairman of the Savoy Hotel, is a former chairman of
Barclays Bank and of RTZ; he joined the Royal board in 1978 and has been
deputy chairman since 1985.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11282</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / People: Keele professor wants to lessen 'the procedure in
accountancy'
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Richard Wilson, the 45-year-old new professor of management and accounting
at Keele University, likes waving his right arm in the air. 'It works very
nicely, but it would not be much good if you chopped it off.'
This is his way of emphasising the interdisciplinary approach he wants to
build up in the new department of management - recently spun off from
economics and management sciences - which he will also be running, in the
first instance for three years.
Training students to be financially literate rather than churning out
accounting technicians is one aim of a professor who, although a qualified
accountant, is much more interested in stopping gifted students going into
the profession for the wrong reasons.
Indeed, his current research is into the occupational psychology of
financial careers. 'Accountancy is massively oversold. The big firms do not
know what they are looking for, nor do the students.' Still in the middle of
the research, he mentions one trait - tolerance of ambiguity  - that emerges
as essential in a profession that he says is quite wrongly seen as heavily
procedural.
Starting off in industry and still retaining a string of consultancies,
Wilson's own experience ranges from working on a World-Bank-sponsored
project teaching managerial skills in the Egyptian public sector, to making
MBA courses at Nairobi University relevant to east African businessmen. He
also happens to have four degrees - in social research, economics,
management and sociology/technology.
Wilson arrives at Keele after a very short stay as professor of management
control at Queen's University, Belfast - an appointment that, because of the
terms and conditions, did not work out, after he had been head-hunted from
the Nottingham Business School.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11283</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Management: Consensus triumphs over greed - Top salaries in
Germany are fat but not fanciful
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Germans regard the fuss about top people's pay as a phenomenon of the
free-wheeling Anglo-Saxon business world. In the US and Britain, they argue,
attention is paid more to individual than to team effort. Also, in the US
and UK there is greater concentration on short-term performance than on
long-term consistency. For most German companies, quarterly reports are
anathema.
Salaries in Germany are certainly high, but they are not outrageous by
international standards. However, it is sometimes hard to tell quite how
high they are. German companies do not give details of individual
executives' pay, providing only a total for all directors, so salary levels
can be only estimated.
Probably the highest paid executive in Germany is Mark Wossner, the
self-assured head of Bertelsmann, the media group.
Bertelsmann's annual report for 1990-91 gives a figure of DM24.6m (Pounds
8.40m) for management board pay, an average of around DM2.4m for each
director. Taking the rough rule of thumb that the chief executive receives
up to 50 per cent more than the others, Wossner would have earned DM3.5m.
This would put him well ahead of other German high-earners like Eberhard von
Kuenheim of BMW, Edzard Reuter of Daimler-Benz, and Carl Hahn of Volkswagen,
all of whom are likely to have comfortably exceeded DM2m.
Bertelsmann operates a formula intended to keep managers on their toes and
reward them well for entrepreneurial drive. Their pay is divided into three
components: one part fixed, one part relating to group performance, and the
third depending on profitability of the director's division.
Bertelsmann differs from other big German companies in two important ways.
It is not quoted and, because it comes under the press and publishing law,
its board structure is relatively unrestrictive.
Indeed, the make-up of German boards is one reason that excesses are foreign
to managers. The non-executive supervisory boards, which set the level of
executive pay, usually have an equal number of shareholder and labour
representatives. Heinz Evers, a director of Kienbaum, the German management
consultancy, reckons this 'acts as a moderating element'.
So does the presence of ministers or civil servants in companies where the
state has a stake. Below the top companies, he says the usual pay level for
a chief executive is DM400,000, about a third of which is
performance-related or dividend-linked. 'This is good when compared with,
say, a professor or civil servant. They don't expect to be millionaires so
they are satisfied.'
Executives tend to compare their pay with those of their peers in Germany
and the rest of Europe. The high remuneration received, for example, by a
Michael Eisner of Walt Disney - exceeding Dollars 10m - would be regarded as
provocative. Also, a German executive can mostly expect a position for life:
he is not likely to be thrown out if short-term goals are not met. After
retirement, pensions tend to be generous.
The German attitude towards pay is in line with the corporatist approach in
German industry. Executives trying to buck the trend would stand out from
the crowd.
Tax treatment of executive compensation is also fairly rigid. Hence, unlike
the US, stock options are not part of top managers' packages. Not only does
the stock market play less of a role in German business life - many top and
middle-ranking concerns are not quoted, or only partially - but there is no
tax advantage for options.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11284</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / People: McMillan quits ISA International
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Rod McMillan, a director of ISA International, the Bradford-based
distributors of computer supplies, is leaving the company after nine years.
He is 38 and has been a director since 1987; he was recently in charge of
the division which sells computer supplies to the end-user market,
accounting for about one quarter of the operation.
Chairman John Parkinson declined to comment on the reasons for his
departure, saying only that it was unconnected with the company's or the
division's performance. 'It is the result of ongoing discussions,' he said,
refusing to elaborate.
*****
Steve Davies, finance director of HALMA's Apollo Fire Detectors subsidiary,
is also appointed finance director of Halma's security division.
*****
David Mason has been appointed production director of DEWHURST on the
retirement of Neville Turner.
*****
Eric Connor, a director of NEI Reyrolle Protection, has been appointed
director of resources of NORTHERN ELECTRIC; David Pearson, retailing manager
of Midlands Electricity, is appointed md - retail at Northern Electric.
*****
Tony Drew has been promoted to divisional director of engineering at FOSTER
WHEELER Petroleum Development. Gareth Attwood has been appointed director of
engineering of Foster Wheeler (Northern); he moves from Davy McKee.
*****
Charles Follows, formerly a fund manager at Pyrford International, has
become a director in CONRAD RITBLAT's investment department.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11285</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Equipping the Nantes transport
system
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GEC ALSTHOM has been chosen by Siman (Syndicat Intercommunual a Vocation
Multiple de l'Agglomeration Nantaise) to supply a further 12 three-car
tramsets for the Nantes urban transport network.
The tramsets, which are valued at approximately Pounds 18.5m, will be
delivered between September 1993 and March 1994. They will be using the same
technology as those previously ordered and will be fully adapted for use by
physically impaired passengers.
Line 2 (city centre-south) will start operation later this year. It will be
serviced by tramsets already in use on Line 1 and by units currently being
delivered by GEC Alsthom.
The 12 additional tramsets will be used for Line 3 which is scheduled to
open in 1994 to extend Line 2 to the north of the city. They will also be
able to run on the other lines of the network
the total number of the company's three-car tramsets running on the Nantes
network, which will be 24 kilometres long when Line 3 is opened.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11286</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: New and refurbished homes for
elderly
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
New and refurbished homes for the elderly in Hull and Bradford are included
in Pounds 3.7m worth of work won by LAING YORKSHIRE, part of John Laing
Construction.
North British Housing Association has selected the company to build 92
sheltered bungalows in Hull.
In Bradford, the City council has awarded a Pounds 425,685 contract to
refurbish an old people's home in Clayton.
Laing Yorkshire is also constructing a new pool at Oakwood swimming pool in
Moorgate, Rotherham, for Rotherham council, while the Property Services
Agency has selected the company to refurbish the public areas of DSS offices
in Rotherham and Sheffield.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11287</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Racal wins orders from Norway and
Turkey
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
RACAL RECORDERS has won two orders worth almost Pounds 400,000 from the
civil aviation authorities in Norway and Turkey for its multi-channel ICR
systems to record voice communications between air traffic controllers and
aircrew.
Under one of the contracts, worth more than Pounds 250,000, Racal has
supplied dual-deck ICR recording systems to improve ground-to-air
communications at airports across Norway - from Hammerfest in the north to
Kristiansand in the south.
Racal will supply a comprehensive spares package as well as providing
training for operators in the UK at the company's headquarters in Hythe,
Hampshire.
The second order, worth in excess of Pounds 120,000, was awarded by Devlet
Hava Meydanlari Isletmesi (DHMI), which is responsible for all Turkey's
national and international civilian airports.
Multi-channel ICR64 Series recorders will be used at four locations,
including Ankara International Airport, for recording voice communications
as Turkey upgrades its air traffic control (ATC) system.
The ICR communications recorder has a radar recording capability. This
system can offer civil aviation departments a permanent record of the flight
history of each aircraft. Using plot extracted radar data, it gives the last
known position of an aircraft for search and rescue operations and assists
in post-incident inquiries by providing full details of targets under
investigation.
Designed around a central microprocessor, the recorder provides a
simple-to-use, individual deck control/display panel plus time and activity
search facilities. It is capable of recording 64 voice channels per deck
simultaneously and plot extracted data at up to 19,200 bit/s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11288</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Pounds 45m gas pipeline plan in Java
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
L G MOUCHEL &amp; PARTNERS has been appointed by Perusahaan Umum Gas Negara, the
national gas corporation of Indonesia, to provide a full pre and post
contract quantity surveying service necessary for construction of 250
kilometres of gas pipeline in Java.
The pipelines, which will radiate from Surabaya, will provide natural gas to
industrial installations in the interior of the island. The project, which
also includes the construction of numerous pressure reducing stations and
meter registering stations, will be let in five contracts.
Mouchel, working in joint venture with a local consultant, P T Hasfarm Dian
Konsultan, is required to prepare full tender and contract documentation and
financial reports on all of the bids. They are also required to put in
place, co-ordinate and supervise five site teams who will make interim
valuations and measurements, supervise the settlement of rates and claims
and prepare the final account.
The project, estimated at Pounds 45m, is being funded by the World Bank and
is expected to begin in a year's time. All contracts will run concurrently
and the construction periods are expected to last between nine and 18 months
on each of the five sites.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11289</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Tarmac to fit out five Dillons
bookstores
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
New Pounds 5.3m offices in Scotland for British Gas and a Pounds 5m package
deal to fit out five of Dillons bookshops are among Pounds 18.5m worth of
projects won by TARMAC CONSTRUCTION.
District offices for British Gas are to be built at Uddingston in
Lanarkshire and they are expected to be completed by September 1993.
A package deal has been agreed with Dillons bookshops to fit out five book
stores in the UK and Ireland. They include new stores at Glasgow and
Kingston upon Thames, and the refurbishment of a store in Dublin.
A Pounds 5.4m contract has been signed with Elm Energy to start the
construction of the Pounds 38m power station at Wolverhampton that will
produce electricity by burning scrap tyres.
The three projects together with a Pounds 340,000 TSB Bank fit out at its
new branch in Bury, and additional public sector work bring the total value
of the latest contracts to Pounds 18.5m.
The contract housing division is to carry out Pounds 1.2m worth of
improvements and repairs to property for Blairtummock Housing Association in
Strathclyde; and refurbish tenements for Cathcart and District Housing
Association in Strathclyde at a cost of Pounds 480,000.
Other projects include the modernisation of houses for Exeter City Council
costing Pounds 390,000 and building 12 houses at Leeds for Ridings Housing
Association for Pounds 370,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11290</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Trafalgar House wins work in India
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Specialist engineering companies within the construction division of
TRAFALGAR HOUSE have won contracts worth over Pounds 10.5m for civil
engineering.
Bombay-based Cemindia has secured four separate projects - the largest
valued at Pounds 4m is the biggest ever secured in its 30 year history.
Cemindia has received a letter of intent from Tata Electric Companies of
Bombay to build a 150 megawatt power plant at Bhira. This 33-month contract
includes the construction of a 24 metre diameter powerhouse shaft 65 metres
deep, a tail race channel and two 3 metre diameter tunnels as well as a
switchyard.
At Kandla, about 1,200 kilometres northwest of Bombay, Cemindia will be
working for the Indian Oil Corporation to develop, design and instal 9,600
stone columns for three 55 metre diameter and 50 metre diameter oil storage
tanks.
This contract is due for completion in August and is the second major order
from this client.
A third contract, worth Pounds 3.3m, has been secured at Tuticorin, on
behalf of the Tamilnadu Electricity Board of Madras. The project covers the
design, manufacture and supply of civil works for a coal handling system at
the Tuticorin site. The main contractor, Southern Structurals, placed the
contract.
Cemindia's fourth job is to build a jetty for Tuticorin Port Trust, valued
at Pounds 1.75m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11291</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Housing awards
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Housing associations have awarded two contracts, together worth Pounds 1m,
to GALLIFORD NORTHWEST, part of the Galliford construction group. Thirty-six
family houses will be built on Merseyside for the Crosby Housing Association
and 16 flats will be built at Farnworth for the Bolton Housing Association.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11292</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Breakwaters
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FAIRCLOUGH MARINE has been selected by the main contractor, Kier
Construction, to provide two protective breakwaters at the entrance of
Sovereign Harbour at Eastbourne, East Sussex, under a 42-week contract
valued at Pounds 2.6m.
The company will supply and place 150,000 tonnes of rock armour in the
construction of the 200-metre breakwaters.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11293</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Construction Contracts: Facelift for east London tower
blocks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The Southern Construction division of M J GLEESON group has been awarded two
London contracts, together worth almost Pounds 10m. At Tower Hamlets,
Gleeson is to undertake the Pounds 5.69m internal and external refurbishment
of Wapping Neighbourhood of two 14-storey tower blocks built in the 1960s.
At Greenford, Gleeson will construct a multi-storey car park for Glaxo
Holdings, which is designed and landscaped to be barely visible. It will
take 370 cars and cost Pounds 3.1m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11294</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Credit loses appeal as joblessness rises
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP RAWSTORNE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONSUMERS have become far more sophisticated in managing personal finances
since the credit-financed consumer boom of the 1980s, according to a report
published today.
The report by Verdict Research, a retail consultancy, says: 'Credit has for
the time being lost some of its attraction.' Greater uncertainty about the
future and rising unemployment have encouraged consumers to reduce debt.
New non-mortgage credit advanced in 1991 amounted to Pounds 52.1bn - a 3.6
per cent reduction in real terms compared to 1990. Loans outstanding at the
end of 1991 amounted to Pounds 51.9bn - 4.8 per cent lower in real terms.
Yet those levels were the same, in constant prices, as in 1988. The report
suggests: 'This resilience in difficult times bodes well for an expansion of
consumer credit boosting retail spending as the economic recovery gathers
pace.'
Consumers were increasingly using different forms of payment to avoid a
build-up of debt. More were paying off credit-card balances in full monthly
and debit-card use had risen sevenfold since 1989 to 330m transactions a
year.
Bank credit cards more than doubled to nearly 30m during the 1980s, and
annual transactions rose from 160m to 650m. An estimated 3m cardholders  -
mainly infrequent users - had abandoned their cards on the introduction of
annual fees.
Card fraud cost Pounds 166m last year - 35 per cent more than in 1990.
How Britain Pays, 1992. Verdict Research, 112 High Holborn, London WC1V 6JS.
Pounds 695.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11295</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Low turnout at Scotland United rally
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HEAVY rain yesterday caused a poor turnout at the second rally in Glasgow
called by Scotland United, the movement formed after the election to
campaign for a referendum on Scotland's constitutional future, James Buxton
writes.
Although organisers had expected 10,000 people, only about 2,500 braved the
rain. The movement's first rally attracted 3,000 to 4,000 people.
No party leaders attended, although a message of support was read out from
Mr Alex Salmond, leader of the SNP.
Scotland United is a cross-party grouping set up by Mr George Galloway,
Labour MP for Glasgow Hillhead, and other Labour MPs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11296</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Dirtiest power stations in England and Wales, 1990
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
RANKED IN ORDER OF ANNUAL SULPHUR EMISSIONS
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
Operator*      Power station       SO2(000t)
NP             Drax                269.3
NP             Eggborough          192.7
PG             Ferrybridge C       176.8
PG             Cottam              173.8
NP             West Burton         168.3
PG             Fiddlers Ferry      165.6
PG             Ratcliffe           164.4
NP             Didcot              110.3
NP             Rugeley B            94.1
NP             Aberthaw B           80.8
PG             Kingsnorth           77.1
PG             Drakelow C           70.8
NP             Thorpe Marsh         66.8
NP             Ironbridge           63.4
NP             Blyth B              59.9
NP             Littlebrook          53.5
PG             Grain                51.2
PG             High Marnham         49.7
NP             Tilbury              38.5
NP             Fawley               37.1
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
*NP = National Power   PG = PowerGen
Source: Friends of the Earth
 ------------------------------------------------------------------
This list of the 'dirtiest' power stations was disclosed yesterday by
Friends of the Earth, the environmental lobby group
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11297</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / California rocked by earthquake
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A POWERFUL earthquake rocked the northern California coast on Saturday,
destroying several buildings and injuring at least 50 people in small
logging towns close to the Oregon border, including Petrolia (above), writes
Louise Kehoe in San Francisco.
The earthquake struck at 11am (Pacific standard time) and measured 6.9 on
the Richter scale. The epicentre was about 250 miles north of San Francisco.
It was the second strong earthquake in California last week. The first, on
Wednesday, hit southern California near Palm Springs and measured 6.1 on the
Richter scale. Seismologists said the two events were not related but served
as a reminder that the state of California was riddled with fault lines.
Ferndale, a small town with 1,600 residents, took the brunt of Saturday's
quake. About 40 businesses and 20 homes were seriously damaged. Preliminary
estimates put the cost of damage at about Dollars 3.5m (Pounds 1.97m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11298</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Philippine candidates agree pact
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOSE GALANG
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MANILA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The seven candidates in the May 11 Philippine presidential election
yesterday signed a pact pledging not to use violence or fraud to disrupt or
pre-empt the campaign, writes Jose Galang in Manila.
The agreement, a first in the history of Philippine elections, was designed
by the Commission on Elections in an attempt to reduce the political tension
that has escalated since the start of the campaign in early February.
Twenty-five deaths linked to the coming elections have been registered since
the start of the campaign.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11299</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Bolona retains cabinet post
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SALLY BOWEN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LIMA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Carlos Bolona, Peru's finance minister, will now retain his cabinet post
while his principal opponents, Mr Augusto Blacker Miller and Mr Joy Way,
respectively foreign relations and industry ministers, have been forced to
resign, writes Sally Bowen in Lima.
Mr Bolona's conditions for remaining at the economic helm apparently
included the departure of both adversaries.
The weekend ratification of his position will come as a relief to the
International Monetary Fund with whom he has been Peru's chief interlocutor
for the past 14 months.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11300</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / S African finance minister to quit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Barend du Plessis, the South African finance minister, has announced he
will resign on May 1 due to exhaustion, writes Patti Waldmeir in
Johannesburg.
Mr du Plessis, who had been one of the Pretoria government's chief
negotiators at the multi-party constitutional forum, the Convention for a
Democratic South Africa, has clashed frequently with black politicians in
the transition to post-apartheid rule.
He has come under increasing pressure recently from businessmen because of
the way he handled the introduction last year of value-added tax. After
battling for several weeks with trade unions over the application of VAT to
foodstuffs, Mr du Plessis announced an arbitrary reduction in the rate from
12 to 10 per cent, and certain exemptions. Despite these concessions,
unionists staged a two-day national general strike which paralysed economic
activity.
Mr du Plessis' successor has yet to be named.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11301</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Kenya alleges plot to spread violence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NAIROBI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Kenyan government said yesterday it had uncovered a plot to spread
violence sweeping the west of the country to other parts of the state,
Reuter reports from Nairobi.
But it said measures were in place to check a spillover of the unrest, which
has killed at least 125 people since March 1.
The government blamed fighting over rights to rich farmlands in western
Kenya on 'outside factors', saying that tribes in the region had been living
in harmony for generations. It implicitly accused Kenya's newly legalised
opposition parties of fomenting trouble, noting that some of their leaders
had threatened to make the country ungovernable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11302</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Arabs to focus on UN resolutions in renewed Mideast talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAMIS ANDONI and TONY WALKER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMMAN, CAIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ARAB delegates to Middle East peace talks, which resume in Washington today,
look set to focus more specifically on UN resolutions requiring Israel's
withdrawal from occupied Arab land.
The representatives seem certain to ask why Israel is being treated
differently to Libya, which is being subjected to sanctions for failing to
accept Security Council demands that it yield nationals accused of bombing
western airliners. Mr Nabil Shaath, a senior Palestine Liberation
Organisation (PLO) official and co-ordinator for the Palestinian delegation
in Washington, has repeatedly accused the west of applying double standards
over the Libyan affair.
However, the fifth round of talks is expected to mark time in the run-up to
Israeli elections on June 23.
The Palestinians have already rejected Israeli proposals for municipal
elections in the occupied West Bank and Gaza Strip, accusing Mr Yitzhak
Shamir, Israel's prime minister, of electioneering.
They believe Mr Shamir, who is facing a strong challenge from Mr Yitzhak
Rabin, the Labour leader, will try to use the talks to improve his record as
a peacemaker.
Israel's Arab neighbours and the Palestinians are making no secret of their
desire for a change of government. Mr Rabin has pledged to push ahead with
plans for Palestinian autonomy in the occupied territories.
Little progress has been made in four round of talks between Israel and
delegations representing Syria, Lebanon and a Jordanian-Palestinian team
since the US-sponsored process was launched amid much fanfare in Madrid last
October.
Much argument has centred on Arab demands that Israel comply with UN
Security Council resolutions 242 and 338, passed after the 1967 and 1973
wars and regarded by Arabs as the basis of any Middle East settlement.
Israel has been intent on deflecting discussions about 'land-for-peace'
resolutions, insisting it is not interested in territorial compromise at
this stage. Rather, it has attempted to discuss interim confidence-building
arrangements.
The US, which is pressuring the participants to begin talks of substance,
has suggested that difficult subjects like the implementation of resolution
242 should be deferred until later stages of the process. But the Arabs
insist that the issue forms an integral part of all discussions.
Arab participants claim that the international community's reluctance to
insist that Israel adhere to UN resolutions obliging it to withdraw from
Arab land is undermining their credibility in the eyes of their people.
However, they also recognise they are caught in a quandary over the issue of
Libya and sanctions. 'How can Arab governments reject Security Council
resolutions (on Libya) while they are pursuing the implementation of 242 and
338,' a Jordanian official involved in the peace talks said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11303</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Old foes resume the bickering: Notebook
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A MEETING of finance ministers of the Group of Seven would not feel right
without a bout of public bickering between the US and Germany.
At a press conference yesterday Mr Theo Waigel, the German finance minister,
was still visibly peeved by the US Treasury's criticism of German fiscal
policy. 'Complaints and accusations don't help,' he said, adding that 'I'm
not going to be put in the dock'.
Meanwhile, the national champions - Mr David Mulford, the US Treasury
under-secretary for international affairs, and Mr Horst Kohler, state
secretary in the Bonn Finance Ministry - have been seen talking to each
other in Washington after trading charge and counter-charge last week.
This latest spat, triggered by Mr Mulford's claim that Germany's high fiscal
deficits were becoming a structural problem and exporting slow growth to the
Europe, rapidly moved up the Richter scale of public rows. If Mr Mulford
thought he could make his strictures acceptable by insisting that the US was
not trying to prescribe policy for Bonn, he must have suffered a shock.
US officials were certainly taken aback by the sharpness of Mr Kohler's
reply, which accused Mr Mulford at one point of making 'one-sided and partly
false public comments'.
While some officials in Washington put the whole thing down to Mr Mulford's
insensitivity and Mr Kohler's thin skin, others could see a method behind
the US Treasury's megaphone diplomacy.
If the US had first raised its worries about Germany's fiscal policy in
yesterday's G7 meeting, the day's discussions on Russia and the world
economy would have been overshadowed by a round of table banging.
If foreign exchange reserves are a guide to a country's ability to import,
it is no wonder that Russia's imports have collapsed.
A new International Monetary Fund economic review of the Russian Federation
discloses that the reserves of the Russian central bank fell to just Dollars
12m (Pounds 6.7m) at the end of January.
Russia's impending membership of the IMF is not to everybody's liking. Many
developing countries fear they will obtain less financial support once the
former Soviet republics qualify for IMF credits.
But Mr Michel Camdessus, IMF managing director, insists that help for Russia
and its neighbours will help the third world too. Taking India as an
example, he points out that the former Soviet Union's imports from India
fell by 52 per cent between 1990 and 1991, delivering a 'major shock' to the
Indian economy. 'In fighting to help Russia to recover, we are recreating
markets for India and all the countries in the area,' he says.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11304</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The Afghan Crisis: At the palace the president gives way to
a semblance of order
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE LEVINE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KABUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A LOOK inside the simple, elegant, book-lined bedroom of the deposed Afghan
President Najibullah suggests all must have been calm until the day he tried
to flee Kabul aboard a waiting UN aeroplane, then was turned back by his
erstwhile militia allies at the capital's airport, reports Steve Levine in
Kabul.
The presidential quarters gave no sign of a hurried exit.
This weekend, though, there was little calm on the green lawns and among the
fountains of the presidential palace grounds. At 3:47 pm on Saturday, men
loyal to the mujahideen commander Mr Ahmed Shah Masood sneaked through the
adjacent Afghanistan National Bank and into the grounds. Mr Najibullah had
gone into hiding in Kabul the day before. Now the rebels, in battle for
control of the capital, were rifling the presidential guards' stores for
weapons and ammunition.
They took up position on the palace roofs and placed tanks in the drive. One
guerrilla fixed his tank in a tight circle, playfully spinning the vehicle
round and round in the dirt.
At the back perimeter wall yesterday morning, militia allies of Mr Masood
fought a machine-gun and mortar skirmish against fighters controlled by
mujahideen rival Mr Gulbuddin Hekmatyar and positioned at the foreign
ministry.
The militia unit, under the command of an ethnic Hazara named Abdul Chirik,
was protecting a communications centre - an aluminium pole sticking up from
the top of a tank, reinforced by electrical wiring fixed to the wall. At one
of the palace's five gates, another rebel commander, allied with Mr Masood
and calling himself Moel, stood near a smoking brick building. 'We want
peace, but they want war. We had to run them out,' he said of Mr Hekmatyar's
fighters.
However, in the palace grounds yesterday, Mr Masood's men were maintaining
relative order. In a building next to Mr Najibullah's quarters, Hazara
militiament strolled about, collecting booty in sacks.
Ethnic Tadjiks at the front door checked the sacks and forced their looter
allies to leave most of the booty. 'You are not a Moslem,' one Tajik
admonished a Hazara carrying a sack, sending a tin teapot he had been trying
to steal bouncing across the floor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11305</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The Afghan Crisis: Guerrillas no longer a joke as Kabul
falls - The taking of the capital
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DURING the long years of civil war, the Afghan mujahideen guerrillas have
often been ridiculed for incompetence. But the speed with which they have
taken over the country in the past two weeks - and the capital Kabul on
Saturday - indicates a well-conceived and executed operation.
Kabul fell like a pack of cards. At daybreak, the army and the paramilitary
forces still had control, although the reality of power had slipped from
them as the regime made clear its willingness to hand over power to an
interim mujahideen administration.
The guerrillas started to slip into the capital in large numbers from
Wednesday night. That day, a long column of Mr Ahmed Shah Masood's
Jamiat-i-Islami fighters headed for the capital. He now says that he moved
more rapidly than he had intended because he feared a coup attempt involving
his rival mujahideen leader, Mr Gulbuddin Hekmatyar.
He accuses the latter, leader of the most fundamentalist of the Islamic
guerrilla groups, Hezb-i-Islam, of conspiracy with Mr Raz Mohammad Pakteen,
interior minister, and with General Manukay Mangel. All these are hardline
Pushtun, who dominate in the south of the country, opposed to hegemony over
Afghanistan by non-Pushtun minorities.
By Friday night, all the main mujahideen groups had smuggled heavily armed
guerrillas into the capital with the tacit support of the security forces.
They broke cover on Saturday morning, shortly after the announcement from
Peshawar in Pakistan of an agreement on an interim administration.
The different guerrilla groups competed for control of key installations.
Apart from the interior ministry, the Hezb gained control of the foreign
ministry, parts of the president's palace, and districts of Mekroyan where
the Russian supporters of the outgoing regime used to live. The Hezb also
won a national guard post in the centre of the city where they unlocked the
armoury and distributed weapons.
But the Hezb were easily outnumbered by the Mr Masood's Jamiat and other
groups supporting him. At the army's arsenal in Kabul, the Jamiat arrived
before the Hezb. 'We got here first. The Hezb came and left,' said Mohammad
Tahirr, a Jamiat commander, grinning with pleasure.
At the Afghan television station, officials in charge had called in the
Jamiat and General Rashid Dostam's Uzbek forces - mainly mercenaries who
have been in a loose alliance with Mr Masood's guerrillas - to maintain
control.
Almost everywhere the army and security forces handed over control
immediately and then stopped to chat with the newly arrived mujahideen. By
mid-afternoon, the streets were almost empty. Mujahideen began hijacking a
few cars and trucks, hoisting the green Islamic flag and touring the town
crying jubilant slogans. Some vehicles carried portraits of the late
Ayatollah Khomeini of Iran.
Mujahideen set up check-points in different parts of the city. There were
areas where nerves were strained. Opposite the interior ministry, where the
Hezb were in command, the Jamiat had taken over the headquarters of Khad,
the secret police. The Hezb kept watch with their fingers on their triggers.
When driving towards the defence ministry, my car was turned back by a
guerrilla who threateningly pointed a rocket-launcher at it.
For all that, it was open day in the Afghan capital in a way probably never
seen before. I walked into the Khad hospital to find the the director and
two of his colleagues terrified by the sudden turn of events. At an
anti-aircraft centre in the south of the city, a smiling air force commander
had just handed over to a group of guerrillas, the Shia Whadad group made up
of Hazaras from central Afghanistan.
At nightfall, the city was tense and in the hands of heavily armed
guerrillas, many of whom had never been to the capital before. At about 7.30
pm, tracer fire signal flares began to light the sky, tentatively at first
and then in a crescendo of celebration. For much of the night, Kabul echoed
to machine-gun and artillery fire, while red and yellow flares hung
overhead.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11306</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The Afghan Crisis: Leader able to compromise
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KABUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IF ANY man deserves the credit for having masterminded the collapse of
Afghanistan's communist regime and the fall of Kabul, it is Ahmed Shah
Masood, the most successful field commander of the war and leader of the
northern-based guerrilla alliance, writes David Housego in Kabul.
Now named defence minister in the interim administration that will take over
running the country, he is likely to be its most powerful member.
Mr Masood is leader of the Jamiat-i-Islami and has already established an
Islamic administration in the north-eastern territories under his control
since 1990. He has shown a flair for diplomacy and compromise in the way he
undermined the communist regime from within and built alliances with other
guerrilla groups.
As his strategy to overthrow President Najibullah's regime began to unfold
this year, Mr Masood asked Mr Benon Sevan, UN envoy on Afghanistan, to go to
see him. It was a major error by Mr Sevan that he did not take up this offer
then and thus open a direct dialogue with the main mujahideen commander.
Apart from a brief contact much earlier, the two met for the first time only
last week at Charikar, Mr Makoud's makeshift headquarters north of Kabul.
By then, Mr Masood had good reason to feel victory was his. He told
journalists he could be in Kabul within two hours if he wanted, but that his
priority was to establish an interim council in the capital. 'I took
Charikar and Baram (the nearby airbase, the capture of which opened the road
to Kabul), so it is easy for me to go into Kabul,' he said.
He outmanoeuvred Mr Gulbuddin Hekmatyar, leader of the rival Hezb-i-Islam,
by contrasting his own readiness to negotiate with the belligerence of Mr
Hekmatyar, who had threatened an attack on Kabul.
'My proposal to Hekmatyar is that, instead of starting an offensive against
Kabul, he should go to Peshawar (in Pakistan), sit with the other mujahideen
leaders and reach an agreement' on an interim administration.
A Persian-speaking Tadjik from the north-eastern Afghan district of
Panjshir, Mr Masood was educated at a French-language school in Kabul. He
took up arms against the Kabul regime as early as 1975 in an uprising backed
by Pakistan and in which Mr Hekmatyar collaborated with him. When that
failed, Mr Masood stayed in Panjshir and Mr Hekmatyar made his base in
Pakistan. The two men have been rivals and enemies since.
In the war against the Soviets, Mr Masood emerged as the most successful
field commander, cutting out a fiefdom in the north-east. He received little
aid from Pakistan, which resented his independence of mind. This changed
briefly in 1990 when he made a lengthy visit to Pakistan.
But he has often complained of Pakistan's lack of support for him. He
essentially created his army from other resources and captured Soviet
weapons. British intelligence is said to have supplied his sophisticated
Racal radio equipment.
While controlling the north-east, Mr Masood was assiduous in building up
contacts in the armed forces and within President Najibullah's regime. He
wooed General Rashid Dostam, head of the Uzbek militia in Mazarr-Iasharif
and one of Mr Najibullah's main supports. He warned him of the great loss of
life in the war. 'How many children can an Uzbek mother bear?' he is said to
have asked by way of encouragement to make peace.
Ten days ago, the Uzbek militia. who had been flown into Kabul with the
connivance of disaffected military leaders, blocked Mr Najibullah's
departure from the country. The end of the regime was in sight.
As a Tadjik from the north, in a country traditionally dominated by
Pushtuns, Mr Masood will find his most difficult task in reconciling the
fears of Pushtuns, who make up 40 per cent of the Afghan population. In the
power struggle unfolding with Mr Hekmatyar's Hezb, the strength of the
latter is that he is still seen as a Pushtun nationalist.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11307</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Spain faces labour unrest over benefits initiative
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SPAIN is facing serious labour unrest this summer and autumn, following the
announcement at the weekend by the General Workers Union (UGT) that it is to
hold a half-day stoppage next month, and a general strike of possibly 48
hours in October, both in protest at government cuts in unemployment
benefits.
The UGT and the other large union, the communist-led Workers' Commissions
(CCOO) are to meet this week to co-ordinate further mobilisations. The CCOO
will probably persuade the UGT to convert its May stoppage into a 24-hour
strike. Both unions are promising a series of rolling sectoral strikes if
the government does not withdraw its decree to cut unemployment payments.
The government, which has made the cuts to trim the growing deficit
(equivalent to Pounds 2.3bn) in the official employment institute, says they
are necessary to help the country cut its public sector deficits before it
enters the EC's economic and monetary union (Emu).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11308</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Demirel leaves for Asian tour
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ANKARA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Turkey's prime minister, Mr Suleyman Demirel, sets out today for a week-long
trip to the Turkic speaking central Asian states, aimed at underlining
Turkey's ambitions as a leading regional power and economic model for these
former Soviet republics, writes John Murray Brown in Ankara.
Mr Demirel's visit, the first by a western leader, will seek to bolster
Turkey's linguistic, cultural and religious links with central asia,
reinforcing its support for the leaders of the six republics - Uzbekistan,
Kirghizia, Kazakhstan, Tajikistan, Turkmenistan and Azerbaijan - all of whom
have visited Ankara.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11309</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / The European Market: Biotech groups find bright new world
slow to dawn - Europe's patent legislation and regulations have caused
frustration in the sector
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPE'S biotechnology sector is considerably frustrated with its European
Community regulators. This is partly because only three of the 12 EC states
have fulfilled their obligation to implement directives on testing new
bio-techniques, patent legislation has been stalled in the Strasbourg
parliament for the past four years and, at least until recently, four
directorates-general inside the Brussels Commission have been at odds over
biotechnology.
But other sectors suffer from EC tribulations, too. The 800 companies active
in the EC in biotech research are particularly frustrated because they
believe their future should be bright. Biotechnology, which is less a new
industry than new biological techniques applied to existing industries, is
seen as boosting Europe's traditional strengths in the agrichemical,
pharmaceutical, and food and drink sectors into the next century. These
three sectors employ 15m Europeans. Biotechnology could create a further 2m
jobs by the end of this decade, according to the Commission, if all goes
right.
All, however, is not going right, says the Senior Advisory Group on
Biotechnology (SAGB), a Brussels-based committee of major chemical companies
with biotech activities. 'If our companies can't use their innovations on a
par with their competitors in the US and Japan, they will either decline or
move their investments elsewhere,' says Mr Brian Ager, SAGB's director.
In fact, both trends seem to be occurring. According to figures on patents
registered in the late 1980s, Europeans obtained 19 per cent, compared to 41
per cent for Americans and 36 per cent for Japanese. Biotech investment,
particularly by the big German chemical companies Bayer, BASF and Hoechst,
is shifting to the US, where the SAGB was recently invited to the White
House and impressed, says Mr Ager, by the Bush administration's 'clear
awareness' of biotechnology's importance.
The senior Commission co-ordinator on biotechnology counters that
'industrial lobbies are over-dramatising the situation' with criticism that
is, at the very least, outdated. The Commission's 1991 biotechnology policy
statement, which pledged not to over-regulate and to ensure EC legislation
was coherent, 'should be recognised as a positive step'.
The industry welcomed the statement but has two gripes:
Existing regulation. In 1990 the EC passed two directives, on the 'contained
use' in development laboratories and on the 'deliberate release' for field
testing of genetically modified organisms. Mr Ager complains these set up 'a
complicated bureaucratic notification and approval procedure', regardless of
the actual risks involved. The industry says biotech products should be
assessed on any inherent risk in the product, not on the process by which it
is made.
EC states were due to have put the two directives on their national statute
books last October; so far only three - Denmark, Germany and the Netherlands
 -have. The UK is still wrestling with how to carry out the EC directive,
and when it put out its proposed regulations for public comment it received
in January a tart answer from the US government. 'In our view,' the US
authorities said, 'these (EC) regulations would eliminate or severely
restrict the potential of UK institutions to bring products to market - and
solely because methods of modern biotechnology had been used in their
production.'
While not conceding any past errors, EC officials harp on more recent
initiatives. These include last autumn's proposal for an integrated risk
assessment procedure for biotech pharmaceuticals (as part of the Commission
idea for a European drugs agency); a plan for a similar procedure for 'novel
foods' this summer; Commission help for the CEN standards body to harmonise
equipment used in the development and manufacture of biotech products; and
the setting up of an advisory group on the ethical implications of
biotechnology. Patenting. In 1988 the Commission proposed a directive on the
legal protection of biotech inventions. This has run into opposition in the
European parliament, chiefly from the Greens and the animal welfare lobby.
Earlier this month the proposal was again sent back to the legal affairs
committee without getting a first reading by the whole House.
The reason was MEPs' differences with the Commission, whose support the
parliament needs if its amendments are to get through the Council of
Ministers. While the Commission accepts MEPs' opposition to patenting human
life or any part thereof, it does not back parliamentary amendments on
animal protection. It is also opposed to MEPs' demands that leeway be given
to farmers using genetically grown seeds. Farmers want to be able to re-use
patented seeds, recouped after harvest, without having to pay royalties or
seek the permission of the right-holding biotech company. The Commission
takes the industry's line that without such protection companies will cut
investment in bio-agriculture.
The argument is false, says Lord Inglewood, a Tory MEP who is both a farmer
and a member of the legal affairs committee. He reckons the biotech
companies would not have a hope of collecting royalties from farmers across
the Community, but could in any case rely on farmers periodically switching
to new strains of seed.
The patent dispute needs a speedy solution, if Europe's biotech companies
are to get uniform protection for inventions in the single market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11310</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Second poll for Austrian candidates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC FREY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   VIENNA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Rudolf Streicher won the first round in Austria's presidential elections
yesterday, confirming his status as front-runner to succeed President Kurt
Waldheim.
But Mr Streicher, the minister for transportation and candidate of the
Social Democratic party, failed to win a clear majority and will face the
runner-up, Mr Thomas Klestil of the conservative People's Party, in a
run-off on May 24.
With 98 per cent of the votes counted, Mr Streicher led Mr Klestil with 40.8
per cent to 37.1 per cent. Mrs Heide Schmidt, the candidate of the
right-wing Freedom Party, polled 16.4 per cent, and Mr Robert Jungk, of the
Green Party, received 5.7 per cent.
Mr Klestil, a career diplomat, did far better and Mr Streicher worse than
their respective parties in the last elections in 1990.
With the voting pattern of the supporters of Mrs Schmidt und Mr Jungk
difficult to predict, the outcome of the second round is still open.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11311</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CD0A4AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920427
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  27 APR 92 / Car prices vary 'very widely within EC'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL and KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS, LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CAR PRICES in the European Community differ substantially from country to
country, and by more than 40 per cent in the worst cases, a study for the
European Commission shows.
However, the Commission is divided about the causes of the price
disparities, and about what actions should be taken to bring prices into
line.
The report, prepared with help by the Motor Industry Research Unit, the
UK-based automotive consultants, shows that five manufacturers had at least
one model with price differences greater than 40 per cent during one of the
five study periods, between January 1988 and January 1991.
Germany and Spain had the greatest number of high-priced models in 1988. In
January 1989, the highest-priced models were concentrated in the UK. Spain
had by far the greatest number of high-priced models in the three study
periods of 1990 and 1991.
Even the car manufacturer with the lowest price gap had differentials as
great as 17 per cent, the report by EC competition officials shows.
For 18 of the 21 car models studied in detail, the price differentials
exceeded 18 per cent, and for 19 of the 21 models the price differentials
exceeded 12 per cent for two consecutive study periods.
On Wednesday, Sir Leon Brittan, EC competition commissioner, and Mr Martin
Bangemann, industry commissioner, will seek approval by fellow commissioners
of two reports they have produced about the motor industry. One is on car
prices, produced for Sir Leon, and there is a report by Mr Bangemann's
directorate on the industry itself. Both highlight differences in car
prices.
But advisers to Sir Leon and Mr Bangemann disagree on the extent to which
the current system of exclusive car dealerships in the EC is to blame.
The system restricts sales of new cars in the EC to dealers chosen by the
manufacturers and is exempt from EC competition rules until 1995.
Under the terms of the 10-year exemption, EC car prices are supposed to stay
within a 12 per cent band in the long term, with fluctuations up to 18 per
cent only allowed for periods of less than one year.
Consumer groups argue that the system aggravates price differences.
Sir Leon and his advisers believe that, while other factors (including tax
differences, currency fluctuation, and varying equipment specifications)
encourage price differences, the exclusive dealership system is the main
culprit.
Mr Bangemann's advisers favour attacking specific abuses of the system, but
say high prices in Britain and Spain have other causes.
Sir Leon will not call for exclusive dealerships to be scrapped but his
advisers say that, over the next three years, dealers will have to show the
system is consistent with a healthy internal market.
His conclusions go further than the lengthy report in February by the UK
Monopolies and Mergers Commission. This compared UK prices with some
continental European markets, and it seemed to accept the car industry's
argument that the UK's dedicated dealer and service network be retained
because of the complexity of the products sold and the implications for
safety if cars were not properly maintained.
Mr Bangemann's report on the automobile industry - the latest in a series of
Commission communications on industrial sectors - calls for 'a satisfactory
and efficient system of selective distribution' to be maintained until 1999,
which is unacceptable to Sir Leon.
The aim, said a recent draft, is to protect EC manufacturers from
'large-scale indirect importation' of cars while they are adapting to
increased competition from Japan.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11312</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / (CORRECTED) UK Company News: The double-edged Wilkinson
Swordsman - Christopher Lewinton, TI Group chairman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Correction (published 15th May 1992) appended to this article.
MR Christopher Lewinton is something of an evangelist in the mould of Sir
John Harvey-Jones, the peripatetic industrialist and troubleshooter. The
chairman of TI Group, which this week launched a hostile bid for Dowty, the
aerospace company, likes nothing more than to spell out his vision of a
British industrial renaissance.
'I'd like to feel I had played a part in the resurrection of British
industry and persuaded talented brains to be attracted to industry and not
the City,' says the man who will head one of the largest UK-based, but
internationally focused, specialist engineering companies if the Pounds 482m
bid succeeds.
'I am trying to bring engineering closer to marketing in order to turn ideas
into money.'
Such pithy soundbites which lace his descriptions of TI's corporate culture
owe much to his business career in the US. Disillusioned by the UK which he
felt did not encourage wealth creation, he had emigrated in the 1960s and
made his name with Wilkinson Sword.
A jolly 60 year old, Mr Lewinton has the air of a natural salesman,
suggesting he should have advertised and not developed double-edged razor
blades at Wilkinson Sword.
But since returning to base in the UK in the 1970s, Mr Lewinton has brought
the steely business equivalent of a mid-Atlantic twang to TI and his ideas
for industrial regeneration.
It has led to a metamorphosis at TI. From dull Midlands metal basher,
concentrating largely on the UK, the company has rapidly shifted to an
internationally focused seals, tubes and aerospace engineer eagerly followed
by a growing band of City followers.
But the genesis of this growth lies in Mr Lewinton's previous experience
reshaping industries.
His first headline-grabbing move came in 1973 when he merged Wilkinson Sword
and British Match, a sleepy world force in the match business that needed to
find new products. The deal caused a stir, not least because the logic of
mixing matches and razors confounded many spectators.
Mr Lewinton denies charges of opportunism, saying British Match had strong
cash flow and a stable market position but had diversified with no regard to
a coherent strategy. Forming a consumer products group therefore made sense.
A similar desire to return to strong core businesses lies behind this week's
bid for Dowty, once a world name in aircraft landing gear but which latterly
has gone astray with ill-judged diversifications.
A second controversial deal, in 1978, involved the merger of the renamed
Wilkinson Match with Allegheny Ludlum, a US special steels company which is
now in bankruptcy proceedings.
This went ahead after a stock exchange row erupted following Allegheny's
plan to take a majority stake without making a bid. Two years later a full
bid was forthcoming.
Ironically it was the decision of Allegheny chairman, Mr Robert Buckley, to
diversify from specialised steels and into consumer goods with the
acquisition of Sunbeam domestic appliances in 1981, which Mr Lewinton feels
lay behind Allegheny seeking Chapter 11 protection in 1988.
Mr Lewinton is at pains to point out that he was in charge of international
operations in London at the time the decision to diversify was taken and
that he left in 1985, long before the company got into serious trouble.
Given his history of merging and focusing businesses, it was therefore
unsurprising that Mr Lewinton turned to Tube Investment's roots. Mr Michael
Garner, TI's finance director, was however surprised at the speed with which
he moved. A week after joining, he asked Mr Garner what he thought about
closing the profitable appliances division, prompting Mr Garner to ask 'How
did you get there so fast?'
Croda was duly sold to GEC; Russell Hobbs and Tower went to Polly Peck; the
headquarters was moved from a 180-strong office in Birmingham to an existing
office in London; and a year later the Raleigh bicycle business was sold in
perhaps the most unexpected move.
John Crane, the engineering seals business, and Bundy, the specialist US
tubes business, were also bought in the first three years, laying the
foundations for the modern TI.
In a grand and expensive gesture, Mr Lewinton also borrowed Pounds 100,000
to buy 60,000 TI shares, a move designed to boost sapping confidence. 'It
had a tremendous impact on the company,' he says. 'There was no sparkle;
they did not have a desire to create wealth.'
It is not a criticism anyone could lay at Mr Lewinton's feet. His
compensation package, which grossed him a handsome Pounds 750,524 of salary
and bonus in 1990, has raised more than a few eyebrows.
Mr Lewinton is unapologetic about such sums - he says in any case that he is
unlikely to get a bonus either last year or this and is therefore looking at
a basic salary of Pounds 485,000 in 1991 - plus the Pounds 800,000 of stock
options he sold.
'If you compare top directors in the City and top directors in industry, I
don't see why one should be worth very much more than the other,' he says.
He argues that so long as bonuses are related to performance, shareholders
are getting value.
An important adjunct, he says, is that top brains are attracted away from
law firms and the City, and the cause of engineering is served. Such sums
are indeed likely to make a young graduate's mouth water and rejuvenate
British industry.
Correction (published 15th May 1992)
An article in the Financial Times on April 25 incorrectly stated that
Allegheny Ludlum Corp was in bankruptcy proceedings. The article should have
said Allegheny International was in bankruptcy proceedings; Allegheny Ludlum
is a profitable producer of specialty materials, which emerged from
Allegheny International via a management buy-out in 1980.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11313</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CFVA2AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Last challenge to EC working hours
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Britain is to make a last ditch effort to amend the European Community's
working-time directive to allow voluntary overtime to be worked above the
48-hour ceiling on the working week.
The directive, scheduled to be agreed by a meeting of EC employment
ministers next Thursday, will be the first European test for Mrs Gillian
Shephard, the new employment secretary.
British ministers hope Luxembourg and Portugal will support a move either to
raise the limit to 52 or 55 hours a week or to allow voluntary overtime on
top of the 48 hours.  They will also continue to argue that working over 48
hours should be permitted if a risk assessment shows there is no danger to
health or safety.
In the past few months some moves have been made in the UK's direction. Some
industries such as transport have been exempted from the directive, and the
requirement of four weeks paid holiday a year has been lowered to three
weeks for the first three years of the directive.
There appears to be further room for manoeuvre on the period within which an
average of 48 hours a week must be worked.  The UK and Germany favour six
months, and a compromise of four or five months looks possible.  There may
also be further movement on Sunday being 'in principle' the day of rest,
which the government dislikes because it fears it would give a boost to the
anti-Sunday trading lobby.
It remains highly unlikely that the government will agree to the directive,
but if enough progress is made on the aspects most strongly opposed by UK
employers, it may discard a formal challenge to the legal basis.
Some officials suggest that Mrs Shephard's arrival may have produced greater
willingness to compromise on both sides and the Portuguese, who hold the EC
presidency, are very keen to get a unanimous agreement - even though
approval can be by qualified majority.  If there are sufficient signs of
progress next Thursday, they may postpone a final decision until June.
Officials have been emphasising that in spite of Mrs Shephard's liberal
image she can be expected to take as hard a line as Mr Michael Howard, her
predecessor, on both EC employment legislation and the next round of
industrial relations law.
On Europe there may be as much change as continuity.  Although Mrs Shephard
has no desire to reverse the 'opt-out' won at Maastricht from extending the
EC's power in the employment field, employment department officials say she
will be more 'pro-active' than Mr Howard.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11314</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CFVA2AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Survey into Sunday shopping
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
About a million people in England and Wales visited a supermarket every
Sunday during March, and 2.8m people shopped on a Sunday at least once
during the month, according to a survey by Nielson market research. The
figure for February was 3m, and for January 2.6m.
London has the highest proportion of Sunday shoppers, at about 18 per cent.
 Households in the north of England are the least enthusiastic - only one in
ten Yorkshire-area households took advantage of Sunday opening.
People spend more on Sundays.  The average shopping basket on Sundays in
1992 cost pounds 10, but the average bill on other days of the week was
pounds 7.40.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11315</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Books: Mightier than the bully - FT Children's Book of the
Month
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL GLOVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
I SAW ESAU edited by Iona and Peter Opie, illustrated by Maurice Sendak
Walker Books Pounds 9.99, 160 pages
SIR Walter Scott was greatly troubled by the initial response from scholars
and men of letters to his proposal in 1832 that he produce a work on fairy
tales. Wasn't such a thing beneath the dignity of a great literary man such
as himself? The consequence was that he found himself obliged to make it 'a
neat thing' that would be 'obnoxious to ridicule'. This story is told in the
preface to a book entitled The Classic Fairy Tales, published almost 20
years ago by Iona and Peter Opie. If the study of children's literature in
our day is no longer felt to be beneath contempt, we have in part the Opies
to thank.
Over the past 40 years, Iona and Peter Opie have made an inestimable
contribution  - in such books as The Lore and Language of Schoolchildren
(1959), The Oxford Dictionary of Nursery Rhymes (1951) and Tail Feathers
from Mother Goose (1988)  - to our understanding of the relationship between
literature and the oral tradition in so far as it relates to the world of
childhood. Assiduous folklorists, they have been the Brothers Grimm of our
times; and their studies have always been enlivened by a characteristic
mixture of childish curiosity and academic rigour, humour and seriousness.
This month sees the publication of I Saw Esau, a remarkable collaboration
between the Opies and the acclaimed illustrator of children's books, Maurice
Sendak, author of Where the Wild Things Are, In the Night Kitchen and many
other award-winning titles.
Sendak's most revolutionary work was first published in the 1960s, and it
was shocking for its lack of sentimentality. Sendak set that whole
generation of children's illustrators a positive example by confronting
childhood fears head on  - the fear of the dark; the fear of monsters; the
fear of feeling helpless and small in a world of giants. Somehow his
illustrations managed to tame, normalise, and even to domesticate such
anxieties. You might even say that he was at one with all those efforts that
have been made in the 20th century  - by psychoanalysis, surrealism and much
else  - to bring about a fruitful, healing accommodation between the world
of fantasy and everyday reality.
The new book has a curious history. The Opies gathered these rhymes in the
immediate aftermath of the Second World War, and the collection was
published in a small, limited edition  - paper was strictly rationed in
those days. One copy alone survived from that printing, tucked away in the
back of a cupboard. Forty years later it was rediscovered and shown to
Maurice Sendak in New York who, enthused by the content, agreed to
illustrate it.
This collection of 170 rhymes is subtitled 'The schoolchild's pocket book'
and it is indeed a vade mecum, a book for all occasions, zestful, humorous,
but also savage and macabre. There are rhymes of insult and retaliation;
rhymes of teasing and repartee; counting rhymes, skipping rhymes; tongue
twisters, riddles and general teasers; lashings of nonsense and bamboozling
circular narratives.
Sendak has illustrated it in zestful colour throughout, enthusiastically
filling up every available inch of blank space with illustrations small,
medium and large  - squawling babies; shrieking maids in mob caps; horned
ogres with vast, cavernous mouths; leaping dogs and cavorting donkeys; and
everywhere, those rumbustious children in rags and tatters and big top hats,
fleeing, skipping, jumping, cartwheeling off the edge of the page. There are
as many different kinds and style of illustration as there are subjects to
match and fishes in the seas.
What never fails to charm and surprise us about the collection itself is the
fact that there is such a demonstrable continuity between past and present.
Among the nonsense verses we find the following familiar lines, for example:
One fine day in the middle of the night / Two dead men got up to fight / A
blind man came to see fair play / A dumb man came to shout hurray.
A note to the rhyme informs us that this is one of the oldest forms of
nonsense, and then goes on to cite an amusement that was jotted down in the
notebook of a minstrel in 1480. The translation reads as follows: I saw
three headless (men) / playing at ball / A handless man served / them all /
While three mouthless (men) / sang and howled / Three legless (men) / drove
them away . . .
Rhymes may die for whole generations, it seems, then mysteriously reappear
in a slightly modified form elsewhere. Like the thistles in Ted Hughes's
fine poem of that name, they come fighting back over the same ground,
vigorous as ever. In this book, they are part of the schoolchild's armoury
 -a way of overcoming fear and embarrassment, a magical means of
incapacitating the school bully with mere words. And mere words, of course,
endure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
Weekend Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11316</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Dumping of D-rams alleged
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MICRON Technology, a US memory chip maker, has filed a dumping complaint
against South Korean semiconductor makers, accusing them of selling memory
devices in the US at less than their cost of production.
The anti-dumping petition, which has been filed with the US Department of
Commerce and the US International Trade Commission, will prompt the US
agencies to investigate the allegations of dumping, which have been a matter
of growing concern among US chip makers over the past two months.
If dumping is proved, the US could impose dumping duties on Korean D-rams
sold in the US. D-rams (Dynamic random access memory) are data storage
chips, used in all types of computers and electronics equipment. Prices have
fallen precipitously over the past year, as supply outstripped demand from
the recession-plagued computer industry.
'Micron has compelling data that indicates that US laws are being violated,'
said Mr Joe Parkinson, Micron chairman. The company claims to have obtained
invoices and delivery documents to support its claim.
Micron alleges that Hyundai Electronics and Goldstar Electron are worst
offenders. The anti-dumping complaint applies, however, to all Korean D-ram
producers, including Samsung, which last year became the world's leading
producer of one megabit D-ram chips, with a 14 per cent share of the world
market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11317</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finance &amp; the Family: CGT allowances for March
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE TABLE shows capital gains tax allowances for assets sold in March. To
use it, multiply the original cost of the assest by the figure shown for the
month in which you bought them.
If you subtract the result from the proceeds of your sale, the difference
will be your taxable gain or loss.
Suppose that you bought shares for pounds 6,000 in February 1986 and sold
them in March 1992 for pounds 13,500. Multiplying the original cost by the
February 1986 figure of 1.415 gives a total of pounds 8,490.
Subtracting that from the proceeds of pounds 13,500 gives a gain for tax
purposes of pounds 5,010 - below the 1991-92 pounds 5,500 CGT allowance. If
you realised no other gains during the year, the profit should be tax-free.
If you are selling shares bought before April 6, 1982, use the March 1982
figure.
 -----------------------------------------------------
       CGT INDEXATION ALLOWANCES: MARCH
 -----------------------------------------------------
         1982     1983     1984     1985
Jan      -        1.655    1.574    1.499
Feb      -        1.648    1.568    1.487
Mar      1.721    1.645    1.563    1.473
Apr      1.687    1.622    1.542    1.442
May      1.675    1.615    1.536    1.436
Jun      1.670    1.611    1.532    1.433
Jul      1.670    1.603    1.534    1.435
Aug      1.669    1.596    1.520    1.432
Sep      1.670    1.588    1.517    1.432
Oct      1.662    1.583    1.508    1.430
Nov      1.654    1.577    1.503    1.425
Dec      1.657    1.573    1.504    1.423
 -----------------------------------------------------
         1986     1987     1988     1989
Jan      1.420    1.367    1.323    1.232
Feb      1.415    1.362    1.318    1.223
Mar      1.413    1.359    1.313    1.217
Apr      1.400    1.343    1.292    1.196
May      1.397    1.342    1.287    1.189
Jun      1.398    1.342    1.282    1.185
Jul      1.402    1.343    1.281    1.184
Aug      1.397    1.339    1.267    1.180
Sep      1.391    1.335    1.261    1.172
Oct      1.388    1.328    1.248    1.163
Nov      1.377    1.322    1.243    1.154
Dec      1.372    1.323    1.239    1.151
 -----------------------------------------------------
         1990     1991     1992
Jan      1.144    1.050    1.008
Feb      1.137    1.044    1.003
Mar      1.126    1.040    -
Apr      1.093    1.027    -
May      1.083    1.024    -
Jun      1.079    1.019    -
Jul      1.078    1.022    -
Aug      1.067    1.019    -
Sep      1.057    1.016    -
Oct      1.049    1.012    -
Nov      1.052    1.008    -
Dec      1.052    1.007    -
 -----------------------------------------------------
Source: Inland Revenue
 -----------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11318</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Rip van Winkle's new world order: The fall of the Soviet
bloc has left the IMF and G7 to rule the world and create a new imperial age
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHUT YOUR eyes and think: what would the world be like if the October
Revolution of 1917 had never happened? Answer: it would be rather like it is
today. If Rip van Winkle had gone to sleep in 1912 and woken 80 years later,
he would understand a good deal without knowing anything of Lenin, Stalin,
Hitler, communism, fascism, two world wars and the end of empire. Only
Russia would be a dreadful disappointment: its present state might seem to
mark a step or two backwards.
Reports of 100 years ago from Russia, and elsewhere, have a strange
resonance now. There was a fearful famine; the Illustrated London News had a
drawing of peasants tearing the thatch from their hovels to feed to starving
cattle. From London, there were pictures of families evicted from their
newly-acquired homes. The jokes in Punch were about the pretensions of the
German Reich to a leading role in world affairs. In the Berliner Tageblatt,
Eugen Wolf, an explorer and foreign correspondent, reported that 'conditions
in Africa leave much to be desired.'
It is not just a question of arguing that we are now back in Victorian times
and that the game of nations can resume normal play. The world has moved on;
but it must be faced as a direct descendant, in great matters and in small,
of that which existed 100 years ago and to which the past 75 have almost
been irrelevant.
A distinguishing mark of this age is that a large number of 'exploded myths'
have suddenly become living reality. It is only five years since EJ Hobsbawm
wrote The Age of Imperialism characterising the period 1875-1914 as one that
was gone forever and could be recaptured only as a bourgeois fantasy.
Bourgeois fantasies are now concrete reality and it is the myths of Marxist
historians that lie in ruins.
Quite unnoticed, imperialism is back in fashion. Nobody calls it that,
except for those who believed it never went away and, therefore, fail to
recognise its present character. It is in the know-how funds and systems for
technology transfer operating in eastern Europe and, above all, in a vast
framework under construction in the developing world; bringing in experts
from Washington, Paris and Frankfurt to tell others how to run their
affairs.
Englishmen draw up plans for privatisation in Prague. In India last October,
the Frenchman who runs the International Monetary Fund, Michel Camdessus,
went to New Delhi to nod approvingly at plans drawn up there for economic
and social reform to the standard IMF template.
The construction of a new global system is orchestrated by the Group of
Seven, the IMF, the World Bank and the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade (Gatt). But it works through a system of indirect rule that has
involved the integration of leaders of developing countries into the network
of the new ruling class.
This weekend, leaders of the developing countries will be listening
attentively to the warnings from the G7 finance ministers and the IMF at
their spring meetings in Washington. Yegor Gaidar, the Russian deputy prime
minister, will be told to ensure the agreed programme is followed - or there
is no aid.
This week the IMF's half-yearly economic outlook singled out the developing
countries in general, and the Latin Americans in particular, for praise:
they had accepted IMF policies and followed them far more loyally than the
richer members of the Fund.
It is not just a question of there being no 'systems argument' any more, as
Sir Ralf Dahrendorf, former head of the London School of Economics, puts it.
There is just one class of people in charge.
In India last October, I found the men in charge enthusiastically ditching
the post-colonial orthodoxies of autarky, independence and self-reliance and
speaking the same language as the neo-liberals of Washington and London. At
the Chilean embassy in Washington last April the finance minister, Alejandro
Foxley, entertained journalists with a scathing attack on the policies of
the industrialised world. But it was not about exploitation, nor the need
for more aid. It was about the need for free trade and the hypocrisy of the
rich nations in demanding open markets in the Third World while closing
their own.
The vehicle by which the free-market gospel has been transmitted has
received scant attention in the rich countries but is omnipresent in the
media of the poor: the Structural Adjustment Programme. It is like the
Middle Ages, when missionaries went out from western Europe to the eastern
half and taught market gardening and architecture, but the real aim was to
spread the word of God. The SAP is the word of God today.
The official line is that it is a natural product of the disinterested
advice the IMF and World Bank have offered their clients over four decades.
In fact, the SAP emerged from the two organisations when they had to find
new ways of using their money. Both had come to the limits of their ability
to resolve mere technical problems: how to supply electricity and highways;
how to deal with a short-term balance of payments problem. Successes had
been limited, anyway, partly because it was becoming harder to manage bits
of economies without managing the lot. So, each developed the means of doing
just that.
There was a clash between them in 1988. But that was resolved, and they run
large parts of the developing world and eastern Europe while insisting that
the governments concerned are merely implementing their own plans. 'We are
there to help,' as the British used to say.
The essence of the SAP is to encourage governments to follow the right kind
of reform policy. A developing country can receive large, cheap loans if it
adopts the programmes embodied in the orthodoxy of (more or less) balanced
budgets, devaluation, privatisation, and a hearty welcome for foreign
investment.
The evolution of structural adjustment programmes has involved the total
integration of the IMF and World Bank into the life of the target countries.
They have become involved in welfare programmes to minimise the instability
that could wreck the new order. A host of social instruments in these
countries are organised by the new imperialists. It does not end there.
In recent years, the declarations of G7 summits and IMF-World Bank annual
meetings have echoed a further, concern by the rich about the way the poor
run their affairs. There is now to be strict control, supposedly, on arms
exports to developing countries - an inevitable consequence, perhaps, of
Saddam Hussein.
The industrialised nations have promoted what is known as a Global
Environment Facility in the World Bank. Its purpose is to bribe developing
countries into building non-polluting industrial projects: in other words,
to prevent others doing what the industrial countries have done.
It was a nice coincidence that the world's trade ministers opened their
present, perhaps doomed, global negotiations in Uruguay in 1986. The choice
highlighted another return to pre-1914 orthodoxies. Uruguay was the classic
prosperous, peripheral economy, the Switzerland of south America, a nation
that grew rich on free access to the vast food market of Britain and could
erect an exemplary welfare state on the profits.
The re-establishment of such prosperity is a primary aim of the Uruguay
Round. It forgets entirely the old 'borrow and industrialise' programmes
that dominated development thinking for 40 years after 1945. Today, a nation
should again be able to grow fat on raising cattle. Developing countries not
only accept what would have been regarded as a subordinate role in the world
economy two decades ago - they support the demand for a system where that
subordination can be exercised.
Finally, of course, there is the now-regular insistence on human rights. It
was built into the policy for recognising Croatia and will prove entirely
meaningless.
There is a portmanteau phrase of the New Imperialism to cover all this:
'good governance.' It has unsettled Third World establishments but these,
apart from one or two of the less savoury Islamic regimes, have no
ideological resources to combat the pressure.
Calling this phenomenon the New Imperialism will be resented. But
imperialism was not always a pejorative term. It described the integration -
admittedly by force rather than choice  - of the world economy. The British,
100 years ago, saw it as a civilising power. The Americans, too: President
McKinley wrote in 1898: 'The mission of the United States is one of
benevolent assimilation, substituting the mild sway of justice and right for
arbitrary rule.' That is the policy the US and its allies say they are
pursuing today. And it is more or less accepted at face value everywhere
outside the last communist redoubts.
Now, this all is amazingly different from, say, 1970, but not very different
from 1900. Twenty years ago I was living in Malaysia, writing for the Far
Eastern Economic Review. If I even alluded to 'human rights' I was treated
as a colonial leftover promoting some cynical western ploy in the Cold War.
The phrase 'Westminster democracy' was a term of abuse. Today, leaders such
as Daniel Arap Moi of Kenya suffer direct foreign interference, and lose aid
money, when they articulate their opposition to Westminster democracy.
Within the old imperial lands, things are returning to the status quo ante.
The First World War put an end to the horizontal relationships that existed
among the upper echelons of society. The English ruling class was more
familiar with its German counterpart than with its own countrymen in the
slums of London. The retreat into the nation, and the consequent concern
with domestic social policy that was caused by the conflicts of the 20th
century, has ended. Inequality grows as the wealthier strata absorb
ever-higher shares of a nation's income. Huge salaries for managing
directors are justified, with a straight face, by reference to the
'international market in senior executives.'
In his book The World of Work, published in November, Professor Robert Reich
concluded: 'When we speak of the 'competitiveness' of Americans in general,
we are talking only about how much the world is prepared to spend, on
average, for services performed by Americans. Some Americans may command
higher rewards; others far lower. No longer are Americans rising or falling
together, as if in one large boat. We are, increasingly, in different,
smaller boats.'
This situation replicates that of the English rentier class before the First
World War. The evolution of the domestic business cycle, the happiness or
misery of the industrial working class, were matters of abstract concern to
those who made their living from Chinese railway bonds or Russian government
stock. They could travel Europe with a single currency and seldom require a
passport.
It is daunting to think that the cataclysmic events since 1913 are
insignificant historically, but it is obvious that the Russian revolution
will not play the role in history that is assigned to the French. The period
1914-1990 has already been called 'the short century' and appears even now
as an aberration.
Rip van Winkle might well be able to understand our world better than we do
because he would be free of the baggage of the past 80 years. There would,
however, be one misapprehension. At some moment, he would almost certainly
remark: 'But aren't you afraid of the socialists?'
James Morgan is economics correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11319</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Afghan mujahideen agree to form ruling council
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By FARHAN BOKHARI and DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ISLAMABAD, KABUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A BREAKTHROUGH in United Nations-brokered talks among Afghan mujahideen
leaders came last night with an agreement in Pakistan to form a 50-member
council which would go to Kabul in the next few days to take power.
The council will rule for two months before turning over power to a supreme
council. This body would prepare a further council of tribal leaders to
choose a transitional government to lead up to elections a year later.
The premiership is being held for Mr Gulbuddin Hekmatyar's fundamentalist
Hezb-e-Islami party. Mr Hekmatyar has offered only conditional support for
the agreement, demanding that the 50-member council stage be eliminated. He
is still in Afghanistan and has not ratified the plan.
Mr Ahmed Shah Masood, commander of the moderate, northern-based
Jamiat-e-Islami (Party of Islam), is to be defence minister.
The 50-member council will be led by Mr Sibghatullah Mojadidi, a former
professor, who leads the small, moderate Afghan National Liberation Front.
It is to be made up of 30 field commanders, 10 Islamic clerics and 10
members selected by the political parties.
The supreme council is to be headed by Mr Burhanuddin Rabbani,
Jamiat-e-Islami leader.
It remained unclear in Kabul whether the accord would end the 13-year-old
civil war. Although Najibullah is no longer president, rivalry between
mujahideen groups has threatened a continuation of the conflict.
Three Afghan generals pledged that the armed forces would support a
government to be formed by the guerrillas.
The deal came shortly after the arrival in Pakistan of Mr Boutros
Boutros-Ghali, UN secretary-general, who said the UN would seek peace in
Afghanistan. 'I will consult leaders of this country (Pakistan) and ask
their assistance, so that we will be able to continue our role of
conciliation among the different groups in Afghanistan.'
Several thousand guerrillas from rival mujahideen groups slipped into Kabul
yesterday in what seemed to be a move towards taking control of the city.
The government has said it is prepared to hand power to a united mujahideen
government.
Mr Raz Mohammad Pakteen, interior minister, confirmed in an interview that
2,000-3,000 armed mujahideen had entered Kabul. Other reports suggested the
figure could be as high as 20,000.
Most are from groups who support Mr Masood.
The eastern city of Jalalabad - the last outside the capital to remain in
government control - yesterday fell to a coalition of guerrilla groups.
Ethnic rivalry casts shadow over hopes for peace, Page 3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11320</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Channel tunnel project facesfurther increases in costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR and ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROTUNNEL, the embattled Channel tunnel group, yesterday announced a
further big rise in the cost of the project and confirmed it was in
technical breach of loan covenants.
This will prevent it drawing cash without special permission from its
bankers.
The group has also started proceedings which it says would allow it to set
aside a ruling that it must triple contractors' monthly progress payments to
Pounds 75m.
Mr John Neerhout, project director, said the decision to begin arbitration
proceedings with the Industrial Chambers of Commerce in Brussels would make
unenforceable last month's payments ruling by an independent disputes panel.
Sir Alastair Morton, chief executive, said at the announcement of
Eurotunnel's annual results in London that the estimated cost of completing
the project - due to open next year  - had risen since last autumn from
Pounds 7.37bn to Pounds 8.1bn. The final cost would be even higher because
the project was not expected to break even until 1996.
The uncertainty over the project's costs will lead to added complications in
Eurotunnel's attempt to persuade banks to allow it to continue to draw down
funds following the breach in loan covenants. The breach was caused by an
increase in the forecast of cash outflow during the first years of the
tunnel's operation because of delays in providing a full train service,
higher costs and economic growth at a lower level than expected.
As a result the group must have the permission of banks - in the form of a
waiver of the relevant covenant - to allow it to continue to draw down the
next tranche of loans due in June, when Eurotunnel will run out of cash. The
19 leading lenders to the company, known as the instructing banks, were
briefed yesterday by Sir Alastair.
Under its borrowing contracts, Eurotunnel needs agreement from 65 per cent
of banks as measured by the value of their loans. Bankers, led by four agent
banks - National Westminster and Midland from the UK, Credit Lyonnais and
Banque Nationale de Paris from France - say receiving that support is not
assured. Eurotunnel says it is confident of receiving it.
Eurotunnel has equity and banking facilities of Pounds 8.9bn which it says
is enough for it to complete construction. Nevertheless borrowings will
continue to rise after the tunnel is open and will exceed the group's
previous estimate of Pounds 8.05bn of maximum indebtedness, taking it close
to the limit of its resources.
Sir Alastair said there were no plans for a rights issue before next autumn
but he would not rule out a refinancing after trains started operating
through the tunnel.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11321</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / German union calls for 'massive warning strikes':
Engineering workers add weight to public sector threat
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER PARKES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WESTERN GERMANY'S 4m en-gineering workers rejected a 3.3 per cent pay offer
yesterday and prepared to add their weight to the wave of strikes already
threatening chaos in public services next week.
Mr Franz Steinkuhler, president of the IG Metall union, said the offer was
meant as a provocation and would be treated as such. He called for 'massive
warning strikes' next week.
Three factories in Hesse were hit immediately as 4,000 workers walked out in
the morning.
The danger of widespread public sector stoppages was heightened when the DAG
white-collar union announced 74.7 per cent of its membership had chosen
action. A 70 per cent 'yes' vote is needed for strikes to be called. Ballot
results from the main public service union OeTV, with 1.2m members, are
expected today.
Work at the Hamburg central post office, which handles 4m pieces of mail a
day, was disrupted yesterday when 400 staff were called out on indefinite
strike. Services were already 'crippled', the DPG post office workers' union
claimed. Cologne-based motorway maintenance workers also stopped work.
Results from smaller groups underlined the strength of feeling in the
workforce. The DPG union reported a 95.4 per cent strike vote. Almost 90 per
cent of motorway maintenance workers in the VDS union voted for action.
Mr Josef Hilgers, the VDS leader, said that even a 5.4 per cent pay deal,
proposed recently by an arbitration council and rejected by employers, would
leave his members only DM80 (Pounds 27) a month better off.
The employers, led by Mr Rudolf Seiters, interior minister, confirmed on
Thursday that, while they were prepared to reopen talks, they would not
increase their offer of 4.8 per cent.
Mr Theo Waigel, finance minister, yesterday reaffirmed his commitment to an
effective freeze on public spending for four years.
Engineering employers, representing the powerhouse of the German economy,
want to link pay rises to productivity increases, expected to be about 2 per
cent this year. They claim that excessive labour costs forced them to cut
62,000 manufacturing jobs last year. IG Metall is demanding 9.5 per cent.
Mr Helmut Schlesinger, president of the Bundesbank, warned of a 'great
danger of a further turn in the spiral' of wages and prices 'if, as is now
the case, people expect wage rises to offset price rises which have resulted
from higher taxes and government levies'.
There was no sign that the public sector unions, representing about 3m
workers, were prepared to take up Mr Seiters' offer of more talks. Their
previous strike, which lasted three days in 1974, was limited mainly to
local transport and rubbish collection services in key towns.
Bonn spurns US criticism, Page 2 Frankfurt shares steady, Page 19
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11322</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Stock Markets (America): Higher bond yields send Dow
lower
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
ALTHOUGH DRUG stocks recovered well from losses sustained earlier in the
week, a round of computerised program selling late yesterday left share
prices rooted firmly in negative territory, writes Patrick Harverson in New
York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 24.15 at 3,324.46.
The more broadly based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 also ended lower, down 2.59 at
409.01, while the Nasdaq composite index slipped 3.16 to 572.89. Turnover on
the NYSE was 200m shares, and declines outpaced rises by 891 to 788.
In early trading, another rise in long-term bond yields unsettled equity
investors. Higher Treasury yields are seen as a threat to economic recovery
because they put upward pressure on mortgage rates, and also make stocks
less attractive to yield-hungry investors. Although they fell back later,
stubbornly high bond yields remain bad news for stocks.
The feeling that the market is overvalued, at least until corporate earnings
catch up with gains in equity prices, was another negative factor. The
generally positive first quarter results have been discounted by the market,
and more good economic news is now needed before investors make fresh
purchases, analysts said.
Drug stocks, which had been sold heavily on Thursday on concern that they
would underperform the market, bounced back. Merck rose more than Dollars 1
in the morning, but ended up only  3/8 at Dollars 140 1/8 . Schering-Plough
rose Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 52 5/8 , Pfizer put on Dollars 2 1/8 at Dollars
68 3/4 and Eli Lilly rose Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 68 3/8 .
General Motors dropped Dollars 2 3/4 to Dollars 39 5/8 in turnover of 2.5m
shares as the market awaited news of the latest developments in the planned
re-organisation of the car maker's unprofitable North American business. GM
also notified the Securities and Exchange Commission that it will raise more
than Dollars 2bn from a public offering of 50m shares. GM's weakness spread
to other car stocks, with Ford down Dollars  7/8 at Dollars 43 1/4 and
Chrysler off Dollars 1 at Dollars 18 1/2 .
After early gains, bank stocks ran into heavy profit-taking. Chemical fell
Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 35 3/4 in brisk trading despite reports from the
company's management that cost savings from its recent merger with
Manufacturers Hanover would exceed targets, that loan loss provisions would
decline for the rest of the year and that revenues exceeded internal
estimates. Also lower were JP Morgan, down Dollars 1 at Dollars 54 3/8 ,
Bankers Trust, Dollars  3/4 easier at Dollars 57 3/4 , and Citicorp, down
Dollars  1/4 at Dollars 18 3/4 . Chiquita Brands plunged Dollars 4 1/4 to
Dollars 20 3/8 after the company reported on Thursday that first quarter
profit was well down on a year ago, and said it did not expect to meet 1992
earnings forecasts.
Canada
TORONTO STOCK prices closed lower in light trading, as the composite index
was pushed downward by a sell-off in the last hour of a generally bearish
trading week.
According to preliminary figures, the index fell 21.78 points, or 0.65 per
cent, to close at 3,349.69, after edging up 3.72 points yesterday. The index
was down only about seven points entering the last hour of trading, before
dropping sharply to the close.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11323</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Money Markets: UK rates firmer
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
There was little change in rates on the money markets yesterday, where most
traders still held firmly to the belief that an interest rate cut was a
far-off prospect. Thursday's increased money supply figures in Germany again
hung over the markets, with one analyst suggesting that an economic
turnaround in Germany was unlikely to come before the end of the third
quarter.
In the interbank market, 3-month money, a key indicator of future base rate
movements, remained un-changed on the previous night's close at 10 9/16 -
7/16 . However, one trader said that it had ended high on the week,
considering that it had been trading at around 10 1/2 - 3/8 in recent days.
One year money ended a touch firmer on the previous day's close. It finished
at 10 3/8 - 1/4 , having closed on Thursday night at 10 5/16 - 3/16 . In the
futures market, the June sterling contract again ended at 89.63, indicating
an implied interest rate of 10.37%.
In the discount market, it was, in the words of one trader, 'another
expensive day for money.' The Bank of England started the day by posting a
shortage of around Pounds 1.15bn. In early operations, the Bank purchased
bills totalling Pounds 153m. These were made up of Pounds 5m of sterling
Band-1 bank bills at 10 3/8 per cent, Pounds 5m of Band-2 bank bills at 10
3/8 per cent, Pounds 34m of Band-3 bills at 10  5/32 per cent,Pounds 2m of
Band-4 Late Assistance bills at 10 1/16 per cent and Pounds 107m of Band-4
bank bills at 10 1/16 per cent.
In further operations the bank purchased Pounds 95m of Band-3 bills at 10
5/32 per cent and Pounds 48m of Band-4 bank bills at 10 1/16 per cent.
In the afternoon, the Bank revised its estimate of the shortage to around
Pounds 1.1bn. The Bank purchased a further Pounds 468m of bank bills at 10
3/8 %, taking Pounds 348m in band one and Pounds 120m in Band-2. It then
provided late assistance of Pounds 310m.
German call money held steady at about 9.65% despite the sharp jump in
German M3 money supply in March. On Thursday, the Bundesbank said that March
M3 had risen by a much higher than expected 9.7 per cent annualised rate
after an 8.6 per cent rise in February. However, dealers said that the
surprise increase did not change the likelihood that call money would stay
up near the 9.75 per cent Lombard rate for the foreseeable future.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11324</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Foreign Exchanges: D-Mark continues to gain
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The D-Mark once again commanded attention on foreign exchange markets
yesterday, where Thursday's money supply figures from Germany continued to
hold sway over traders. The German M3 statistics, which revealed that money
supply had risen by 9.7 per cent in March, have convinced traders that no
interest rate cut is likely in Germany in the near future.
According to Mr Neil Mac-Kinnon, chief economist at Yamaichi, market
sentiment was dominated by those figures throughout the day. 'It is likely
that the Bundesbank will resist pressure for an interest rate cut at this
weekend's G7 meeting,' he said. 'And many are worried that they will
actually increase rates.'
As a result, the D-Mark ended up against both the dollar and sterling. In
London, it closed at DM1.6505 against the dollar, a cent up compared to its
previous close of DM1.6605. Against sterling, the D-Mark ended at DM2.9250
after a previous close of DM2.9300.
D-Mark strength apart, the dollar had its own reasons for a weak performance
on markets yesterday. Some traders said that dollar support had been partly
undermined by a growing frustration with the pace of US recovery, with many
traders hedging their bets until an important series of US economic
indicators are published next week. In London, the pound ended at Dollars
1.7720, compared to a previous close of Dollars 1.7650.
In yen-dollar trading, dealers seemed unwilling to take any bets on the
possible outcome of this weekend's G7 summit in Washington. In London, the
dollar ended almost unchanged against at Y134.55. 'The market is taking the
G7 with a pinch of salt,' said Mr MacKinnon of Yamaichi. He recalled that,
before the Garden City G7 summit in January, there had been speculation on a
deal to prop up the yen. Nothing came of it, however, and dealers did not
want to be caught out a second time.
In early New York trading, the dollar moved up slightly from a lower
opening. It was at DM1.617 up from 1.6485 at the opening.
Sterling's weakness against the D-Mark came despite some encouraging
indicators on the UK economy. Sluggish high street sales before the UK
election were disappointing, though Britain's current account deficit at
Pounds 575m in March was in line with expectations. The market chose to
ignore these figures, feeling that German economic issues were
all-important. Sterling could not withstand a surge in the franc, which
resumed its place third from bottom in the EMS grid after France announced a
FFr1.4bn trade surplus for March, far higher than forecast. Sterling ended
at FFr9.8825 compared to a previous close of FFr9.8925.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11325</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: Kellogg helped by sale of unit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KELLOGG, the US cereals group, reported after-tax profits of Dollars 196.2m
in the first three months of 1992, up from Dollars 163.1m in the same period
a year earlier.
Kellogg said the results included a one-off pre-tax gain of Dollars 58.5m
from the sale of Fearn International, a US food service subsidiary,
partially offset by a charge of Dollars 22.4m following the sale of its
convenience foods operations in Canada, and some other US assets.
Without these distorting factors, first-quarter profits would have improved
by 4.5 per cent. Sales were up by 6.6 per cent in the first three months, to
Dollars 1.51bn. Kellogg shares fell Dollars  1/8 to Dollars 56 1/8
yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11326</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: GM reshapes N American
operations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN DICKSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GENERAL MOTORS, the US automobile manufacturer which has been suffering
heavy losses, yesterday announced plans for a major reorganisation of its
troubled North American operations and the strengthening of its balance
sheet through a share offering which could raise Dollars 2.3bn.
The company is to reshape its North American operations into two divisions,
one for trucks and one for cars, in place of the three-division structure
introduced in 1984, with one for trucks, one for large cars and one for
small cars.
The moves are part of a shake-up initiated last December when the company
said it would cut some 70,000 jobs over the next few years, close 21 plants
and streamline its North American operations.
Mr Robert Stempel, the chairman, told staff that yesterday's shake-up was
likely to lead to the loss of about 20,000 out of the 70,000 jobs which are
on the line.
Analysts said the moves were also likely to lead to the elimination of a
significant part of GM's model range.
The move came just weeks after GM's non-executive directors staged a
boardroom coup which clipped Mr Stempel's wings, demoted two board members,
and elevated Mr Jack Smith, head of international operations, to president
and chief operating officer.
The issue of common stock, also announced yesterday, will be an important
test of investors' views of the company following the shake-up.
The share issue will be GM's first issue of common stock since 1955 and the
largest public stock offering in US history, excluding the Dollars 2.8bn
rights offering to existing shareholders made by Time Warner last year.
The current record for a straight common stock issue is held by Chemical
Banking, which raised some Dollars 1.4bn earlier this year. Over the past
six months corporate America in general has rushed to take advantage of a
strong stock market to issue equity and reduce the heavy debt burden it took
on during the 1980s.
GM, which lost Dollars 4.5bn last year, has already raised Dollars 3.358bn
through three tranches of preference stock since the middle of 1991. It had
been widely expected to follow through with an issue of common stock,
although the magnitude of yesterday's proposed offering took some traders by
surprise. GM's shares closed Dollars 2 3/4 lower on Wall Street yesterday at
Dollars 39 5/8 .
The company plans to issue 50m shares in an offer led managed by Morgan
Stanley. Some 35m of the shares are likely to be allocated to the US, with
tranches of 6m in the UK, 4.5m in Asia/Pacific markets and 4.5m in other
international markets. A further 7.5m shares might be sold in the US if
there is sufficient demand. GM currently has some 630m shares outstanding.
The group also plans to contribute 12m shares of common stock to its US
pension plans this year, in additional to its required contributions, to
reduce the schemes' Dollars 8.6bn underfunding.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11327</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / International Company News: Hungarian drug group rises 190%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CHINOIN, the Hungarian pharmaceuticals company in which Sanofi of France has
a substantial minority shareholding, increased after-tax profits by 190 per
cent for 1991.
Chinoin's net profits rose to Ft2.29bn (Dollars 29m) on sales of Ft14bn. The
performance owes much to the success of Jumex, the drug against Parkinson's
disease which was the first Hungarian compound to be approved for use in the
US, and Ipriflavon, a treatment for osteoporosis. Royalties from the two
helped Chinoin increase sales in western countries by 44 per cent and
compensated for the collapse of the Soviet market.
Chinoin's earnings trend indicates that the profit-related purchase price
for the 40 per cent stake acquired by Sanofi will move towards the top end
of the Dollars 75m-Dollars 150m range agreed with the Hungarian authorities
last year. Sanofi also has an option to take its shareholding to a majority
from 1994.
Chinoin's figures contrast markedly with those of other western joint
ventures in Hungary which have generally suffered disappointing sales and
profits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11328</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Letter: Not lobster eaters
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr WILLIAM NORTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The article by Dominic Lawson, 'Pity the lobster socialists - A plan to
help wealthy Labour voters carry on' (April 18), must be one of the most
insensitive ever to be published by you.
The 3m unemployed, the many bankrupt entrepreneurs, the dispossessed, do not
eat lobster - nor will they be helped by the new government.
Mr Lawson has displayed his total lack of Christian charity in his
unwillingness to countenance the redistribution of wealth from fat cats
(like him and me) to the poor and needy. His cynical approach would have
made even Marie Antoinette ('let them eat cake') seem generous.
Government of the people, by the 42 per cent for the 42 per cent was not
what Abraham Lincoln had in mind.
Cannot you dispense with the services of this servant of Genghis Khan?
William Norton,
The Dovecote Field,
Brant Broughton, Lincoln
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11329</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Letter: Corporate security strategies can help counter
terrorism
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr P A GWYNN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Having the ultimate responsibility for investigating serious crime in the
City I was very disappointed to read the remarks of Mr Noboshi Kamei of
Sanwa Bank in your article, 'City workers accused of complacency on
security' (April 23), on security in the wake of the St Mary Axe bombing.
Unlike Mr Kamei I firmly believe that there is a range of positive
preventive measures capable of deterring the terrorist.
As a community the Square Mile can, in partnership with the police, raise
general public awareness of the potential threat. Terrorism after all is
serious crime - the murder and maiming of innocent people and the
destruction of property. Society has long accepted the principle of
combating and preventing general crime, so why should terrorism be viewed
any differently?
We need to maximise the effectiveness of the available resources, ie the
deployment of the man guarding resources by patrolling the exterior of
premises, enhanced use of closed-circuit TV cameras, proper access control
measures to buildings and encouragement of staff to be alert to any
suspicious activity, whether by individuals or vehicles in the vicinity of
their premises. The police, meanwhile, play their part by substantially
enhancing uniform patrolling and focusing all their efforts to protect the
public. By these and other methods we can together hopefully deter the
terrorist.
In the event of an incident occurring, the loss of life, injury and damage
can be minimised by taking physical and and safety protection measures -
blast-proof film for windows and bomb incident contingency plans covering
the searching and safe evacuation of premises.
Implementation of these basic security and safety plans should be an
integral part of any corporate security strategy serious in its efforts to
protect its employees.
Free advice is available to all who ask. P A Gwynn,
detective chief superintendent,
head of CID,
City of London Police,
26 Old Jewry, London EC2
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11330</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / A world of uncertainty: Developments from Germany to Japan
have loosened the Group of Seven's grip on the global economic structure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
By rights, the next few days in Washington should be a period of quiet
satisfaction for the capitalist west.
Russia and the other republics that emerged from the wreckage of the Soviet
Union have completed the formalities to join the International Monetary Fund
next week (IMF), marking their entry into the international financial
community and their acceptance of market economics.
But there is no sense of triumph in the finance ministries and central banks
of the world's richest nations, as they prepare for tomorrow's meeting of
the Group of Seven leading industrial countries and the regular spring
meetings of the IMF and World Bank on the following two days.
Over the past six months, it has dawned on policymakers that the world
economic structure of the 1980s, which the G7 - the US, Japan, Germany,
France, Italy, the UK and Canada - could dominate, is no more. Nobody
pretended it was an ideal economic order. But the G7 participants knew
enough of each other's temperaments and goals to avoid damaging, public rows
most of the time and occasionally to attempt ambitious schemes for
co-ordinating policy.
The old certainties have been replaced by widespread uncertainty and
confusion. In the interdependent world economy of today, such confusion
could pose a threat to the G7 nations and smaller industrialised countries
too.
Economists and pundits still like to think of a tri-polar world, with
economic influence shared between the US, the European Community and Japan.
But over the past six months, this vision has been threatened by bewildering
developments in a vast territory from the Rhine Valley in the west to Tokyo
in the east.
Western policymakers are no longer able to assess accurately the import of
three distinct economic developments:
Nobody knows what is happening to the Russian economy: whether its
precipitate decline in activity is approaching bottom or whether more misery
lies ahead.
It has become increasingly unclear whether Germany can make a success of
unification. Some of Germany's trading partners fear that the new Lander
will be incapable of being weaned off subsidies and transfer payments from
the west, necessitating high German fiscal deficits and high interest rates
for a considerable time. The causes and dynamics of Japan's shrinking stock
market values are not clear to policymakers in other G7 countries. Officials
in the US, Canada and Britain learned the hard way in the 1980s that asset
price deflation is difficult to manage and translates all too easily into
real recession. Although Japan's trading partners have so far accepted the
assurances of Tokyo that all is under control, doubts remain.
These three imponderables cannot be taken in isolation. The interdependence
of the world economy means that all have serious implications for other
countries.
Germany's problems of integrating the new eastern Lander were felt
throughout Europe last December. To curb the monetary expansion unleashed by
massive fiscal transfers and subsidies to the east, the Bundesbank raised
its interest rates to levels last seen in the 1930s.
Since the G7 last met in Garden City, Long Island, in January, recognition
has grown among Germany's trading partners that the country's problems are
not those of an overmighty central bank. Instead, attention has focused on
the mix of monetary and fiscal policy. The IMF this week joined the fray,
calling for a more rapid reduction in Germany's fiscal deficits to help
lower European interest rates.
Such action is easier to prescribe than carry out, however. Transfers from
west to eastern Germany totalled some DM140bn (Pounds 48bn) in 1991. The
Bundesbank has calculated that last year's deficit amounted to about 4 per
cent of German gross domestic product, and was therefore only slightly above
its level at the beginning of the 1980s. But various costs of unification,
including the accumulating debts of the Treuhand agency charged with
privatising east German companies, have been kept off balance sheet.
Counting in these factors, some independent experts believe German fiscal
deficits are nearer to 6 or 7 per cent of GDP than the 3.6 per cent general
government deficit projected for this year by the IMF in its latest World
Economic Outlook.
Such figures beg important questions regarding Russia. If the Germans have
such difficulties absorbing eastern Germany, what hope can Russia and the
other east European countries have for their own economic progress? And how
far will the G7 finance ministers and central bankers be prepared to go to
provide aid for Russia?
Mr Nicholas Brady, the US treasury secretary, said last week that he thought
the Russian reform programme was intact. But nobody in western finance
ministries or central banks has a clear idea of what Russian monetary policy
constitutes.
One example of confusion is the Russian attitude towards currency stability.
Reports this week have suggested that the Russian government wants to adopt
a 'crawling peg' system of adjustable exchange rates for the rouble. If that
is the case, there will be no point in the west's discussing a Dollars 6bn
stabilisation fund for the rouble at the G7 meeting tomorrow and at the
meeting of ministers and central bankers from the Group of 10 big industrial
countries on Monday.
Although the west welcomes Russia and other former Soviet republics into the
world of free markets, G7 officials have serious misgivings about committing
their taxpayers to large-scale financial support. As a senior official
muttered this week: 'What if Russia is just a bigger and endless version of
eastern Germany?'
There are worse scenarios: what if Russia and some of its neighbours fall
prey to the same destructive trends that have plunged the former Yugoslav
republics into civil war?
Unanswered questions also remain over the possible damage that Tokyo's stock
price slide could wreak. The lessons of the US, UK and Canada are that such
asset price deflation heightens the risk of spectacular corporate failures.
In Japan's case, it is easy to imagine growing problems for the country's
banks when their capital bases have already been eroded by losses on large
shareholdings, and more difficult borrowing conditions for clients of these
banks abroad.
Confidence in Japan would be greater if the government were more effective
or more transparent. But G7 officials admit that it is difficult to gain an
insight into the workings of the weak and scandal-prone administration of Mr
Kiichi Miyazawa.
These deep-seated worries throw the IMF's latest forecast of lacklustre 1.4
per cent growth in the world economy this year into sharp relief. The
problems of Germany, Russia, Japan and the rest of the industrialised world
would be easier to contemplate if growth were more assured.
Whether these concerns surface in the final communiques of the G7 or the
other meetings in Washington this week is open to doubt. Interesting
discussions in such forums tend to produce bland statements.
But the increased difficulty of managing the world economy cannot be held
off the international agenda, and will be ripe for discussion at the Munich
World Economic Summit of G7 leaders in July.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11331</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Another rough ride for Patten: Hong Kong's new, powerful
governor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE ROGALY and SIMON HOLBERTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
There is no doubt about it: Mr Christopher Patten will be a heavyweight
governor of Hong Kong. When it comes to matters Chinese he is, however, an
inexperienced heavyweight, a high-powered innocent abroad. Will he outwit
the dragon, or will it gobble him up?
As he sets out for fittings for a plumed hat and other gubernatorial fancy
dress he may reflect upon the strengths he takes to the job. His contacts in
Whitehall are as good as - some say better than  - those of most ministers
in Mr John Major's cabinet. When he speaks the people of Hong Kong will know
that what he says has the backing of the prime minister and the foreign
secretary. When he negotiates with the Chinese they will soon see that there
is nothing to be gained by trying to shift disputed items up a rung to
Downing Street.
Mr Patten's ties with the foreign secretary, Mr Douglas Hurd, go back to
when they both served in the Conservative research department in the late
1960s. They worked together when Mr Hurd was political secretary to the then
Mr Edward Heath and again at the Northern Ireland Office in the early 1980s.
In 1986, as the Westland helicopter affair blew itself out, Mr Patten and a
group of like-minded ministers told Mr Hurd that 'should the No 11 bus come
along' - that is, should Mrs Margaret Thatcher be struck down - they would
campaign to make him her successor. That is exactly what he and his friends
did when the No 11 hit home in November 1990.
The new governor's close relationship with the prime minister is of more
recent vintage. When Mr Patten was a parliamentary secretary in the Northern
Ireland Office in 1984 he became acquainted with Mr Major, then a
freshly-minted junior government whip. 'That is the most talented man of my
generation,' he told a friend. The well-hidden man of talent eventually
joined the 'blue chip group', a dining club founded by Mr Tristan
Garel-Jones, a Foreign Office minister, and our hero, among others. During
his 17 months as chairman of the Conservative party Mr Patten and Mr Major
have come to know one another well; the successful outcome of the election
puts the latter in the former's debt.
These advantages should allay the doubts of those Hong Kong residents who
ask, with some justification, what credentials Mr Patten has for the job,
other than a sense of deep disappointment at losing his seat in Bath. He is
very upset; he came to regard both the constituency and his delightful
nearby cottage, a converted chapel, with especial affection. But Mr Patten
has always kept a place in his dreams for what he calls 'life after
politics', even imagining himself, at times when his fancy takes flight, as
perhaps a future president of the World Bank, or head of a United Nations
development agency.
Such fantasy appointments enable him to picture himself helping to develop
the Third World on a large scale, as he actually did with some success,
although on a small scale, as minister for overseas development in 1986-89.
He won the ODA a budget increase of 7 per cent in real terms - and he did it
while Mrs Thatcher was still prime minister. 'That's big potatoes,' he said,
boosting Britain's minuscule aid budget as best he could. But Hong Kong is
not Third World: it is in a growing and rampant first world corner of Asia.
Mr Patten has never regarded his ambitions as forever confined to the
British isles, but there is no evidence that he knows much of Hong Kong, or
Chinese, or China.
He is, however, a quick study. In spite of a robust social round at
university he managed a good second in history at Balliol College Oxford. He
is widely respected for his intelligence, his willingness to entertain all
manner of ideas and persons, and, latterly, his political ruthlessness. The
image of 'cuddly Chris' has been destroyed by his hard-nosed management of
the election campaign. What is revealed is a rapidly matured 47-year-old
politician of unquestioned ability and fine imagination whose principal
qualifications, listed above, derive from the fact that he has practised no
other art than politics since he left university.
His first big conundrum will be whether to break with all that. If he is to
win the allegiance of Hong Kong's articulate high earners and businessmen he
must demonstrate that he sees himself as the protector of the colony's
interests, even where those conflict with Britain's. But how can he - he who
is above all chum and confidant of the prime minister and foreign secretary?
The man who, as secretary for the environment, administered Mrs Thatcher's
poll tax while regarding it as a disaster may find a way.
It will, however, be difficult. Mr Patten's greatest domestic challenge is
to ensure that institutions which protect the interests of Hong Kong's
citizens and businesses - an independent judiciary, a partially elected
legislature, and a free press - are firmly rooted; his greatest foreign
policy challenge is to convince the Chinese government that it is in their
interests that he should do so.
The framework is there, at least on paper. There are two basic documents,
the September 1984 Anglo-Chinese joint declaration, and the Basic Law -
drafted by the Chinese and passed by their legislature in 1990. Neither is
perfect but both legitimise the concept of 'one country, two systems' and
provide for a high degree of autonomy for Hong Kong after its reversion to
Chinese sovereignty on July 1 1997.
The colony's vibrant economy is currently exhibiting the dynamism for which
it is justly famed. Real growth this year is expected to accelerate to 5 per
cent from 4 per cent in 1991. Hong Kong's economic integration with southern
China - principally Guangdong where strong ties of family and dialect exist
 -is proceeding at an astonishing rate. The local bourse is the best
performing leading stock market in the world. This is the golden goose that
it is in everyone's interest - Britain's, Hong Kong's, and China's - to keep
alive.
The trick can be done by a skilful political operator, which Mr Patten
happens to be. But he will need many skills. The administration he will take
over lacks firm leadership. The civil service employs capable officials but
is demoralised. Like the executive, it is struggling to come to terms with
the introduction of limited democracy.
This needs some explaining. The colony's legislative council, (LegCo), has
60 members, 18 elected by popular vote. Most of the 18 returned in last
September's poll support Mr Martin Lee, the leader of the United Democrats.
Like Mr Patten, Mr Lee is a devout Catholic; unlike him he is driven by
conviction, and hence regarded by the present administration as inflexible.
Thus the Hong Kong government has acted as if the elections never happened.
Mr Lee's supporters have been obliged to adopt the role of an opposition.
Mr Patten must decide whether to risk bringing Mr Lee and his associates
into the executive council, or ExCo. The sticking point for the present
governor, Lord Wilson, was Mr Lee's refusal to accept collective
responsibility, although he said he would abide by secrecy. Yet this is only
an issue if the governor makes it one; the rules of government are not
immutable nor are they universally observed. Mr Patten will anyway have to
get to know the personalities in LegCo quickly. The council has to approve
government expenditure; it can amend bills; and it may scrutinise government
decisions. A sure touch with LegCo might be the least that Mr Major, ever
the Whip, could expect of his new governor-general.
That achieved, Mr Patten will face the not unfamiliar question of electoral
reform. He has it within his gift to gerrymander, when he negotiates the
details of the new electoral system to be put in place by 1995 under the
existing agreements. He should resist the temptation. He will be told that
the people of Hong Kong are not interested in democracy, that all they want
is a quiet, prosperous life.
He will also be told that Mr Lee is increasingly unpopular. This can be put
to the test in 1995; how fairly will depend upon the new electoral system.
Mr Patten has two tasks here. First, he must make the right choice: 20
representatives elected in 20 seats by one-person, one-vote is best. Then he
must get China to agree. He must somehow persuade Beijing that a Hong Kong
which recognises a plurality of views is most likely, in the long run, to
retain the confidence of its people and their commitment to its development.
Relations between Britain, its Hong Kong dependency and China have been
slowly but painfully recovering since the rupture of June 4 1989. But the
'big atmosphere', as the Chinese call it, is still poor. China is deeply
suspicious of British intentions. In its view Britain aims to maximise the
commercial benefits to itself (through projects such as the Dollars HK114bn
(Pounds 8.3bn) airport) and at the same time lay down structures that will
perpetuate British influence beyond 1997.
Beijing's counter is the Chinese water torture: an incessant drip, drip,
drip of interference in domestic affairs. Its spokesmen now regularly
comment on the colony's activities in a manner calculated to undermine the
government's authority. Recently, without consultation, China appointed 44
Hong Kong worthies to advise it on Hong Kong matters.
The relationship with China is managed by the governor through
intermediaries, notably the Anglo-Chinese Joint Liaison Group (JLG) which
negotiates the detail of the hand over. He also has regular contact with Lu
Ping, head of the Hong Kong and Macao Affairs Office of the State Council,
who reports directly to Li Peng, China's current prime minister. But what
does this mean for the colony? The current power struggle in Beijing is not
helping. The natural tendency of Chinese officials is to keep their heads
down and wait to see which faction emerges triumphant.
It is hardly surprising that little progress is being made in the JLG.
Negotiations over air service agreements between Hong Kong and third
countries and the future of British military land in the colony are
proceeding at a snail's pace. Trivial matters such as a plan to change the
status of the local broadcaster have been allowed to get out of hand. There
is a growing backlog of work relating to Hong Kong's external relations:
some 400 treaties have to be changed to account for Hong Kong's post-1997
status.
In short, the dragon Mr Patten will set out to tame is many-headed,
possessed of ancient wisdom, and strengthened by an accretion over the
centuries of an infinite patience. We will only know he can do it if he
does.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11332</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Tighter banding gains political currency: Sterling's sharp
rise since the election has prompted speculation that the pound may soon be
placed in the narrow band of the European exchange rate mechanism - A guide
to the ERM and the arguments over changing sterling's status within it
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
What is the narrow band?
The ERM is a system for keeping the main European currencies within set
limits of each other. The idea of that is to promote monetary stability
across Europe and to keep inflation low. In the ERM there are two approaches
to tying currencies to each other, based either on narrow or broad bands.
Seven of the 10 currencies in the system - including the D-Mark and the
French franc - are allowed to fluctuate within narrow, 2.25 per cent bands
in relation to each other. The other three - sterling, the Portuguese escudo
and the Spanish peseta - have broad, 6 per cent margins.
Why is the ERM important?
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, has made the ERM the central feature of UK
macro-economic policy. It is based on keeping the pound within set limits of
the D-Mark, which is regarded as the system's core currency. That is because
the German currency is still considered the least likely within the ERM to
lose value over the longer term, even though the D-Mark has been under
pressure during the past year due to inflation resulting from reunification.
The policy boils down to keeping the pound tied in a 6 per cent band around
a central point of DM2.95. The upper limit is about DM3.12 and the lower
limit DM2.78.
Why is Britain now in the broad band?
Currencies face all sorts of pressures on financial markets, which mean they
can go up or down depending on economic events. Broad bands provide greater
leeway for currencies to gain or lose value against the others. When Britain
entered the ERM 19 months ago it thought a narrow band would be too
restrictive. Mr Lamont, however, has said that the UK will join the narrow
band at some point.
Why the speculation about entering the narrow band?
Since the election, sterling has benefited from a surge in buying from
international investors. That has pushed the pound from about DM2.85 before
the election to DM2.925 at its London close last night, comfortably within
what would be its margins under a narrow band. With a weakening in sterling
unlikely over the next few months, it may be a good time to take the plunge.
What would it mean?
The new floor for the pound against the D-Mark would be about DM2.88 and the
new ceiling DM3.01. If the pound looked as if it would rise or fall outside
those limits, then under the system's rules central banks from the ERM
nations would be forced to sell or buy pounds to keep it in place.
Alternatively, Britain would have to reduce interest rates (to keep the
pound from going too high) or to increase them (to stop it going too low).
How would it help Britain?
It would reduce the amount by which sterling can fall against the D-Mark
without triggering official action. The theory is implicit support for
sterling by governments at some point just above the lower limit would
inhibit selling. So what?
This is where we get on to interest rates. Assuming the theory worked,
Britain would be able to cut interest rates, which have been held at 10.5
per cent since September, without causing international investors to sell
sterling.
Would a narrow band lead to lower UK rates?
Not quite. A key issue is the high level of short-term German interest
rates, at present 9.75 per cent. Via the ERM link, those determine borrowing
rates throughout the other nations in the system. High German rates, set by
the Bundesbank to damp Germany's inflationary surge, have distorted the
central philosophy of the ERM, which is based on fairly low levels of
inflation and borrowing costs in Germany. ERM nations will find it difficult
to bring down rates unless the Bundesbank does so. Other potential problems?
Sadly, yes. If the Bundesbank decided over the next few months to push its
own rates still higher, a UK move to a narrow band might rebound. That is
because more investors would be likely to buy D-Marks, forcing the pound
lower against the German currency and possibly dangerously close to its new
lower limit in the system.
Would a move to a narrow band be widely welcomed?
No. Some economists and Tory backbenchers think entering the ERM was a
dreadful mistake because it limits flexibility on monetary policy. They
would see a move to a narrow band as a further twist of the knife.
How about the impact on the rest of Europe?
Joining the majority of European countries in narrow bands would underscore
the UK's European credentials. It would signal a positive stance on European
integration. Would a move to a narrow band help UK recovery?
Probably not.
So what is going to happen?
Mr Lamont will probably want to stay his hand on narrow bands until the
summer, to get a clearer idea about the pace of any UK recovery and also
about the Bundesbank's next move on German rates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11333</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Nucor maintains interest in Scots site
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NUCOR, the US steel producer, is to investigate what it calls 'interesting
possibilities' for building a 1.2m-tonne-a-year steel plant on a greenfield
site in Scotland.
Mr Keith Busse, vice-president of the company, said in Glasgow that the most
promising site was at Hunterston on the Firth of Clyde, where British Steel
has an ore-handling terminal, but other sites would be investigated.
He was speaking towards the end of a visit to Scotland, during which he
looked at British Steel's Ravenscraig plant, at Motherwell, Lanarkshire,
which is due to be closed in September.
He said the decision that it would not be economic to introduce Nucor's thin
slab compact strip production technology at Ravenscraig did not exclude the
use of other facilities there, such as the basic oxygen steel production
shop.
Mr Busse said Nucor would examine whether the costs of setting up a plant on
a greenfield site could be reduced to 'the competitive levels we have to
meet before putting forward a project'. That would take several weeks.
Mr Busse, who visited Scotland at the invitation of Scottish Enterprise, the
official development body, acknowledged that to build a plant at Hunterston
would require the co-operation of British Steel, which owned the terminal.
British Steel is said to be wary of allowing a competitor with low-cost
production methods to set up in Britain.
Mr Busse acknowledged that Europe still had overcapacity in steelmaking but
said Nucor's success in the US had been based on applying new technology in
markets where there was also overcapacity of older equipment.
The greenfield site plant would be a joint venture with a partner Nucor
would find in Europe. It would employ between 500 and 700 people.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Growth in imports supports recovery hopes
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE UNDERLYING volume of imports grew by 3 per cent in the first quarter
compared with the final three months of last year, supporting hopes that a
slow economic recovery may be on the way.
The Central Statistical Office said yesterday that underlying export growth
over the period was flat, underlining the world slowdown, which might brake
any UK upturn.
According to the CSO, underlying import volumes last month fell by 0.6 per
cent compared with February, while export volumes were flat. The underlying
level strips out trade in oil and high-price erratic items such as ships and
gems, which distort the pattern.
By value, imports - including oil and erratics  - fell 2 per cent in March
to Pounds 9.8bn. On that basis, exports were 0.5 per cent lower at Pounds
8.9bn. That produced a deficit on all merchandise goods - the so-called
visible deficit - of Pounds 875m. That compared with Pounds 1bn in February
and met City expectations.
Taking into account a projected March surplus on invisible trade - services
and various financial transfers - of Pounds 300m, the deficit on the current
account as a whole works out at Pounds 575m. In February it was Pounds 708m.
These figures for both months are subject to revision when better estimates
for invisibles become available.
Without oil and erratics March's trade deficit was Pounds 1.1bn, the same as
February's.
The level of underlying import volumes in the first quarter was the
second-highest on record. It was 5.5 per cent higher than in the
corresponding period last year.
Between the first quarter and the final quarter of last year, growth in
import volumes was especially marked for intermediate materials - such as
factory components - and other materials used in industry. That supported
theories that companies may be increasing stocks, on the basis of recovery
hopes.
Underlying export volumes between January and March were at record levels,
up 4.5 per cent compared with the equivalent period last year.
However, volumes in the first three months were up by less than 1 per cent
compared with the final quarter of last year - the previous record -
probably reflecting export difficulties due to slow growth in other
developed countries.
Exports in value terms to the rest of the European Community - which
accounts for about half of UK exports - were down 3 per cent in the first
quarter compared with the period of October to December. However, exports to
the US were up 5.5 per cent over the same period.
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
                  CURRENT ACCOUNT (Bn Pounds)
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
                    Visible Trade Balance
                            Less oil
            Current           and                         Invisibles
            Balance  Total  erratics  Exports   Imports   Balance
1990        -15.4    -18.6   -21.0    102.0     120.7      +3.2
1991         -4.4    -10.1   -13.4    103.7     113.8      +5.7
Qtr 2        -0.2     -2.2    -2.9     26.0      28.2      +2.0
Qtr 3        -1.2     -2.3    -3.5     26.4      28.8      +1.1
Qtr 4        -0.6     -2.6    -3.5     26.3      28.9      +1.9
Aug          -0.5     -0.8    -1.2      9.1       9.9      +0.4
Sept         -0.5     -0.9    -1.2      8.6       9.5      +0.4
Oct          -0.3     -0.9    -1.1      8.6       9.5      +0.6
Nov          -0.3     -1.0    -1.3      8.7       9.7      +0.6
Dec          -0.1     -0.7    -1.0      9.0       9.7      +0.6
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
1992
Qtr 1        -2.1     -3.0    -3.5     26.2      29.3      +0.9
Jan          -0.9     -1.2    -1.3      8.3       9.4      +0.3
Feb          -0.7     -1.0    -1.1      9.0      10.0      +0.3
Mar          -0.6     -0.9    -1.1      8.9       9.8      +0.3
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Invisibles for January to March 1992 are projections
Figures are seasonally adjusted, and due to rounding may not add up
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: CSO
 --------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 5
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Managers of troubled casino group to quit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID SPANIER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIX of the senior management of London Clubs, the troubled casino group, are
to resign in an attempt to safeguard the future of the company's six casinos
and their 2,300 staff.
In a message to staff, Mr Max Kingsley, chairman and managing director, said
yesterday that he and five of his senior colleagues would leave London Clubs
on April 30.
His brief statement said: 'Since we have each served the company for well in
excess of 20 years, we leave with great reluctance and regret, but do so in
the hope that our departure will prove to be in the best interests of the
majority of the company's employees.'
The decision follows a series of emergency meetings of the main investors,
led by Standard Chartered, the lead bank. It was seen as the best way of
meeting police and Gaming Board objections to renewal of the licences for
London Clubs's six casinos after a raid on the main London casinos last
June.
London Clubs' casinos include the Ritz Club in Piccadilly and the recently
opened Les Ambassadeurs at the end of Park Lane. It also manages the Carlton
casino in Cannes.
Yesterday's announcement is likely to be regarded in the industry as a
high-risk strategy because its success depends on satisfying the police and
the Gaming Board, which claim that the company is 'not fit and proper' to
keep its casino licences.
Mr Kingsley is known to have preferred to defend the company's record in
court. Departure of the top management is not an admission in any way that
operation of the clubs was in breach of the gaming regulations. The
licensing hearings are due to open on October 19.
A group of banks including Royal Bank of Scotland, Security Pacific Merchant
Bank, Credit Lyonnais, Credit Anstalt and Mitsui Trust, financed the
company's Pounds 125m buy-out from Grand Metropolitan in 1989. The banks'
determination to safeguard as much of their investment as they could appears
to have been the deciding factor.
They stand to lose about Pounds 55m if the group's casinos were to lose
their licences, which would lead to the premises being disbarred from
gaming.
The police and Gaming Board's objections are believed to focus on the
industry's own guidelines for conduct, with only one alleged infringement of
the Gaming Act, relating to credit. London Clubs has denied any wrongdoing.
Another issue that is understood to have worried the Gaming Board concerns
complimentary services to attract foreign players (prohibited for British
punters), such as funding air fares and hotel bills. Without that practice,
which London Clubs claims is perfectly proper, the company might lose 15 per
cent to 20 per cent of its turnover.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Rush on Tesco computer offer
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE's a rush on Tesco's latest special offer. With just three weeks to go
schools around the country are pulling out all the stops to claim the
computers and software on offer from the supermarket chain in return for
vouchers.
Tesco expects the promotion to cost it more than Pounds 3m. It has printed
42m vouchers and so far distributed 10m.
For every Pounds 25 spent on its groceries, Tesco is giving a voucher worth
about 38p redeemable by schools in software and computing equipment. Some
3,500 vouchers will buy Acorn's BBC A3000; with another 1,400 comes a JP150
printer; and just 300 gets a 'Nelson's Navy at Trafalgar' software package.
Mr John Patten, the new education secretary, who has forthright views on
good and evil, would doubtless praise the enterprising efforts by schools to
help themselves by tracking down the vouchers. Staff and parents have been
approaching businesses to collect on their behalf. In Swindon, collecting
boxes are in the foyers of churches, hospitals and police stations.
Door-to-door collections are reported in Pontefract, West Yorkshire.
Wren Park primary and Ravensdale infants schools, in Mickleover, Derby, have
put giant 'barometers' in front of their schools measuring progress in
voucher collection.
Tesco says that Essex people and the Welsh appear to be the most avid
voucher collectors.
Should not the state be providing all this equipment anyway? 'Yes', says one
Roman Catholic head, 'But remember the good book: unto him that has, more
will be given.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Doubt over council's schools plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A WIDELY publicised move by Wandsworth council, the Conservatives' flagship
borough in south London, to introduce selective primary schools with
government funding may breach the rules of the City Challenge scheme under
which funding is being sought.
City Challenge is an inner-city regeneration scheme that takes Pounds 750m
from existing urban programmes to concentrate it on 20 authorities over five
years. It is intended to promote partnership between public, private and
voluntary sectors.
Wandsworth's bid - one of more than 60 submitted to the Department of the
Environment - includes Pounds 3m to improve pre-school education, upgrade
three primary schools in Battersea as selective 'junior technology
colleges', and establish a state 'prep' school on the site of Battersea
Technology College.
The college, due to open in September, is part of the government's
controversial city technology college scheme. The original plan was to spawn
elite schools funded largely by the private sector - but in practice the
colleges are reliant on the state for about 80 per cent of funding because
of a shortage of business sponsors.
The environment department said yesterday: 'We would not pay (through City
Challenge) for things ordinarily part of a local education authority's
function. City technology colleges are not within the City Challenge remit.'
There is also doubt about Wandsworth's ability to attract 'partnership'
funding. Mr Edward Lister, the borough's education chairman, has said the
plan will be open to outside funding - but the scheme has failed to attract
any private money, nor is any in prospect.
Mr Lister defended the introduction of selection at primary level as 'a
welcome addition to parental choice in a deprived area'.
Under Wandsworth's plan, applicants for the prep school would be selected by
interview. The results of seven-year-old tests might also be taken into
account. Entry to Battersea Technology College would be by interview and
examination.
If successful, the scheme would mark the most significant reverse for
comprehensive education for 20 years.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Partners accused over Polly Peck
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TWO PARTNERS at Coopers &amp; Lybrand Deloitte, the accountancy firm, face the
possibility of disciplinary action for an alleged breach of professional
ethical guidelines connected to their appointment as administrators to Polly
Peck International.
Mr Richard Stone, head of corporate finance at Coopers, and Mr Michael
Jordan, chairman of Cork Gully, the firm's insolvency arm, are to appear
before the disciplinary committee of the Institute of Chartered Accountants
in England and Wales late next month.
They will deny charges that they breached the institute's ethical guidelines
by accepting the appointment in October 1990 when there had been 'a
continuing professional relationship' between Coopers, Polly Peck and its
chairman Mr Asil Nadir during the previous three years. The work included a
series of feasibility studies for Polly Peck during the 1980s and personal
tax advice to Mr Nadir.
Coopers' defence is likely to centre on whether the work it conducted
constituted a continuing professional relationship rather than a series of
one-off assignments.
The disciplinary hearing comes in spite of the ratification of the
appointment of the two partners by Mr Justice Millett in February.
The firm refused to comment yesterday on the allegations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / City of London boundaries widen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SIGNIFICANT extensions to the boundaries of the City Corporation
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
the local authority for the 'square mile' of the City of London - were
announced by the Local Government Boundary Commission yesterday.
London borough boundaries are under review as part of the Boundary
Commission's programme. The corporation, Britain's smallest local authority
with 5,000 residents sandwiched between seven inner London boroughs,
includes most of the City's old business district. The changes will add
about 1,000 to its residential population.
Notable additions to the City are the Golden Lane housing estate, north of
the Barbican; the entire Broadgate development, beside Liverpool Street
station; Milton Court, off Chiswell Street; and a large business district
east of Chancery Lane, including the Public Records Office. The only notable
loss is an area on Bishopsgate fronting the Spitalfields development.
Welcoming the extensions, Mr Michael Cassidy, chairman of the corporation's
policy committee, said: 'This will simplify the preparation, implementation
and monitoring of appropriate planning policies for the world's principal
financial centre.'
The corporation was under threat of abolition by Labour, but with the
Tories' re-election its future appears secure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Labour candidates set for horse-trading: Bryan Gould 'just
short' of nominations needed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID OWEN and DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LABOUR is preparing for a flurry of political horse-trading on Monday as MPs
return to Westminster and candidates for the party leadership seek the
support they need to secure nominations.
Last night an aide of Mr Bryan Gould, who is contesting the leadership and
the deputy's post, said the shadow environment secretary was just short of
the nominations required on both counts.
Candidates need the nominations of a fifth of the parliamentary Labour
party. Last night people all but assured of the 55 signatures needed were Mr
John Smith, the odds-on favourite to succeed Mr Neil Kinnock as leader, and
Mrs Margaret Beckett, one of the front-runners for deputy leader.
In a move that appeared partly designed to pre-empt charges of a
'stitch-up', Mr Robin Cook, Mr Smith's campaign manager, issued a statement
calling for the proportion of the party required to nominate a candidate to
be reduced to a tenth in future contests.
The task of getting 55 signatures has been made more difficult by the
reluctance of many of the 69 new Labour MPs - more than a quarter of the
parliamentary party - to nominate any candidate until they know them better.
Nominations must be submitted to the party's Walworth Road headquarters in
south London by Tuesday evening. Each MP may nominate only one candidate -
but those who have already made a nomination may withdraw it and submit a
new one.
Mr Ken Livingstone, MP for Brent East, in London, is also contesting the
leadership. The other candidates for the deputy leadership are Mr John
Prescott, shadow transport secretary, Ms Ann Clwyd, shadow overseas
development minister, and Mr Bernie Grant, MP for Tottenham in London.
Meanwhile, there has been criticism from one of the largest unions over
plans to weaken union influence in the party. Mr Ken Gill, general secretary
of the MSF general technical union, said excluding unions would be 'an
unmitigated disaster'.
However, Mr Gill said a change in the balance of the electoral college - in
which the unions have 40 per cent of the votes, against 30 per cent each for
both MPs and constituency parties - would be 'legitimate'.
The TGWU general union, Britain's biggest union, now looks certain to ballot
its 1m members to decide how to cast its vote in the leadership contest.
The union will formally announce its position on Monday, but officials say
it is most likely to choose either a workplace or postal ballot. A workplace
ballot would be cheaper and encourage a higher turn-out and will probably be
the preferred option.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Finishing touches
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The old Spitalfields fruit and vegetable market building on the edge of the
City of London reopens tomorrow, with a temporary market offering antiques,
crafts, organic food and sports. The market is a joint venture between
Spitalfields Development Group, which plans to develop the site, and Urban
Space Management, which cre-ated the weekend market at London's Camden Lock.
Spitalfields Development Group is awaiting planning permission for a large
office, retail and residential development there.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Sillars condemns '90-minute patriots'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JIM SILLARS, deputy leader of the Scottish National party and a leading
campaigner for Scottish independence, has said that he now doubts whether
Scots have the 'character and ability' to face up to the responsibility of
making their country independent.
Mr Sillars, who lost his Glasgow Govan seat to Labour in the general
election, said in an interview on Scottish Television that Scotland had too
many '90-minute patriots' whose national outpourings were confined to big
sporting events.
The strength of popular demand for a referendum will be tested tomorrow when
Scotland United, the newly formed grouping of all non-Conservative parties,
holds a rally in Glasgow.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Last challenge to EC working hours
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART, Labour Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN is to make a last-ditch effort to amend the European Community's
working-time directive to allow voluntary overtime to be worked above the
48-hour ceiling on the working week.
The directive, scheduled to be agreed by a meeting of EC employment
ministers next Thursday, will be the first European test for Mrs Gillian
Shephard, the new employment secretary.
British ministers hope Luxembourg and Portugal will support a move either to
raise the limit to 52 or 55 hours a week or to allow voluntary overtime on
top of the 48 hours. They will also continue to argue that working more than
48 hours should be permitted if a risk assessment shows there is no danger
to health or safety.
In the past few months some moves have been made in the UK's direction. Some
industries have been exempted from the directive, and the requirement of
four weeks paid holiday a year has been lowered to three weeks for the first
three years of the directive.
There appears to be further room for manoeuvre on the period within which an
average of 48 hours a week must be worked. The UK and Germany favour six
months, and a compromise of four or five months looks possible. There may
also be movement on Sunday being the day of rest, which the government fears
would boost the anti-Sunday trading lobby.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Barclaycard fee to rise
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ANNUAL fee for Barclaycard. which has more than 8m customers, is to rise
by Pounds 2 to Pounds 10. New customers will pay the higher price
immediately and existing holders on the anniversary of their first fee
payment.
Barclaycard said that an increase in costs, including fraud, made the rise
inevitable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Haulage group names chairman
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR Martin Llowarch, who stepped down unexpectedly as chief executive of
British Steel last May, is to become chairman of Transport Development
Group, one of Britain's biggest road hauliers.
Mr Llowarch, who was regarded as a possible future chairman of British Steel
until he resigned, will succeed Sir James Duncan, who retires at the end of
August on reaching 65. Sir James has been chairman since 1975 and has been
on the board since 1960.
Mr Llowarch joined the board only in February. The decision to bring in an
outsider is another sign of the management shake-up at a company, where
profits have marked time for several years. Mr Alan Cole, TDG's chief
executive, joined in June 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Lloyd's wins US court ruling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD LAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LLOYD'S of London has won a further legal victory in an action brought
against it by three US Names, Richard Lapper writes.
The Names - individuals whose assets support underwriting at the insurance
market - also took action against a number of agents and various banks.
A Chicago District Court granted a motion by Lloyd's to dismiss an action
brought by three Names, Mr Kenneth Bonny, Ms Francesca Bonny and Mr Robert
Flesvig.
The Names were appealing against an earlier ruling which upheld a Lloyd's
contention that under the terms of agency agreements signed by Names, any
dispute must be heard in an English court.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Ethnic rivalry casts shadow over hopes for Afghan peace: UN
envoy warns of anarchy unless mujahideen commanders curb personal enmities -
Prospects for a lasting settlement of a long and bloody civil war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KABUL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AFGHANISTAN stumbled this week towards the end of a 13-year-old civil war,
possibly sealed yesterday with agreement among rival guerrilla leaders
meeting in Pakistan to form a 51-member council as an interim government.
Mr Benon Sevan, the UN special envoy on Afghanistan, has been negotiating
the setting up of an interim mujahideen-dominated administration to take
over from the communist regime in Kabul, which has virtually collapsed after
the overthrow 10 days ago of former President Najibullah. He has warned
guerrilla leaders of the danger of anarchy and civil war if they continue to
pursue ethnic and personal rivalries.
Over the last week all the main provincial cities - Mazar-i-Sharif, Herat,
Kandahar, and yesterday Jalalabad - have been taken over in bloodless coups
by different coalitions of mujahideen groups co-operating with local army
commanders. The overthrow of the communist rule that remained in power after
the Russians left two years ago has thus so far gone smoothly.
All week there have been scenes of apparent reconciliation between
mujahideen guerrillas and the army they have been fighting for so long.
At Charikar, north of Kabul, the temporary headquarters of the
northern-based coalition, Shah Ahmed Masood, the main guerrilla leader,
warmly embraced General Abdul Majid, deputy commander of an Uzbek militia
force that Mr Najibullah used for his most brutal offensives.
The local accords on a transfer of power outside Kabul seemed to have been
matched yesterday by a agreement on the fate of the capital - both the
largest city and the one where the ethnic mix is the greatest - and over the
setting up of an interim administration for the country. Yesterday's
agreement appears to end the squabbling between guerrilla commanders and the
political organisations based in Peshawar over how to fill the vacuum in the
capital.
The rivalries centre on the polarisation between Mr Masood and the leader of
the hardline Hezb-i-Islam guerrilla group, Mr Gulbuddin Hekmatyar. This is
partly a conflict between men who have quarrelled in the past and still
detest each other - but more worryingly it reflects deeper ethnic divisions
that could over time lead to the break-up of Afghanistan.
Mr Masood, the most successful field commander of the war, is a
Persian-speaking Tajik from the north. His coalition of Tajiks, Uzbeks,
Hazaras, Ismaelis and Shias reflects the resentment of the non-Pushtun
population of the country at Pushtun domination. The Pushtuns from the
south, who account for only 40 per cent of the population, have
traditionally provided government leaders.
Mr Hekmatyar, a politician and a Moslem crusader more than a field
commander, who spent much of the war in Peshawar, is the best known
representative of Pushtun nationalism. But his extremism and
unpredictability have lost him the confidence of other Pushtun leaders and
made him disliked in the capital.
In the power struggle that may yet unfold, yesterday's accord
notwithstanding, the Pushtuns feel squeezed by the prospect of non-Pushtun
domination on the one hand and distrust of Mr Hekmatyar on the other.
Mr Masood has greater military strength than Mr Hekmatyar - with his
alliance including General Abdum Momen, a former divisional commander in the
north under President Najibullah, and Mr Rashid Dostam, head of the powerful
Uzbek militia, whose defection from Mr Najibullah was crucial in his
overthrow. Mr Masood's strategy all week has been to hold back from entering
Kabul to allow time for an interim administration to be formed. But he
desperately needs Pushtun backing.
The pressures for some form of accommodation are strong. Street opinion in
Kabul is uniformly against further fighting.
Pakistan seems to be reining in the belligerence of Mr Hekmatyar. The
international community is exerting pressure through the UN with the arrival
of Mr Boutros Boutros Ghali, the secretary general, in Pakistan yesterday.
The question now is whether the interim administration can hold the country
together. Even among Uzbeks of the north, the goal remains Afghan unity
rather than secession. The central Asian republics of the former Soviet
Union, Iran, and Pakistan are all in favour of preserving Afghanistan.
This week's events outside Kabul have shown a willingness by the mujahideen
to work with the security forces and the existing bureaucracy. The mood does
not seem to be one of mass reprisals.
There is no immediate food problem. Senior Afghan officials believe the
volume of aid will be large - relative to the country's size and capacity to
absorb it - for the task of reconstruction. Two million people were killed
in the war and a further 2m disabled.
But Afghanistan is also a country with a record of putting individual,
regional and ethnic rivalries before national unity. 'I am a pessimist,'
said a former senior official. 'I think the rivalries will continue and at
some stage result in armed clashes.' It could be that such skirmishes will
develop into serious conflicts leading to the disintegration of the country
over the next 10 years.
Thirteen years of civil war have transformed Afghanistan into an arms depot
in which there is no shortage of weapons to pursue conflicts. Local military
bosses like Mr Dostam in the north will not easily cast aside their
ambitions. If the country does begin to fall apart, its neighbours - Iran,
Pakistan, and the central Asian republics  - will not resist the temptation
to intervene. Iran, which sees Afghanistan as part of its historic sphere of
influence, has already embarked on an active policy in support of
Afghanistan's non-Pushtun minorities. The outcome of the drama now unfolding
will thus have its repercussions throughout central Asia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11348</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Iraq told to name nuclear suppliers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK NICHOLSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   VIENNA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
UNITED Nations nuclear inspectors say Iraq must reveal how it procured vital
material and equipment used in its nuclear weapons programme before there is
any chance of declaring Baghdad in compliance with UN Gulf war ceasefire
terms.
In particular, UN inspectors say Iraq must explain where it acquired 100
tonnes of maraging steel, a special alloy used in construction of uranium
enrichment centrifuges, and 20 carbon fibre rotors, also used in the
enrichment process.
Mr Maurizio Zifferero, head of the UN team investigating Iraq's nuclear
programme, said he was seeking assistance from countries or companies which
might have supplied these.
He said Iraq must also identify the technical specialists who advised
Baghdad on its advanced nuclear programme.
The UN inspectors believe that a handful of key foreign specialists,
possibly retired from the nuclear industry, provided Iraq with technical
expertise.
The Italian scientist, based in the International Atomic Energy Agency
headquarters in Vienna, said that until his inspectors had a clear idea of
Iraq's procurement system, they could never be confident that they had
uncovered the full extent of Iraq's nuclear weapons-building programme.
He said that despite Iraq's improved co-operation with UN inspectors, some
important inconsistencies remained in what had so far been either uncovered
or revealed.
Mr Zifferero nevertheless said he was satisfied with the co-operation of
Iraqi officials during the 11th and latest UN nuclear inspection mission to
Iraq, which oversaw destruction of buildings in the Al Atheer complex south
of Baghdad, said to be central to development of an enriched uranium weapon.
However, he said Iraq was still 'stonewalling' on its procurement programme.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11349</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Tokyo minister enters farm trade fray
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID DODWELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR Kozo Watanabe, Japan's international trade and industry minister, plays
host to his US, EC and Canadian counterparts today amid the faint hope that
the meeting will inspire compromise on farm trade issues.
When Japan named Mount Bandai in Fukushima, Mr Watanabe's childhood home, as
the venue for the 'trade quad', it had been hoped the US-EC farm trade
dispute, that has since the end of 1990 blocked settlement of the Uruguay
Round of talks on reform of world trade, would have been resolved.
However, Mr Watanabe will be relieved that the Washington summit on
Wednesday between President George Bush and Mr Jacques Delors, EC Commission
president, did not end in acrimony, although it failed to find a compromise.
Today's meeting should have been an opportunity to celebrate success, and to
shift focus forward to a leading Japanese concern - the Rio Earth Summit in
June, and the potential clashes between the call for free trade, and
environmental protection.
Instead, Mr Watanabe finds himself in the hot seat. Japan, perhaps more any
other country, has much to lose from the rising protectionism that could
result from a failure of the Uruguay Round. Along with Canada - which as an
exporter of farm products has been vocal in pressing both the US and the EC
to dismantle farm protection systems - Tokyo is likely to express robust
views over the failure of the US and the EC to reach a compromise.
Mr Michio Watanabe, Japan's foreign minister, last week wrote an unusually
blunt letter to both Mrs Carla Hills, the US trade representative, and Mr
Frans Andriessen, the EC's trade negotiator, calling for compromise and
warning of the dangers of failure.
However, expectations must now be low that headway can be made. The EC has
presented 'new ideas' - so yet not publicly defined.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11350</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Opec agrees to hold ceilings on output
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK NICHOLSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
OIL ministers from the Organisation of Petroleum Exporting Countries (Opec)
decided yesterday to leave untouched a nominal output ceiling of 22.98m
barrels a day for the second quarter, pronounced at their last meeting in
February, after slight recent firming of crude prices.
However, Dr Subroto, Opec secretary general, said after the ministers'
meeting in Vienna they had agreed that members still producing above their
nominal February allocation 'should implement the agreement' - a nod in the
direction of Iran, which has been producing 3.4m b/d rather than its
allocation of 3.2m b/d.
Although some members, notably Iran and Algeria, had entered the meeting
urging further output cuts, ministers settled for a reiteration of the
February limit, encouraged by the slight firming of prices which Mr Hisham
Nazer, the Saudi Arabian oil minister described as 'a good omen'.
Dr Subroto said Opec output for March was 23.2m b/d, 'very close' to the
February ceiling which was lowered from post-Gulf war output levels of
23.65m b/d in an effort to shore up softening crude prices. This, he said,
had been achieved, citing the rise in the price for the Opec basket of
crudes from Dollars 16.39 in early March to Dollars 17.73 in early April.
Oil analysts in London suggested the market might take some encouragement
from yesterday's meeting, particularly if Opec tightened output closer to
the February figure.
However, Opec's own output figures are at variance with industry estimates,
which put Opec production nearer 23.5m barrels per day.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11351</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Bank head calls for EC flexibility
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A rise in stubborn unemployment could result if European Community markets
fail to adjust flexibly as they move towards economic and monetary union,
Bank of England Governor Robin Leigh-Pemberton said in a speech in Chicago
yesterday, Reuter reports.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11352</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Peruvian minister stays on
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LIMA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Peruvian economy minister Carlos Bolona, whose resignation earlier this week
was seen as a severe blow to President Alberto Fujimori, will now stay on in
his post, the president's office said yesterday, Reuter reports from Lima.
Two other ministers, foreign minister Augusto Blacker Miller and industry
minister Victor Joy Way, who had clashed with Mr Bolona, would resign. Their
portfolios will be taken by prime minister Oscar de la Puente and Mr Jorge
Camet, a businessman,a spokesman said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11353</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / EC to seek farm fraud funds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The European Commission will seek to recover some Ecu5m (Pounds 3.55m) paid
in bogus farm export subsidies to Bord Bainne, the Irish dairy export board,
and to DMK, a German trading company, EC officials said yesterday, Our
Foreign Staff reports.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11354</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Key Polish vote delayed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Poland's centre-right minority government won a reprieve yesterday when
parliament put off for two weeks a crucial vote on public sector pay which
threatened to rekindle hyper-inflation, Christopher Bobinski reports from
Warsaw.
Meanwhile, new figures show a marked improvement in Poland's trade surplus
and the first success for the policy of raising export competitiveness
through devaluation. In the first quarter, exports rose to Dollars 3.3bn and
imports fell to Dollars 2.9bn to give a surplus of Dollars 385m, against a
small deficit in the 1991 first quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11355</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Lull in Sarajevo fighting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Sarajevo, the capital of Bosnia-Hercegovina, yesterday saw a lull in the
fighting that broke out immediately after the leaders of Moslem Slavs,
Serbs, and Croats had agreed to observe a ceasefire brokered by the European
Community on April 12, Laura Silber writes from Belgrade.
Sarjevo residents described it as the worst night of clashes since battles
erupted in Bosnia about seven weeks ago over its bid for independence from
Yugoslavia.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11356</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Europeans nearer to HDTV agreement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW HILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN television manufacturers, broadcasters and satellite operators have
indicated their willingness to develop high-definition television (HDTV)
services in Europe, signing a joint declaration which the European
Commission described yesterday as 'a major step' towards advanced TV
services, Andrew Hill writes from Brussels.
But the different interest groups have yet to agree a legally-binding
memorandum of understanding. Such a document would commit the industry to a
firm strategy and is essential to the Commission's plan to develop HDTV. The
companies will meet again in May to discuss a revised text.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11357</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Hong Kong welcomes some political clout
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HONG KONG welcomed the announcement of the name of its new governor as
evidence the colony is finally being raised in the hierarchy of British
political affairs, because of Mr Chris Patten's close connections to the UK
government leaders.
Legislative councillors said the new governor would be in a position to
achieve more than his predecessor, because as friend and senior colleague of
the prime minister and foreign secretary of Britain, Mr Patten should carry
much more political clout.
There was concern at Mr Patten's lack of experience in Asia. But it was felt
this might be balanced by the fact that his previous position in the
government might encourage Beijing to treat him as a direct representative
of the sovereign power, rather than just an agent.
'He is clearly someone who is held in high regard by the British
government,' said Mr Nigel Rich, managing director of Jardine Matheson. Mr
Rich argued that in the period of transition leading up to the hand-over to
China in 1997, 'the skills of a politician will be very helpful'.
Mr Martin Lee, leader of the United Democrats, the party which attracted
majority support in Hong Kong's first direct elections last year, said he
was cautiously optimistic. He said he hoped a politician would be more
receptive to the will of the people than a diplomat.
Mr Lee has complained that under Lord Wilson, a 'group of yes men and women'
was appointed 'to thwart all our attempts to change policies and better the
conditions of our people'. He said: 'A politician may see the benefits of
working with us, rather than against us. After all, who are the elected
members?'
Mr Lee was not concerned about Mr Patten's lack of knowledge of Asia.
'Sometimes you have a China expert and you find a little knowledge is a
dangerous thing. If he is a good politician, I am sure he will pick things
up very quickly,' he said. Mr Patten follows two Sinologists and diplomats
to the post of governor, Lord Wilson and his predecessor Sir Edward Youde.
There was a strong feeling in the business community that Hong Kong had
stood low on the political agenda in Britain, and that the appointment of
one of the prime minister's close confidants as governor indicated a change
of strategy.
Ms Rita Fan, a legislative councillor, argued 'I hope this will mean that
Hong Kong will become more important on the political agenda,' while
Baroness Dunn, a member of the Executive Council, said Mr Patten was 'highly
respected for his political abilities. I am sure that his talents will be
particularly useful to Hong Kong during these crucial years of political
evolution.'
But there will inevitably be voices of discontent. One pro-Beijing
legislative councillor was concerned that Mr Patten might give special
treatment to British business interests, arguing that the Conservative party
has long had close contacts with the local British business community.
This is a sensitive subject, following the award of most consultancy
contracts for the new port and airport development scheme to local
subsidiaries of UK companies, much to the ire of the local press.
Some newspapers have mirrored British Labour party accusations that the
governorship was being handed to Mr Patten as a consolation prize after he
lost his seat in the election.
But the news is likely to have no impact on the local stock market, which
was more concerned about the outcome of the British election, given the
pronounced Tory leanings of the local business community and its obvious
desire for stability.
'Mr Patten will need a very good support team,' said Mr Barry Yates,
research director of Asia Equity. 'He is coming out to a part of the world
with which he is not familiar. And politics out here is very different.'
But some hoped that Mr Patten's arrival with little knowledge of local
affairs will at least leave him open to new ideas. 'We hope this is the
beginning of a change in British policy towards China and Hongkong. So far
this has been one of kow-towing to Beijing,' said Mr Lee.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11358</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Andreotti steps down as Italian PM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN and REUTER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MILAN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FORMATION of a new Italian government moved a step closer yesterday
following the resignation of Mr Giulio Andreotti as premier.
The timing of Mr Andreotti's resignation had appeared in doubt, as a result
of delays on Thursday in electing new leaders of the Senate and Chamber of
Deputies following this month's general election.
After two rounds of voting yesterday, Mr Giovanni Spadolini, of the
Republican party, was re-elected president of the Senate. In the Chamber of
Deputies, it took three votes to produce a majority for Mr Oscar Luigi
Scalfaro, a veteran Christian Democrat.
The nomination of the new parliamentary leaders had become the subject of
intense debate as a result of the new political balance following the
general election.
The polls revealed sharply lower support for the Christian Democrats, still
Italy's largest party, and their Socialist allies in the previous coalition
government.
President Francesco Cossiga yesterday threatened to step down, Reuter
reports. Mr Cossiga, 63, said he would only remain in power if convinced
that quitting would aggravate the political crisis.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11359</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / US shifts stance on global warming
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GEORGE GRAHAM, NANCY DUNNE and JOHN HUNT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US has taken a big step towards bridging its differences with other
industrial countries over a global warming convention, possibly clearing the
way for President George Bush to attend the Earth Summit in Rio de Janeiro
in June.
The Bush administration yesterday sent the EC a detailed analysis of the
actions it plans to curb emissions of greenhouse substance - thus narrowing
the gap between the two sides' positions.
Europe and Japan have urged that a convention be built on the target of
capping emissions of carbon dioxide, the principal greenhouse gas, at 1990
levels by the year 2000.
Despite intense pressure in negotiations leading up to the summit, the Bush
administration has resisted commitment to specific goals.
But in yesterday's US memorandum the administration estimates that the
energy and clean air initiatives it has already undertaken will reduce
projected net greenhouse gas emissions by about 125m to 200m tonnes in the
year 2000. This reduction of 7-11 per cent of projected emission levels is
estimated to be within a hair's breadth of the cuts needed to stabilise.
'What this analysis shows is that the US government can stabilise CO2 and
other greenhouse gases easily,' said Ms Liz Barrett-Brown, a
non-governmental adviser at the negotiations preparing for the summit. But,
she said, it was still important to set specific reduction targets to ensure
that there is no backsliding from deadlines and agency budgets.
White House officials have complained that other countries, while calling
loudly for carbon dioxide emission targets, have done little to spell out
what actions they plan to control the gases.
'Many countries appear to have committed to targets, but they have not
demonstrated to us how they are going to meet targets,' said Ms Teresa
Gorman, a senior policy adviser to President Bush on energy and
environmental issues.
Ms Gorman also complains that a flat global target ignores the fact that US
population is expected to grow by 7 per cent over the next decade whereas
populations of Europe and Japan are likely to remain almost unchanged.
Mr Bush has been dithering for weeks over whether he should attend the Rio
summit. He has been fiercely attacked by Governor Bill Clinton, his probable
Democratic opponent in November, for failing to commit himself.
But Mr Bush has also been under pressure from some of his advisers not to
commit himself to a convention potentially costly to the economy or set
himself up as an Aunt Sally for attacks from Europe and the developing world
on his environmental record.
A substantial write-down of the third world's debt to commercial banks was
urged yesterday by the World Commission on Environment and Development,
which has spent three days in London debating the Earth Summit to be held in
Rio de Janeiro in June, John Hunt reports. The commission said developing
countries' debts were forcing them to sacrifice environmental assets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / World Bank ready to lend Dollars 4.5bn to ex-Soviet states
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN, Economics Correspondent and JOHN LLOYD
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON, MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE World Bank will be able to lend the former Soviet Union between Dollars
4.5bn and Dollars 5bn a year by the end of 1993, Mr Lewis Preston, the
bank's president, said yesterday.
Mr Preston said the bank could lend about Dollars 500m (Pounds 280m) now to
Russia to help with the importing of vital goods. The World Bank's lending
to Russia and the other former Soviet republics could total abut Dollars
1.5bn in the bank's coming financial year from July 1.
Mr Preston said that World Bank lending would be contingent on the republics
implementing economic reform programmes developed by the International
Monetary Fund. That lending would be directed to improving agriculture, oil
exploitation and transport. Oil prices in Russia are set to rise sharply in
the middle of the year, pushing consumer prices up by 150 per cent, Mr
Andrei Nechayev, economic minister, said yesterday, John Lloyd writes from
Moscow.
After a cabinet meeting in Moscow, he said the government would impose an
effective ceiling of Rbs2,200 a tonne (with a floor of Rbs1,800), up from
the present subsidised price of Rbs350 a tonne.
Gas prices will also rise to Rbs1,100-1,600 per thousand cubic metres for
all except domestic users, who will continue to pay the subsidised price of
Rbs260.
The rise of energy prices, the largest price subsidy left on the budget, is
seen by the International Monetary Fund as an essential step towards
stability of the currency.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Yacht, fetes and death sentences await governor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS FOSTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS GOVERNOR of Hong Kong, Mr Chris Patten can console himself with the
knowledge that even if his Westminster career is over, he will earn more
than HKDollars 10.4m (Pounds 765,000) tax-free during his tenure, at current
pay levels.
In case that is not enough, he will also receive an entertainment allowance
of HKDollars 432,000 a year with which to wine and dine visiting dignitaries
and local high-flyers.
Not that he or his wife will have to do the cooking. He will be maintained
by a domestic staff of 30, which includes three chauffeurs, one for each of
the governor's cars, a Rolls and two Daimlers.
But Britain's last significant outpost of empire requires more than the
occasional donning of the colonial plumed helmet. As the Queen's
representative in Hong Kong, the governor has enormous powers, including the
final decision over the death sentence. (All sentences have been commuted
since the 1960s.)
He is also in charge of the 186,000-member civil service and, working with
the Foreign Office and Downing Street, guides Hong Kong's relations with
third countries. Once a year he delivers a policy address, the equivalent of
the Queen's speech, which sets out his government's agenda.
On day-to-day decisions, he is advised by an Executive Council of senior
business and political figures. He is also surrounded by Foreign Office
mandarins, many of them Sinologists, who advise on China relations.
Much of the work is boring, including opening fetes and placing wreaths on
the anniversary of the Japanese invasion. But if Mr Patten should ever
become disillusioned, he can escape to the calm of the governor's luxury
country house in the New Territories, or set sail into the South China Sea
sunset on his 30-metre launch, the Lady Maurine.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Lloyds board clears way for Midland bid
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LLOYDS directors yesterday approved a bid for the rival Midland Bank.
However, bankers said a bid was not inevitable, and a great deal of work
would be needed before one could be launched.
Nonetheless, it is probable that there will be a battle for Midland, least
profitable of Britain's four clearing banks, between Lloyds and Hongkong and
Shanghai Banking Corporation, which has already made a Pounds 3.3bn bid for
Midland.
Approval for a bid came at a board meeting yesterday morning. Directors, led
by the chairman, Sir Jeremy Morse, had been discussing whether to make a bid
since their dinner together the previous evening.
There was no official statement after the board meeting. Directors are
understood to have been persuaded by the bank's chief executive, Mr Brian
Pitman, to press ahead with preparations for a takeover attempt.
Mr Pitman believes Lloyds can make huge incremental profits through
combining with Midland, cutting more than Pounds 500m from the combined
banks' overheads. Such savings would come from shedding more than 20,000
staff.
But after sounding out Sir Gordon Borrie, director-general of the Office of
Fair Trading, Lloyds became concerned that a bid would be referred for
investigation by the Monopolies and Mergers Commission, the UK competition
authority, and that the MMC might block the takeover.
Lloyds understands the competition authorities fear that a takeover would
reduce competition for small business loans.
To minimise this threat to competition, Lloyds will try to find a bank
prepared to take control of about 500 of its and Midland's branches should a
bid succeed.
Their purchase by a bank with a relatively small presence in England would
serve as a guarantee that the small business loans market would not be
dominated by just three banks - Lloyds, Barclays and National Westminster.
Several banks, including the Bank of Scotland, are understood to be
interested in such a deal. Bank of Scotland said yesterday that it had not
had conversations with Lloyds about acquiring branches and that it remained
committed to a policy of expanding in England by using 'non-traditional
delivery systems'.
Letter, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Patten chosen to steer Hong Kong to 1997 handover
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALISON SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR CHRIS PATTEN, the Con-servative party chairman, is to become governor of
Hong Kong.
His task will be to steer the colony through a sensitive period as it
approaches the handover of sovereignty from Britain to China in 1997, making
him in all likelihood Hong Kong's last British governor. He is expected to
take up the post in July.
The appointment yesterday by Mr John Major, the prime minister, was
immediately welcomed by Hong Kong businessmen and politicians who saw Mr
Patten's close relationship with Mr Major and Mr Douglas Hurd, the foreign
secretary, as beneficial for the colony.
Mr Patten lost his parliamentary seat in the general election while playing
a pivotal role in his party's victory. He said at a London press conference:
'I have long admired the Hong Kong success story and I come to the job with
a determination first and foremost to uphold the interests of all the people
of Hong Kong.'
His move represents a break with the tradition of the governorship being
held by senior diplomats. Mr Patten, 47, replaces Lord Wilson of Tillyorn, a
career foreign office official, who is retiring.
The governorship commands a Pounds 140,000 tax-free salary, the highest in
the Civil Service, a mansion and grand life-style. Mr Major offered it
immediately after Mr Patten lost his Bath seat, and he was understood to
have been led to accept by 'gut instinct'.
Mr Major said: 'He will have a vital job to do at a critical time. No one
could do it better.'
Mr Patten's decision throws his future in British politics into question. He
is understood to have rejected as 'unseemly' any early return to cabinet by
an artificially arranged by-election.
Mr Patten deflected questions about his own future in UK politics with a
quotation from a hymn by Cardinal Newman: 'I do not seek the distant scene,
one step enough for me.'
Though Mr Patten has clearly not ruled out a return to Westminster, his
commitment to staying as governor for the full five years will mean he is
not able to take part in the next election.
On criticisms from the Labour party that the governorship was a 'consolation
prize' for having lost his seat, Mr Patten admitted that had he remained an
MP he would probably not have been offered the post.
Mr Henry Keswick, chairman of Jardine Matheson, the Hong Kong conglomerate,
said the appointment was 'very good news indeed'. Mr Keswick, who was
believed to have lobbied Downing Street for Lord (formerly Sir David) Wilson
to be replaced, said: 'Hong Kong needs a politically skilled leader of the
highest rank and is very fortunate to have Chris Patten.'
Mr Martin Lee, leader of the United Democrats, which has emerged as the main
opposition party in Hong Kong's nascent democracy, voiced cautious optimism.
He said a politician was better for Hong Kong than a diplomat, and 'if he is
a good politician, I am sure he will pick things up very quickly'.
Mr Cheng Kai-Nam, a pro-China politician, said Mr Patten's appointment
showed the British government was attaching importance to Hong Kong ahead of
the transfer to China. But he expressed disappointment that Mr Patten had
little knowledge of Hong Kong and Chinese affairs.
Honk Kong welcomes some political clout Page 2
Fowler favourite to be Tory chairman Page 4
Another rough ride for Patten Page 6
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Barclays chairman to stand down: Sir John Quinton told by
directors on return from holiday to give up top jobs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT PESTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR JOHN QUINTON is being forced to quit next week as chief executive of
Barclays, Britain's biggest bank, after pressure from its non-executive
directors. He will stay on as chairman of the bank, but only until the
beginning of next year.
Details of his departure will be finalised at the next Barclays board
meeting on Thursday. Later the same day Sir John, 62, is expected to tell
shareholders at the bank's annual meeting that he will give up his post as
chief executive to be replaced immediately by Barclays' managing director,
Mr Andrew Buxton.
Mr Buxton will take on the chairmanship as well when Sir John steps down.
Unlike his predecessors among Barclays chairmen, Sir John will not remain on
the board. Bankers say he feels he would be 'cramping the style' of his
successor if he stayed.
Sir John was confronted by the bank's non-executive directors three weeks
ago, when he returned from a fortnight's holiday in Mauritius. They made it
clear that he had to go. Bankers say Sir John had no idea that there was
unhappiness with his performance at Barclays.
The bank's non-executive directors include Sir Martin Jacomb, the bank's
deputy chairman and a Bank of England director, Sir Nigel Mobbs, chairman of
the property company Slough Estates, Sir Denys Henderson, chairman of
Imperial Chemical Industries, and Sir James Spooner, chairman of the
conglomerate Morgan Crucible.
The Bank of England has been informed of the management changes.
Sir John's departure is the most unexpected and sudden in a series of
resignations involving senior directors at all of the UK's leading clearing
banks over the past year. Last month, Mr Tom Frost stood down as chief
executive of Barclays' main rival, National Westminster Bank.
The non-executive directors are believed to have been persuaded that
Barclays' approach to managing its huge business, which employs 111,400
people across the world, needed to be changed significantly. It was felt Sir
John was too closely associated with the existing management style.
Barclays' financial performance last year was worse than had been expected
in the City, because its overheads rose more rapidly than those of its main
rivals. In the current year, some of its big corporate customers, such as
the property companies Heron International, Speyhawk and Olympia &amp; York,
have run into difficulties. As a result, Barclays is likely to face big
losses on loans to some of these companies.
However, some Barclays executives, who are not on the board, questioned
whether Mr Buxton was the best choice to replace Sir John. One senior banker
pointed out that Mr Buxton was responsible for cost control as managing
director.
Mr Buxton's appointment would revert to a tradition that Barclays chairmen
are drawn from the ranks of several families, which previously owned the
regional banks bought by Barclays over the past 100 years. Sir John is not a
member of the Barclays families.
The Barclays board has not decided whether a new managing director should be
appointed to replace Mr Buxton.
Leading institutional shareholders said they had put no pressure on the
board to make the changes. However, some of them have recently said they
were unhappy with Barclays' performance.
In 1988, they provided Barclays with Pounds 921m of new money in the form of
a rights issue and they are upset that a large proportion has been used for
lending to property companies.
London stocks, Page 13
Lex, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Consumer confidence lifts hopes of slow UK recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMMA TUCKER and PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A RISE in consumer confidence and a sharp increase in import volumes have
boosted prospects for a hesitant UK economic recovery later this year.
A survey of consumer confidence by Gallup, the market research company,
showed that the balance of people expecting economic conditions to improve
was the highest for five years. The poll was held immediately before and
after the April 9 general election.
Meanwhile, Central Statistical Office figures showed that the underlying
volume of imports grew by 3 per cent in the first quarter compared with the
final three months of 1991.
However, underlying export growth over the period was flat, reflecting the
slowdown in the world economy which might damp the pace of a UK upturn.
Other CSO figures showed that retail sales volumes in March fell to their
lowest level for almost a year, but many in the City shrugged off the
figures, arguing that they were distorted by electoral uncertainties and the
lateness of Easter.
The Gallup poll, on behalf of the European Commission, showed that 42 per
cent of those surveyed expected the economy to improve over the next 12
months, compared with only 20 per cent who were pessimistic.
It also showed that the balance of consumers expecting their own financial
position to improve over the next year was the highest since August 1987.
Retail sales volume fell by 0.8 per cent in March compared with February,
bringing the year-on-year decline to 3 per cent. In the three months to
March sales were flat compared with the previous three-month period.
Although the drop in sales reversed the improvement in January and February,
economists said a strong month-on-month rise in sales of household goods
suggested a more encouraging picture of underlying consumer activity. In the
three months to March, sales of household goods - a sensitive indicator of
consumer confidence - rose by 2 per cent compared with the previous
three-month period.
The volume of sales fell in all other retailing sectors. Sales of clothing
and footwear fell 2.6 per cent but the decline was most evident in mixed
retail businesses where sales dropped by 3 per cent, month-on-month.
The City will attach more importance to April's retail sales figures which
should reflect Easter spending, better weather and post-election confidence.
Recovery hopes, Page 5
Editorial comment, Page 6
Currencies, Page 11
London stocks, Page 13
Lex, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11366</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Hawks &amp; Handsaws: Vision goes mega
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'ANNUAL reports of British companies vary widely in their ability to
communicate information, according to an analysis by Meridian Design
Associates, a consultancy firm. It says the typical report is 56 pages long,
contains a vacuous 'vision statement', and has five sub-standard
photographs.' - FT news report.
It is surprising how thoroughly the vision thing is sweeping world affairs.
George Bush started it off, of course, but now the vision thing is seeping
into every nook and cranny of relatively unsophisticated countries, like
Britain.
Yesterday morning my agent, Harriet Halfeshare, rang. 'Hi, bambino,' she
said. 'Sorry I missed lunch last week. I had to dash to the Coast. There are
some very big deals going down, film stuff, residuals, merchandising. And
Martin was there. He's snaky, Martin, don't you tend to think?'
'If you say so, Harriet. But how is my novel doing?'
For the past five months, Harriet has been in possession of a private-eye
thriller I completed last year. It is mould-breaking stuff, Chandler updated
but with a female private eye who knows how to handle herself but is
actually middle class. I mean, she actually owns a Dalmatian. Her sitting
room is green. The novel is set in Notting Hill. Also Bond Street, Fes and
Beverly Hills. A painting gets stolen, which is thought to be a fake but is
actually perfectly genuine. There is a sort of fascist sub-plot. My private
eye is sexy. I mean, she's actually post-feminist and is an expert at
taekwondo.
'Bambino,' said Harriet. 'Everyone loves your book. They love it in New
York, they love it on the Coast. I've even shown it to Martin, who says it's
post-punk. But we've got to get the timing right. New York has pencilled you
in for 1996. They say you might go nova.'
'So why are you calling, Harriet?'
'It's the vision thing, bambino. Vision's going mega. How would you like to
earn Pounds 7,500 writing 1,000 words on vision for one of my clients, the
Incorporated Society of London Cinema Owners?'
Naturally, I agreed. Last night I faxed them my piece. This is how it
started:
'In common with Arthur C Clarke, the noted futurologist, we at the
Incorporated Society of London Cinema Owners share a vision of how our
industry will look in the year 2019.
'There will be a plethora of new technologies at work in cinemas of the
early 21st century. High-speed, large-screen film processes offering a more
realistic viewing experience will be commonplace. Audiences will be engulfed
by holographic images in a nerve-tingling experience that will leave them
drained and gasping.
'Computer-graphic techniques will enable producers to recreate
electronically the voices and physical appearances of great stars of
yesteryear, so that new movies featuring Greta Garbo, John Wayne, John
Travolta, Maggie Smith and other hall-of-famers will be shot in
'Live-Synchro.'
'And movie screens of the early 21st century will see the debut of
animatronic actors - humanoids, robots, call them what we will  - who will
play any role, from buffoon to sex siren, at a millifraction of the fee
currently charged by the likes of Warren Beatty.
'At present, things are not like that. At present, cinema-goers in London
have not latched on to the exciting futureworld that lies in store.
'They love poky little cinemas disguised as fast-food restaurants. They want
the stench of popcorn and hot dogs. They demand specially-designed candy
wrappers that are impossible to penetrate without making an excruciating
noise. They oblige us to hire staff who don't know what year it is, let
alone what time a movie starts. Today's audiences want tiny screens and
sub-standard soundtracks. And they expect - demand  - to wait many, many
months before films on show in America are brought across the Atlantic.
Popcorn and squalor. That is what they want. That is what we give them.
'But we at the Incorporated Society of London Cinema Owners have a vision .
. .'
So well was my first venture into vision received that Harriet phoned again
last night, to commission 1,000 words for John Major linking his aspirations
for the Tory party with scientists' discovery of giant ripples of matter,
the Holy Grail of cosmology, at the outer limits of the universe. I sprang
to my screen at once.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11367</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / A little left of the right policies: John Willman comes upon
a puzzling preview of the Queen's Speech
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WILLMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Leaked documents all too rarely find their way to the FT's headquarters at
No. 1 Southwark Bridge, so I was intrigued to find a plain buff envelope in
my in-tray this week. Inside was what appears to be a draft of the Queen's
Speech for the state opening of Parliament on May 6.
It bears all the hallmarks of the real thing, although the authorship is in
doubt, and it appears to have been drafted a few days before the general
election.
My Lords and Members of the House of Commons.
I look forward to visiting Strasbourg and Malta later this month, France in
June and Germany in October, but not Australia.
My government believes that the conclusive election result has brought
confidence back to the markets. Business can now plan for the future without
fear of the irresponsible economic and industrial policies espoused by my
Loyal Opposition.
Unfortunately, recovery is likely to be slower than my government was
recently suggesting might be possible. Because my government declines
absolutely and completely even to discuss the possibility of a re-alignment
of sterling within the exchange rate mechanism, real interest rates and the
exchange rate of the pound will remain intolerably high. Unemployment will
therefore carry on rising until at least the end of 1993.
Members of the House of Commons, this will be a tough spending round. It is
already clear that the budget forecast of a PSBR for the year of Pounds 28bn
will be exceeded.
My chief secretary - whose hawkish reputation on public expenditure is well
known to you all - will be seeking cuts in departmental expenditure across
the board.
There is no likelihood of any additional funding for public services over
the lifetime of this parliament unless growth exceeds the generous forecasts
in this year's Red Book.
My Lords and Members of the Commons, this parliament will run until autumn
1993, a lengthy session doubtless much-needed by my Loyal Opposition to
resolve its internal difficulties.
My government believes that there has been enough radical legislation over
the last 13 years. There will be only one major measure in the coming
session - a short three-clause bill entitled the European Union (Abolition
of Parliamentary Sovereignty) Bill. Instead, my ministers will get down to
the hard graft of implementing the changes already introduced.
My secretary of state for education will send his children to a state
school. In another departure from his predecessor's practice, he will also
be visiting schools to see what goes on in them.
With the conclusion of the election campaign, there is no longer any need to
raise the threat of increased immigration. My government therefore will not
reintroduce the Asylum Bill.
A white paper will be issued in the new year setting out possible plans for
the privatisation of British Railways (NB check whether the wording of last
year's speech was sufficiently vague).
My government will introduce Citizen's Charters will be brought forward for
dog-owners, for noisy neighbours and to abolish the menace of portable
telephones.
A bill will be introduced to compel newspaper publishers to use ink which
does not transfer to reader's hands.
A bill will be introduced to permit the use of redundant churches as
brothels provided they are managed by the Mothers' Union.
A bill will be introduced to ban the wearing of horse-hair wigs in my
courts.
The Loyal Opposition's manifesto promised a 'Hedgerow Incentive Scheme to
help preserve hedgerows of particular historic, landscape or wildlife
importance'. In a spirit of reconciliation, my government will introduce a
bill to implement this commendable proposal.
My government attaches the highest importance to maintaining our security,
but we've got to scrounge cash from somewhere (NB this needs rephrasing -
something about 'peace dividend', welcome developments in the Soviet Union
etc)The defence of the realm will therefore be contracted out to a private
security firm.
Other measures will be laid before you.
My lords and members of the House of Commons, I pray that the blessing of
almighty God may rest upon your counsels.
And that's it - apart from a pencilled note at the end of the draft.
Mysteriously, it says 'Will this do, Roy? Neil'.
Dominic Lawson is on holiday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11368</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Private View: A mother rattles the prison bars
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTIAN TYLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MARILYN BROWN'S life changed when her son was arrested in Goa. For one
thing, the bustling Tory party activist decided to stand against her own
Member of Parliament in this month's British general election.
She polled 119 votes; the official Conservative candidate, Douglas Hurd,
Foreign Secretary, retained his Oxfordshire seat with 36,256. But the point
was made.
Marilyn Brown accuses the Foreign Office of 'disgraceful' failure to support
British citizens arrested in other lands. Her verdict is the result of the
16 months her son Nicholas has spent in Reis Magos jail in Panaji, capital
of the former Portuguese enclave on India's western coast.
'This is totally beyond any experience I have had in my life before,' she
told me this week. 'I didn't know who to turn to, who to talk to. The
Foreign Office and Douglas Hurd were the obvious experts. Within six months
I began to suspect that their advice was more for the benefit of the Foreign
Office than for the benefit of my son.'
Mrs Brown conducts her campaign from a modernised cottage, now for sale, in
a hamlet so small it does not even merit road signs. The house is full of
cats and there are chickens and donkeys in the garden. Divorced from
Nicholas' father, whom she married at 18, she lives with David Brookes, now
her partner in a domestic heating business.
She was always a Conservative. She laughed ironically. 'My ideas have been
challenged somewhat. I would still regard myself basically as a Conservative
but I am beginning to wonder if I really am.'
She has had more support than criticism for her act of political betrayal.
'That doesn't surprise me. I always felt that the people I mixed with were
nice people first and committed Conservatives second.'
Her son Nicholas, now 28, also worked for the business until he set off to
see the world after a broken love affair. He settled in India for two years.
Riding a friend's motorcycle through Goa in December, 1990, he was stopped
by the police. He claims they planted half an ounce of cannabis on him in
order to extort a bribe.
Since India, with western encouragement, strengthened its drug laws the
minimum sentence for possession of this quantity of cannabis is 10 years.
Nicholas' trial began last July and has dragged on intermittently ever
since.
Goa was once a hippy paradise. Today it is an enforcers' paradise. There are
several dozen young foreigners languishing in jail. Nicholas Brown's case
sounded familiar to me. Six months before his arrest I was stopped, like
him, while riding a borrowed motorcycle through the outskirts of Panaji. I
refused the three policemen's demand for money, threatened them with the
name of my newspaper and was let go.
Following Press stories on the Brown case, India's High Commission in London
has hinted at further charges against him: holding a forged passport is one.
Mrs Brown dismissed them as a concoction. I asked her whether publicity was
not counter-productive.
'The Foreign Office advice is don't rock the boat. If you do, they say, the
prisoner will suffer. So most families spend months and perhaps years
clinging pathetically to the hope that behind the scenes the Foreign Office
is watching over their interests. Most of us eventually come to the
conclusion that the prisoner is being just left to take his chance.'
What exactly is your complaint? I asked her.
'My main complaint is that they totally abandon their own citizens in these
sorts of situations. They will take in books and cigarettes and
what-have-you as long as the prisoner has funds to pay for them. But if the
family and the prisoner don't have money, there is no money.
'They find these sort of cases very embarrassing. Not every prisoner in a
foreign jail is an innocent by any manner of means. A lot of them have been
very foolish. Some of them, you know, are quite bad characters and are
probably guilty of quite serious crimes. It's very easy to regard these
people as a nuisance.
'Douglas Hurd is on record many times as saying 'Don't interfere in the
judicial process of foreign countries.' Unfortunately, he's missing the
whole point. We're not asking him to interfere. What we're asking is for the
Foreign Office to make it very clear that British citizens, whatever trouble
they're in, are people of value and worth and the Government is standing
behind them. They don't actually need to do a great deal in most cases.'
But, I said, aren't you asking for much more than moral support. You want
Her Britannic Majesty's Government to crack the whip and demand special
treatment.
'No. Their negative attitude means countries realise that however slow or
unfair a trial may be, however great the injustice, the British Government
isn't going to make a fuss about it. If that comes across so clearly to us
and other families, it sure as eggs comes across just as clearly to foreign
governments.'
But with today's mass travel isn't the attitude of the Foreign Office
understandable? If you go to these places you take a risk.
'If they said that loud and clear it might be understandable. But they
don't. If you were to stop 100 people on the street and ask them what would
happen if they went to Thailand, or Goa or South America and got into
trouble, most of them would say the Foreign Office would pull out all the
stops to make sure they were treated justly.'
Mrs Brown thinks the diplomatic career structure is at fault. The
'high-flyers with wonderful degrees' did not have the relevant experience,
she said. The consular service was 'very much third division. A lot of the
staff try their best. But if a person in post doesn't want to stir himself,
there's no incentive to do so.
'I'm not very articulate and I'm not an original thinker. So you have to
forgive me if I talk in cliches. But consular affairs is the Cinderella
service.'
She praised Douglas Hurd for giving Britain a high profile abroad. 'He goes
round shaking hands with all the world leaders, establishing on the whole
excellent relations. Now what's the point of that if it's not to benefit
Britain and its citizens? I know trade is a big issue, but there are
others.'
'I'm not in the business of getting guilty people off the hook. I am
fighting for guilty and innocent alike: everybody has the right to a fair
trial. We can't fight for everybody. We can fight for our own citizens.'
You are suggesting that British subjects should get British treatment
wherever they go in the world. That is not achievable.
'No. But that doesn't stop us trying to achieve it, surely. Otherwise
nothing's going to change. The British Government is marvellous about human
rights for Kurds, Chinese dissidents, the 'disappeared' in South America,
and I would cheer them every inch of the way on that. But if they can speak
out for foreign victims of injustice why are they so reluctant to speak out
for their own people?'
Are you quite sure your son is innocent?
'I'm sure, yes, absolutely. But in a way it doesn't really matter whether
he's innocent or guilty. When you look at the charges against him and the
others they are so minor that, quite honestly, the way the cases are being
handled is diabolical.'
Mrs Brown has been adopted by a recently-created lobby, Fair Trials Abroad.
Her demands are for extension of means-tested legal aid to Britons abroad,
surveillance to identify difficult cases, and independent legal evaluation
of trial transcripts where miscarriages occur.
Although in the dark about her son's prospects, Mrs Brown thinks he is one
of the luckier ones. She has had 'desperate' letters from other prisoners
and other families and is sending her own money to the worst off.
I asked her whether campaigning had made her own troubles easier to bear.
'No, it's made it worse, actually because now I'm in touch with other cases,
most of them much worse than Nicholas's. I'm very worried and frightened
because all these cases have got to be taken up.'
It may sound cruel to ask, but has this given you a purpose in life you
didn't feel before?
'Well, yes it has. I'm quailing because I didn't want to be involved in
anything so devastating. But I am a Christian and I've really run up against
the buffers with this. I've spent all my adult life quite merrily talking
about how being a Christian is a challenge, etcetera, etcetera. For me so
far, I realise, it hasn't been particularly challenging. 'Now it looks as if
I have suddenly been presented with a path to my life that I could never
have foreseen. I just cannot turn aside from it, which is quite
frightening.'
Have you discovered yourself to be stronger than you imagined.?
'Yes, in some ways. But an awful lot weaker in others. I have found that I
have a lot more determination, more - what shall I say?  - resourcefulness
than I'd ever have thought.
'It is changing my life. I'm amazed that I'm so committed to this. I would
have thought I would be the sort of person to find a way of shuffling it on
to someone else. I'm amazed how determined I am not to do that.
'I wouldn't have thought I am the stuff that campaigners and martyrs are
made of. But an area of real, human misery has been revealed and I just
cannot turn away from it.
'I just hope and pray the Foreign Office is going to do the decent thing and
start wading in there, because I don't relish the thought of fighting like
this for the rest of my life.'
So I rang the Foreign Office. A spokesman said no new guidance had been
issued to embassies or consulates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11369</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Front line fight against Aids
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By REX WINSBURY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'COMBAT ready, condom ready', shouts a poster in all the Ghana army
barracks. 'Take the firing squad to Aids]' shouts another.
The US military worries about having soldiers with their finger on a nuclear
button who are HIV-positive. The French army has been checking to find out
whether, and how, its soldiers have sex when they are flown out to intervene
in some attempted coup d'etat in one of France's ex-colonies in Africa (yes
indeed, some of them do have sex.) The Nigerian chief of defence staff has
set up a special secretariat to co-ordinate anti-Aids activities in the army
and police.
But what, I asked the Ministry of Defence, are the British armed services
doing about Aids? I got a very stiff-upper-lip reply. 'It is not our
practice to discuss individual medical cases,' said the man from the MoD,
quoting almost verbatim a reply given in the House of Commons on March 12
1990 by Archie Hamilton, then a junior defence minister, to an MP who had
dared to ask a similar question.
However, Hamilton did get as far as admitting that 'one member of the
services was identified as HIV-positive in 1989' - a statistic that
experience in other countries suggests may be on the low side. The US army
has found that about one in 600 of those it has tested carry the virus,
although admittedly the US does have a far higher general incidence of Aids
than the UK.
The US military has taken a tough and open line on this matter. HIV-positive
soldiers remain in the army for as long as they are fit for active duties,
but they are kept firmly away from sensitive 'finger on the button' posts in
nuclear weapons commands.
'Not a good place to put someone who knows they are going to die anyway,'
commented a senior US army medical officer to me recently. For it is a grim
fact that sooner or later, perhaps as long as 10 years or more later, the
HIV virus inevitably progresses to full-scale Aids and death.
Surely the British public has a right to know, too? It may not be exactly an
election issue, but Britain also has soldiers with their fingers on nuclear
buttons, and presumably annual medical check-ups either can or do show who
is HIV-positive and who is not.
The man from the MoD hastened to assure me that this policy of silence about
Aids did not mean that the British army had no policy at all on the matter -
just that it was not prepared to talk about it. Well, let us give the
Ministry the benefit of the doubt, while pointing out that the 'whose finger
on the nuclear button' issue is not the only Aids question that matters in
the military context.
For example, the armies of the US and Ghana army have both taken the view
that HIV-positive soldiers should not be posted abroad. You can see why. In
sensitive political situations, they could easily be accused of wilfully
spreading the deadly disease to host and/or invaded countries.
Ghana's efficient professional army, made up of 20-year enlisted men, is a
favourite contributor to international peace-keeping forces, as is the
Nigerian army, and it would hardly do if it became known that these
peace-carriers were death-carriers also.
Confinement to the mother country also has a deterrent effect against
soldiers taking risks over contracting Aids. In the Ghana army, a sure route
to promotion is service abroad - and vice versa. Also, service abroad brings
with it lucrative foreign allowances, lots of cash, which the HIV-positive
man confined to home duties is deprived of.
It would be good to know whether a similar rule applies to British military
personnel. Britain also sends troops abroad, as part of UN forces and for
training, including Kenya, where Aids is a serious problem. But apparently
the British public is not to know what the rule is. Nor are people to know
whether the soldier who is infected by HIV is treated with due respect -
that is, in a way that would avoid any charge of discrimination against
sufferers.
The US army has a formal policy that an HIV-positive soldier can continue to
receive full army medical care and army housing for as long as he (or she,
one supposes) is still fit for duties. After that, the soldier is retired on
standard retirement benefits; that is, honourably retired.
It is impossible to rule out the possibility that some armies might take a
different view. A senior officer in the Ghana army told me that, if other
measures failed to stem the spread of the disease among military personnel,
then getting Aids might have to be made a dismissable offence.
So there are issues here about the civil and military rights of HIV-positive
people; about non-discrimination; and about the practical benefits
guaranteed (or not) to soldiers who test HIV-positive. Maybe that was what
was on the mind of the MP, Harry Cohen, who asked that question back in
March 1990.
'What action was followed after (HIV) diagnosis,' he wanted to know, asking
also whether any representations had subsequently been received concerning
the military authorities' actions in these cases.
'There were no representations concerning this (one) case,' replied
Hamilton.
Rex Winsbury is editor / publisher of AIDS Analysis Africa.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11370</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: Rosenkavalier at length - Records
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NOBODY, not even those who love every note of it, will deny that Der
Rosenkavalier is rather too long; vastly too long, some would say. Except
with a Baron Ochs of irrepressible geniality - like the late Kurt Bohme -
the Act 3 farce soon wears thin, and I know one producer who vowed to delete
the entire levee scene from Act 1 if ever he had the chance (luckily, he
never did). For all its cultivated virtues, Haitink's new recording ignores
the problem, thus bringing the listener face to face with it.
It is no secret that Strauss got carried away, as with almost every libretto
he set later. His just-previous operas Salome and Elektra had left him room
to expand within a safe one-act compass, but the newly sophisticated,
conversational style of Hofmannsthal's three-act Rosenkavalier text tempted
him to heedless felicities - beyond the playing-time that the comedy could
bear. Afterwards, both creators admitted that. The usual stage solution is
to make small cuts, but in recordings that would seem a cheat.
It should be enough to remember that it is primarily a romantic comedy
(conceived on the lines of a cleverer Fledermaus), not a lachrymose drama,
and that during his own lifetime Strauss deplored the tempi at which other
conductors liked to draw it out. Though Haitink takes only a couple of
minutes longer over each act than Erich Kleiber did in 1954 (Decca 425
950-2: an evergreen tonic) the effect is dishearteningly staid. In the
waltz-hullabaloo at the final rout of Baron Ochs, for example, the
orchestral voices register superbly - and yet there is hardly a twinkle in
its eye, let alone a frank guffaw: it sounds like a majestic interlude.
Richard Strauss: Der Rosenkavalier. Von Otter, Te Kanawa, Hendricks, Rydl,
Grundheber, Powell. Clark, Leech, Faulkner; Haitink/Dresden Staatskapelle &amp;
Opera Chorus. Dresden. EMI 7 54259 2 (three CDs)
Friedenstag. Marc, Roloff, Shirley, Wildermann, Broitman, Cassilly, Wood;
Bass/Collegiate Chorale &amp; Orchestra, NYC Gay Men's Chorus. Koch 3-71111-2 H1
(one CD)
Nikolai Medtner: Piano Concerti nos. 2 and 3. Demidenko, Maksymiuk/BBC
Scottish Symphony. Hyperion CDA66580
Franz Schmidt: Symphony no. 3. Paul Hindemith: Concerto for Orchestra.
Jarvi/Chicago Symphony. Chandos CHAN 9000 CONCERT
Paganini: Violin Concerto no. 1. Saint-Saens: Introduction &amp; Rondo
Capriccioso; Havanaise. Bizet/Waxman: 'Carmen' Fantasy. Vengerov,
Mehta/Israel Philharmonic. Teldec 9031-73266-2 RECITAL
Beethoven: 'Kreutzer' Sonata, op. 47. Brahms: Sonata in A, op. 100.
Vengerov, Markovich. Teldec 9031-74001-2
Strauss used to insist that Ochs is, after all, a nobleman, but Kurt Rydl
allows him to be nothing else. From his grand bass, judicious and
authoritative, you would never guess that this is one of the great,
bumptious scamps of operatic comedy. All three principal ladies have radiant
moments (they would sound lovely in extracts), and their characters are
delicately fixed. None of them, however, is a native speaker, and their
repartee plods where it should dance. Dame Kiri, in particular, likes to
make 'significant' phrases tell at half-speed. For Sophie, Barbara
Hendricks' soprano sounds unwontedly dark, too much like Anne Sofie von
Otter's fine, sober Octavian. In lesser parts, Richard Leech (the Italian
Tenor), Claire Powell and Graham Clark (the intriguers) stand out.
For serious Straussians, the new recording of his 1938 one-acter Friedenstag
('Day of Peace') - the first ever  - is of keener interest. It is an opera
maudit, all but forgotten since the initial performances incurred Nazi
disfavour because of its untimely, undisguised pacifism.
A mediaeval Commandant and his forces, besieged in a fortress, are at the
end of their resources; despite his loyal wife's yearning for a pacific
future, he resolves to blow up the entire town rather than surrender. At
what was to be the fatal moment, church bells ring out from everywhere:
miraculously, peace has been declared from afar.
The score is stern and single-minded, with touches of Kurt Weill's acerbic
style. Only the Wife (Alessandra Marc, best in full cry) is allowed some
romantic expansion. For the bleak Commandant, Roger Roloff's baritone is
uningratiating but effective, and the many small roles are cast from
strength - George Shirley, William Wildermann, Ruben Broitman and Richard
Cassilly among them. Roger Bass conducts the large orchestra and excellent
choruses with a sure, sympathetic hand.
Some briefer notes on other new recordings of music from the period. With
the Chicago Symphony, Neeme Jarvi continues his rewarding cycle of Franz
Schmidt's symphonies with the 'Schubertian' Third. Fresh, eager playing,
with the Scherzo at last performed properly up-tempo and to bracing purpose;
only Jarvi's Adagio is an aberration, treated as an urgent, passionate
Andante instead of the dark meditation it really is. The Hindemith Concerto
is a surprisingly attractive fill-up.
Among new virtuosi, the pianist Nikolai Demidenko and the very young
Siberian violinist Maxim Vengerov have been making extraordinary
impressions. Demidenko has often struck me as an eerily detached, chilly
artist, but Medtner's music proves to suit him magnificently. The Second
Concerto is the less remarkable here, hefty and rather close to Rakhmaninov
(a Medtner classmate at the Moscow Concervatoire); the Third, however, is
richly original and stirring, and Demidenko is magisterial with it.
The phenomenal young Vengerov will doubtless make hundreds more records, in
due course. His playing is immaculate and devoted in the Beethoven and
Brahms sonatas on Teldec, but his Russian partner is obtrusive, often
distracting - like someone determined to make himself noticed. The concerto
record with Mehta is much more fun: gorgeous tone, dazzling feats - you can
enjoy amazing guests with Vengerov's fantastic account of the 'Carmen'
Fantasy.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11371</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: Looters and pillagers but above all traders - The
Viking exhibition in Paris
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICIA MORISON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MOST people see the Vikings from the point of view of their victims. The
conventional image is of berserk brutes in dragon-prowed ships looting towns
and burning monasteries. After unleashing a Darwinian struggle for survival
among the top families of western Europe, the Viking threat simply petered
out; Scandinavia once more became marginal to European civilisation.
How much more there was to the Vikings is brought home by an extraordinary
exhibition in Paris. Les Vikings: Les Scandinaves et l'Europe 800-1200 is
mounted by the Council of Europe and the Nordic Council of Ministers. With
more than 600 items, the majority from Scandinavia, this embarrassment of
riches is enough to bring even the hardiest visitors to their knees with
exhaustion.
A folie de Vikings has now gripped the French, fascinated, for example, to
discover that they owe the word for lobster, homard, to their Norse
persecutors. In consequence, visibility in the Grand Palais is not good. The
installation is stylish, but the labelling sets a new standard in
uninformativeness. I grumble in the hope something can be done when the show
moves on.
Fortunately, the catalogue is a wonderful find. Nothing less than an
encyclopaedia of the northern world, it is packed with information on
everything from Icelandic sagas to the salt-fish trade.
Armed with such a handsome yet unusually portable book, the exhibition's
dingiest finds become fascinating. A tatty fragment of 10th-century cloth
was once part of billowing, brightly-coloured Viking trousers, rather like a
Turkish peasant's. Another wool scrap tells archaeologists that when Vikings
were hard-up, they trimmed their jackets with fake fur.
The sheer quantity of 9th- and 10th-century material is almost beyond
belief; skis, carved beds from the famous ship-burials, a tool-box and its
contents from Gotland, amulets of amber shaped like Thor's hammer, a bone
flute and Pan-pipes from York, and bits of boats.
Swords inscribed in Latin suggest that the Frankish kings' embargo on
selling arms to the Vikings was useless - unless, of course, it was booty.
But there is a mass of evidence in support of the view that the Vikings were
traders first, warriors second. I particularly liked a carved stick which
was an invoice for a shipment of pepper.
The exhibition opens windows on to an unfamiliar northern world. We meet the
Faroese, the fiercely pagan Laplanders, and the redoubtable Finnish ladies
who were buried with their axes. The Scandinavians' Baltic neighbours also
feature memorably; one of the most magnificent sights is the complete sets
of ladies' jewellery, complete with cowry shells, from the museum in Riga.
Between 800 and 1100, Viking ambitions spanned almost the entire known
world. Grave-goods and caches of buried treasure in their homeland recall
the ceaseless forays of warbands, as far as the coasts of Spain and Morocco,
down the Volga to Byzantium (there are Viking graffiti in Haghia Sophia),
Syria, and Central Asia. Even so, the mind boggles to think how a
7th-century bronze figurine of Buddha ended up at the Swedish trading-post
of Helgo.
From Canada comes precious testimony to the settlement discovered 30 years
ago at L'Anse aux Meadows in Newfoundland. It was not a success, unlike
Viking settlements on Iceland, the Duchy of Normandy, and above all, Kiev
and the kingdom of Russia.
Equally fascinating are the finds which suggest the civilising process at
work. In an idle moment, an 11th-century Dane scratched in runic letters on
a cow-bone, 'Kyss mik]', 'Give us a kiss]'. Passing love-notes under the
table hardly squares with our image of the ferocious gens Danorum.
(After-dinner entertainment for a band of Danish warriors in 869, was to
pelt their captive St Edmund, king of East Anglia, to death with the dinner
service.)
Christianity transformed the Vikings. Till the mid-10th century - later in
Sweden - they were worshippers of Thor and Odin. A 10th-century burial from
Denmark contains two skeletons; a young man dressed in imported silk, and an
older man, decapitated. It recalls Adam of Bremen's story of the corpses of
sacrificial victims hung like pheasants in the grove at Uppsala.
The last room contains spectacular artistic proof of what happened once
Thor's worshippers had evolved into pilgrims and crusaders. There are
wondrous beauties here, such as the carved wooden font from the church of
Norre Snede in Jutland, ivory crucifixes made from walrus teeth (an
important Scandinavian export), grave-stones and furniture, and an graceful
iron candelabrum in the shape of a longship.
Just how far the Vikings had travelled is summed up by a 12th-century shoe
from Bergen. Embroidered runes along the top spell out amorvicithomniaoth -
a gallant shot at Virgil's Amor vincit omnia, 'Love conquers all'.
The wooden portal of the church at Hylestad in Denmark shows how
delightfully the Viking tradition of interlaced animals married with
Romanesque figurative art. It tells the story of Sigurd, alias Siegfried,
and the dragon. Precious manuscripts of Snorri Sturluson's books testify to
the intellectual sophistication of clerics who, in writing down the legends
of Valhalla, made perhaps the single most influential contribution of
Scandinavia to European culture.
At the Grand Palais, Paris, until 12 July, then in Berlin (Altes Museum,
September 1 - November 15) and the Nationalmuseet, Copenhagen, December 26-
March 14 1993.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11372</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: Slave of the box office
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TOURING reveals all too clearly the Jekyll and Hyde tendencies of ballet
companies. The need, the duty, to take classical dancing to regional
audiences is inescapable. The temptation to play horridly safe (an infernal
round of Swan Lake and The Nutcracker) is still Mr Hyde's box-office
imperative. The voice of conscience urges triple bills, less familiar
full-length pieces, and Dr Jekyll faces financial ruin thereby.
Current tours by two Russian troupes - Moscow City Ballet with its feeble
Sleeping Beauty; Stars of the Bolshoy with gems from the classics - show how
familiarity dictates repertory. Northern Ballet Theatre plays solid weeks of
Swan Lake; Scottish Ballet offers ceaseless Coppelias; London City Ballet
provides Romeo and Juliet and a classical triple bill. English National
Ballet soon embarks on a season of Cinderellas. Even the Birmingham Royal
Ballet must tour Giselle and a programme of one-act pieces relying on such
securities as Les Sylphides and Elite Syncopations
Companies have so pandered to audience taste; so failed to generate an
interest in the new; so homogenised the repertory and the very idea of
'ballet' (and their own identities), that any break with proven titles will
soon become impossible. Rising costs have helped price ballet out of
inventiveness and adventure; a vast and valuable repertory lies unexplored.
Where once small companies as different and differently exciting as Western
Theatre Ballet or Walter Gore's troupes, laboured to give programmes unique
and enjoyable; and where once the wild and wonderful repertory and glamorous
casts of the de Cuevas troupe were guarantees of excitement, astronomical
outlay, inadequate subsidy, have produced the cast-iron titles, the
atrophied imagination, and the deadly sameness of touring ballet's current
programming.
Standards vary wildly, and I hold little brief for most of the performances
that pass themselves off under illustrious titles - I can think of no more
than a dozen ballerinas fit to dance Aurora or Odette/Odile or Giselle as
these roles should be seen, and of even fewer stagings that do honour to the
ballets themselves.
The Birmingham Royal Ballet Giselle, which I saw on Thursday in Canterbury,
remains a careful, well-conceived production - and the Marlowe Theatre
offers it a fine stage. The performance was honest - though I thought some
of the soloist dancing less than inspiring, and the mime playing looked
all-too-predictable - and the evening offered a chance to see a guest with
the troupe, Anna Valladolid, born in the Phillipines, now a principal dancer
in Munich. Her Giselle was delicate, most effective amid the mists and
mystery of the second act, where her compassion was touchingly sincere. But
it was yet another Giselle in the deja-vu; phenomenon that is Britain's
touring ballet scene.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11373</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: A stale world
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MURRAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ADRIAN Mitchell's Columbus show, A New World and the Tears of the Indians is
loosely adapted from a Lope de Vega play, The Discovery of the New World,
written about a century after Columbus's voyages; but in proper liberal
spirit, Mitchell has set it within Bartholome de las Casas' grim
contemporary testimony about the later destruction of Columbus's gentle
'Indians' by the Spaniards.
Bartholome's document is just spatchcocked in: a bit by way of prologue, and
much more for an epilogue in which Columbus is presented with it. It is
impossible to divine what Hugh Quarshie's hero may feel here - bemused?
cynical? pained? defiant? Having smouldered darkly throughout the play
(something for which Quarshie has an admired knack), and given nothing that
might catch fire, he merely smoulders on.
The director Patrick Sandford and a hard-working multiracial cast do what
they can for this half-baked text, in Robin Don's deft, inviting set.
Presumably Lope's verse-play was in high epic colour with quaint native
vignettes.
In the programme Mitchell writes that 'hindsight has made some of his comedy
unplayable' (so he has cut it); foresight, however, might have suggested
that flat modern-colloquial, like most of Mitchell's language here, would
not enhance the drama.
Neither do the amiable little songs scattered through the affair. At what
ought be the climactic moments Pete Moser's score tries harder, but an
miasma of amateur pageant hangs over the whole thing. We expect Columbus to
encounter Ferdinand and Isabella, and later an Atlantic mutiny, and just in
time the island of San Salvador, and then some natives, and finally the
royals again.
He does; but only the most modest expectations are fulfilled. No discredit
to the actors, who may be happy not to be named (some of them can sing well,
too). What they have to work with is just too flabby and moony, too thin on
character, too vaguely proportioned for the production to get a grip on it.
In a loyal, stylish translation, Lope's 'popular though chaotic' play might
prove considerably less unplayable than this one. It would be bound to be
more interesting.
At the Nuffield Theatre, South- ampton, until Saturday 2 May.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11374</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: Theatres in old London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GERALD CADOGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN 1600, theatre takings were put in piggy banks, until someone had time to
break the pottery moneyboxes and count the cash. The play cost a penny for
the groundlings in the yard, and seats in the galleries were two pence.
Broken piggy banks from the 1988-89 dig in the Rose Theatre in Southwark are
an evocative part of a newly opened permanent display of Tudor and Stuart
theatres in the Museum of London.
The Rose, over the road from the FT's building, was at the heart of
theatreland in the days of Marlowe and Shakespeare. Across Park Street was
the Globe. Nearby were the Swan and the Hope, and the Bear Garden for bear
baiting.
London's first theatre was The Theatre, built by James Burbage in 1576 in
Shoreditch, beyond the rule of the City fathers. Similarly, Philip Henslowe
put the Rose in Southwark in 1587. In 1599 Burbage demolished The Theatre
and came south to build the Globe and start a lively rivalry. The
Globe/Shakespeare players in Hamlet parody the Rose/Marlowe style of acting.
Centrepiece of the new display is a metre-high model of the Rose
incorporating the results of the dig, which confirm details Henslowe
recorded in his diaries.
The model includes the refreshment parlour that Henslowe's partner, the
grocer John Cholmley, ran beside the Rose. A sword hilt and scabbard from
the dig are rusty relics of many a swordplay. But missing from the display
are the hazelnuts, which were those days' chocolates and popcorn. Both Rose
and Globe digs produced masses of them.
At the Globe, the Museum of London has finished supplementary bore hole digs
beneath the cellars of Anchor Terrace, paid for by the site's owner, Hanson,
finding more of the theatre's perimeter. Now Hanson and the Museum are
preparing a proposal for the future of the site. What a chance for the new
French-style National Heritage Secretary to promote a French-style solution,
a total excavation of the Globe - even if it means removing the lower floors
of Anchor Terrace - to learn how Shakespeare was played in the theatre he
wrote for. Bore holes are not enough.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11375</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: Fewer platitudes, more cash - Off the Wall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ROBERT KEY, David Mellor's number two at the Ministry of National Heritage,
performed badly - platitudes galore  - at his first appearance before the
arts community on Thursday night at the National Art Collections Fund Awards
ceremony. Sir Nigel Mobbs, chairman of Slough Estates, sponsors of the
event, summed up the reaction by calling for more money for the arts - and
fewer platitudes. He spoilt his case by announcing that, after six years,
Slough was withdrawing its sponsorship.
The Awards were the swansong for Sir Peter Wakefield, who is retiring as
director of the NACF. He leaves an impressive record - a trebling of the
membership to 35,000 and a rise from Pounds 300,000 to Pounds 2m a year in
NACF's contributions to save works of art for the nation.
This years winners were Whitechapel Gallery for its community education
programme; The Arts Newspaper; Art in Albany Prison; the Homerton Hospital
Art Trust; and the Fan Museum at Greenwich.
If David Mellor wants to get his new Ministry for the National Heritage off
to a spanking start he should quickly find the Pounds 500,000 needed to
beautify the new British Library nearing completion (phase one anyway) in
the Euston Road.
The crassest decision of his civil servants when he was at the Treasury was
to cheesepare over the commissioning of art to set off the Pounds 450m
building. Since this is the most expensive national monument of the century,
mooted at one time as Margaret Thatcher's permanent memorial, there is a
case for spending a full 1 per cent of the building costs on art. With
Pounds 45m, you could have created something to put all the recent Parisian
monuments in the shade. Instead a miserly sum was earmarked - and then
withdrawn, even though artists like RB Kitaj and Eduardo Paolozzi had been
commissioned to produce a huge tapestry and a large sculpture.
The Library was told to raise the money for art from sponsorship, a
time-consuming task in a recession, and hardly its first priority. Now
Mellor can make good his lapse. He had better hurry. An imaginative scheme
has emerged which should tempt a sponsor to find the Pounds 250,000 needed
for the Paolozzi monument. The sculptor has agreed to give the sponsor a
free second casting of his 12ft high sculpture, which is inspired by Newton.
To make such an offer irresistible there are other benefits - the sponsor
will be immortalised by having their name inscribed on the plinth; receive
an invitation to next year's opening by the Queen; and doubtless qualify for
a tax benefit. A final incentive is that a recent Paolozzi sculpture has
just been insured for Pounds 1m. Such a commercial deal to dress up a
national monument should be enough to embarrass the Government into action.
The phone has hardly stopped ringing at Sotheby's since it wrote to members
of Lloyds last week reminding them that, to ease their current financial
woes, they might like to cash in their art collections. Some felt that the
auction house was taking on the character of a vulture, feeding off the
discomfiture of hard-pressed Names.
In the event, the offer of a free valuation of their works of art, and the
promise of a cash advance of a third of Sotheby's valuation if the owner
felt obliged to sell at auction, struck a chord. There have been more than
50 calls, with the first valuation taking place today.
Sotheby's has been surprised at the quality of the antiques, which include
important Impressionist and modern British pictures. One problem is the
weakness of the art market - many modern British pictures are worth less
than what their owners paid for them during the 1980s boom years. But needs
must, and the auction house thinks that demand is picking up, fuelled by
post-Election euphoria. It will recommend that some Names sell at auction in
the next few months to release the cash needed to meet the bills from Lloyds
when they land on their mats around July.
GLYNDEBOURNE opens next Saturday with a new production of Peter Grimes. And
for once, this most traditional of English Festivals will be different. Not
as different as next year, when there will be no Festival at all, nor as
1994, when the audience will gather on May 28 for The Marriage of Figaro in
a new Pounds 33m auditorium, in a new Glyndebourne. But different enough.
Since last August, Glyndebourne has been a building site. The development
has stormed ahead. The shape of the new theatre is clearly visible. The old
walled garden and the tennis court have been demolished too, but there has
been a temporary reprieve for the auditorium, where this summer Glyndebourne
is holding a shortened Festival, starting four weeks earlier to allow for
total destruction in August.
Apart from the work in progress, which does not impinge on the traditional
pleasure grounds, and the possibility of nippy picnics at the early May
performances, there is one more change this year. Glyndebourne was unable to
find a company prepared to put up Pounds 100,000 to sponsor Peter Grimes.
It is not too surprised, nor too perturbed. Since launching the appeal for
funds to build the new theatre, chairman Sir George Christie has extracted
money from big business with a charm and facility unmatched in the history
of British artistic philanthropy. In two years, companies have pledged
almost Pounds 25m - the bulk of the Pounds 28m so far raised. The total
contributed by sponsorship to performing arts is only Pounds 57m a year,
such is Glyndebourne's importance as a mecca for culture and hospitality.
And this is just the start. By pledging money now, corporate members earn
the privilege of paying yet more money in the future: for annual
subscription and the purchase of guaranteed tickets.
General director Anthony Whit worth-Jones admits that Glyndebourne got in
just in time, weeks before the recession really began to bite. It has still
not achieved its target from the corporate sector, but as the new building
shows off its qualities, it hopes to should round up the backsliders.
Although the facts of life force the Festival to embrace the corporate
sector, they keep it firmly in its place. The new theatre adds 320 seats,
making 1,150, but businessmen will be confined to 35 per cent, with the
bulk, around 50 per cent, going to individual members, and the remainder to
the general public. And there will be cheap standing places at every
performance. Glyndebourne is not nearly as exclusive as its reputation
suggests. There are still a few May tickets going for speedy callers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11376</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: Whose film is it anyway? - Screen
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIGEL ANDREWS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE PAST has always come to us neatly packaged. Give history enough time and
it will reduce itself, as all schoolboys know, to a grab-bag of dates,
political milestones and rhyming mnemonics ('Willy, Willy, Harry, Steve').
The remarkable thing about cinema history is that, unlike real history, it
has been neat and simple: at least until now. 99 out of 100 films were made
to a certain length and shown at that length. They had no life beyond the
cinema, so there was no call for longer TV/video versions aimed at the
mini-series market or shorter TV/video versions aimed at turning epics into
teledramas.
In addition, the studio era kept the director's ego on a leash, deterring
him from crying 'Foul' if his film left the cutting-room minus his favourite
scenes.
Today all is different. Multiplying delivery systems and declarations of war
by hard-done directors make the modern feature film the world's most
frighteningly elastic work of art.
When a film is not actually born in two distinct versions - as recently in
Rivette's 4-hour La Belle Noiseuse twin-packed with a 2-hour 'Divertimento'
 -it can have a delayed rebirth as that increasingly voguish phenomenon, the
'director's version'. Witness A Star Is Born (Cukor), Lawrence Of Arabia
(Lean), Betty Blue (Beineix) and, soon to reach us, James Cameron's revised
Aliens and Ridley Scott's revised Blade Runner.
Scouring the cutting-room floor, auteurs collect the celluloid that they
once had to excise at a producer's whim and stick it back in. Sometimes too,
a director changes his own mind. Video allows him to push out a second
version of his film without blaming anyone else for the first. The world is
treated to, say, Steven Spielberg's Close Encounters Of The Third Kind: The
Special Edition.
Meanwhile, there are movies or movie-sagas expanded for TV serialisation
(The Godfather), made-for-TV films that live a ghostly second life on the
large screen (Broadway Bound) and films that cannot make up their minds at
all whether they are features or teledramas or mini-series (Altman's Vincent
And Theo). Even that notable modern mould-breaker Twin Peaks began life as a
TV series pilot cum mini-feature cum video.
No one has worked out what all this portends culturally, least of all the
directors. German film-maker Wim Wenders denies that his 2 1/2 -hour sci-fi
fable Until The End Of The World is a contractually enforced compromise
version, but he admits to having a preferred five-hour version up his sleeve
for later release.
Further back in time, Michael Cimino's ill-fated Heaven's Gate fought for
survival in three different versions, ranging from the director's cherished
4 1/2 -hour cut to a 90-minute TV quickie called The Johnson County War.
Bygone film-makers such as DW Griffith, Abel Gance and Erich Von Stroheim
all faced the curse of the scissors from censors or studios. But they,
unlike their descendants, could seldom combat the finality of the release
version.
Today, TV and video allow a director a second or third bite at the cherry of
artistic perfection. Result: a world at once saner and madder. The awareness
of expanded options liberates the director. But it also allows him to
bewilder audiences by treating his film as an almost 'work in progress'.
This phrase has become a mantra of modern cinema. When two famous films were
submitted to the Cannes Film Festival in different years as
works-in-progress and won the Golden Palm - Apocalypse Now and The Mission -
festival-goers rightly protested that they were being treated as sneak
preview audiences. Either the film was ready to the director's satisfaction
or it was not. If not, it should wait for another festival.
But then the sneak preview itself has assumed a special role in the age of
the flexi-film. Is a movie ready when the director says so? Or when the
studio says so? Or when a guinea-pig audience says so after filling in its
preview cards and demanding that, say, Glenn Close be horribly slaughtered
in Fatal Attraction or that the ending of The Bonfire Of The Vanities be
radically re-cut (see Julie Salomon's enthralling production chronicle The
Devil's Candy)?
Films are flexible today because so many paymasters call so many different
tunes. Cinema has become the modern equivalent to oral storytelling. In the
old days, the diverse responses of Tom, Dickon or Harry influenced the
teller's tale so that it changed from one telling to the next. The
storyteller with a high opinion of his art might protest, but the fluid
nature of the audience patterned the fluidity of the work.
Some cinephiles today would claim that that fluidity has always existed in
film: that the finite nature even of past works of cinema is illusory.
Scholars and restorers such as Britain's Kevin Brownlow (Napoleon) and
America's Robert Harris (Lawrence Of Arabia) earn a living from regarding
old movies too as being in a state of perpetual evolution. But even these
men tend to have a guiding light to move towards: that inspirational concept
of 'the director's intention'.
We are fast entering an age, though, when this concept, too, is exposed as
unsound. It supposes not only that the director had an intention - debatable
in the hurly-burly of most film-making - but that the director is the
highest reference point and authority. Is he?
One could argue that the true author of a successful commercial film is the
studio that first packaged the ingredients, or the star who lovingly nursed
the project as his next career move, or the screenwriter who put pen to
paper, or even the novelist whose best-seller made the film a going concern
from the start.
Cinema gets us into these confusions because it is a corporate art like
cathedral-building, not a single-signature art like novel-writing or
composing. In many ways, the proliferating confusions of the flexi-film do
us a service by pointing out a truth long overdue: that, since movies emerge
from a turmoil of creative minds, it is fair to reflect that in a turmoil of
release versions and delivery systems.
Equally, if film-making is increasingly shaped by the imagined or
market-researched demands of the viewers who will pay for it, then new
viewing contexts are justified in making their own new demands. If the
screen's ravening appetite and ramifying digestive systems demand that a
successful movie doubles as a mini-series or a pop promo or a sitcom, who is
the director or anyone else to say nay?
In years to come the 'definitive' version of a film could become as elusive
or controversial as those rarer instances of protean identity in other arts:
from Verdi's Don Carlos to Joyce's Ulysses. But unlike them, in the
perversely polymorphous context of movie authorship, there is no
artist-as-God-the-father looking down and advising from the heavens.
A world where 'democratic' has become the most approved and talismanic word
in the language has got the democratic art it silently called for but is
struggling, not so silently, to understand it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11377</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Arts: Time at Easter for the agnostics - Radio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BA YOUNG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EASTER Sunday gave the agnostics a run as well as the Christians. Radio 1's
A Damn Good Lie examined the truth of the Crucifixion and the Resurrection,
but the programme, presented by The Man Ezeke, was so elementarily
Christian, songs and all, that doubters would remain doubters and believers
believers, leaving us where we were.
Radio 4 gave Easter Enigma, a more serious debate chaired by a dubious
Ludovic Kennedy, in which such contentious figures as the Bishop of Durham
and Don Cupitt examined the Easter story from a realistic angle. And on BBC
1, for TV addicts, Joan Bakewell grilled some C of E parsons who showed
little respect for the Nicene Creed.
Radio 4's Monday play, Are Friends Electric? by Lesley Davies, was a still
life of a 15-year-old boy's death from cystic fibrosis, presented not to
celebrate Easter Monday but to remind us that this was Cystic Fibrosis Week.
Ben is ill throughout, and Richard Pearce's ghastly coughs and spits are a
horrid part of his effective playing. As he lies in bed, he plays a computer
game with an imaginary Gene, his enemy, and scenes from his life are called
up. His two siblings Chas and Alex also have CF, as they call it; and if
this seems a dramatic exaggeration, the dreadful fact is that the play is
based on an actual case.
There is indeed dramatic exaggeration in some of the talk, but the situation
can take it. John Rowe and Jennie Linden are Ben's patient father and
impatient mother, and Peter Whitman the antagonistic Gene, that Ben conquers
in his last supreme effort. We end at Ben's funeral, attended by 'all these
people we didn't know about,' symbols of the complete life Ben lived in his
15 years. The play was touchingly directed by Cherry Cookson, and one must
hope it will have met its object.
Still with drama, a six-part adaptation of Evelyn Waugh's Decline and Fall
plays at 12.35 on Wednesdays. The adaptation by Jeremy Frost stays close to
the novel, though pacing through it fairly fast. By lunchtime this week, a
rather mature Paul Pennyfeather (Alistair McGowan) had been sent down,
deprived of his inheritance, begun work at Llanabba Castle, and got drunk
with Captain Grimes (Jim Broadbent).
Howard Barker's A Hard Heart was repeated on Tuesday on Radio 3. I wrote
about it a month ago, but I mention it now because Radio 3 is only to have
one play a week after the Proms. This seems to me idiotic, for this is where
the best of the new drama is usually presented or repeated, and a new Radio
3 drama editor, Jeremy Howe, has only lately been appointed.
In the Radio Authority's complaints bulletin for January to March, only
seven complaints out of 40 are based on political bias - four from the
Andrew Neil programme on LBC, only one of them upheld. (Two other biases
dealt with hunting and with fighting in Israel.) This was a fair record in
the quarter before the election.
Forty programming complaints were sorted under five heads - bias, accuracy,
taste and broken undertakings, together with six miscellaneous. Nine
altogether were upheld by the Authority, whose reports, and subsequent
reference to the stations concerned, seem notably sensible - especially in
view of the frivolity of some of the complaints, such as dislike of music
policy or jokes that 'might offend lesbians'.
The advertising complaints tend to be pretty trivial. If a phrase like
'Columbus discovered America' offends American Indians, they must have been
offended ages before North West Airlines got hold of it. Too many complaints
are better than too few, though - better for listeners, that is, even if
they are agony for the Authority.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XXI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11378</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Books: Lord Byron's unpretty Polly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALANNAH HOPKIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LORD BYRON'S DOCTOR by Paul West Serpent's Tail Pounds 9.99, 277 pages
THE BUTCHER'S BOY by Patrick McCabe Picador Pounds 14.99, 215 pages
INHERITANCE by David Pryce-Jones Weidenfeld &amp; Nicolson Pounds 14.99, 252
pages
Fiction
BYRONIC memoirs are becoming a new literary genre. Lord Byron's Doctor first
appeared in the US in 1989, the same year that Robert Nye's Memoirs of Lord
Byron came out here. Mab's Daughters, by the Shelleyean academic Judith
Chernaik, added the female points of view, with imagined extracts from the
diaries of four of the women in Shelley's life, one of whom was Byron's
mistress.
The odd thing is that these imaginative monologues, taking off from the same
sparse facts, do not contradict each other, but weigh in with accumulative
effect. They can even be read alongside straightforward biographies,
although the 'reconstructions' are so lively and accomplished that
conventional biography is in danger of seeming tame.
Nye's Byron does not even mention the despised Doctor Polidori, while
Chernaik's women find him a pathetic figure of fun, a marginal character.
Paul West lets him address us from centre stage. Son of an Italian father
and an English mother, educated at Ampleforth and Edinburgh, Polidori was a
prurient, conceited 20-year-old with literary ambitions when Byron took him
abroad in 1816 as physician-companion. The poet quickly tired of his
'Polly'. When they met the Shelley household on Lake Geneva their outings
were frequently punctuated by Byron's exclamation, 'Thank God Polidori is
not here.'
Opium, sex and social climbing were the young doctor's main interests. His
detailed accounts of Lord Byron's member ('pallid warts on the scrotum') and
Lord Guilford's bowels, among other medical curiosities, are not for the
squeamish. And yet, such is the power of Paul West's achievement, one starts
to feel sympathy for the derided outsider, so far out of his depth.
So great is his self obsession that information about his companions is
incidental. Byron's publisher, John Murray, promised him Pounds 500 for a
diary of his travels with Byron, but on receiving the document asked: 'You
did go with Lord Byron, did you not? I do not find him here.' Paul West's
Polidori has the same shortcoming, and yet holds our interest as a
convincing and disturbing portrait of one of history's losers.
The Butcher's Boy features an even more obscure loser. Francie Brady,
orphan, soft in the head, has killed Mrs Nugent for reasons known only to
himself, and the reader is plunged into his wandering mind. Punctuation is
minimal and quotation marks omitted to give greater play to the grisly
events recorded. The misery and deprivation of working class life in rural
Ireland have never been so brutally evoked: steaming dung heaps, the whine
of the bacon slicer, and a tractor 'farting off home to the mountains with a
trailer of muck.' Francie, it turns out, is a 'lifer' recalling his past.
'No more hanging? I says. For fuck's sake] What's this country coming to?'
This is the third novel by Patrick McCabe (born County Monaghan, 1955), and
the strongest to come out of Ireland in many a year.
It was a relief to turn to the sunny Italian hills of Inheritance, and the
imposing old villa owned by the wealthy widow Dina. Italo Calvino, Iris
Origo, the young Bruce Chatwin and other fashionable expatriates mingle with
the fictional cast. The textures and colours of the villa, its furnishings
and garden, the details of dress, are so enjoyably described that sometimes
I felt I was looking at a back number of Harper's. But, even better, there
is a very clever story, told as if piecing together various verbatim
accounts of events in retrospect, which adds to the mystery.
The novel opens with a visit to Assisi in which the elderly Dina has a heart
attack and a vision of her late husband, Andrew. As she recovers, Andrew
takes to interrupting her sessions with the BBC World Service to convey
urgent mystical messages. Dina dedicates herself and her considerable wealth
to promoting the resulting religious movement, under the slogan: 'Unite the
Impossible'. In no time, clergymen are squabbling over the inheritance. When
her grown children realise what is going on, it is far too late. Pryce-Jones
gives us a rich combination: a well evoked foreign location, a good story
told with dry humour, and the satisfaction of reading about the follies of
the rich.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11379</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Books: Whaddya mean illiterate?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By AC GRAYLING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IMAGES OF ENGLISH by Richard W. Bailey Cambridge Pounds 16.95, 329 pages
I ONCE saw a notice in a London bus explaining scheduling changes which
concluded with the words, 'So the buses run smoother, and there are less
delays'. To purists this sentence is a ghastly example of the
quasi-illiteracy which besets our culture. To the more liberal-minded, it is
an example of desirable simplification in the direction of demotic forms.
How might the quarrel between purist and liberal be decided? The purist will
say, 'The writer of this notice ignored logic. He was talking of bus
services, not tyres, so it is not the buses but the services which run more
smoothly, and that is why he must use the comparative adverb 'more
smoothly', not the comparative adjective 'smoother', because it is the verb
'run' which is being qualified, not the noun 'buses'. Moreover, it is either
'less delay' or 'fewer delays' but not 'less delays', since in the plural
the word 'delay' is a count noun not a mass term.'
Liberals will respond by saying that the original sentence is perfectly
intelligible, which is all that matters. Purists might defend nice
distinctions and aesthetics, but liberals are unpersuaded: speakers, they
argue, wish to communicate, and whatever serves them is good English.
At least one thing is clear: as long as language exists, it will change; and
change will always provoke complaint. Among the targets in Richard Bailey's
book are the complainers. He attacks them for wishing to preserve English in
literary aspics of one flavour or another, and he also attacks those who
think English is pre-eminent among languages, an attitude which arose with
Empire and has accompanied and promoted some of the worst excesses of
English-speakers' snobbery, colonialism, and self-aggrandisement. The
official aim of Bailey's book is to give a 'cultural history of English';
its real aim is to expose and debunk English-speakers' pretensions.
If Bailey were just another commentator these aims would seem merely
partisan contributions to the familiar purist-liberal quarrel. But he is an
associate editor of the forthcoming Oxford Companion to the English
Language, and there is something significant about a Professor of English,
engaged in authoritative research, so clearly setting out a reductive view
of the place and importance of the English language.
Bailey begins with a surprising fact: that the number of people regularly
using English in their daily lives is only 15 per cent of the world's
population, and declining. The belief that English is an international
language and still growing in importance may bolster English-speaking egos,
but its hold on this role is slipping, according to Bailey, not just because
Japanese, German and Chinese are growing in importance, as a result of
economic influence and sheer numbers, but because English itself is
fragmenting into many varieties, some already unintelligible to the
mainstream.
By extensive use of quotation Bailey shows how English first captured the
British Isles and then, after an uncomfortable start without settled
spelling and grammar, began to impose itself abroad through colonialism.
The attitude of Cotton Mather, the 17th century American colonist and
divine, is typical; he resisted the idea of an Indian edition of the Bible
on the ground that 'It is very sure, that the best thing we can do for our
Indians, is to Anglicize them in . . . language, as well as otherwise.'
Praise of English, efforts to increase its influence, improve its spelling,
or protect its purity, are observed by Bailey with a sardonic eye. So too
are claims about the supposed damaging tendencies of slang, neologisms and
jargon. At the same date as the Book of Common Prayer - that exquisite jewel
of the tongue - was being compiled, John Evelyn complained of English's
corruption by 'pedantry of schooles, affectation of travellers,
translations, fancy and style of Court, servility and mincing of citizens,
pulpits, political remonstrances, theatres, shopps, &amp;c' Today the causes of
linguistic decay are cited as television, poor education, advertising,
computer jargon, and the argot of youth culture. Bailey's view is that the
language never decays; it merely changes.
This is true; and change is irresistible. But Bailey leaves two large points
unconsidered. First, standards may change, but they exist nevertheless. At
every point in its history there has been good and bad English of the day,
and we need to grasp the difference. And secondly, a language is as great as
its literature; all the world's great languages are rich in this respect,
English among the first. Taking this into account might have influenced some
of Bailey's judgments more positively.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11380</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Books: The losers' champion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTORIA SCHOFIELD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
STOLEN CONTINENTS: THE INDIAN STORY by Roland Wright John Murray Pounds
19.95, 424 pages
'FOR FIVE centuries,' writes Roland Wright, 'we have listened only to the
history of the winners.' Stolen Continents redresses the balance by
portraying the European 'discovery' of the continents of North and South
America from a 'native' perspective.
In selecting the Aztecs, Mayas, Incas, Iroquois and Cherokee, he has focused
on the most complex societies for whom the greatest source material is
available. 'The five I have chosen must therefore stand for the many who
will never tell their stories because they are extinct. The silence of the
Caribbean Taino, the Newfoundland Beothuk, and the Ona of Tierra del Fuego
is the most terrible eloquence of all.'
Wright portrays the history of these five groupings during three phases:
invasion, resistance, rebirth. The book is timely, not just because this
year marks the 500th anniversary of Columbus's first voyage across the
Atlantic, but because Wright follows the story through to the vociferous
nationalism of today.
His account is passionate and moving. Through reconstruction of wide-ranging
primary sources the reader can relive the agonies of the original
inhabitants at the hands of the invaders. But whereas we may be accustomed
to the devrecounted in the sixteenth-century Florentine Code, the continued
persecution of the indigenous population comes as a surprise. The memoirs of
the Guatemalan Mayan activist Rigoberta Menchu, written in 1982, are so
horrific that Wright admits some people may not believe that such horrors
really happened.
Wright sees the superior European attitude towards the 'primitive' natives
as almost laughable were the consequences not so tragic. The 'Requirement'
read by the sixteenth-century Spaniards to the local people at each
encounter demanded they submit to God, the Pope and the Church. 'And if you
do not do this . . . with the help of God I shall come mightily against you,
and I shall make war on you everywhere . . . and I shall do all the evil and
damage to you that I am able. And insist that the deaths and destruction
that result from this will be your fault.' This 'shabby document', as Wright
points out, was a symbolic necessity to justify outright plunder. The
Indians understood neither its meaning nor its intent.
Apologists for the European 'invasion' rightly point out that what decimated
the local people was not so much warfare but European diseases. But Wright
stresses the consequences of Lord Jeffrey Amherst's command against the
Iroquois in 1762. 'Infect the Indians with sheets upon which smallpox
patients have been lying or by any other means which may serve to
exterminate this accursed race.' The epidemic raged all summer, says Wright.
'One by one the leaders who survived it were compelled to sue for peace.'
Whether he is talking about the Incas, Aztecs, Mayas, of South and
Mesoamerica, or the Cherokee and Iroquois of North America, the 'Indian
story' is a tawdry one of misunderstanding and betrayal. Time and again the
new arrivals in North America reneged on their treaty obligations with the
original inhabitants who had once made them welcome.
There never was any expectation that the 'white' and 'Indian' cultures might
coexist. Thousands of books of Mayan hieroglyphs were destroyed because the
Spaniards could not understand them. When finally the remaining few were
deciphered, they revealed advanced astronomical information. In their
attempt to eradicate the Inca culture, the Spaniards banned Ouecha song,
music and theatre. Even well-meant reforms backfired.
Although the title of the book indicates that the continents of North and
South America have been 'stolen' from their pre-Columbian inhabitants, the
reader is left in no doubt that 500 years later the 'theft' is still being
contested by those who have not lost sight of their ancient culture or
language. 'If Guatemala really had majority rule, it would be a Maya
republic,' says Wright. In the Andes 12m people speak the Inca language.
There are more Iroquois living in North America than there have been for
three and a half centuries. And the eastern Cherokees have managed to remain
in the Great Smoky mountains where they lived in pre-Columbian times.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11381</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Books: Twinkling Star of the Enlightenment - An examination
of Diderot's life and deceptions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY CURTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DIDEROT by PN Furbank Secker &amp; Warburg Pounds 25, 523 pages
WHAT IS the English for the 18th century French word philosophe? Thinker?
Ironist? Satirist? Wise man? Nothing quite works but it is at least clear
the philosophes were not philosophers pure and simple, in the sense that
they formulated a complete system of thought. In this respect they are not
like, say, Descartes, Locke or Hume; yet to understand their work in any
kind of depth you have to engage with a great deal of hard-core
philosophical argument. Their most cogent British interpreters have tended
to be professional philosophers or political scientists, Ayer on Voltaire
(1986) and Cranston on Rousseau - in a major biography of which the final
volume is still awaited.
PN Furbank is the exception in that he is a literary critic and biographer
with previous books on EM Forster, Samuel Butler and Italo Svevo to his
credit. Yet happily Furbank is more than capable of presenting with clarity
the main philosophical issues that abound in the work of Diderot. The
sub-title - 'a critical biography'  - is here an exact description of the
book. Furbank deals comprehensively with the life and the work of this
liberating writer in roughly equal parts.
Diderot, son of a cutler, was a wonderfully entertaining, radically
subversive genius. He was, above all, brave; never afraid to risk his neck
in publicly proclaiming his violently anti-clerical views with immense
vigour in spite of having suffered a period of harsh imprisonment in his
youth on account of them. If Diderot is best known to us as the architect of
the Encyclopedie, as an early champion of the notion of the Tree of
Knowledge, and more generally as a protagonist of the Enlightenment (a term
about which this book has some sharply corrective things to say), we are
reminded by Furbank that Diderot's total output also included many polemical
essays and treatises, regular art criticism, pieces of theatre, and some
brilliant fictional dialogues.
A sense of virtuosic performance typifies Diderot's life as much as it did
his work. He was greatly in demand socially, and would entrance his
contemporaries by his flow of sparkling discourse even when he was embattled
in furious argument with them. He had long love-hate relations with both
Rousseau and Voltaire, less stormy ones with his other collaborators on the
Encyclopedia, D'Alembert, Holbach, Naigeon, and with Baron Grimm (not to be
confused with the folklorists of the same name). One of Diderot's greatest
fans was Catherine the Great, who supported him financially for much of his
career and persuaded him at an advanced age to go to St Petersburg as her
adviser on how to run her empire; though she does not seem to have acted on
his voluminous advice.
Furbank paints vivid portraits of Diderot's shrewish wife, Nanette, and of
his intellectual mistress, Sophie Volland. Diderot was torn apart like any
typical honnete homme or pere de famille in a boulevard farce. Unlike
Rousseau he accepted the burden of parenthood but did not allow it to impair
his career. Nothing in his life ever could or did. He was unceasingly
industrious. His surviving child married a businessman who prospered and she
provided Diderot with two grandchildren upon whom he doted. Angelique, his
daughter, also wrote the earliest life of Diderot.
Furbank places Diderot's novels within the tradition of European fiction in
the 18th century and highlights their relevance and readability today. This
is his most useful service for the lay reader. He draws an interesting
distinction between novelists like Jane Austen, Balzac and Dickens, and many
other mainstream writers of fiction, who rely on giving their readers an
illusion of reality, and those like Diderot who practise a kind of deception
or con trick on them. In Diderot the reader is deceived into believing that
the events described actually occurred. Diderot much admired the work of
Richardson, where this kind of deceptive technique is apparent in the way
the events of the novel are viewed at one remove through a sequence of
authentic-seeming letters, all of them carefully dated.
Diderot's deceptions took many devious forms. His novel about the horrors of
conventual life, The Nun, derived from a case of an unwanted illegitimate
female child who was forced to take nun's vows at the age of 16, and then
when she had grown to self-awareness found it impossible to renounce them.
In other instances, too, Diderot grafted the fiction onto an episode in the
life of a known individual. The composer Rameau, for example, happened to
have a nephew who was a mediocre composer and a layabout. In his fable
Rameau's Nephew Diderot takes him as an example of the social parasite and
engages with him in a dialogue that examines the role of genius in society.
In D'Alembert's Dream Diderot used another real person, his chief assistant
on the Encyclopedia, the mathematician D'Alembert, to initiate a
dramatically conveyed discussion of materialism.
The obscurity nowadays of the real people deployed by Diderot in such works
has prevented them reaching many British readers outside the universities.
If we are ignorant of the French naval officer Louis-Antoine de
Bougainville, who in 1771 wrote an account of a Voyage around the world
(except perhaps through the purple plant named after him), why should we
read Diderot's Supplement to that Voyage? Yet the Supplement is a
masterpiece of irony, hilariously arguing the case for polygamy and the
economic virtues inherent in a state of nature.
These strategies of deception also include direct addresses to the reader
whom Diderot invites to join in the argument. His most elaborate performance
of this kind was the posthumous Jacques the Fatalist, to which Furbank
devotes a concluding chapter. It is a book that defies summary, a running
dialogue inverting the relations between master and servant; in part a
parody of Cervantes, also an essay on determinism, and a landmark in the
history of the anti-novel. It appeared in a readable English translation in
the Penguin classics in 1986. After Furbank it should acquire many more
British admirers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11382</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Gardening: Plant of the Week
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Trillium grandiflorum This plant is a native of thin woodland in eastern and
central north America where it grows in rather moist, peaty, naturally-acid
soil. The white flowers turn purplish with age and are distinctively
three-petalled, the petals broad and overlapping, the flowers two to three
inches across. They are carried on sturdy 18 to 24 inch stems in April and
May. In gardens in Britain they are quite hardy, suitable for any moderately
shady place that is not alkaline and does not dry out readily. The tubers
should be planted in September or October, three to four inches deep, and
left undisturbed for years to establish themselves as colonies by
self-regeneration.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11383</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Fishing: The biggest catch of all - Russia is the latest
'in' angling destination
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TOM FORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A CENTURY ago, Norway was the place for the moneyed angler seeking something
out of the ordinary. For a time, in the 1920s and 1930s, Sweden, and in
particular the River Em, where the giant sea trout ran, was the place to be
seen. Later still Alaska and Canada held sway, although Iceland had its
enthusiasts. But now now there is only one wilderness which the
fashion-conscious fisherman need bother with - Russia.
The sporting possibilities revealed in the wreckage of the Soviet Union have
been hungrily seized upon by specialist travel companies. So far, attention
has been focused on the salmon rivers of the Kola peninsular, which thrusts
itself like a thumb into the Barents Sea north east of St Petersburg. The
reports are of great runs of salmon, and sport of a quality now almost
unheard of in the West.
Already the frontiers are being pushed further back. I see that one company
is offering trips to Kamchatka, with the promise of Pacific salmon. Another
invites you to join what it calls a research fishing trip to somewhere
called Yakutia, in Siberia, where sturgeon may be caught.
I am afraid that I have no first-hand experience. I was offered the chance
to go to Kola last year, but decided that ten days in the treeless,
mosquito-infested tundra, pulling out salmon as fast as I could and putting
them back again (catch-and-release is accepted practice) might not be as
much fun as it first appeared. There was also  - I confess it with shame - a
nagging fear that I might not pull anything out, and that reputation and
self-esteem might suffer.
However, although I have not fished in Russia myself, I have before me an
entertaining account from one who has - although his experiences are a far
cry from those glowingly advertised by Messrs Abercrombie and Kent and the
rest. I met Marius-Adrian Dumitru while I was fishing in Transylvania a
couple of years ago. His exceedingly pretty wife gave me a bag of cherries
on a hot and thirsty day, and he and I talked fishing and became firm
friends.
Last autumn, he travelled to St Petersburg as a guest of the city's Anglers'
and Hunters' Association. His description begins arrestingly: 'Numberless
are the rivers and lakes of the great Russian taiga, but how to reach them?'
Certainly, many people reached them, and some of them for ever. Marius found
the Russians a very hospitable people. 'I was assailed', he writes, 'with
real delicatessen richly aspersed with the never-failing vodka.'
He also found his hosts entirely ignorant on matters of fly-fishing. On the
River Vilojba - about 200 miles east of St Petersburg  - Marius was able to
show the Russians what they were missing.
From the Vilojba, Marius travelled north, to Karelia and the lake of Ladoga.
He met a Romanian girl, Roxana. 'She proved to be my fairy as, after a whole
week of endless rain, I finally had a wonderful autumn day. We crossed dark
fir tree forests, past rivers and clear lakes, towards our destination.'
Ladoga is celebrated, apparently, for a species of trout called the Kumja,
which grows to 15lb and more. But Marius concentrated on another fish:
'Above me, thousands of ephemerids flew incessantly, and the grayling came
to the surface to take my forgeries. When the setting sun lengthened the
shadows of the trees over the lake, I felt a fish hang heavy on the end of
my line. It was sixteen inches long - perhaps one-and-a-half pounds. Then
the rain came down again.'
Perversely, perhaps, I find this sort of thing more congenial to my
imagination than the thought of ten days of salmon plunder in Kola. I would
love to wander the streams that feed Ladoga. I could be lured to the lakes
of Armenia, or to mighty Baikal. Kamchatka sounds a little chilly, and as I
cannot find Yakutia on the map, I will have to reserve judgment.
One place I am very keen on at the moment is Outer Mongolia. The other day,
leafing through a 65-year-old copy of The Field, I came across a photograph
of a Mr V. de Franck, holding a vast fish, a taimen of 58lb. Of the taimen I
know no more than that it is a relative of the salmon. de Franck describes
it as a grim and vicious fighter, and since he caught 37 of them on a two
week trip, I am prepared to take his word for it.
The river on which he enjoyed this sport was the Gan, whose limpid waters -
he says  - flow from the Hingan Mountains across the plain of the North
Barga. I have been unable to find the Gan, or the town of Kantagaitu (The
Elks Are Here, in English), where he stayed. But the Argun - into which the
Gan flows  - forms the border between Russia and China, so it must be on one
side or the other.
As a final recommendation, de Franck says: 'This territory is 100 per cent
safe from the Chinese brigands who infest other parts of North Manchuria and
have closed many promising fishing and shooting grounds to the sportsman.'
What more do I need to know? I have always wanted to be an authority on
something. Why not the Manchurian, or Mongolian, taimen?
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11384</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Gardening: Early victims of the annual conflict - The front
lawn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE-FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR THE first time in three years, the weather is favouring late planters.
The sequence of dry springs has broken; frosts have not been erratic; the
ground is warming without becoming hard. It is all an incentive to buy and
plant, but before you pitch in, reflect on my report from the front line.
The front line, as usual, is littered with casualties. I blame them not so
much on frost as on a winter of cold winds. In the Cotswolds, they include
almost anything of marginal hardiness which went unprotected: the better
sorts of cistus, the riskier forms of penstemon and anything with silky
silver leaves.
As I exhume corpses, I notice a warning to planters: despite appearances,
these casualties have hardly ever crept out of their original ball of
compost during four or five years in the open ground. The top growth, even
the flowers, were promising, but something deterred the roots from spreading
far and wide.
I have no doubt about the culprit: it is the sad apology for earth in which
most of our nurseries now grow on their stock. Most of this compost is peat;
some of it is white perlite; none of it is plain loam of the robust variety
which these plants then meet in the garden. It is as if the roots emerge
from a light cocoon and then go on strike when they encounter reality on
three sides. Corpse upon corpse shows the same effect which has not killed
them, but has certainly slowed them up.
You and I have to learn to live with it because nurserymen are not likely to
change their convenient ways. These light composts are easy to buy,
transport, force-feed and keep clean: innocent customers are now accustomed
to them and there are only a few eccentrics like myself who prefer to buy
'open ground' plants with bare roots and a dead appearance in late winter.
We are all told that it is marvellously easy nowadays to plant anything from
a container at any time of the year: we hear much less about the difficulty
of persuading plants inside it to grow on smoothly.
My first cure for the difficulty is water. Much of our newly-bought stock is
planted out when it is already too dry. The compost in plastic containers
tends to dry out on a warm shopping day in the garden centre and dry out
even more drastically in the car boot.
I have just been planting a group of pot-grown box bushes: here, there is
the added complication that their fibrous roots are already a tangled mass
and the only way of wetting this muddle is to stand the entire ball of roots
for an hour or two in a bucket of water. Casual watering from a can merely
runs down the outer sides of the root ball and reaches nothing: the plant
goes into the ground with a dry centre and is not saved by most people's
habit of watering gently round the plant, not directly at its centre.
If you are planting during this weekend, ignore the trivial distraction of
any rain and keep a bucket nearby in which to immerse each subject which
comes equipped with its own designer-compost.
The next step is to loosen the ground to as fine a texture as possible
immediately around the new ball of roots. On a clay soil, you will have to
have a second bucket of a light, leafy compost to hand in order to add to
this workable zone round your new acquisition. Labels will probably tell you
to plant your pot-grown purchase in yet more peat, but I rebel against
correcting the culprit by using yet more of it and I do not find that
another handful solves the problem. Sooner or later, the roots have to be
persuaded to explore your local soil and in my view, they might as well
start as soon as possible.
They will be persuaded more quickly if you avoid the amateur's other great
mistake. Whenever you plant, you must make a hole which is deep enough for
the job. Except on heavy soils, the level of the ground will always settle
round newly-planted stock and beginners will be caught out and find their
plants protruding above ground level like corks in a half-opened bottle.
It is extremely difficult to plant too deeply unless you are handling roses
or larger shrubs which have been grafted: here, you should not bury the
plant below the point of grafting unless you want endless suckers.
Otherwise, you must allow for the surrounding soil to settle if you are to
persuade the upper tangle of roots to leave their nursery home. The more I
see newly-planted borders, the more I realise how people do not realise this
fact.
It is not only important to plant deeply: it is absolutely vital that you
give a plant enough width. There are two great popular fallacies about
roots. One is that they somehow eat the surrounding soil and its goodness.
Of course they do nothing of the sort. They are enabled to take up goodness
from it by moisture: they are incorrigible drinkers, not eaters.
The second fallacy is that roots move around. Again, they mostly do no such
thing. Existing roots stay exactly where you have finally planted them, or
squashed them without noticing while treading on the soil as you fill up the
hole. They then grow outwards, if you are lucky, from the tangled position
in which you have left them.
Once you understand these two fallacies you can see the importance of my
advice. Watering allows your plant to pick up goodness: I totally mistrust
scientists who tell us in the early stages of a drought that there is no
need to water anything. The advice emphatically does not apply to
newly-bought and planted goods.
As roots cannot move, you must be sure to space them out and tease them to a
full, straight length when setting them first into the ground. If they are
hideously tangled and impacted at the bottom of a pot, loosen them by
pulling them gently sideways and not fussing too much if some are torn in
the process. You have to break the circle if they are not to go round and
round on themselves.
Finally, watch out for plants which are all top-growth and no bottom, let
alone a tangled ball of roots. They will be appearing by the hundred in
garden centres during the next month because plants in a one-litre size look
much more promising and fetch a higher price than smaller versions in 9 cm
squares of polythene.
The trouble is that many of the apparent litre-sized varieties were only
nine centimetre plants a week or two ago. They have been over-potted,
frequently in the sort of non-compost which persuades half-hearted gardeners
that there is absolutely no chance of meeting anything so undesirable as a
worm. Investigate gently below the surface to be sure that your chosen plant
is well rooted and is not still rolling around in a bed which is too big for
it.
The litre size will cost you up to half as much again, so you want to be
sure that the extra value is there. If it is, I like to calculate that I can
divide one of these bigger plants into three or four smaller ones, shake off
the useless compost and grow them on in my own soil in a special corner
until next autumn. This practice gives you several plants for the price of
one and allows you to break them gently into local conditions.
At this late stage, if you want an instant border, sow hardy annuals or buy
some of the more bearable varieties of dahlia - which really do exist. Do
not believe that you will make it in three months from a mass of
container-grown purchases, brought back from a display unit in a burst of
post-electoral confidence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11385</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Gardening: A garden to visit - A Sussex woodland paradise /
Arthur Hellyer is entranced by a visit to an English valley
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LEONARDSLEE is one of the most beautiful woodland gardens in England. It was
laid out by Sir Edmund Loder after he bought the estate in 1889 and has been
continued by his heirs, right down to Robin Loder who took over in December
1981.
The garden is at Lower Beeding, near Horsham in West Sussex, and covers 200
acres of a steep-sided valley running north to south with a string of hammer
ponds in the bottom. It is about the finest site you could imagine for a
woodland garden, since the soil is moderately acid and each side of the
valley gets an equal amount of sunlight. There are two houses, both at the
top of the valley on the west side. They are more or less in the middle of
the garden and have magnificent views over it.
Leonardslee is particularly famous for its rhododendrons (many raised
there), azaleas, camellias, magnolias and coniferous trees. But it grows an
immense variety of trees and shrubs, including hardy palms which were
planted by a previous owner. Nearly everything flourished and the garden has
sometimes been used for filming stories requiring a sub-tropical setting.
But this very luxuriance threatened to destroy it, and Loder says it was
saved by the great gale of October 1987.
Loder estimates that a garden like Leonardslee needs to have at least 300
trees removed each year after a half-century of growth. But that was never
attempted there; in any case, there was also the problem of getting felling
permission for supposedly valuable trees. As a result, the garden became
choked. The outer areas were abandoned as being too dense and the original
200 acres was whittled down to 100.
Matters probably would have continued like this had it not been for the
gale. It toppled thousands of trees and, in order to get them out, many more
were removed. The clearance is now completed, replanting (where necessary)
is well under way, and Leonardslee is a transformed place.
Most of the plants are responding by growing and flowering more freely than
before. It is, of course, the extra light and the reduced competition for
water and food that have made the difference, and there are lessons in this
for every gardener. Naturally, there are immediate problems of daily
maintenance, since there is a greater growth of grass plus brambles and
other weeds. But Leonardslee has the answers - wallabies and deer.
Wallabies were introduced more than 100 years ago and are naturalised
completely. They are particularly fond of brambles. The deer used to be kept
out of Leonardslee by its fences; but when these had to be replaced after
the great gale, it was decided to change policy and bring in herds of sika
and fallow deer to help the wallabies in controlling grass and weeds.
The results have been highly successful and the cost savings significant. In
addition, the animals are proving a great attraction to the 50,000 people
who visit Leonardslee each year.
But there is plenty of new planting to attract them, too, including
rhododendrons. Many of these are yakushimanum hybrids, which are dwarf and
of particular interest to owners of small gardens. And there is a new bank
of hydrangeas which flower in the summer and will link up with the autumn
foliage for which Leonardslee is famous.
A year ago, Loder persuaded the Sussex Bonsai Group to bring a large
demonstration of its art to Leonardslee on permanent loan, and this is now
installed near the restaurant and cafeteria. Nearby, a big greenhouse has
been turned into an alpine house containing rock plants arranged in their
natural families. There are also a new visitors' centre and gift shop.
For the first time, Leonardslee is to be open continuously from April until
October 31. In April and June, the hours are 10-6 daily; in May, 10-8 daily.
From July to October, the garden is open 2-6 Monday to Friday, and 10-6
Saturday and Sunday. There is to be a special demonstration of bonsai on May
9 and 10.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11386</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Perspectives: British papers - the best and the worst / The
press in Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A COLLEAGUE said the other day: 'I suppose you are an expert now.'
'An expert on what?'
'On European papers. You've been writing about them for over a year - you
must have read hundreds.'
It turns out to be 37; at least, that is the number of titles which have
appeared in London. They have come from a dozen countries, but there has
been nothing from most of Scandinavia, Portugal, Greece, Bulgaria and
Romania, so my expertise is a little sketchy. And not all the 37 have been
'read,' either.
Still, a year and a bit of this column has certainly taught me a thing or
two. For one thing, when it comes to newspapers, Britain is astonishingly
rich compared with the standards of the rest of Europe.
It is not just that the British read more of them than anybody else; their
papers have resources that others can only envy (and regret the manner in
which, sometimes, these resources are used]) The biggest French daily,
L'Ouest Republicain, sells only about 1m, and no foreigner has ever heard of
it. It seems to be published in Rennes (which is a bit like publishing The
Sun in Market Harborough) and has a dozen different editions, each replete
with local fatstock prices.
In Spain, about one in eight of the population reads a paper. In Germany,
most read the tiny local dailies which lay down the law for communities of
50,000 or so. At one time, Russian papers enjoyed vast power and influence;
now, the former Communist Party mouthpiece Pravda is reduced to three
appearances a week and can hardly afford that.
Each paper is unique, though. If you want to be well-informed on every issue
under the sun (and elsewhere, for that matter), the Neue Zurcher Zeitung is
good value. It might not provide the news of the day that interests you - or
anything that interests you at all  - but by the end of a month's reading
you will have caught up with everything.
The papers I like, however, are those which are often reviled in their own
countries. Die Welt has been loathed by liberals and the left in Germany
because it is the flagship of the right-wing Springer press, but it is a
good read.
This might be a purely subjective judgment; Welt looks and feels like a
British paper - which it was when it started life under the occupation
authorities. It seems, however, to do something quite alien to much of the
German press: it produces well-written, concise articles which the readers
find interesting. That, in the Frankfurter Allgemeine, would not be as bad
as making a joke, but it would seem like lese-majesty.
The French papers always seem a bit of a mess, even though Liberation,
neatly, has pages the same size as its articles. But the result is that I
can never find my way around Libe and a certain monotony sets in.
The front page of France-Soir is so awful that it is good. There are always
about 18 stories, all continued on page four or 16. The other day, the
strapline over the headline ran: 'Tell me what you are afraid of and I'll
tell you where you live.' The headline: 'The crime map of France.'
But then, British papers are a mess to foreigners. Patrick de Jacquelot, of
Les Echos, once asked me why the Financial Times would have a story about
Robert Maxwell as its lead, a backgrounder on page three, an editorial 13
pages later, a feature opposite and, finally, a commentary by Lex or someone
at the back. In a French or Italian paper, the whole lot would have been on
a single page.
One daily which has impressed me is El Pais, again disdained by Spanish
intellectuals. It is a bit like its French sister, Liberation, in pagination
and layout, but it contains more interesting material and really does cover
the ground. The nearest British parallel is the Guardian.
Pais, though, has one feature that would cause a riot in Hampstead, not to
mention uproar in every teachers' common room and social services office in
Britain if the Guardian tried such a thing. Each day, the classified
advertisements carry two or three columns of what are known in the trade as
'hooker ads.'
Prostitutes of both sexes give a concise account of their wares, delivery
points, and a phone number. The Germans get near this in their weekend
editions, but the Spanish are still reacting against the suffocation of the
Franco years.
The Italians seem to react against nothing. Their papers have a world-weary
feel, produced by people who know that nothing can surprise their readers.
In an attempt to excite the jaded palates of its readers, La Reppublica will
add a desperate twist to stories which are amazing in their own right, but
it never comes off.
Of course, it could be just be what you know best, but I still prefer
British papers. On holiday abroad, there is no choice between Le Dauphine
Libere and a day-old Daily Telegraph. The 'quality' press in the UK is
unrivalled.
On the other hand, as a Spanish friend once remarked to me: 'The best and
the worst of Europe are to be found in Britain.'
James Morgan is economics correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11387</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Perspecitves: Japan fails to face its shame - Tokyo's
dilemma over forced prostitution
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GORDON BREWER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN THE days of Stalinism, the Russians had a saying: 'The trouble with the
past is that you never know what you'll find in it.' Now that both Stalin
and his Soviet Union have gone, perhaps the phrase should be bequeathed to
the Japanese.
Shim Mi Ja's visit to Tokyo last month was a traumatic experience - for her,
and for those who heard her testimony. Now 70 and living just outside Seoul,
she was one of between 80,000 and 200,000 young Korean women forced to be
prostitutes for the Japanese imperial army in the 1930s and '40s. Speaking
in Japan's parliament building, she told Japanese women (many of whose
fathers or grandfathers were in the army) of how she was forced to serve in
a 'comfort station' - or military brothel - in Fukuoka, southern Japan.
From childhood, her hobby was embroidery. One day at secondary school, she
was asked to make a Japanese cherry blossom; instead, she made a Korean
flower. It was seen by the Japanese military police. She was taken away,
raped, tortured - she still has the scars on her back and beneath her
fingernails - and sent to Japan. 'We dealt with 20 or 30 men a day,' she
said. 'But, when truckloads of troops stormed in from the front, then you'd
have 40 or 50 men each. I was a young girl dealing with 40 or 50 men in one
day - can you imagine that? On weekends, there would be long queues in the
yard outside. It was a mechanical job; you couldn't get up or wash. Just one
man after another, endlessly.'
Faced with the testimony of Shim Mi Ja - and that of a growing number of
other former 'comfort women,' prodded by Christian and women's groups to
speak out for the first time in almost 50 years - the Japanese government
launched an official investigation. It claimed, however, that the comfort
stations were run privately and that it had no legal or moral
responsibility.
That argument was disproved spectacularly in January when Yoshiaki Yoshimi,
a professor of history at Chuo university, spent eight hours in the Defence
Academy library in Tokyo. He found six documents which showed that the army
and the government both were involved in setting up comfort stations for
soldiers on the Chinese front late in the 1930s.
Two of the documents record an order from the commander-in-chief of the
North China expeditionary army in 1938. It told units to set up brothels as
quickly as possible because rape by Japanese soldiers was making it
difficult to control the local population. Other documents talk of
procedures for checking the women for venereal disease, and fears that
contaminated soldiers returning home would spread VD.
A few days after Yoshimi's documents were published, foreign minister Michio
Watanabe said he 'could not help but admit' that the imperial army was
involved. Prime minister Kiichi Miyazawa, about to start a state visit to
Seoul when the story broke, spent much of his time there apologising. But
the government has yet to provide any explanation of why its official
investigation failed to uncover documents which Yoshimi found within hours.
Yoshimi says: 'Some of them are hard to find, but most are catalogued and
can be found easily. There is no way Japanese historians wouldn't know about
them. They didn't want to investigate it.'
The issue of the comfort women has brought to the forefront, painfully, the
way in which the Japanese authorities have resisted coming to terms with
their colonisation of Asia in the first half of this century. In Germany,
the fall of Hitler was followed by attempts to teach the younger generation
the lessons of history, and to compensate victims of the Nazis. In Japan,
there has been silence. Allied tribunals tried many individual soldiers for
atrocities after the war, but the Japanese government has not pursued cases
since.
Occasionally, the resentment of Japan's neighbours has surfaced in public.
Ten years ago, there was a row with China and South Korea over the history
textbooks used in Japanese schools. These either fail to mention the
atrocities committed by the imperial army in Asia, or treat them in the most
cursory way. The books all are vetted by Japan's education ministry.
Angry protests by the South Korean government in 1990 elicited an apology
from the new emperor, Akihito; he referred to the 'unfortunate past between
our two countries and for which my country was responsible.' His father,
Hirohito, had simply regretted 'the unfortunate past.' The addition of the
seven extra words was thought by Japan to be an enormous concession.
The reluctance of the Tokyo government to acknowledge the past has left
resentment and distrust among most of the occupied countries. Lee Kuan Yew,
Singapore's former prime minister, declared: 'If they are not willing to
confront the past and educate their children on what happened, instead of
sloughing it off as an 'advance into south-east Asia,' it means that a
younger generation of Japanese would be less reluctant, if pushed, to take
the military road.'
Hajime Funada, an MP of the ruling Liberal Democratic party who heads a
group studying reform of Japan's post-war (and pacifist) constitution, adds:
'We can't carry on like this. It's creating too many problems we will have
to face sooner or later.' He fears that, without a rethink, 'Japan will end
up as a special case, left out of world concerns.'
The anxieties of other Asian countries are likely to become increasingly
prominent as Tokyo struggles to find a political role to match its status as
the world's second-largest economy. Adding largely to the problems is the
continuing debate over whether Japan should have a military role outside its
borders - something banned at present by the constitution. In the wake of
the Gulf war, the government has been trying - so far, unsuccessfully  - to
pass a bill allowing the military to take part in United Nations'
peace-keeping operations.
This is unlikely to banish the deep-seated fear of Japan's neighbours about
its possible re-militarisation, or a related concern that the institutions
of democracy there may not be strong enough to enable Japan to behave - as
Funada would wish  - in a 'normal' way. As its power grows, coming to terms
with the past is becoming more necessary in order to come to terms with the
future.
Gordon Brewer is the BBC Tokyo Correspondent. His report will be broadcast
at 9.30 pm on BBC2 on April 26 in Assignment.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11388</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Property: Still waiting for their ship to come in - London's
Docklands, an area with a blighted past and an uncertain future
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DURING ten roller-coaster years, the London Docklands has been remoulded
into one of the most exhilarating, bewildering and exasperating landscapes
in Britain.
For the purists, hype gave way to hostility long ago. 'London's Docklands
contains one of the worst collections of late 20th century building to be
seen anywhere in the world,' said the Architecture Design and Technology
Press. 'The triumph of commercial expediency over civic values,' concluded
the Prince of Wales.
But anybody tired of the sullen ranks of suburban terraces elsewhere in
London could be swayed by the Dockland's proximity to the heart of the
capital, its energy and the appeal of being a pioneer in an area where urban
history is still being made.
A surreal 'city of the 21st century' has been superimposed on an area that
still has Dickensian streets, 18th century churches and faint echoes of its
raffish maritime past.
The fit is not wholly successful: the toy-like light railway that glides by
the rooftops is notoriously unreliable; the flimsy balconies and steeply
pitched roofs of new developments resemble those of dolls' houses; and the
towering Canary Wharf looks like a fairy-tale castle deposited in the middle
of nowhere.
The most popular developments in the Docklands are those that successfully
combine the old and the new. The dream of most would-be buyers in the
Docklands is a converted warehouse, complete with mellow brown brick, beams,
huge rooms, high ceilings and views of the Thames.
A three-bedroom flat with these attributes in New Crane Wharf in Wapping
would cost Pounds 325,000. Flats in Butlers Wharf, a scheme originally
devised by Sir Terence Conran, a short walk from the City, are more
expensive. A three bedroom flat with a magnificent view on to Tower Bridge
costs Pounds 450,000. (Savills are the agent for both these developments.)
Not all warehouse conversions live up to the fantasy image, though. Some
have insufficient light, no balconies and do not face the river. The
position of the windows means that even the best river views are often
obscured when sitting.
Newly-built developments can be as popular, and expensive, as converted
warehouses. Knight Frank &amp; Rutley is marketing two bedroom flats in the St
Hilda's development overlooking the river in Wapping High Street for Pounds
300,000.
Whatever the charms of these buildings, potential buyers have to consider
the disadvantages of moving to an area that has undergone such a dramatic
upheaval. As well as some friction between long-standing inhabitants and
wealthy newcomers, there are reminders that the new developments have been
grafted on to an area noted for dereliction and poverty.
For instance, some flats in the ziggurat built by Regalian at Free Trade
Wharf, which cost up to Pounds 265,000 for two-bedrooms) offer a
breathtaking view of the river at its steepest point in the bend at the
front, but a view of run-down housing over the bustling four-lane highway to
the back.
The practical problems that have dogged Dockland pioneers are starting to
ease. More shops are slowly arriving, most notably a Safeway supermarket
opening later this year in Wapping. The traffic problems will be greatly
improved when the current batch of extensive roadworks is completed.
Indeed, many Docklands dwellers say the area's attraction is a practical
one. Compared to the travails of commuting from the country, a short drive
into the City has great appeal for bankers and brokers. 'British Rail has
made more sales for us than anybody else,' says one saleswoman.
Is now the time to buy? After a difficult few years, agents have a spring in
their step. 'For three months before the election, people were holding
back,' says Sarah Shelley of Knight Frank &amp; Rutley. Since the election, she
has been innundated with enquiries, she says.
'I firmly believe that now we have a Tory government we have hit the
bottom,' says Russell Taylor of Savills. He predicts that prices will stay
level for the next 12 months.
Prices have fallen 30-40 per cent from their peak, according to Taylor. Even
now, however, valuers working for building societies maintain that buildings
are often overpriced.
Some developers are prepared to offer large discounts for rapid sales. But
others are determined not to be pushed into offering firesale prices. The
receivers who manage Butlers Wharf are taking a long term view, preferring
to let flats rather than sell them at bargain prices.
Anyone buying a property in the hope of making a rapid capital gain should
also consider the possibility that the buildings bought by people hoping for
a speculative gain may be released as the market recovers.
Any assessment of the state of the market has to grapple with the diverse
character of different parts of the Docklands. As the most established part
of the market, Wapping's property tends to be more expensive than the Isle
of Dogs, where prices for one-bedroom flats startt Pounds 55,000. Surrey
Quays, which offers four bedroom houses at Pounds 90,000, is dismissed as a
suburban housing estate by agents working north of the river.
The biggest question mark hangs over the Isle of Dogs, which is dominated by
the huge Canary Wharf development. This has an uncertain future. Its
developer Olympia &amp; York has run into financial difficulties. The company is
in talks with its bankers, which will determine whether it can carry on with
the project.
The stakes are high, and there are large implications for the residential
market. The establishment of a financial centre on the Isle of Dogs was
expected to boost demand for housing enormously. The doubts over the area's
commercial prospects have punctured these hopes.
Another, related problem is the future of the extension of the Jubilee line,
which is to link Canary Wharf with Central London by 1996. This tube link,
which would boost house prices, could be in jeopardy because O &amp; Y is
scheduled to make a large contribution to the project.
Agents say these doubts are not deterring people who are already working at
Canary Wharf from buying property close to their employment. Although the
area has a rather desolate, clinical atmosphere, there are attractive
properties available.
Consider, for instance, Rosehaugh's Anchorage Point next to the brash,
nautical Cascades development, which became an early landmark on the island.
This new block of flats, which has a swimming pool and gymnasium, charges
Pounds 130,000 for a two-bedroom flat. (The agent is Savills).
Canary Wharf's problems are further evidence that the establishment of the
Docklands as a thriving commercial centre will take longer than was expected
in the heady days of the property boom. That suggests that people buying
property in the hope of a speculative gain may have to wait longer than they
bargained for.
People should only step into the Docklands market if they like the area's
character and its proximity to the City. Anyone less sure could try it out
by making use of the area's well-established letting market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11389</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Sport: Champions face a fierce challenge - Cricket
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TERESA MCLEAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT GOES without saying that the first day of a new cricket season is played
in cold, wet weather. This year the traditional hostility of the elements
excelled itself, to the point of hail-storms and gale-force winds last week
on the few first-class grounds where play was possible at all. The handful
of fans who turned out in the hope of seeing some cricket and the restless,
track-suited cricketers hoping to oblige them sat in the pavilions agreeing
that this year must be better than last.
Essex, of course, would be happy for this year to be the same as last year.
The Britannic Assurance Championship was fiercely contested and Essex's
confidence was as important as their range of talent through all areas of
the game, holding them secure against strong pressure from Warwickshire and
latterly from the ever unpredictable Derbyshire, who reached top form in
dazzling style, too late.
Essex have lost none of that confidence, and welcome Mark Waugh back from
Australian national batting service to his county batting slot, profitably
occupied last year by Salim Malik. But they are an odd team, Essex, with an
unpredictable element about them, which led them into disaster in the
one-day games while they were doing so well in the county championship.
It was quite an achievement to get themselves all out to Lancashire for 61
last Tuesday in the Benson and Hedges Cup. But that is what Essex are like.
If they fail, they fail pathetically. If they do well, they do very well
indeed - witness the eight Lancashiremen Neil Foster removed at Manchester
for 99 runs last year.
One of Essex's most impressive features was good captaincy, by Graham Gooch
and by Foster when Gooch was on Test duty. Foster showed enterprise and both
were good ambassadors for age and experience in a game increasingly
dominated by concern for youth and fitness.
The newcomers, Durham, are keenly recruiting young players. They boast a
fair number of local youths already, tempered with the battle-wisdom of
outsiders Wayne Larkins, Paul Parker and Ian Botham, along with their
overseas import, Dean Jones.
Jones began the season in belligerent form on Easter Sunday, his 114
dominating the day's play as Durham's 246 for 4 proved just enough to open
the Sunday League with a win over Lancashire. The main force behind Jones's
batting is its aggression and David Graveney will have his work cut out
keeping that focussed on the enemy without. Though Durham bring with them a
breath of fresh air, they also bring a lot more travelling, one of the most
unpopular aspects of modern cricket.
Lancashire found it so tiresome that they started hiring a coach to take
them to all their fixtures, so they could rest and talk on the way. Last
season Glamorgan, not to be outdone, chartered an aeroplane to fly to one of
their home games.
This season's championship, grossly over-punctuated by one-day games,
promises to be tight. Lancashire are keeping Neil Fairbrother as captain.
His leadership will have to pull the team together for they are a
temperamental lot. They were too inconsistent to do themselves justice last
year. With Mike Atherton injured, they missed his spin bowling as well as
his batting.
Atherton is one of a tradition of English batsmen, useful for tweaking out
entrenched Test batsmen and it was good to see him loosening his arm at
Chelmsford last week with his spinners and drifters. A generation earlier, I
remember the cavalier Bob Barber and dogged Ken Barrington breaking up
partnerships when brought on to bowl for short stretches.
After two years at the bottom, Sussex rocketed to 11th last year and if I
had to pick an outsider to do well in the championship this year, it would
be Sussex. I respect their policy of recruiting and training young
home-grown players. It is time that bore full fruit.
The sad departure of Parker to Durham, when asked by Sussex's committee to
give up the captaincy after four unsuccessful seasons in office and 17 happy
and successful seasons at the club, made way for Alan Wells, 'Bomber' of
Newhaven and brother of Colin Wells, another 'Bomber' of Newhaven, to become
only the fourth Sussex captain since World War II born in Sussex. Newhaven,
in fact.
He is a man with a proud sense of county identity and if he can pass that on
to the team and lead it happily, it might do well. For some time it has had
to be a sharp fielding side, to keep enemy batsmen's excesses within limits,
and it even boasts that most welcome of rarities: a young leg-spinner, Ian
Salisbury, just back from a good England 'A' tour to the Caribbean. I look
forward to watching him bowl this summer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11390</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Motoring: Ford passes the bed test
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIX YEARS after Ford inexplicably dropped a big load carrier from its range,
a Granada/Scorpio estate car has made a welcome appearance.
It is a handsome car, spacious enough to pass the acid test of a really big
estate; you can put a single bed inside it. It will look just as much at
home at a Range Rover and Shogun infested three-day event or point-to-point
as in the managing director's reserved parking bay.
There are versions with 2-litre, 4-cylinder, 120 horsepower or 2.9-litre, V6
145 horsepower engines, both with catalytic converters. They are priced only
marginally higher than their 4-door saloon or 5-door hatchback equivalents.
The spread is from Pounds 18,413 for a 2.0-litre Granada LX manual estate to
Pounds 21,760 for a V6 2.9-litre Scorpio. This flagship of Ford's estate
cars is trimmed in leather and has automatic transmission, air conditioning
and self-levelling rear suspension as standard. All Granada/Scorpio models
come with ABS brakes. The V6 Scorpio I drove in Scotland earlier this month
is far cheaper than any rival equipped to the same standard. But, price
apart, Ford's new bulk carrier is an exceptionally attractive car.
It rides with shock absorbent suppleness on its redesigned suspension
whether running light or well laden. The steering wheel is small and power
assistance is now speed sensitive.
On winding roads the Scorpio has a much smaller car's nimbleness; on
motorways it loafs along in that state of relaxed near silence peculiar to
big, long-legged cars.
The overall gearing gives close to 30 mph (48kph) at only 1,000 rpm and the
Scorpio feels as if it would cruise all day long on the autobahn at 100 mph
(161 kph) and a shade over 3,000 rpm.
The sensibly proportioned 65 series tyres create little road noise on coarse
surfaces.
A Granada/Scorpio's interior space should be enough for most users; there is
ample room for up to five people and a lot of luggage. But compulsive
furniture shifters might like to know that loads of up to 100 kg (220 lbs)
can be carried on the integral roof rack or even on the roof panel itself,
which has rubber strips to protect the paint. To frustrate car thieves and
'joy riders' - there must be a better name for these criminals - Ford has
installed elaborate security systems in the new Granadas and Scorpios.
Electrical and mechanical deadlocks prevent window smashers from opening the
doors; interior sensing scanners detect an intruder and will not allow the
engine to be started.
Of course, nothing in this world is entirely thief proof. But the new cars
are said to have defeated a former professional car thief who, like a
poacher turned gamekeeper, is retained by Ford as a security consultant.
All Granada and Scorpio models now have the same improved running gear as
the estate cars.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11391</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Sport: The rotten truth behind the five-ring circus
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   THERE ARE two ways of looking at the Olympic Games
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
or 20, or 200. But let us stick to two, lest madness overtakes us.
The first way is to accept the propaganda peddled by the International
Olympic Committee (IOC) in Lausanne and imagine, just for a moment, that the
Olympics really are about youth, sport, peace, brotherhood and moral uplift.
The IOC - 90-odd members drawn randomly from 75 countries - are the people
who actually own the Olympics.
Their president and pontiff, Spain's Juan Antonio Samaranch, is the
undisputed king of world sport. In Samaranch's view, the Olympics are the
world's 'most important contemporary social movement', and his beloved IOC
'the world's leading authority on competitive sport.'
The second way to view the Olympics is the one that has gained ground since
the tawdry and cut-price Games of 1984, in Los Angeles, which, to most
folks' surprise, were run at a profit. According to this viewpoint, the
Olympics are hopelessly bloated and cynical. They have been besmirched by
drugs, corrupted by commercialism, over-run by greed and hi-jacked by a
secretive and powerful cabal, led by Samaranch, which is known as The Club.
Between them, members of The Club run world sport. The Club comprises
Samaranch and his IOC members, plus the presidents of the international
federations that control the 25 Olympic sports, pre-eminently Primo Nebiolo
of athletics, the key Olympic sport, and Dr Joao Havelange of soccer, the
world's most popular sport.
In the view of many, the Olympic Games are now a great and raging beast
virtually out of control. In the view of some, the Games' most insidious
role is to serve as marketing vehicle for some of the pagan gods of
international commerce - Coca-Cola, Kodak, Brother, National Panasonic,
Ricoh, Philips, Time, Mars, Bausch &amp; Lomb, Visa, what have you. In the view
of a few, the stench of commercialism that overhangs the Games is so strong
that Samaranch and his IOC must be lanced, like a boil on the face of sport,
if the Olympic movement is to survive and renew itself.
So which view of the Olympics - sport, youth and joy, or power, money and
drugs - is closest to the truth?
The parlousness and precariousness of the Olympics under Samaranch are about
to receive cruel exposure in a book, The Lords Of The Rings, by Vyv Simson
and Andrew Jennings of Granada TV's World In Action team, which Simon &amp;
Schuster is publishing, in 11 languages, on Monday.
To show the mess in which Samaranch finds himself, one cannot do better than
quote Simon &amp; Schuster itself.
'Traditionally', it says, 'Olympic year sees a torrent of glossy books,
articles and TV films about the beauty and purity of the Olympic ideal. In
passing, they refer to the Lausanne-based International Olympic Committee
and its benign president, Juan Antonio Samaranch. The Lords Of The Rings
explodes the carefully cultivated myths of the IOC. The authors reveal:
' The secret past of Juan Antonio Samaranch, today's guardian of the Olympic
ideal. For nearly 40 years Samaranch was an active fascist, becoming sports
minister under the Spanish dictator General Francisco Franco. Samaranch
signed official correspondence with the greeting 'I salute you with my arm
raised.'
' How under Samaranch the Olympic movement appears to have taken on many
characteristics of the dictator Franco's fascist Movimiento. Samaranch is
now the unchallenged dictator of the Olympic world.
' How Samaranch won his place at the head of the Olympic movement with the
help of the boss of the world's biggest sportswear manufacturer (Horst
Dassler of Adidas, who died five years ago). Three years later his friend
was granted the Dollars 200m Olympic marketing contract.
' How The Club lives a fabulous lifestyle of five-star hotels, first-class
air tickets, endless presents and hospitality at the expense of sport and
cities who want to stage the Games.
' How some IOC members demand even more - and the rackets and graft that is
covered up.
' How the organisers of bids to win the Olympics, desperate to see their
cities succeed, stay silent about the attempts to shake them down for money
in case they alienate IOC members. Who gets the Games is decided by just the
94 members of the IOC. They are answerable to nobody . . . Bidding cities
spend around Dollars 40m to woo them.
' How, under Samaranch, the IOC has turned from a non-commercial
organisation led by worthy part-timers who defended the ethics of amateur
sport into a professional, full-time business enterprise.
' How Dollars 20m of sponsors' money has ended up in an off-shore bank
account controlled by just one man.
' How a leading member of Kuwait's royal family bribed sports officials to
keep Israel out of world sport while the Olympic leadership turned a blind
eye.
' How the Olympic leadership has spoken out against doping - but done little
 -and how it has covered up the failure of its anti-drug measures. Drug
scandals have been suppressed in order not to frighten off the sponsors.'
So much for Simon &amp; Schuster. What about the book? The most useful task the
authors have performed is to have gathered all the Olympic dirt they could
find and stack it in one great pile, where it is accessible.
They are good on Samaranch, fast-winding us forward to the opening ceremony
of the Barcelona Games this summer as the IOC president steps forward to
invite King Juan Carlos to declare open the Games of the 25th Olympiad.
'Watch the president's right arm', they say, 'is it stirring, is it
twitching, is it taking on a life of its own, compelled by some visceral
force to rise to an angle of 45 degrees from his shoulder? . . . (Samaranch)
rose to become a fascist parliamentarian, a fascist member of the Barcelona
city council, fascist president of the Catalan regional council and, for a
while, fascist sports minister. In his own words, Samaranch was '100 per
cent Francoist'.'
Simson and Jennings are good on the machinations of The Club and the IOC.
They are good on Dassler of Adidas, and how he developed The Club. In the
view of Patrick Nally, Dassler's former business partner and right-hand man:
'Horst became the puppet-master of the sporting world, pulling the strings
to create massive changes, the pinnacle of which is his legacy of control of
the modern Olympic Games. Horst got a tremendous buzz from controlling and
manipulating.'
They are good on the Eastern bloc and its rump of discredited IOC members
who still have power and influence.
They are good on the backstage dramas at the Seoul Olympics in 1988, and how
the Seoul Games were 'conceived from a desire by a military junta to obscure
their brutal image and to find new markets for their dynamic economy.'
They are good on drugs. Good on cheating. Good on scandal. And good on the
racketeering that underpins the selection of cities to stage the Games - the
gifts and free-loading, and the escalating sums spent by candidate cities to
climb aboard the wagon.
The authors of The Lords Of The Rings are even good in many of their
conclusions, and especially good when indicting Samaranch and Nebiolo.
'There seems to be little philosophical difference in their approach to
stage-managing our world of sport', the authors state. 'They have hoisted
themselves above their fellow officials to levels of absolute power
previously unknown in the democratic world of sport. All that divides them
is who should wield absolute control.
'They come together in this Olympic year in Barcelona at what may be the
turning point for the Olympic movement and for world sport. Many people
outside the complacent membership of The Club feel that too much has been
conceded to the demands of the media and the multi-nationals. The spectators
and the participants have never been consulted about 'communication tools'
and 'exclusive categories' of product merchandising. The TV viewers around
the world increasingly believe that many of the stars are junkies, puffed up
into chemical champions. In the scramble for more money, more perks, more
self-indulgence, more TV viewing hours and more dubious world records the
fundamental rights and concerns of the worldwide, silent majority outside
The Club are ignored.'
But there are various defects in the arguments advanced by those who claim
to be sickened by the Olympics in their modern, corporatist guise  - one of
which is the inability to juggle with opposites and contradictions.
For a start, almost no critic of the Olympics seems capable of wrestling
with the inevitability of money, drugs and commercialism. Sport was always
bound to grow into a billion-dollar business. Yet most of the time, secure
in their naivety (or the pose of naivety - a standard sportswriters' trick),
critics of the Olympics speak as though television could be uninvented,
sponsorship could be uninvented, Coca-Cola could be uninvented, cheating
could be uninvented, steroids could be uninvented, professionalism could be
uninvented - as though all the world, and all of sport, could have been kept
pristine and savoury and goodie-goodie, free of corruption, clear of the
Fall.
I have attended four summer Olympics, Mexico, Montreal, Los Angeles, Seoul.
I will not be going again, not because the Olympics remotely offend me but
because there are other things to write about, other fish to fry.
Certainly the Olympics have grown big and cumbersome. Certainly they have
become part of the global marketing-media-entertainment complex. Certainly
they are a magnet for those who want to sell sticky beverages or copiers or
contact lenses. Certainly some competitors pop pills and shoot up in a sad
and desperate lunge for records, medals, millions.
But the Olympics are still about sport, still about friendship, still about
bridge-building. They still do good, even while doing bad. Forget about the
silly ideals with which the Olympics are alleged to be concerned, the
namby-pambyism of Baron Pierre de Coubertin, who revived the Olympics a
century ago - amateurism, valour, the importance of taking part, all that
stuff and baggage. They are nothing of the sort. The Olympics are about
winning. It is as simple, and as complex, as that.
In the meantime, however, it looks increasingly the case that the IOC in
Lausanne has slipped as far down the slope as it ought to think of
venturing. The IOC needs fresh leadership, a determined change of direction.
It is time to purge the pontiff.
The Lords Of The Rings, Simon &amp; Schuster, Pounds 14.99.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11392</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Motoring: Banning bangers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LIFE WILL become tougher for motorists who drive cars unfit to be on the
road when a proposal by the Department of Transport comes into effect later
this year.
At the moment, so long as a car three or more years old passes its annual
inspection (the MoT test), it can be taxed, insured and driven for another
12 months.
What if it deteriorates and becomes unsafe during that period? In theory it
should be repaired. In practice, many old cars in poor shape continue to be
driven while they remain driveable. The police will prosecute if the car is
involved in an accident or if the driver is stopped for a traffic offence
and they find it has, say, illegally worn tyres or bad brakes.
But, rightly or wrongly, many owners of decrepit old cars think a current
MoT certificate is a permit to keep on driving them until the next MoT
inspection falls due. If they break down, they call one of the
long-suffering rescue services - the subscription is seen as a financially
attractive alternative to having the car properly maintained.
The department is planning to treat cars in the same way as heavy commercial
vehicles. If one of its examiners at a roadside checkpoint finds a lorry in
bad enough condition to be a danger to other road users, the driver is
handed a prohibition notice.
That means it has to be repaired on the spot or towed away by a recovery
vehicle. Now the department proposes to treat cars and lorries alike. An old
banger held to be dangerous will be banned immediately and have to be taken
to a repair garage on a trailer. In less serious cases, the owner will be
allowed to drive it to a garage.
The prohibition notice stays in force until the car has been made
roadworthy, given an MoT test and the owner has taken the certificate to a
police station.
The proposal is going through the usual consultative process on how it can
be implemented. When it becomes law on July 1, it will help road safety. As
a spin-off, roadside spot checks should catch a lot of irresponsible
motorists who reckon the rules about taxing and insuring cars only apply to
other people.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11393</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Special Report on Language Courses: A beginner's guide to
Japanese - The problems of learning one of the 'difficult' languages
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARILYN BENTLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPE'S conception of Japan is changing: from 'difficult' market to that of
important trading opportunity. Japan's former protectionism has shifted to
an equally vigorous internationalism, and there is increasing scope for more
complex commercial relationships, strategic partnerships and technological
exchange.
In the spring of 1991, the UK's Department of Trade and Industry, together
with a committee of leading industrialists, launched Priority Japan, a
consciousness-raising exercise with specific economic goals: to assist an
increase to Pounds 5bn in annual sales to Japan in three years, and to
narrow the balance of trade.
As commercial links between Britain and Japan increase, so does the demand
for Japanese language as a working tool. Learning Japanese indicates a
serious commitment to doing business in that country.
Many of the most imaginative business language training initiatives in the
UK are coming from the public sector. A DTI pump-priming fund of Pounds 1.6m
over four years, to be matched by private funding, was established in 1989,
to support business-oriented intensive language courses which include a
substantial period of study in Japan. (See box)
The courses are intended for high flyers; graduates and/or people with
several years' business experience. The University of London's School of
Oriental and African Studies (SOAS) offers a one-year programme combining
intensive language study with a survey of the contemporary Japanese economy.
'Business in Practice' brings participants together in seminars led by
people from sectors such as pharmaceuticals, energy, electronics and
finance, who are working at a senior level in companies doing business with
Japan. The fourth component of the course is a three-month work placement in
Japan, giving practical insight into how business functions.
The Scottish Centre for Japanese Studies at Stirling University runs a
similarly intensive year-long programme, including three months' study at
the Graduate School of Policy Science at Saitama University, with a further
optional three months' work placement in Japan. The Centre utilises some
imaginative computer software, designed for the course by Richard Harrison,
to reinforce tuition and assist individual study.
The structure of Japanese is simpler than many European languages, and it is
not necessary to be skilled in script in the early stages in order to speak
and understand. Most native English speakers find Japanese easier to
pronounce than, say, French.
A more serious difficulty is to master the appropriate 'register', or level
of formality, with which to address and respond to interlocutors. The SOAS
course emphasises the relationship between Japanese language and culture.
'In class, participants are expected to behave in a Japanese way from the
word go, and the lectors are very strict about that,' explains Wendy Moor,
the project co-ordinator. 'It is important preparation for when they go to
Japan and work there. The protocol and etiquette of Japanese business life
are absolutely vital. You can't really separate culture and language.'
The courses are taxing. The demands, not only of an unfamiliar language, but
also of an unfamiliar discipline, place strain on the students. 'The most
intelligent, articulate, open-minded person will still have problems,'
admits Wendy Moor. 'Everybody's pulled through so far, but it's been tough.'
Course providers in both the public and private sectors agree that between
nine months and a year of intensive study is required to reach a level at
which one can expect to converse in most business and social situations.
This inevitably poses problems for companies. Many staff who need to learn
Japanese will be senior personnel, and not readily spared for long periods.
But companies with a serious 'Japan strategy' are making the commitment.
Cable &amp; Wireless, for example, is planning to train one employee per year on
the SOAS programme for the next ten years, spearheading a continuing Japan
development programme, and building the training into the career structure
of suitable personnel. New corporate sponsors for the SOAS course starting
this month include the Oracle Corporation, and Sotheby's.
The insight which staff gain through knowledge of the language is worth the
investment, according to Dr Clive Morton of the engineering company Komatsu
UK. 'The logic of it is that they learn the Japanese approaches,' he says.
'They can understand where Japanese engineers are coming from, in particular
in terms of their design activity and production improvements.'
But while government and industrial leaders are ringing in their
exhortations, many at grass roots level are less than convinced they need to
act. 'We've been quite disappointed at the reaction of many companies,' says
Wendy Moor. 'Some simply don't have any idea of what it is to learn Japanese
at business level. They still think you can learn by having once-a-week
evening classes.'
There is no objective evidence on whether this reluctance is recession-led,
or due to a lack of corporate imagination. But Wendy Moor feels that more
must be done to change their minds. 'I think it's a question of educating
companies into what we're trying to do,' she says. 'They should have a
Japanese approach in how they train their staff - in a nutshell, long term.
The Japanese think ten, 20 years ahead. And in Britain especially, that's
not how we think at all. That's why we're getting behind. We're losing the
race.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11394</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Special Report on Language Courses: Business looks out for
the linguists
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARILYN BENTLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH business is in no doubt about the need for a multilingual work
force. Participants in a recent report by the Institute of Manpower Studies*
considered that a lack of language skills restricted the pattern of trade,
led to misunderstandings and stress, and prevented business activity in
certain countries.
But a gulf exists between the perceived needs in British companies, and the
action necessary to meet them. The same IMS report concludes that 'in most
companies, few employees received language training.'
Those who do are likely to be the recipients of brief, total immersion
programmes. Linguistic short-termism is widespread in British boardrooms.
Intensive courses, while arguably the most effective way to learn a foreign
language, are also the most expensive - particularly if the skill acquired
in the heat of secondment to the Bonn office is lost within months of a
return to the UK.
Knowledge of a foreign language, like any skill acquired through training,
will atrophy unless put into practice and sustained. Yet few British
companies provide a culture in which staff are encouraged to maintain their
hard-won competence. Positive corporate initiatives are needed to ensure
that language skills are maintained at an operational level:
Conduct a language audit. It is essential to know who can do what. This may
seem obvious, but companies often reveal a surprising ignorance of their
current language resources. One participant in the IMS study discovered that
the employee with the highest degree of language competence was the Polish
gardener.
Design programmes: There is a confusing variety of material and methodology
available, from simple 'get-by' texts and cassettes to sophisticated
interactive video courses. Different learners have different needs, and
no-one benefits from a random selection. A competent training provider will
assist in the design of programmes to meet specific objectives and
circumstances.
Set realistic goals: Continuing study should be geared towards appropriate
achievements. Maintenance at a given level of fluency is a realistic aim;
rapid progress is not.
Provide motivation: Few staff will take the trouble to maintain a skill for
which there is no perceived need. Use of the target language - on occasional
overseas trips, for example, or in monitoring the foreign media - should be
built into the work structure. 'It is back to career planning,' says Gavin
Barrett, international marketing director of Sundridge Park Management
Centre. 'But a bit more planning will pay off handsomely.'
Mr Barrett's organisation provides continuous language support for all those
likely to have international involvement. Even employees without front-line
contact are encouraged to join the same programmes, as part of their
self-development.
Staff at Sundridge Park are given a choice of which language they would like
to study. At present, the mainstream second language is French, with some
Spanish and Italian, and Russian at a basic 'survival' level. As well as
expert tuition 'bought in' from outside providers, and specific training in
the vocabulary of their industry, staff meet with others at a similar level
of fluency for 'du pain et du vin' working lunches, using the language in an
easy, idiomatic context.
The core of the training takes place in company hours, but at a time least
likely to disrupt normal work. Employees are encouraged to spend extra time
on study, by the funding of books and materials. Requests for more focussed
tuition are considered individually.
The overall attitude of the company is supportive. 'Self-study requires
exceptional motivation,' says Barrett. 'Unless the organisation sustains the
motivation and the morale, it can be a lonely path.'
But he is clear, too, about the pay-off in corporate terms: 'We have a
strong operational need to deliver abroad, and it is imperative to deliver
in the target language. It is part of our vision of being a leading provider
in business management. Languages are part of that.'
IMS Report No. 215: 'Foreign Language Needs of Business', Institute of
Manpower Studies, Mantell Building, University of Sussex, Falmer, Brighton
BN1 9RF.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11395</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Special Report on Language Courses: Japanese
Language/Business Courses sponsored by the DTI
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Bath College
1 year postgraduate In Japan: 5 months; 2 months at university, 3 months
industrial placement Contact: Julie De Looze 0225-874146
Essex University,
Contemporary Japan Centre 1 year postgraduate In Japan: 3 months at
university, 1 month industrial placement, 1 month to write dissertation (in
Japan or UK) Prof Ian Neary 0206-872543
London University, SOAS
1 year postgraduate In Japan: 3 months, 1 month at university, 2 months
industrial placement Wendy Moor 071-637-2388
North West Centre
1 year postgraduate, (taught as second year of an MBA with diploma in
Japanese, ie two years in total) In Japan: 6 months; 3 months at university,
3 months industrial placement Dr Nigel Campbell 061-275-6466
Sheffield University,
School of East Asian Studies
1 year postgraduate In Japan: 3 month industrial placement Mr Graham Healey
0742-768555 ex 4384
Stirling University, Scottish Centre for Japanese Studies
15 month postgraduate course In Japan: 3 months at university, 3 month
industrial placement (optional) Jenny Morris 0706-73171 Ex 7575
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11396</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Accounts in speedy detail -
Computing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CARTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YOUR sales invoices contain the details of everything you have ever sold,
your purchase invoices contain the details of everything you have ever
bought.
Recently I looked at the new type of sales and purchase ledger packages
which, when you enter an invoice, aim to capture all that vital sales and
purchase information in the greatest possible detail, enabling you to build
up sales and purchase history databases.
The new ledger packages allow you to store and display far more information
for each invoice. A listing of all invoices on an account will give an
entire history of everything you have sold to that customer, which before
would have been impossible.
To record sales and purchase invoices in this detail demands a lot of disk
space. It is only with the advent of unlimited disk storage that this has
become feasible. The potential is exciting, but as hundreds or thousands of
records build up in the sales history and purchase history, the problem
arises: how do you find your way around all this data?
Suppose, for example, you have 20,000 transaction records on your sales
history. One thing you will want to do is to find, quickly, one particular
record. This facility, sometimes called 'serial number/batch tracking' is
essential for companies who must be able to keep track of everything they
have ever sold, such as computer companies, or drug manufacturers.
If you wanted to find out which customer purchased that Deluxe Spoon, serial
number 123456, and when. It would be a long job to call up those 20,000
records one by one and try to find it yourself. The computer can do the job
for you by means of a 'string search'. You simply ask it to search through
the all the records, and find any record where the Description field
contains the character string '123456'. For a 20,000 record file this might
take about 30 seconds.
Apart from finding individual records, you need to analyse the information
in the sales and purchase history. Anyone who has ever had experience of a
large database on computer will know that the key to analysing it is to be
able to sort and search by reference to codes. The more codes you have
attached to each record, the better.
The new ledger packages handle this neatly. When you first want to do
business with Hotel XYZ, you must set up their account details in the sales
ledger. It invites you to fill in not only their name and address but
certain codes such as account code, area code, salesman code and so on.
Similarly, when you set up a new product record for Deluxe Spoons, you fill
in not only the description and price but also codes such as product number,
and price category.
As each invoice line is entered on to the ledger, the computer automatically
retrieves the codes associated with this customer and this product, and adds
them to the newly created sales history record. So, without any effort on
your part, all the records in your sales history are automatically coded by
salesman, area, price category and so on, ready for you to make your
enquiries. You simply tell the computer: 'Find me all the spoon sales made
to anyone in the hotel industry in the north-west of England in the first
six months of 1992.' Obediently it zips through 20,000 records and comes up
with the six that meet these criteria. All in 10 seconds flat.
There are a only a few of these new ledgers on the market, most introduced
during the last 12 months. In my last column I mentioned Business Manager, a
budget range package from Pegasus, a bargain at Pounds 299. This creates the
sales and purchase histories but does not transfer the codes from the
customer and product records. One of the new packages which does code the
history records is Sequel, a mid-range package developed by the ex-boss of
Pegasus.
Sequel can be ordered by telephone: 08015-466.
David Carter is a consultant in information systems for small businesses.
Tel: 0727-812447.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11397</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Look east for the quota problem -
A tale of frustration over international textile regulations
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY HUCKLE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
It all seemed so easy. Carolyn Whitwell had a shop in Bristol ready to open.
She had supplies of clothing ready to transport from India. She had never
even dreamed of the existence of the multi-fibre arrangement (MFA).
The MFA governs world trade in textiles. In practical terms it means that if
you want to export clothing from India you need 'quota' - approval from the
Indian authorities.
The origins of Carolyn's business lie in a twinning arrangement between the
Bishopston district of Bristol and the south Indian village of K V Kuppam.
The people of Bishopston asked those of K V Kuppam what they most wanted.
The answer came back: jobs.
An enterprise began, involving at first six tailors in India. K V Kuppam is
in a cotton-growing area with a traditional village textile industry.
Carolyn and her partner, Jaki Collard, supplied sample garments, and within
weeks the first products were ready.
Carolyn, a former nurse, had put herself through a business course at
Bristol University. She had no experience, but a lot of enthusiasm, and some
luck. A Pounds 1,500 insurance payout after her home was burgled provided
some working capital.
Then they heard about the quota. 'We knew nothing about international
trading,' said Carolyn, 'and we couldn't get our clothes out of India
without quota.'
Carolyn learnt that a quota was awarded on the basis of past export
performance. 'So how did new exporters get started?' Nobody knew - or nobody
who knew was telling.
In desperation, Carolyn rang everyone she could think of who might help. No
one wanted to know. Finally a friendly response from clothing retailers
Oasis Trading referred her to its Delhi agent.
From the agent Carolyn learned of 'sample quotas'. You could export 25
garments every 10 days, as samples. Form two companies and you could export
50 items every 10 days. Then there was 'first-come-first-served quota,'
awarded to those who put in the highest bids. And once established, you
qualify for 'past performance quota.'
Anomalies abound. Carolyn can never get enough dress quota. Why? Because
other exporters pass off long T-shirts as dresses to get round the shortage
of shirt quota. One wheeze she discovered was to package jackets and
trousers together and call them a suit: two garments thus pass as one item.
Eventually that first day of trading arrived. 'I was intoxicated,' she said.
'Then we ran out of stock after three weeks.' With 1,000 members of the
Bishopston Link there was no problem finding customers or staff for the
shop. But obtaining sufficient supplies was another matter. The Delhi agents
were far from K V Kuppam in south India. And they had to be paid months in
advance. In K V Kuppam, delays meant the village ran out of money to pay for
cloth and the tailors. In Bristol, garments had arrived in the wrong season.
At the end of the first year, all there was to show for the months of
struggle was a Pounds 15,000 loss. 'That was our worst point,' said Carolyn.
'But we could see why we had made a loss. The clothes had all arrived at the
wrong time and we had too much stock unsold.'
The next year they concentrated on improving quality. The village tailors
were used to making garments as fast as possible to maximise earnings. They
had to be persuaded they would be paid the same for making fewer but better
items.
By the third year Bishopston Trading, propped up with a bank loan, a second
mortgage and funds from Carolyn's grandfather, finally broke even.
Again, a friendly tip from a big company had come to their aid. The Delhi
agent was too far from the village, but P &amp; O responded to a call from
Carolyn and put her in touch with its own shipping agent in nearby Madras.
This modern, efficient, big-city agent was a world away from the primitive
village industry, but it agreed to take on Carolyn's little business. Some
staff knew nothing of village life, but in time the agents almost took the
role of managers, providing the on-the-ground control that was so hard to
supply from a distance.
Last year the agents came to the rescue when the workforce, by now 70
tailors and 140 handloom weavers, threatened to strike. What had seemed from
Bristol like a coming together of two communities - albeit a rich one and a
poor one, with a hefty dose of paternalism - seemed different from the
viewpoint of the Indian villager. Far from feeling humbly grateful to
western benefactors who had created so many jobs, Carolyn's workforce was
beginning to exert a little trade union muscle. Unknown to her, her workers
had been organised by a communist activist, and were demanding huge pay
rises.
Carolyn refused to pay, insisting that she was not an employer, simply a
benevolent buyer. With mediation from the Madras agents, a 20 per cent rise
was eventually agreed.
Today the business has a turnover of Pounds 250,000, with three shops, sales
through the Oxfam catalogue, and other outlets.
Carolyn readily admits to breaking all the rules of business. She does not
share the usual business motivation - making money for herself: only
recently she raised her own pay to Pounds 4 an hour. And profit is a
secondary factor after fair wages and prices, and creating employment  -
although in the last full year she made Pounds 15,000.
The export quota rules remain a bugbear and a constraint on growth - and
likely to remain so, with the Gatt talks on reforming world trade edging
closer to failure.
Bishopston Trading, 183 Gloucester Road, Bishopston, Bristol, BS7 8BG. 0272
245598
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT922-11398</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-CDYAPACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>920425
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  25 APR 92 / Minding Your Own Business: Peeled in the pink with pride -
The Lancashire producer of a British seafood delicacy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS LANDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN YOUR product has been made by the family business since 1799, bears the
name of your home town on its label, and has earned two Royal Warrants as
purveyors to Their Majesties The Queen and The Queen Mother, pride in the
product is justified.
Bob Baxter, proprietor of James Baxter and Son, Morecambe Bay, Lancashire,
hopes he has pride in his product sufficient to see off the two new threats
to his speciality food business (and to many similar businesses throughout
Europe): EC interference from Brussels, and the wave of new food legislation
which seems to make no distinction between small, independent food producers
and industrial giants.
His family - thanks to the combination of a fishing grandfather and a
grandmother on the commercial side - monopolised the Morecambe Bay fish
trade. Until the early 1950s Morecambe was an important seaside location:
weekend trains in the summer season disgorged 800 visitors every 15 minutes
at Morecambe station. The Baxters ran wet fish shops, five large
restaurants, fishing boats and a famous potted shrimp business.
As a lad, Bob Baxter used to look on to a bay filled with more than 100
small fishing boats; on my visit there were just six. He has spent 45 years
in the family business, selling the retail outlets ahead of Morecambe's
decline as a seaside resort; he now runs a business with a Pounds 500,000
turnover which includes more modern frozen foods, but it still produces the
traditional potted shrimps.
The shrimps live in the sandy estuaries of the rivers between north Wales
and the Solway Firth. Baxter only buys those trawled by professional
fishermen in the traditional 25 ft boats.
Twenty stone of shrimp is a good catch for the eight-hour voyage. Once on
board, the shrimps are cleaned and cooked in boiling sea water. Later they
are hand peeled by the fishermen and their wives in approved premises, then
delivered to Baxter.
Kathleen and Doreen, with more than 35 years' experience between them, take
over. In a small room, no bigger than a domestic kitchen, the shrimps are
re-cooked in small batches in spiced butter - the recipe is a trade secret -
and allowed to cool. Then 2oz cartons are filled with 1 3/4 oz shrimps each,
and  1/4 oz butter lovingly spooned across the top to seal and protect the
contents.
The process is swift: out of the sea and into the pot in a maximum of 36
hours. It is simple, too: there is only one quality standard. Asked by a
potentially important customer to produce potted shrimps to a slightly lower
specification, Bob Baxter refused.
On a busy day Kathleen and Doreen fill 750 pots; in a good year, 150,000. In
the past, the weather was the biggest obstacle - not merely storms, but
changes on the sea bed occurring every eight years. In 1991 the shrimp catch
was reduced by 40 per cent.
Baxter now feels that the obstacles are multiplying, and that they are
increasingly man-made. Like most professional food handlers he cares about
hygiene and safety: the shrimps are regularly analysed by an independent
laboratory, and his formica-topped tables were replaced by stainless steel
long before any directives appeared. But he has no truck with the sentiment
expressed by a government health official, that the main drive for quality
should be fear of prosecution. For Baxter, the priorities are a good product
and a satisfied customer.
Last year, as recession was also affecting sales, two new obstacles
materialised. First, the EC decided to classify the one-man 25ft trawling
boats as 'factory ships.' Although not yet passed into law, this directive
could lead to the end of the immediate boiling of the shrimps in sea water,
an important part of the traditional process. Instead, the small fishing
vessels would be required to carry huge quantities of fresh water and ice on
board.
Then the new Food Safety Act, by initially proscribing mail order business
and stipulating that all deliveries to wholesalers be made by refrigerated
transport, threatened to break the contact between Baxter and his customers.
The second stipulation means that he can no longer supply his retail or
restaurant customers with fresh potted shrimps; they now have to make do
with frozen shrimps. (There is, though, no significant difference in taste:
at certain times of the year the shrimps are frozen to ensure a constant
supply.)
Fortunately for all small-scale UK food producers, the ban on mail order
business was lifted, allowing it to continue to the 'end-user': the private
customer. For Baxter this was critical: local trade now accounts for only 5
per cent of his entire production. In late 1991 he placed an advertisement
in a national newspaper, offering ten 2oz pots at Pounds 19.90 inclusive of
packing and postage. Pounds 4,000 worth of new business was the result.
There has been speedy repeat business from grateful customers. If he can
maintain momentum, Baxter plans a small modern unit to handle mail orders.
James Baxter &amp; Son, Thornton Road, Morecambe, Lancashire LA4 5PP. Tel:
0524-410910.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
